,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:

About us, but well be brief

We are thrilled to share that FORTUNE has named Experian one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For. In addition, for the last five years weve been name in the top 100 Worlds Most Innovative Companies by Forbes Magazine.

Experian DataLabs is a R&D unit at Experian formed with the desire to work in collaboration with Experians business units to enhance relationships with clients and acquire strategic datasets. Experian® is a global leader in providing information, analytical tools and marketing services to organizations and consumers to help manage the risk and reward of commercial and financial decisions. Using our comprehensive understanding of individuals, markets and economies, we help organizations find, develop and manage customer relationships to make their businesses more profitable.

What youll be doing
Leading research and development projects on machine learning and data analytics.
Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets
Identify/develop appropriate machine learning/deep learning/natural language understanding/natural language processing techniques to uncover the value of the data
Designing data structure and data storage schemes for efficient data manipulation and information retrieval
Developing tools for data processing and information retrieval
Developing data driven models to quantify the value of a given data set
Applying, developing and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems
Validating score performance and conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting model process and model performance
Qualification:

What your background looks like
Advanced degree in Machine Learning, Data Science, AI, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math or other quantitative fields
2-5 years of working experience in data science, and/or predictive modeling
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish
Ability to independently support existing products
Proven track record in modifying and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems
Experience in deep learning (CNN, RNN, LSTM, attention models, etc.), machine learning (SVM, GLM, boosting, random forest, etc.), graph models, and/or, reinforcement learning.
Experience with open source tools for deep learning and machine learning technology such as Keras, tensorflow, pytorch, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.
Proven ability to work independently on development of complex models with extremely large and complex data structures
Proficient in more than one of Python, R, Java, C++, or C
Experience in large data analysis using Spark (pySpark preferred)
Robust knowledge and experience with statistical methods
Plusses\:
Extensive knowledge of MATLAB and SQL
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as Map Reduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, mongoDB, Cassandra, etc.
Experience with online, mobile marketing analytics
Experience with GPU programming
Experience with Natural Language Processing, Natural Language Understanding, and the relevant open-source tools
Solid knowledge of Bayesian statistical inference and related machine learning methods.
Experience with Agile methods for software development
Perks
Three weeks of vacation to start, five sick days and two volunteer days (plus eleven paid holidays)
Competitive pay and comprehensive benefits package, with a bonus target of 20%
Flexible work schedule and relaxed dress code
EOE including Disability/Veteran",4.1,"Experian Information Solutions, Inc.
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
1,Data Scientist,-1,"The Data Scientist will participate in the development and deployment of PeopleReadys machine learning solutions. She/he will develop machine learning solutions as part of a collaborative agile team, contributing not only quality code, pipeline architecture, and ideas, but also helping grow the PeopleReady Technology culture: a group of people who deliver top-notch software solutions and enjoy working together to solve exciting problems. The role will require excellent data science, machine learning engineering, and AWS architecture skills, as well as a high level of verbal and written communication.

Duties & Responsibilities:
Self-driven member of the data science team using the Agile Scrum process to successfully deliver machine learning solutions which will delight PeopleReadys associates, customers, and/or internal stakeholders.
Write high quality code in Python to deliver critical data science functionality.
Work collaboratively with PeopleReady machine learning engineers, data engineers, DBAs, and business stakeholders.
Passionately engage in an automation culture throughout delivery: testing, deployment, configuration.
Participate in user story estimation and grooming sessions, driving to delivery predictability and reliability.
Cooperate with data scientists and the lead machine learning engineer to ensure that your work follows PeopleReady Technology standards.
Participate in regular peer code reviews with other team members as well as full-team development showcases.
Requirements:
Experience with Python, object-oriented programming, and test-driven development
Experience using Jupyter notebooks and common data science libraries, such as NumPy, Pandas, and Matplotlib
Experience using TensorFlow, PyTorch, and/or MXNet
Experience using Amazon SageMaker
Experience developing end-to-end machine learning workflows and implementing machine learning engineering best practices
Experience identifying Data science use cases based on domain knowledge of the business operations/processes
Experience with feature selection and dataset scoping for individual data science use cases by using SQL to query large relational databases, such as SQL Server, PostgreSQL, or AWS Aurora
Experience with data preprocessing and feature engineering of structured datasets
Experience using Amazon SageMakers built-in algorithms for a variety of use cases, such as linear regression, logistic regression, dimensionality reduction, anomaly detection, clustering, forecasting, and natural language processing
Strong understanding how learning rate, batch size, L1/L2 regularization, network size, and other hyperparameters affect loss functions and model performance
Experience defining, selecting and optimizing proper model accuracy metrics, such as precision, recall, F1 score, and AUC
Experience with software engineering best practices, such as modularization, optimization, unit testing, proper documentation, logging, code commits/reviews, and clean code best practices
Experience with Agile Scrum methodology
Experience using Docker and ECR to containerize machine learning models as SageMaker estimators
Experience deploying machine learning and data science models to production as serverless microservices using AWS API Gateway and AWS Lambda
Experience with real-time/batch inference and online/offline inference
Experience with SOA design patterns, microservices architectures, and REST web services
Demonstrate a portfolio of end-to-end data science based solutions
Desire to participate in building a DevOps/MLOps culture with commitment and ownership
Excellent written, verbal and interpersonal communication skills
Other Desirable Skills/Experience (Bonus):
Experience with AWS cloud-based infrastructure and services
Experience building serverless architectures using AWS Lambda
Experience with AWS AI/ML services, such as Rekognition, Transcribe, Polly, Lex, Translate, and/or Comprehend
Experience with PySpark/EMR and distributed data preprocessing
Experience with AWS Glue for serverless ETL
Experience with Amazon Kinesis Firehose
Experience with machine learning container orchestration, such as TFX/Kubeflow or ECS/EKS with Fargate
Self-sufficient and highly motivated, self-directed and possess high energy
Experience working in a virtual delivery environment
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law.

#PIQJAB

Jbergman@PeopleReady.com

Internal ID: 103710",3.4,"PeopleReady
3.4",North Carolina,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1989,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
2,Senior Scientist - Synthetic Biology,-1,"Role Description
We are seeking a skilled and experienced Synthetic Biologist or Protein Engineer to join our R&D team. The Senior Scientist will be responsible for leading, managing, and executing complex R&D initiatives involving synthetic biology, protein engineering, antibody engineering, and machine learning. The Senior Scientist will act as the primary scientific lead for multiple high-priority external partnerships and collaborations. From a technical perspective, the role will largely involve designing and building yeast surface display libraries, performing and monitoring experimental assays, analyzing next-generation sequencing data, and presenting results internally and externally. The ideal candidate will have impeccable communication and organizational skills, allowing them to effectively manage multiple projects simultaneously. To be successful in this role, candidates must be ambitious, detail-oriented, and comfortable in a rapidly growing and highly dynamic biotech start-up environment.
Responsibilities
Lead, design, manage and execute internal and external R&D programs aimed at discovering and optimizing therapeutics
Lead and participate in discussions to determine R&D strategy and define project specifications with external partners and collaborators
Collaborate closely with the Computational Biology Team to analyze massive protein-protein interaction datasets while addressing key research questions
Independently author detailed, accurate, and accessible documentation of experiments and data
Present scientific findings to the internal team and to external partners
Transfer developed and optimized processes to the Production Team, assist with troubleshooting, and write and revise process documentation
Mentor, train, and manage junior members of the R&D and Production Teams
Stay current with scientific literature and present to the team on relevant topics
Qualifications Required
Ph.D. in Life/Chemical/Physical/Engineering Sciences and 5+ years of post-doctoral or industry experience
Impressive technical track record at top-tier academic institutions or companies
Synthetic biology experience and strong molecular biology skills
Experience with DNA encoded libraries (yeast/phage display, yeast-two-hybrid, etc.)
Self-motivation, intellectual curiosity, and excitement to carry out interdisciplinary research involving complex experimental and bioinformatics pipelines
Strong written and oral communication skills
Strong organizational skills
Preferred
Experience in the role of scientific lead or PI on complex research projects
Strong statistics and data science skills in Python (Pandas, Matplotlib, SciPy)
Experience with protein engineering, antibody engineering, and drug discovery
Technical proficiency with at least 1 macromolecular modeling suite, preferably Rosetta
Familiarity with next-generation sequencing platforms, including sample preparation and analysis for Illumina and Oxford Nanopore",-1,Bevov,"Seattle, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
3,Senior Data Scientist,$98k-$158k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position is available for remote employment in these areas:
Boston MA, Draper UT
Job Description:


The Opportunity

Pluralsight Iris is the learning intelligence platform built within Pluralsight. It helps technologists worldwide discover the learning they need to achieve their personal and career goals in technology.

As a data scientist on our core team, you will help us solve novel statistical, machine learning, and data science problems by building and improving on the intelligence of Iris. We are looking for an experienced data scientist who loves tackling ambiguous problems, finding creative and practical solutions, and producing concrete prototypes that will become a key part of Pluralsight’s user experience. You’ll work closely with an established team of top-notch, collaborative data scientists and you will collaborate with a cross-functional product team that is responsible for one of Pluralsight’s key differentiators.

Who you are:
You are intellectually curious, collaborative, and highly driven with an entrepreneurial mindset. You have excellent critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills.
You can guide complex projects from ideation and planning to model design to deployment and independently make decisions about the technical approach
You have a solid data science toolkit that you can leverage, with knowledge of and understanding of how and when to apply different algorithms and technical approaches.
You have a strong foundation in Machine Learning, Computer Science, and Statistics.
You have mastery of either Python or R. Regardless of your favorite scientific computing environment, you can flex between the two languages.
You know your way around SQL-like databases (e.g. PostGres, Impala, Hive) and even better if you have experience with Spark and other big data platforms.
You are able to perform rapid prototyping of experimental solutions, writing readable, scalable, and reproducible code.
You can describe and speak in an approachable way about complex analyses and concepts within a cross-functional team. You are a great “analytic translator”.
What you’ll do:
You will collaborate with product teams to understand and solve complex problems; envisioning and creating data science solutions needed to drive our user experience outcomes.
You will create, iterate, and innovate on models and algorithms and collaborate with team members to implement them on the Pluralsight platform.
You will evaluate and introduce new technology by developing proof-of-concepts and prototypes and effectively communicating highly complex information to Experience team partners and leaders
You will propose and design experiments to test new product features and analyze their results.
You will also serve as a data science expert and consultant to Pluralsight’s product teams, leveraging your statistical and analytical skills to answer ad hoc questions.
Experience you’ll need:
M.S. or Ph.D in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, or related quantitative discipline
Minimum 5 years in a non-academic data science role, conducting analysis, developing algorithms and building prototypes
Experience working with product development teams and/or with developers
#LI-Remote",4.3,"Pluralsight
4.3","Draper, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
4,Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHAT YOU WILL DO IN THIS POSITION:

·Perform analytical research to identify and resolve routine data issues impacting NCCI’s data providers and NCCI products and services.Responsible for identifying the nature of data issues and invoking developed solutions to resolve the issues on our Unit Data Validation team.

·Based on knowledge of the system and/or data type supported; provide needed testing support for baseline, discretionary, and investment projects impacting the core work.

·Identify and/or resolve customer data issues and assist data providers in the resolution of these issues.

·Provide testing and systems support - including researching issues to determine if NCCI systems issues are contributing to the root cause.

·Prepare documentation to resolve system requirements, procedures, or customer communication to resolve issues impacting core work functions and customer group supported.

·Participate in process review and improvement of team functions.

·Provide support to newer team members and collaborate with team members on resolutions to data provider challenges.

WHAT’S IN IT FOR YOU:
A competitive starting base salary plus a targeted 7% annual performance bonus
A Monday through Friday work schedule
A phenomenal work environment with perks including onsite restaurant and coffee shop, employee activities, onsite fitness center, and sports leagues
A wonderful team of fun, caring and friendly people to work with
A fantastic benefits package that’s hard to find in south Florida


WHAT YOU MUST BRING TO THE ROLE:

·Bachelor's Degree and 2 years in an analytical role in a service-oriented, financial, and/or insurance related enterprise where primary work performed uses web-based or other business systems.

·In lieu of the work experience requirement, a degree with coursework in any of the following: database and/or system management or design, data extraction, data mining, or data warehousing.

·In lieu of a bachelor’s degree, 5 years relevant work experience as indicated above is required.

·Ability to perform independent research using business applications, databases, data viewing tools, and reports to identify root cause and resolve data issues

·Ability to identify system issues are present and tests system changes to confirm resolution

·Ability to identify nature of customer issues and implement fixes from established resolution plans

·Experience participating in efforts to improve team processes / providing suggestions on team duties

·Ability to lead customer teleconferences to resolve issues – including agenda preparation and minutes

·Ability to interface professionally and effectively with higher-level staff / management on customer side

·Ability to prepare appropriate internal reports on customer issues to be shared with broad audience

·Solid knowledge of navigating web-based systems to provide training /assistance to customers

·Ability to independently handle multiple tasks to meet established deadlines and SLAs

·Ability to provide inbound / outbound customer support - owning a variety of inquiries simultaneously

·Ability to makes proactive calls to customers providing them with the needed detail to help them understand and resolve issues

·Strong computer, verbal, written, and teaming skills to deliver on assignments

·Ability to take on work outside comfort zone to develop skills for future assignments

·Proficient with Microsoft Office - Outlook, Word, Excel

WHAT WILL MAKE YOU A MORE VIABLE CANDIDATE:

·Knowledge of insurance, claims, or financial data

WHO WE ARE:

Since 1923, NCCI has been committed to fostering a healthy workers compensation system. We are the nation’s trusted source for accurate, objective workers compensation information. We are the industry leader. At NCCI, we recognize that our employees are the reason our legacy endures today. We’re motivated by the opportunity to do challenging and interesting work, and our Total Rewards package attracts top talent. Our employees care about each other and the communities in which they live and work. Our values of integrity, respect, quality and excellence, responsibility, and commitment, guide our success.

We require a drug screen and background check.

EEO / Smoke free environment",4.4,"NCCI Holdings
4.4","Boca Raton, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1923,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
5,Data Engineer,$58k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

As a Data Engineer on the Alteryx Data Science team, you will be part of an innovative and groundbreaking team, being primarily responsible for engineering a world class enterprise data management platform and driving continuous improvement for a world class analytics company. You will work closely with data architects, other data engineers, data scientists, and line of business associates to build out new system features/functionality and help bring thoughtfully curated data system and products to the Alteryx organization.  Success in this role is critical to our mission of becoming a world-class Data Science team and fostering Alteryx’s Data Science journey!

Position details/requirements:
Build, test, monitor and maintain a highly scalable data management ecosystem
Execute architected techniques and solutions for data collection, management and usage
Take business requirements and produce data sets for efficient cross-business analysis
Extreme focus on detail and data quality validation
Deep interest in the data and analytics market with ability to constantly evaluate new ways to enhance the telemetry system and train it to be smarter and more scalable
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***

Qualifications:

Need to Have
3+ years of data engineering / development / integration experience
Experience with Enterprise Data Warehouse development
Comfortable with data modeling practices (normalizing, dimensionalizing)
Ability to read and create ERDs
Intermediate SQL experience
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail
Ability to work with geographically distributed teams
Ability to work with other teams across an organization
Strong oral and written communication
Helpful to Have
BA/BS degree in Information Science, Data Analytics, Computer Science, Software Engineering or related technical field
Experience with Alteryx platform
Experience with Snowflake
Knowledge of at least one modern scripting language (Python, R, etc.)
Understanding of cloud infrastructure
Experience with automated software testing and deployment
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation,
3 weeks of vacation, 9 holidays, and additional sick days, floating holidays, and volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness allowance annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
6,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data scientist who has a great passion for solving business problems by providing data insights through data modeling and analysis. You will work with senior leadership and data/technology teams to understand and solve complex business problems by developing data models and various techniques to analyze the health populations.

Responsibilities:
Derive insights from data analysis and modeling using multiple datasets, derived from the company platform, data provided by our customers etc.
Develop a comprehensive profile of the patient/member using the data available.
Apply statistical techniques to understand health data and analyze outcomes.
Apply data science algorithms and techniques to understand the member profile and prepare the data such that these insights help the care management team in addressing needs of our customers and members.
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience (claims, groupers) is a plus.
Technologies:
Data science: Analysis/Machine learning/AI algorithms and modeling.
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,Enterprise Data Analyst,$41k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Five Star Bank and affiliate companies are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles and ensure that all other personnel actions are administered without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, citizenship, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic. Five Star Bank and affiliate companies are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to employees and applicants with disabilities to the full extent required by the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA). If you feel you need a reasonable accommodation pursuant to the ADA, you are encouraged to contact us at (585) 786-4344, (585) 498 - 7565 or (585) 786-1417.

Position Title: Enterprise Data Analyst

Location/Affiliate: FSB Plaza– Chestnut Street

Reports To (Title): Enterprise Data Manager Department: Enterprise Data Management

FLSA Status: Exempt

Purpose: The Enterprise Data Analyst collects, interprets, and analyzes data to support the corporate goals and strategic initiatives.

Scope and direction

Area of Responsibility: Enterprise Data Management

Degree of Supervision Received (Minimal, Moderate or Extensive): Moderate

From (Title): Enterprise Data Manager

Degree of Supervision Given (None, Minimal, Moderate or Extensive): None

To (Title(s)): N/A

Essential Functions: The major duties of the job that constitute the fundamental tasks and or responsibilities of the position. Employees must be able to perform the essential functions of the position with or without reasonable accommodations.

1. Supports Enterprise Data Management initiatives, including identification of data sources, maintenance of data dictionary, and troubleshooting data issues.

2. Adheres to and helps support established Data Governance policies and procedures.

3. Prepares and publishes standard reporting, dashboards, etc. for various constituencies throughout the organization.

4. Provides analytical and statistical support necessary to complete data requests, campaigns, projects and other activities.

5. Works with business units to define scope and requirements for data requests and conveys those requirements to IT as needed.

6. Supports and maintains enterprise data sources and systems, where appropriate.

7. Demonstrates the standards and principles of the Five Star experience in every interaction with internal and external customers and associates. Incorporates the high-performance behaviors of teamwork, leading by example and service in every facet of work

8. This job description is not exhaustive. The Enterprise Data Analyst may be required to perform other duties as assigned.

Job-Related Qualifications

Education:

Required: Bachelor’s Degree in marketing, Market

Research, Data Analysis, Finance or

related field

-OR-

Required: Associate Degree in Marketing,

Market Research, Data Analysis, Finance

or related field

Preferred: Bachelor’s Degree in marketing, Market

Research, Data Analysis, Finance or

related field

Prior Experience:

Years: 2+ Type: Marketing, Market Research, Data

Analysis, or Finance

Years: 4+ Type: Marketing, Market Research, Data

Analysis, or Finance

Years: 2+ Type: Marketing, Market Research, Data

Analysis, or Finance

Licenses or Accreditation:

Required:

Preferred:

Competencies:

1. Excellent written and verbal communications skills

2. Ability to present information in an effective concise manner to employees with diverse skill sets

3. Excellent organizational skills with ability to manage multiple priorities and meet established deadlines

4. Analytical ability to interpret data and present it in a meaningful and easily understood form

5. Proficient in Microsoft Office, especially Excel, with the ability to learn and utilize new and existing banking software applications

6. Proven working application of SQL, data visualization (Power BI preferred), and other business intelligence tools

7. Knowledge of or the ability to learn the intricacies of bank products and services

8. Ability to work with all levels of staff and share ideas to achieve companywide results

Physical Requirements:

1. Able to regularly sit for prolonged periods of time

2. Extensive computer usage is required

3. Occasional travel within the corporate footprint

Note: At a later stage in the application process, applicants may be required to provide information about their criminal conviction history, if any, and to authorize the procurement of a consumer report that will contain, among other things, information about criminal conviction history. Except as required by applicable law, past criminal convictions will not automatically disqualify an applicant from employment, and Five Star Bank will only consider such history in accordance with applicable law. Please be advised, however, that federal law prohibits Five Star Bank from employing“any person who has been convicted of any criminal offense involving dishonesty or a breach of trust or money laundering, or has agreed to enter into a pretrial diversion or similar program in connection with a prosecution for such offense” unless the FDIC has provided prior written consent.",3.1,"Five Star Bank
3.1","Rochester, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
8,Data Scientist,$90k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description/Responsibilities


Position Summary:Nutrisystem is seeking a Data Analyst to join its growing Analytics community. This role will develop, manage, and deliver analytical solutions to solve complex business challenges. The Data Analyst will closely interact with online and offline Marketing, Product Development, Call Center Sales, Retail and Finance to influence key business decisions through fact-driven insights. The ideal candidate will possess excellent analytical and communication skills and have a history of thriving in fast- paced business environments.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

• Develop queries and performs extensive programming to access, transform and prepare data for analysis, ad-hoc and automated reporting and modeling. Create visualizations for variety of projects.

• Support ad-hoc analysis, discussions and conclusions around the efficacy of marketing channels to drive revenue per customer, length of stay and lifetime value.

• Analyze data to describe customer behavior and preferences, understand marketing channel effectiveness, diagnose customer experience problems, size marketing opportunity and measure the impact of marketing initiatives.

• Prepare and deliver insight presentations and recommendations. Communicates complex material in digestible terms appropriate for each audience. Educate company executives and the broader team on analytical findings and implications using storytelling and data visualization techniques.

• Design analytic plans, translating business problems/opportunities into analytic approaches. Engage with project sponsors and stakeholders to understand each business question. Probe for hidden questions and goals. Bring structure to each request and translate requirements into the appropriate analytic approach.

• Participate in special projects and performs other duties as required.

Qualifications


• Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Analytics, Operations Research, Information Technology, Computer Science or other quantitative field required. Master’s degree preferred.• Must have minimum of five (5) years of experience working in an analytical role with a history of taking on additional responsibilities with data analysis, measurement reporting

• Must have five (5) years of experience with SQL programming

• Must have minimum of three (3) years of experience working with relational databases and associated data query tools. Experience with cloud databases a plus (e.g. AWS Redshift, Google BigQuery, Snowflake).

• Must have proficiency in data visualization and report writing technologies using at least one of the following Business Intelligence tools Tableau, Power BI, QLIK or SAS. Knowledge of Looker preferred.

• Domain experience in marketing analytics: customer acquisition, digital marketing, response modeling, identifying customer needs, predicting customer behavior, next best offer, churn, customer lifetime value preferred

• Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

• Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Experience presenting to senior executives distilling complex concepts into actionable recommendations

• Advanced Microsoft Excel skills including pivot tables, data manipulation and analysis

• Ability to work in a team-oriented environment.

About Tivity Health:

Tivity Health® (Nasdaq: TVTY) is a leading provider of healthy life-changing solutions, including SilverSneakers®, Nutrisystem®, Prime® Fitness, Wisely Well™, South Beach Diet® and WholeHealth Living®. We are actively addressing the social determinants of health, defined as the conditions in which we work, live and play. From improving health outcomes to reversing the narrative on inactivity, food insecurity, social isolation and loneliness, we are making a difference and are transforming the way we do health. Learn more at TivityHealth.com.

Tivity Health is an equal employment opportunity employer and is committed to a proactive program of diversity development. Tivity Health will continue to recruit, hire, train, and promote into all job levels without regard to race, religion, gender, marital status, familial status, national origin, age, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, source of income, or veteran status.",3.0,"Tivity Health
3.0","Fort Washington, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
10,Web Data Analyst,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Web Data Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Our customer promise is worth bragging about. Use your marketing and advertising expertise to spread the word and grow our business.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Collect web data and statistics for Uline’s various eCommerce websites (Uline.com, Uline.ca and Uline.mx).
Analyze data and provide weekly and monthly reports to management.
Make recommendations to improve website and reduce return rates.
Translate complex and analytical work into easy to understand data points.
Respond to ad hoc reporting requests and maintain relationships with various departments.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
Experience using Google Analytics or Adobe Analytics.
Experience using a data visualization tool such as Power BI or Tableau.
2+ years experience in website analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Excel with some knowledge of SQL and / or Google BigQuery.
Well organized and detail-oriented with an ability to multitask.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-SR1
#CORP",3.6,"Uline
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
11,Applied Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Redesign Health is a proud Equal Opportunity Employer we recruit, train, compensate and promote our team members based on qualifications. We know how important it is not only to include, but to actively seek out a diversity of opinions and voices.

We want to hear from you regardless of your race, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, veteran status, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.

About Anomaly


Anomaly is a healthcare technology company with a bold mission: to bring precision payments to healthcare.

Healthcare billing is complex, prone to errors, waste, abuse, and fraudat a cost of over $300 billion annually. Precision payments means the right amount is paid the first time, so the focus is on members, not on payment paperwork. Cutting-edge AI/ML technology immediately catches anomalous claims, enabling payments to flow with precision. Anomaly's team of technical, clinical, and operational experts is working with innovative payers and employers to implement this vision. Our team includes the former CEO of UnitedHealthcare Employer & Individual, head of engineering of Foursquare and Redesign Health, and formers from Optum, Apple, Google and other leading tech and healthcare companies.

Anomaly, currently in stealth mode, was incubated by Redesign Health.

About Redesign Health


Redesign Health is a healthcare innovation platform. The Redesign team brings together entrepreneurs, industry experts, and investors to fund and launch companies that transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives. Their first companies include Lively, Ever/Body, Vault Health, Springtide, HealthQuarters, Calibrate, and stealth ventures in payment integrity, sleep therapy, elder care, and complex care. Redesign is capitalized with permanent capital from world-class institutional investors and entrepreneurs.

About the Applied Machine Learning Engineer Role


As our Applied Machine Learning Engineer, you will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team in order to execute cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data. Your goal is to train and test models on millions of data-points, and help build-out a state-of-the-art human-in-the-loop ML infrastructure.

In this role, you will report directly to the Head of Data Science at our New York City headquarters. This role will remote until it is safe to return to the office. You will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team. You will also engage in daily interactions with domain experts on the payment integrity team.

What you'll do:
Write production-level machine learning models
Executing cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data.
Making infrastructural choices in order to ensure that the trained models scale well across millions of health insurance claims
Collaborate with the team to build internal tools to support our company mission
Working with domain experts in the health insurance field to incorporate their knowledge into trained models.
Building interactive internal tools to obtain expert feedback for the purposes of model validation.
Have strong impact on innovative engineering projects
Running unsupervised anomaly detection on millions of heterogeneous health-insurance features using PySpark.
Shining a bright light on black-box models to make all anomalous signals easily interpretable.
Interacting with domain experts and encoding their experience into simple heuristics. Pushing these heuristics to production for the purposes of weak supervision.
Training large-scale, weakly-supervised ML models using tools like Snorkel. Making sure these models are interpretable.
Tweaking models using expert feedback. Building dashboards to solicit that feedback using human-in-the-loop training techniques.
Experimenting with transformer model applications using the Pytorch / Tensorflow libraries.
What you'll need:


Background
Standard knowledge of Python data-science stack
5+ years in software engineering experience
Hacker mindset
Experience building out production-ready machine learning solutions
Skills
Communicates Effectively: Attentively listens to others. Adjusts to fit the audience and the message. Provides timely and helpful information to others across the organization. Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.
Manages Ambiguity: Deals comfortably with the uncertainty of change. Effectively handles risk. Can decide and act without having the total picture. Is calm, and productive, even when things are up in the air.
Courage: Readily tackles tough assignments. Faces difficult issues and supports others who do the same. Provides direct and actionable feedback.
Instills Trust: Follows through on commitments. Is seen as direct and truthful. Keeps confidences. Practices what he/she preaches. Shows consistency between words and actions. Gaining the confidence and trust of others through honesty, integrity, and authenticity
Action Oriented: Readily takes action on challenges, without unnecessary planning. Identifies and seizes new opportunities. Displays a can-do attitude in good and bad times. Steps up to handle tough issues.
Nice To Have
Exposure to PySpark, PyTorch, Snorkel
Experience working in a fast-paced, innovative environment
What Redesign is all about


Redesign's mission is to transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives by elevating patient experiences, increasing information transparency, and democratizing access to high quality healthcare.

Our vision is to connect extraordinary people and ideas with capital and resources to create better healthcare solutions.

At Redesign, we value achieving results thoughtfully, quickly, and compassionately. To give a sense of what our team is all about, these are the values that guide our work:
Solve for impact: Healthcare is complex and opaque, but we're positioned to meet the challenge. If not us, then who?
Patients first: We are all consumers of healthcare. We create real solutions for real needs.
Outcome over egos: Our work is bigger than us. What we're building together is greater than the sum of the parts.
Bias for action: We move fast, but we're deliberate. We don't delay success or failure.
Continuous learning: We seek feedback early and often. Iteration and insight allow us to connect the dots and are key to our process.
Practice good intent: We take our work seriously, but we're never too busy to be kind.
Why work with us?
Competitive salary and equity compensation
Comprehensive health & wellness benefits and perks
Lunch & Learn sessions hosted by internal and external industry experts featuring topics ranging from ""Qualities of a Strong Consumer Brand"" to ""Combating Unconscious Bias""
Variety of functional, social, and community focused groups and meetups across the Redesign ecosystem and portfolio
Annual learning stipend
16-week parental leave
Fully stocked kitchen with plenty of coffee and tea, cold brew and iced tea on tap, a Bevi machine, and a variety of snacks
Dog friendly office",5.0,"Redesign Health
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
12,Cheminformatics Data Scientist,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"30-Oct-2020

Job ID
305764BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""250! That’s the number of data scientists leading a digital revolution at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

We are looking for a highly motivated data scientist to leverage deep learning and cheminformatics to enable our early drug discovery portfolio. As a domain specialist, you will collaborate closely with an innovative global team of in silico drug hunters in the Chemical Biology & Therapeutics Data Science (CBT DS) group at Novartis Institutes for Biochemical Research (NIBR).

You will also be part of a larger, global Data Science team with expertise in bioinformatics, computational biology, screening analytics, data engineering and predictive modeling, that combine expertise to gain a molecular understanding of disease etiology, to identify novel targets and chemical matter, assess preclinical model translation relevance and patient population heterogeneity. The team’s mission is to impact early stage drug discovery and advance biomedical research using innovative computational approaches with emphasis on data stewardship for predictive science. Together we are the brokers between data and the next wet-lab experiment.
This is a unique opportunity in an interdisciplinary environment at the intersection of chemical biology, genomics, biophysics, cheminformatics, and molecular modeling.

Your responsibilities will include:

•Champion in the group for current methods in deep learning.
•Develop novel deep learning workflows and apply them to lead discovery projects.
•Design, implement, and maintain robust methods, algorithms, and packages (python, R) that help the computational community solve old and new problems with ease.
•Ideate and implement visualizations, dashboards & webservices for data dissemination to computational peers as well as to non-computational collaborators.
•Engage as a collaborative member of the broader CBT Data Science community.

Posting Title
Cheminformatics Data Scientist",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
13,MicroStrategy Business Intelligence Analyst,$73k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Modesto, CA, G3 Enterprises has been supplying the wine and spirits industry for over 50 years. As a single source packaging solution, its products and services include labels, stock and custom closures, warehousing, transportation, bottle etching, and mobile bottling.

The Business Intelligence Analyst creates reporting and analytical solutions that enable translating data into knowledge and maintains MicroStrategy infrastructure across G3 organization. Analyzes business intelligence data to inform business decisions. Partners with other areas of the business to model the outcome of implementing potential business strategies.

Essential Functions
• Utilizes data architecture to enable business decisions and recommend technical solutions to management based on scalability and complexity.
• Provides guidance and analytical support to include analysis and research in areas across G3 corporation.
• Satisfies ad-hoc requests for information from G3 teams that aid in uncovering new understandings that drive decisions which move the organization forward.
• Acts as technical expert, addressing infrastructure needs, systems/applications integration, compatibility, and multiple platforms.
• Analyzes data to create and maintain reports, dashboards, visualizations, and other tools (such as cubes and views) in multiple development and production environments.
• Responsible for executing the implementation of the BI strategy related to G3’s SAP ERP and OTM systems.
• Sources data from various systems via Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) and external data sources.
• Designs user driven analytics structure using existing data architecture.
• Influences data warehousing teams to recommend data layer structures and integrate systems.
• Translates business requirements to functional and technical design solutions, specifications, and prototypes.
• Collaborates with development teams to design business intelligence solutions to facilitate data gathering, storage, and retrieval.
• Consults with users or decision makers to identify data sources, required data elements, or data validation standards.
• Develops test plans and facilitates testing prior to promotions.
• Creates and maintains technical documentation
• Performs cross-functional analysis and collaborates with stakeholders across departments. Partners and presents findings to senior leadership.
• Responsible for understanding and complying with applicable quality, environmental and safety regulatory considerations. If accountable for the work of others, responsible for ensuring their understanding and compliance.

Qualifications
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, Data Analytics, Data Science, or Engineering plus 3 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management; OR High School diploma or State-issued equivalency certificate plus 7 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management.
• Ability to build and understand basic SQL queries.

Preferred Qualifications
• Master’s degree in Computer Science, Operations Research, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, or Engineering.
• MicroStrategy Intelligence Server Development experience.
• Experience designing and executing Application objects and Schema objects using MicroStrategy Desktop.
• Experience analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of complex reports, ETL scripts and dashboards.
• Experience troubleshooting high level issues to identify and resolve problems caused by the database, source data, ETL, or the Business Intelligence software (common examples: nulls in data causing joins to function incorrectly; ETLs running out of sequence; MicroStrategy Objects not set up properly).
• Experience with cloud computing and “big data” processing and analytics.
• Understanding of web servers and applications.
• Knowledge of components of an enterprise systems architecture
• Knowledge of business process re-engineering processes including Lean Six Sigma principles.
• Lean Six Sigma Green or Black Belt Certified.
• Strong understanding of network architecture and application development methodologies
• Experience reading, analyzing, and interpreting common scientific and technical journals and financial reports.
• Knowledge of emerging technologies and development platforms.
• Experience applying machine learning or artificial intelligence to BI applications.
• Possesses a passion for technology and its impact on the enterprise, customers and consumers along with a breadth of experience that can balance business, application and operational requirements.
• Strong understanding of systems and “systems thinking” with the ability to make trade-off decisions to accomplish system-wide goals.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Excellent planning and organizational skills.
• Skilled in balancing long-term and short-term goals and perspectives of challenging situations.
• Skilled in applying multiple technical solutions to business problems.
• Remains unbiased toward any specific technology or vendor choice.
• Excellent analytical and technical skills.
• Skilled in navigating complex political situations to ensure successful change management.
• Exceptional interpersonal skills, including teamwork, facilitation and negotiation.
• Demonstrates strong technical thinking and developed high credibility with the technical community. Recognized by the IT community as someone who solves complex technology related business problems.
• Experience with performance tuning of business intelligence applications.
• Strong knowledge of SQL queries including writing, reading, and debugging.
• Experience working with Enterprise Data Warehousing, specifically SAP Data Warehousing (HANA).

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.

Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

EEO/AA M/F/Vet/Disability",3.9,"G3 Enterprises
3.9","Modesto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
14,STAFF SCIENTIST,$24k-$51k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Staff Scientist

Requisition Number: 2020-2410-09

S&ME is a leading, employee-owned, multi-disciplined professional services firm that responds to clients with innovative, sustainable solutions. S&ME strives to create an environment where everyone can be their best by providing a supportive atmosphere of entrepreneurial growth, to build growing relationships, and to take on increasingly complex project opportunities.We recruit top talent and are currently seeking a Staff Scientist to join our team in Chattanooga, Tennessee.

The individual will perform field and office work associated with environment evaluations. Field work will include: soil sampling, groundwater sampling, surface water sampling, sediment sampling, wetland delineations, stream classifications, and fauna/flora identification. Other responsibilities include completing data entry to capture field activities, and the preparation of standard environmental reports. This individual will be expected to maintain knowledge of, and compliance with, regulatory requirements by attending environmental or natural resources training courses, or other in-house trainings. This position will require some travel and overnight stays.

Qualifications:
BS in environmental science, geology, biology, chemistry or related field;
2-4 years field experience in related field;
Ability to work outdoors in varying weather conditions;
Ability and willingness to accommodate overnight and out-of-town assignments;
Good technical writing, verbal communication, and computer skills.
To apply visit www.smeinc.com/careers and follow the ""Career Openings"" link.This is a full-time position with competitive pay based on experience. Successful candidate must meet requirements of the company's Fleet Management Program, Substance Policy and Reference Check program. Submit resume, cover letter, and salary expectations for consideration. Only qualified candidates with acceptable employment eligibility verification (I-9) will be considered. Visa assistance not provided. S&ME reserves the right to fill this position with an internal or external candidate at any time during the search. S&ME is not responsible for unauthorized job postings or submissions of resumes using external links/websites.

No candidate/recruiter calls, personal calls or walk-ins accepted.

An Equal Opportunity Employer.

Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.7,"S&ME, Inc.
3.7","Chattanooga, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
15,Data Engineer,$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
16,Data Engineer,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data engineer who is well versed with SQL, database optimization, data processing platforms & analytics.

Responsibilities:
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Manage ingestion process of various input data sources (healthcare, claims data etc) and develop/maintain the common schema to store the healthcare information of members.
Manage tools and processes to process the data to derive key insights and analytics to power the intelligence of our platform.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience is a plus.
Technologies:
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
17,Data Scientist,$101k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist who wants to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well). If that sounds appealing to you - we'd love to chat.

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to Image and Video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python
Experience with machine learning or statistics
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in Machine Learning specific to Natural Language Processing, Computer Vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Must be eligible to obtain and maintain a TS/SCI with Poly clearance

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
18,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
19,Nextracker - Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer,$79k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description
At Nextracker, we are leading in the energy transition, providing the most comprehensive portfolio of intelligent solar tracker and control software solutions for solar power plants, as well as strategic services to capture the full value of solar power plants for our customers. Our talented worldwide teams are transforming PV plant performance every day with smart technology, data monitoring and analysis services.


As a company driving the clean energy transition, sustainability is not just a word. It's a core part of our business and our operations. Our sustainability efforts are based on five cornerstones: People, Community, Environment, Innovation, and Integrity. We are creative, collaborative and passionate problem-solvers from diverse backgrounds, driven by our shared mission to provide smart solar and software solutions for our customers and to mitigate climate change for future generations. Make your mark with Nextracker.

NEXTracker is seeking a ML Engineer/ Data Scientist.He or She will work within the NEXTracker Asset Management and Support team and be responsible for gleaning insights from data collected from the world’s largest installed base of solar array single-axis trackers. The position will be located in our Fremont, CA office.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do:
Design and develop large scale distributed ML pipelines on cloud.
Take end to end ownership of Machine Learning systems - from data pipelines and training, to real-time prediction engines.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment with a quick cadence of research, experimentation, and product launches.
Create visualizations and presentations for a wide range of technical and non-technical audiences.
Develop tools to create daily monitoring reports on product health and product performance.
Here is some of what you’ll need (required):
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, mathematics).
3+ years of relevant work experience in Machine Learning, building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including Supervised (Regression, Classification) and Unsupervised ML algorithms (clustering, anomaly detection), optimization, neural networks
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression analysis.
Excellent hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and using ML/statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn
Intermediate MS Excel experience (Data Analysis, Pivot Tables, Formulas).
Experience in pattern recognition methodologies
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
#LI-LD1
LD50

Here are a few of our preferred experiences:
Programming experience in SQL, NOSQL and PowerBI, Tableu is a plus.
MATLAB
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide:
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Design, Process & Technology Engineering

Relocation

Eligible for domestic relocation only
Is Sponsorship Available?
No

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accessibility@flex.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
20,Data Analyst,$35k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


At Grow Financial, we believe in service—to our 200,000+ members, 550+ team members and local communities. We know happy, engaged people provide the best service, so we live by our mantra: Be Bold. Be Great. Have Fun. (Especially the fun part!) Yes, our work is serious, but we don’t take ourselves too seriously. Consistently named a Top Workplace by the Tampa Bay Times and a Great Place to Work among 100 Best Medium Workplaces by FORTUNE Magazine®, we cultivate a positive, collaborative work environment where you can grow personally and professionally. In fact, 94% of our team members say Grow is a great place to work. And the most common word they use to describe the Grow culture? Family.

Responsibilities


Performs advanced business analysis using various techniques, e.g. statistical analysis, predictive modeling, machine learning and data mining. Responsible for gaining an in-depth understanding of business problems as it relates to the visibility (insights), and feasibility an analytic solution would provide. Works closely with functional areas and business leaders to identify analytical requirements. This includes development and deployment of analytic models, supporting overall Grow and departmental strategic objectives, recommending profitable and/or cost-effective solutions that enhance member experiences or modernize processes; and collaborating with business partners to promote data-driven decision making.

Data Analytics
Interprets and analyzes large amounts of data using exploratory mathematical and statistical techniques.
Builds predictive models, selects features, and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques.
Identifying and extending credit union’s data capabilities with third-party sources of information.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Analyzes problems and determines root causes.
Business Analysis
Works with functional areas and business leaders to identify analytical requirements and define a problem statement.
Identify assumptions, limitations, constraints, and the key metrics of success to business problems.
Summarize analytical data into user-friendly reports translating highly technical, detailed data into appropriate recommendations and key metrics requested by management and various business lines.
Advise business partners on options, constraints, risks, costs, and benefits of proposed projects.
Qualifications
Bachelor of Arts/Science degree from an accredited college or university in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or related discipline required. Master’s degree preferred.
3 – 5 years of work experience with financial, analytical, or related research experience required.
Expert knowledge of Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, and Power Point) required.
Strong quantitative analysis skills using statistical software such as R, SQL and Python required.
Experience working with large datasets. Extensive knowledge of statistical methodologies including hypothesis testing, linear regression, modeling, simulation, and analysis of variance.
Knowledge of relational database technology and business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau).
Must be comfortable working on projects in an agile, iterative or multi-generational manner.
Eager to learn, enthusiastic, motivated and a self-starter.
Must be an analytical thinker and problem solver, as well as possess and display effective organizational and communication skills.
Ability to manage multiple priorities and work under deadline with minimal supervision required.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
Must be able to sit for extended periods of time.
Must be able to read, write, speak and type English.
Must be able to hear and use a telephone.
Use of computer requires repetitive keystrokes.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
Traditional office setting; remote work available.
Sedentary role
Excellent Benefits * 401K Plan * Competitive Pay * Business Casual Environment * Service-Minded Team Attitude * Positive Workplace * Exciting Growth Potential & More

An Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Veteran/Disabled",3.6,"Grow Financial
3.6","Brandon, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1955,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
21,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst,$50k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blending customer advisory, customer support, and customer experience, Carousel’s supercharged Customer Success Obsessed mission goes beyond any one IT function. Rather, it’s a mindset, a mantra, and a company-wide drive to bring extreme technology value to Carousel customers—so they can bring value to theirs.
With deep expertise across a vast portfolio of technologies, including security, unified communications and collaboration, data center, networking, managed services, and cloud solutions, Carousel can design, implement, and support solutions tailored to meet the unique needs of each customer. By offering professional and managed services with flexible deployments in the cloud, Carousel ensures customers achieve agility and use technologies in the way most effective for their business.
A legion of 1,300, the Carousel team has been committed to the art of customer success for its more than 6,000 highly satisfied customers since 1992. The company has been recognized by multiple publications and industry consortiums as a top technology integrator and managed services and cloud solution provider—including the Inc. 500/5000, Healthcare Informatics 100, and CRN MSP Elite 150. Headquartered in Exeter, RI, the company has offices across the United States and internationally—with three Network Operations Centers. To learn more, visit CarouselIndustries.com.

Position Summary:
The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for leveraging large quantities data to assist executives, business partners, and operations teams to make data-driven decisions. This position will focus largely on sales operations data defining data relationships (inclusive of off-system spreadsheets), data mining and data modeling which will be the basis for actionable intelligence dashboards and reports. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will utilize their experience to explore data, applying statistical techniques, and designing sales dashboards and reports that provide value to the company and its operational leaders. This role will collaborate with all Business Systems Teams and business subject matter experts to deploy a robust reporting universe that is streamlined and transparent. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will report to the Vice President of Business Intelligence and join a highly agile cross-functional team that leads some of the most critical projects for the Business Intelligence department and Carousel Industries as an organization.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Commitment to the Sales Organization to develop and deliver analytical reports that support and enable actionable intelligence to achieve strategic and operational goals.
Provide descriptive data analysis, and creative problem-solving using SQL programming language
Lead projects regarding data exploration, relationship management and data-driven story telling
Ability to create practical, actionable plans that are coherent and understood by stakeholders
Partner with Business Systems teams, business leaders, and functional groups to provide actionable intelligence regarding operational effectiveness and revenue growth
Gather, manipulate, and explore large datasets to test hypotheses and extract useful insights
Create and manage reporting, data narratives, and analytics deliverables for the CI Governance board and committee
Build innovative data models, reports and dashboards
Troubleshoot data conflicts and inconsistencies through data mining and collaboration with the business teams
Evaluate and develop data monitoring reports to provide further insight into process and change management
Develop roadmaps with proposed solutions from an end-to-end perspective
Partner with clients to promote evidence-based decision-making and devise action plans that influence behavior changes
Investigate and create trend analysis models to promote operational effectiveness

Qualifications:
B.S. in a quantitative field required.
Prior experience and expertise with Salesforce strongly desired.
Experience in financial and/or sales driven data modeling is a plus.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI and SNOWFLAKE cloud data warehouse preferred.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Demonstrated advanced analytical, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to deliver and support a quality service experience.
Demonstrated experience with industry report writers such as Einstein Analytics, Business Objects, Power BI, SSRS, Tableau or other BI reporting solutions.
Prior experience with CRM, ITSM and ERP reporting preferred.
Experience with writing/updating (SQL) queries.
Strong problem-solving skills.Superior verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to organize and prioritize concurrent projects.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively.
Create, maintain, and optimize reports, including SQL statements, views, functions, and stored procedures.
Effectively gather requirements and design new reports, troubleshoot, research, and correction of reports and database objects requiring review.
Accurately estimate effort for requested custom reports.",3.2,"Carousel Industries
3.2","Exeter, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
22,Data Analyst,$33k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"divvyDOSE is a new kind of home-delivery pharmacy in a hyper-growth phase focused on adherence packaging.

Our company is professional but fun, dedicated yet quirky. We are fast-paced, highly-motivated doctors, pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, and support staff who focus on health and wellness (and if we’re being honest, sometimes pizza) and most of us have slight obsessions with our pets. We want to make a difference in the lives of our customers by treating them like friends and family. We offer a work-hard, play-hard environment with competitive pay and a comprehensive benefit plan.

Vision/Mission

Our vision is to fix and reimagine healthcare for everyone. Our mission is to engage customers by fixing all the problems around getting and taking their medications. We've taken the first step by simplifying adherence.

We’re now part of Optum and the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, backed by the resources of a global health organization working to help people live healthier lives and to help make the health system work better for everyone. Are you looking for a way to create next-level results with a human-level approach? Then look at opportunities with divvyDOSE, where changing the world is just one result of doing your life’s best work.SM

About the job:

Our data operations team is the pharmacy support system for our customers - we help them transition to divvyDOSE, manage their prescriptions, answer their questions, and coordinate care with their health team. This work is coordinated across pharmacists, technicians, and customer support staff to ensure we provide the best care for our customers. Among other things, we transfer prescriptions to and from other pharmacies, contact medical care providers to understand treatments and request prescription refills and answer inbound questions from our customers.

You will:


Your goal is to help the operation run more effectively and efficiently through data analysis, reporting, dash-boarding, and special projects. You will help us build context through better reporting and drive the business forward by providing data-driven recommendations on ways to improve efficiency and optimize our operation. On any given day you might be presenting to our executive team, doing a deep dive on call analytics, or working with a small team to prototype and test new processes.
Become an expert and go-to resource for our process flows and our operational data
Work with operations management to develop actionable operations performance dashboards across all areas of the organization
Perform ad-hoc data analysis to identify measurable improvements to our operation, and advocate for those improvements via presentations and reports
Maintain and improve operations forecasting models
Collaborate with Finance and Technology teams to ensure we are able to continue to effectively measure our operation as technology improves
Communicate effectively and efficiently across multiple teams and work groups
Requirements
You have strong analytical and problem-solving skills
You are used to tackling very loosely defined problems and still deliver high-quality output
Advanced proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and strong written and oral communication
Ability to adapt quickly to a changing environment
3-5 years of analyst experience
Bachelor's degree, with major in analytical or technical field strongly preferred
Experience with BI tools such as Looker or Tableau is a plus
Job Title: Data Analyst

Job Type: Full-time

FLSA Status: Exempt

Benefits

In addition to competitive salary and a unique opportunity to thrive at a growing company, divvyDOSE offers various formal benefits as well.

INSURANCE, PAID TIME OFF, & RETIREMENT

Full-time employees receive Sick days, Vacation days, and Holiday Bonuses as well as employer-paid Medical (including a Health Savings Account with an employer contribution), Dental, Vision, and Life insurance. In addition, we're proud to offer Voluntary Life & AD&D, Short Term Disability, and Long Term Disability coverage. A 401k plan with employer contribution is available, too.

SOCIAL EVENTS

In our company description, you can tell the divvyTEAM likes to have fun. Regular potlucks, company events, pizza days, wellness challenges, and divvyNEWS You Can Use updates maintain our work-hard play-hard culture.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment. In addition, employees in certain positions are subject to random drug testing.

Employment with divvyDOSE is AT WILL, and can be terminated at any time, for any reason, by either party.",3.4,"divvyDOSE
3.4","Moline, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
23,Data Analyst Internship - Paid,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Learn all aspects of operations across a wide variety of functional areas throughout the corporation.
Perform advanced analytics functions including data modeling and prescriptive analytics in the context of real business scenarios and problems.
Utilize sophisticated techniques and business intelligence (Power BI) to create dashboards and ad hoc/refreshable reports to address current business problems or to streamline processes.
Support or adapt existing T-SQL/VBA applications, tools and reporting as needed.
Complete other projects, analyses, and data extraction as required.

Minimum Requirements
This internship is open to Junior-status students only.
Expertise with MS Excel a must, with proficiency in SQL required
Experience in spreadsheet automation using Visual Basic for Application (VBA) preferred.
Knowledge of R, Python, and Power BI or Tableau preferred.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",3.6,"Uline
3.6","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
24,Senior Systems and Data Analyst,$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Pursuit

Pursuit is a social impact organization that creates transformation where it's needed most. Through our intensive, four-year software developer training program, we teach high-need, high-potential adults the technical skills and industry smarts needed to get their first tech jobs, advance in their careers, and become the next generation of leaders in tech. Our graduates are hired by leading companies like Pinterest, Kickstarter, LinkedIn, BlackRock, and JPMorgan Chase, and increase their average annual salaries from $18,000 to over $85,000.

Our graduates are hired by leading companies like Pinterest, Kickstarter, LinkedIn, BlackRock, and JPMorgan Chase, and increase their average annual salaries from $18,000 to over $85,000. By connecting talent with opportunity, Pursuit empowers graduates to transform their families, tech companies, and communities across the nation. Read about our work in the New York Times: Income Before: $18,000. After: $85,000. Does Tiny Nonprofit Hold a Key to the Middle Class?

About the Role

As Pursuit's Data Analytics and Systems Analyst, you will play a critical role in managing and making useful all the information and information systems that drive our mission. You will take charge of Pursuit's data collection and storage systems, further strengthen their linkages, and develop the dashboards, reports, and analyses that drive the organization forward.

This is an excellent opportunity for a data and systems guru who is looking to use their skills to make a clear daily impact on people's lives.

About You
You find joy in a beautiful and useful data dashboard
You love to use analytics to find the important human stories and insights within big datasets
You know how to make disparate portals, platforms, and spreadsheets work nicely together
You're always looking for ways to automate everyday tasks
You find satisfaction in combing through data to make sure the details are correct and complete
You enjoy working across different teams and functions of a buzzing organization
Key Responsibilities
Develop and maintain information collection and storage systems across Pursuit
Lead updates, train staff users, and troubleshoot for systems like our CRM, Applicant Tracking System, and public-facing website
Develop live dashboards and analyses for Pursuit's program and business teams
Build and sustain linkages across data systems
Create and maintain notification and alert systems for key events and data changes
Respond to needs for ad-hoc reports for Pursuit's program and business teams
Support build and rollout for new data tools and features
Requirements
2-5+ years working in an analytics and/or data management role
Expertise in Google Sheets or Microsoft Excel
Proficiency in SQL
Working knowledge of JavaScript (Experience with Google Apps Script a plus)
Experience with CRM software, especially Salesforce
Experience building and maintaining ETL processes
Understanding of analytic techniques and tools
Experience with Python and/or R a plus
Positive attitude and enthusiasm for Pursuit's mission
Location: Long Island City, NY (Currently fully remote due to coronavirus)

Compensation: In addition to competitive compensation, we are happy to provide employees with a range of benefits. Our offerings include premium health, dental, and vision insurance, flexible paid time off, robust 401k matching, discounted gym memberships, and an active workplace that includes drinks, snacks, and fun team events.

Time Commitment: Full-time

Diversity

Our team has a wide range of backgrounds and experiences, and we value the richness that diversity brings to our organization. We welcome new perspectives and affirm that all employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, ancestry, religion, national origin, age, familial or marital status, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity or expression, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any other classification protected by federal, state, or local law. Pursuit is an equal opportunity employer.",2.9,"Coalition for Queens
2.9","Long Island City, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Nonprofit Organization,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
25,Medical Laboratory Scientist,$17-$23 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Performs and interprets tests at all complexity levels. Demonstrates an understanding of the theory and scientific principles of laboratory testing as well as the technical, procedural and problem solving aspects. Correlates abnormal laboratory data with pathological states, determines the validity of test results and the need for additional tests. Determines the validity of test results through the monitoring and/or verifying of quality controls, standards, etc. Communicates test results, reference ranges, specimen requirements, and other pertinent information to authorized sources.

Job Responsibilities:

Follows the laboratory's procedures for specimen handling and processing, test analyses, reporting and maintaining records of patient test results.
Performs laboratory testing in a compliant manner.
Maintains regulatory knowledge and awareness as it pertains to specific job duties.
Adheres to the laboratory's quality control policies, document all quality control activities, instrument and procedural calibrations and maintenance performed.
Assumes responsibility for and takes action regarding any quality control or quality assurance issues as it pertains to specific job duties.
Maintains instruments and equipment in accordance with manufacturer’s specifications.
Assumes responsibility for good documentation practices and maintains clear and legible records.
Performs proficiency testing in compliance with Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) regulations i.e. analyze proficiency survey sample in the same manner as a patient specimens, no communication with other CLIA laboratories, complete record retention and accurate documentation and result reporting.
Assumes responsibility for participation in continuing education, professional development and required annual competency assessment.
Follows the laboratory's established policies and procedures whenever test systems are not within the laboratory's established acceptable levels of performance.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or reporting of test results and either must correct the problems or immediately notify the General Supervisor, Technical Supervisor, Clinical Consultant, or Laboratory Director.
Exercises good judgment, analytical and problem solving/troubleshooting skills.
Recommends solutions and improvements.
Documents all corrective actions taken when test systems deviate from the laboratory's established performance specifications.
May function in an educator and provides instruction and training in theory, technical skills, safety protocols, and the application of laboratory test protocols to students, employees, residents, etc.
Other duties as assigned.
Follows Hospital and department policies and procedures with special attention to attendance and punctuality, confidentiality, dress code and display of ID badge, and safety.
Completes mandatory education and training in order to maintain organization and department-specific competencies and requirements.

Education:

Bachelor's degree in a chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science or medical technology from a four-year college or university.
One year training in approved program with registry/certification at Medical Technologist/ Clinical Laboratory Scientist level (MLS or MT) or registry eligible.
OR
Meets the CLIA qualifications for high complexity testing personnel grandfathering clauses.
See Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, §493.1489(b)(3), §493.1489(b)(4), §493.1489(b)(5), §493.1491 Standards; High Complexity Testing Personnel Qualifications.
Diploma and/or transcripts must be provided.
Education will be verified.
Education outside of the United States requires diploma/transcripts translated into English and proof of foreign equivalency from by an HHS approved agency or nationally recognized organization such as NACES (National Association Credential Evaluation Services, Inc.) or AICE (Association of International Credential Evaluators, Inc.).

Languages:

Certifications:

Certification as a Medical Technologist (MT) or certification eligible preferred upon hire, from the American Society of Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or American Medical Technologists (AMT).
Certification must be obtained within one year of hire.

Complexity of Work:

Requires critical thinking skills, decisive judgment and the ability to work unsupervised or with minimal supervision.
Must be able to work in a stressful environment and take appropriate action.

Work Experience:

None required.

Physical Requirements:

Physical demands include: Visual acuity to study specimens under a microscope.
The ability to distinguish colors.
Fine motor skills and manual dexterity to handle specimens and lab equipment required to process specimens and repair equipment.
May be required to stand for long periods of time.
Light lifting may be required.
May be exposed to hazardous chemicals, biohazards, radioactive materials, etc.

Personal Protective Equipment:

Follows Standard Precautions using personal protective equipment as required.

The policy of Cleveland Clinic and its system hospitals (Cleveland Clinic) is to provide equal opportunity to all of our employees and applicants for employment in our tobacco free and drug free environment. All offers of employment are followed by testing for controlled substance and nicotine. Job offers will be rescinded for candidates for employment who test positive for nicotine. Candidates for employment who are impacted by Cleveland Clinic’s Smoking Policy will be permitted to reapply for open positions after 90 days. Decisions concerning employment, transfers and promotions are made upon the basis of the best qualified candidate without regard to color, race, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, ancestry, status as a disabled or Vietnam era veteran or any other characteristic protected by law. Information provided on this application may be shared with any Cleveland Clinic facility.

Cleveland Clinic is pleased to be an equal employment employer: Women/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities",3.8,"Cleveland Clinic
3.8","Akron, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1921,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
26,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux
Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

Oversight is the world’s leading provider of AI-based spend management and risk mitigation solutions for large enterprises. Based in Atlanta, GA, Oversight works with many of the world’s most innovative companies and government agencies to digitally transform their spend audit and financial control processes.

Oversight’s AI-powered platform works across our customers’ financial systems to continuously monitor and analyze all spend transactions for fraud, waste, and misuse. With a consolidated, consistent view of risk across their enterprise, customers can prevent financial loss and optimize spend while strengthening the controls that improve compliance. Learn More.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,"Oversight Systems
4.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
27,Molecular Biology Research Scientist PhD,-1,"*Company Name: *Avance Biosciences Inc.

*Job Title: *Research Scientist
*Department: *Operations
*Reports To: *Department Manager
*Classification: *Full-time, Exempt
*Date: *September 2020

Avance Biosciences Inc., a fast-growing biotechnology CRO, is recruiting several Research Scientists (PhD) in its GLP and/or GMP biological testing departments. This position plans, directs, and manages research and testing projects on behalf of our biopharma and biotech clients, as well as development projects to improve laboratory operations.

*ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *

The omission of specific statement of duties does not exclude them from the position if the work is similar, related or a logical assignment to this class. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
* Plan and execute biological assay development, validation, and sample testing activities.
* Prepare study protocols and/or test plans according to client's requirements.
* Direct laboratory associates to execute experimental plans.
* Lead in incident and OOS investigation and root cause analysis per company quality policies.
* Perform data analysis and prepare project reports.
* Communicate to clients on project progress regularly.
* Establish standard operational procedures and train laboratory associates as needed.
* Ensure all project related work are done in compliance with GLP and CGMP regulations.
* May supervise a small group of lab scientists.

*QUALIFICATIONS: *

A successful candidate for this position must have the following experience, knowledge, and skills:
* Must have a PhD degree in biological sciences
* In-depth knowledge of and hands-on experience in ddPCR, NGS, and QPCR
* Post doctorate independent research experience is preferred
* Detailed-oriented and multi-tasking skills
* Strong problem-solving skills

*SPECIAL JOB CHARACTERISTICS: *Demonstrated excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Able to work independently and as part of a team on complex tasks with minimal supervision. Able to create accurate work in a fast-paced environment with constant change and interruptions. Able to prioritize effectively and manage multiple tasks simultaneously. Commitment to the mission and values of Avance Biosciences Inc.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* Molecular Biology Lab: 4 years (Required)

Education:
* Doctorate (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Work Location:
* One location

Company's website:
* www.avancebio.com

Work Remotely:
* No",3.4,"Avance Biosciences Inc
3.4","Houston, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
28,"Scientist I, Quality Assurance - Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy",$51k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
The Scientist I, Quality Assurance Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy supports the on-going enhancement of the PTC total quality system by performing Quality Assurance (QA) functions related to the disposition of Raw Materials/Consumables. This position enables the manufacture of clinical and commercial gene therapy products while ensuring product quality through the control of incoming materials.

The Scientist I, Quality Assurance- Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy develops, implements, and executes procedures for the timely and compliant testing and disposition of raw materials and consumables.

The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments such as manufacturing, logistics, QC, and external vendors on Quality-related issues.

The Scientist I, Quality Assurance Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy supports adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate.
Job Description:


Responsibilities:
Lab responsibilities include raw material testing and release, sampling of raw materials, and disposition of consumables
Methods of testing include FTIR, Raman, HPLC-CAD, Description, Osmolality, pH, wet chemistry
Develops novel testing methods for the identification of raw materials
Performs method and material qualifications and validations
Aides in the sampling and disposition of raw materials
Performs manufacturing consumable and processing aids inspections and release
Maintains sample and reference material inventory
Qualifies and validates new laboratory instrumentation
Supports activities related to vendor/material approval and management of Contract Testing Laboratories
Authors and reviews new specifications for raw materials and consumables
Data and material management via electronic systems such as LIMS and SAP
Manages outsourcing of raw materials for Contract Lab Testing
Authors or revises procedural SOPs and testing methods
Participates in Vendor Audits and the review of quality agreement
Contributes to and participates in vendor change notification program
Assesses new in coming raw materials and proposes testing plans
Recommends QA system and procedure changes to enhance overall job performance and QA functions
Maintains electronic and paper-based documentation, as needed
Performs other tasks and assignments as needed and specified by management, i.e. audits
Qualifications:
Masters degree in a related scientific discipline and a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in a QA, logistics or related role OR a Bachelors degree in these same disciplines and a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience
Detailed/Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of GMP regulations and Food and Drug Administration (FDA) requirements
Experience with SAP, LIMS, ELN, Veeva Vault Quality Document Management System or equivalent
Working knowledge of global pharmacopeias such as USP, EP, JP, BP, Ph. Eur
Knowledge of biopharmaceutical manufacturing process workflows
Proficiency with Microsoft Office and Excel
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and collaboratively, as required, in a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines
0-15% travel
Office/Laboratory-based position. Requires the ability to lift items weighing up to 15kg
Special knowledge or skills and/or licenses or certificates preferred.
Experience working directly with the FDA or other health authorities
QC laboratory experience
Experience with Quality Risk Management and Quality Management Systems such as Deviation Investigations and CAPAs
EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","Pennington, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
29,"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development",$86k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development
Location: Bedford, MA
Homology Medicines is seeking an outstanding Senior Scientist to assist in the advancement of viral gene therapy production processes for novel adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The individual in this role will be a highly-skilled, talented and motivated researcher who will lead the work to develop and characterize next generation plasmids for large scale manufacturing of AAV vectors. We seek candidates with proven ability to work independently and collaboratively who are driven to pursue cutting edge science and develop next generation therapies to transform the lives of patients.
Essential Functions and Duties
Design, development, and characterization of novel plasmids for AAV production using molecular and cell-based assays
Analyze vector specific characteristics including packaging efficiency and product quality, as impacted by packaging and inverted terminal repeat (ITR) plasmid and integrity
Advance technical understanding and development of critical parameters in mammalian cell culture production systems for AAV vectors
Collaborate closely with analytical characterization team to evaluate critical vector attributes and process performance parameters for AAV vector production
Lead a team of research associate and scientist completing assigned tasks and serve as scientific mentor to overseeing laboratory experimentation and data analysis
Author technical reports and technology transfer documents as needed
Skills and Experience
PhD or MS in molecular biology, virology, or related fields with 4+ (PhD) or 6+ (MS) years industry experience in viral vector production
Expertise in molecular cloning techniques preferably with AAV/ITR experience
Thorough understanding of virus characterization methods including nucleic acid and protein-based approaches
Familiarity with using lab-scale production platforms including adherent cell systems, shake flasks, and bioreactors for live virus or viral vector production
Adept at conducting routine testing and limited troubleshooting of multiple methods
Independently motivated, detail oriented, and good problem-solving ability
Excellent interpersonal written and oral communication skills
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line: www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
30,Data Engineer III,$57k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUTGROWN YOUR OWN BACKYARD? COME PLAY IN OURS.

At Columbia, were as passionate about the outdoors as you are. And while our gear is available worldwide, were proud to be based in the Pacific Northwest, where natural wonders are our playground.

Every product we make and every task we undertake is inspired by the famous words of our founder Gert Boyle: Its perfect. Now make it better. As pioneers of relentless improvement, we are constantly evolving.

We believe the outdoors is ours to protect and strive to keep our planet healthy.

We believe in empowering people to experience the outdoors to the fullest.

And we believe in you.

ABOUT THE POSITION

Although we're an apparel and footwear focused company, technology is central to everything we do. Columbia Sportswears Global Information Services (GIS) teams enable an IT infrastructure across four global brands, a global supply chain, and 500+ geographically dispersed stores. These teams support in-store, mobile, and data platforms to enhance customer interface and service in an ever-evolving industry.

The Data Engineer is a member of the Enterprise Information Management team and is responsible for the design, development, testing, maintenance, and support of Columbias enterprise data assets. The Data Engineer will provide technical design, development and analytical support for Columbia Enterprise initiatives.

HOW YOULL MAKE A DIFFERENCE
Lead activities that include: data modeling (relational and dimensional), data lake & data warehouse development, data integration / ETL process development, and support.
Continuously deliver and improve prioritized enterprise data assets that enable the growth of Columbias global analytics, reporting and visualization solutions.
Coordinate frequently with several enterprise support organizations and Columbia end users.
Manage scheduling, support, tools and maintenance of integration processes.
Identify project risks and impediments, notify management, and proactively work with other members of the team to complete assigned tasks as defined by project scope, timelines, and budgets.
Identify data quality issues and support Columbias data governance initiative by participating in necessary activities including data profiling.
Participate in the use of Agile practices to elicit and refine requirements through an iterative process of planning, defining acceptance criteria, prioritizing, developing and delivering enterprise data asset solutions.
YOU ARE
An expert in data design & development and have a deep understanding of complex organizational analytical and data needs that enable improvements in environment design, efficiency, controls and the overall user experience of enterprise data assets
A strong communicator that has an ability to work with all levels of the organization to advance Columbias vision for information management and analytics
Highly conversant in the culture and changing landscape of information technology
Curious and creative, always looking to deliver a superior product while working closely with a small scrum team
YOU HAVE
A Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or a related field or a combination of education and experience
3+ years of hands-on experience architecting, developing and/or managing the implementation of Business Intelligence solutions and 2+ years professional experience with one or more ETL tools such as Informatica, SQL Server Integration Services, Business Objects Data Services, or Spark
Experience in SQL and query optimization for data platforms such as Azure SQL DW, HDInsight, Teradata, SAP HANA, Oracle, or equivalent required. Experience with Microsoft Azure BI Stack: Azure Data factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse is a bonus
Proficient in relational database concepts, including normalization, indexing, physical and logical modeling, creation of SQL queries and performance tuning.
Familiar with the Kimball and/or Inmon methods of data warehousing techniques, standards and best practices. Experience with management of a star schema implementation and related concepts such as slowly changing and late arriving dimensions
Familiar with Data Lake and Spark concepts and have some hands-on experience working with Spark DataFrames, pySpark preferred. Experience with large scale data processing, data structure optimization and scalability of algorithms a plus
#LI-JD1

Columbia Sportswear Company and our portfolio of brands, including Columbia, SOREL, Mountain Hardwear and prAna, know a thing or two about adventures. After all, we've been on one since 1938, working to perfect the art of enjoying the outdoors. Behind everything we make is an employee who's found that the greatest adventure starts with joining a company that strives to do the right thing.

This job description is not meant to be an all-inclusive list of duties and responsibilities, but constitutes a general definition of the position's scope and function in the company.

At Columbia Sportswear Company (CSC), we are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants and teammates without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy (including childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military and veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by applicable law. CSC believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",3.7,"Columbia Sportswear
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1938,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
31,Quantitative Analyst,$99k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quantitative Analyst

Are you ready to explore a world of possibilities?

Join our DTCC family, and you’ll grow your expertise and become the best version of you. As you embark on a new journey, you’ll tackle challenges with flexibility and grace, learning new skills and advancing your career while having the time of your life.

Why You’ll Love This Job:

Being a member of our Risk Management team, you’ll work to protect the safety and soundness of our systems and are responsible for identifying, managing, measuring and mitigating a spectrum of key risk types including credit, market, liquidity, systemic, operational and technology in all existing and new products, activities, processes and systems.

Responsibilities:

The candidate is primarily responsible for designing, developing, testing, and maintaining stress test models or tools and performing Stress Test related analyses and reporting.
Design and implement stress testing scenarios
Perform analytical analysis such as attribution analysis to explain stress testing risk metrics results
Conduct quality assurances and controls on data
Maintain stress testing related functions in QRM's Production System, including setting up scheduled jobs to perform stress testing calcuations
Aligns risk and control processes into day to day responsibilities to monitor and mitigate risk; escalates appropriately
**NOTE: Responsibilities of this role are not limited to the details above. **

Talents needed for success:
1+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferable in credit risk or market risk modeling
Minimum 6 years of related work experience
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written.
Must have excellent interpersonal skills
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Have a general knowledge about the financial market, products, risk management (such as VaR modeling) and risk metrics (such as back testing).
Solid programming skills in data processing language such as SQL, Python. R, Matlab are pluses.
Must have a Ph. D or a Master’s degree in a quantitative field, preferably in applied economics, econometries, statistics or financial engineering.",3.9,"DTCC
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
32,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux
Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

Oversight is the world’s leading provider of AI-based spend management and risk mitigation solutions for large enterprises. Based in Atlanta, GA, Oversight works with many of the world’s most innovative companies and government agencies to digitally transform their spend audit and financial control processes.

Oversight’s AI-powered platform works across our customers’ financial systems to continuously monitor and analyze all spend transactions for fraud, waste, and misuse. With a consolidated, consistent view of risk across their enterprise, customers can prevent financial loss and optimize spend while strengthening the controls that improve compliance. Learn More.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,"Oversight Systems
4.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
33,Data Scientist,$107k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Small Teams; Big Data

At Tapad, we look for individuals who are motivated by complex and challenging work. We want to work with people who share compelling solutions to those challenges, solutions informed by their unique experiences, passions, and expertise.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to research and develop state-of-the-art algorithms and help build models to support Tapad's mission to create the world's largest identity graph. As part of Tapad's Data Science team, you will leverage cutting edge technologies and techniques to impact our core intellectual property and commercial products. This includes, but is not limited to, machine learning, deep learning, NLP, Google Cloud AI Platform, BigQuery, TensorFlow Extended, and Kubeflow Pipelines.

Tapad Data Scientists are responsible for turning new ideas into innovative products. You will work closely with our technologists to actualize your research and solutions into concrete commercial products and services. You will also collaborate with product managers and business stakeholders to understand our customers' needs and the broader addressable market.

When you work with us, you matter. We ask our employees to make an impact and feel it is only right to give a lot in return. We offer every employee a 401k with matching, generous parental leave, and unlimited PTO (and we mean it!). We believe if you're sick, feel like you're getting sick, or just need a personal day, you should take that time to get better. We have free virtual lunches every month, free continuous education, and an open-door policy every day. We make sure our virtual office is a welcoming space full of individuals who can teach and learn from one another every day.

Technologies we use at Tapad (don't worry, we'll teach you):
Python, SQL, Scala
Spark, SparkML, SciKit Learn, AutoML, BigQuery ML, TensorFlow Extended (TFX)
Google Cloud Platform (GCP), BigQuery, Apache Airflow
We are looking for candidates who meet some of the following qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Chemistry, etc.)
3+ years experience in applying machine learning techniques, advanced analytics, and statistics, either in an academic setting or as a data scientist
Experience working with large data sets using SQL, Spark, Hadoop, or MapReduce
Understanding of programming concepts and experience with programming languages, such as Python, R, Java, Scala, MATLAB
Strong communication skills, both verbal and written
Experience working in a large-scale, distributed system environment
Bonus Qualification & Experience:
Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline
Experience using cloud computing technologies
A day in the life as a Tapad Data Scientist:
You will use machine learning (e.g. deep learning), clustering, statistical modeling, and other advanced techniques to infer connections from petabytes of data
Employ predictive modeling, data mining, graph algorithms, and other data science techniques to contribute to and enhance our cross-device identity resolution portfolio
Design experiments and apply appropriate metrics to measure the impact of the developed models
Partner with other data scientists and engineers to turn various machine learning, clustering, and statistical solutions into viable and scalable products
Collaborate with product managers and business partners to understand market needs and to help identify new opportunities for Tapad
Tapad Perks:
Generous PTO - no accruing necessary
401k matching, Life, LTD & STD Insurance, dental, vision, and telehealth plan with 24/7 access to a dedicated team of physical and mental healthcare providers
Scala School (we'll teach you!), Coursera, LinkedIn Learning, peer-led professional development, and an abundance of resources to help you stay sharp
Unlimited snacks and beverages, collaboration catered lunches (virtual lunches until we're back in the office)
Discounts on gym memberships
Foosball, ping pong, diversity and inclusion group, book club, Tough Mudder, push-up challenges, and tons of other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family (virtual game nights and happy hours until we're back in the office)
Check out our #TapadLife page to see what our employees have to say
Find more about our engineering culture HERE
More about Tapad:

Founded in 2010, Tapad cracked the code on cross-device marketing technology. Our groundbreaking, proprietary technology assimilates trillions of data points to find the relationship between smartphones, desktops, laptops, tablets, and connected TVs. Ten years later, we are processing data at petabyte scale, with an engineering team that comprises roughly half of our entire organization. When you work with us, you matter, and your work matters.

In combination with large-scale data processing and open-source technologies, we use Scala to build our device graph. Across our engineering teams, we also use Scala, GCP, Spark, Kubernetes, Python, TypeScript, and anything else that helps us get the job done. We're open-minded about new technologies, we're passionate about what we do, and we make time for everyone to learn and grow as the industry changes. Engineers at Tapad are approachable and ambitious people who think outside the box and solve big problems collaboratively. Are you up for the challenge?

Tapad is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants regardless of age, sex, race, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or family status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

Tapad does not accept resumes from unsolicited search firms nor recruiters. In no event shall fees be paid to any unsolicited search firms nor recruiters, regardless of whether the candidate is made an offer or accepts a placement at Tapad. All resumes received through any channels will be considered the sole property of Tapad.",4.2,"Tapad
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
34,Data Scientist,$101k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is currently seeking a TS/SCI Data Scientist to serve as a data specialist: finding, analyzing, and vetting potential data sources for applicability in a geospatial problem domain.

Responsibilities include:
Explores data sets and verifies data quality to gain an understanding of relevant data, then identifies differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the machine learning model in an operational environment.
Identify data sets of machine learning tests and use cases.
Develops and tunes machine learning model's hyper parameters.
Basic Qualifications:
Function independently and can present/defend/communicate the results and ideas to key decision makers.
Experience in visualizing and manipulating big data sets, including leaflet, plotly, D3, and ggplot.
Demonstrated background in data mining and statistical analysis. Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills.
Desired Skills:
Modeling familiarity: ability to understand how to optimize datasets for use in computational models.
Graph Indexing: ability to develop logical connections between disparate data via indexing in an efficient manner, and building/understanding graph algorithms to maximize value of retained data.
AWS familiarity: ability to use and manage AWS instances as well as coding lambda functions (etc) to minimize expenditure while maximizing throughput.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI required to start
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","McLean, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
35,Senior Physiological Data Scientist,-1,"ABOUT US:

Embr Labs believes in harnessing the body’s natural response to temperature to enhance human wellbeing. We are a wellness tech company that has developed a unique, wearable thermal technology with therapeutic applications in both the consumer and regulated device sectors.

To date, Embr has sold over 65,000 devices to customers in 150 countries around the world. A mobile app and backend augment our hardware devices, forming a unique technology platform that combines thermal stimulation, digital interventions, and data to manage symptoms and treat disease. Our technology was invented by the company’s founders while at MIT; we are backed by DigiTx Partners, Safar Partners, Bose Ventures and Intel Capital, and we have partnered with companies like Johnson & Johnson.

‘EMBR’ stands for Environment, Mind, Body Resonance: we believe that technology can help us lead more balanced lives. Our workplace cultivates both fulfillment and fun. We are looking for an exceptional candidate to help us create a future where digital thermal interventions help people live better lives.

DESCRIPTION:

We seek a smart, energetic, and impact-oriented Senior Physiological Data Scientist. This is a strategic hire that will lead Embr Labs’ expansion into continuous physiological monitoring and real-time symptom detection.

Embr is now designing its next generation of innovative products where sensors and algorithms will be critical and offer a core competitive advantage. The Senior Physiological Data Scientist will lead a wide range of activities, from database design and machine learning to project management and technical leadership.

Collaborating with Embr’s senior technical leaders, and leading research collaborations, they will develop new technical capabilities for Embr Labs by taking early concepts all the way to productizable prototypes. For the first two years, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will also hold a Visiting Scientist position with the Department of Kinesiology and Institute for Applied Life Sciences at the University of Massachusetts Amherst (UMass IALS).

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide technical leadership for sensor data-related research and development at Embr Labs
Oversee the development of new technical capabilities that utilize physiological monitoring
Develop R&D data infrastructure to transfer and store physiological data streams, including data pipelines and databases
Train, refine, and evaluate algorithms that identify symptoms and other physiological markers from sensor data
Collaborate with researchers and engineers to translate algorithms into low-latency embedded systems on actual prototype devices, and in the translation of successful prototype devices into actual commercial products
Ensure that physiological data projects are executed on schedule and on budget, and that collaborations with academic & industry partners are smooth and efficient.
IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL HAVE:
Deep technical expertise in biomedical informatics, data science, or biomedical engineering (Ph.D. or equivalent industry experience).
Experience working with physiological data from wearables or body sensors.
Proficiency in machine learning and deep learning for human physiology data.
Successful track record of taking algorithms from conception to implementation on products.
A self-starter personality and the ability to work with broad direction and little oversight.
Proficient in Python, Matlab, or R; Git; and SQL.
Excellent communication and teamwork skills.
Experience with relational and/or NoSQL database technologies, streaming data processing and data lakes is a plus.
THINGS YOU WILL GET:
A full-time position at Embr Labs, combined with a two-year Visiting Scientist position at UMass Amherst Department of Kinesiology & Institute for Applied Life Sciences.
The opportunity to make a transformative impact at a rapidly growing wellness tech startup company.
Constant exposure to interesting science and novel technology.
Ability to build relationships with other technology leaders in the emerging Digital Therapeutics ecosystem
A strong leadership team that encourages close collaboration; talented, open-minded team of contributing engineers.
A dynamic, exciting workplace with a flexible work environment
A caring team that values mutual respect and includes three MIT co-founders, one of the top female CEOs in the Boston tech scene, bright and thoughtful employees, and a small dog.
Competitive compensation, benefits, and equity in a fast-growing startup.
LOCATION:

This position is based at UMass in Amherst, Massachusetts for the first two years. Following the completion of the project with UMass IALS, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will be given the opportunity to work from the Embr Labs office in Boston or to keep working remotely from Amherst.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
biomedical informatics or biomedical engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Location:
Amherst, MA 01003 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.embrlabs.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.9,"Embr Labs, Inc
4.9","Amherst, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
36,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
37,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
38,Lead Data Scientist,$94k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The Lead Data Scientist will be seen as the team expert on experimental designs and observational/retrospective studies, helping our Home Care Business partners design and understand the effectiveness of their interventions & core processes.

Responsibilities

Come be part of a new and exciting team that is at the forefront of innovative care delivery! This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated care via Home & Virtual Care solutions. The Lead Data Scientist will be seen as the team expert on experimental designs and observational/retrospective studies, helping our Home Care Business partners design and understand the effectiveness of their interventions & core processes.

The ideal candidate will have experience conducting experiments of various designs in an applied healthcare setting and have demonstrated innovation and creative methods for overcoming testing constraints.

Responsibilities

As a Lead Data Scientist, you will:

Design rigorous business experiments that allow confidence in results, while taking into account the complexity of testing in a large organization with legal, compliance, and other regulatory oversight
Work with Business Partners to clearly define hypotheses and appropriate leading indicators
Provide recommendations for sample sizing through power analysis
Apply Behavioral Economics theory to the design of interventions
Build strong working relationships with a variety of teams in a collaborative, matrixed environment with physical locations across the U.S.
Design, conduct, analyze, and provide recommendations for the interpretation of results of business experiments
Perform retrospective/observational studies on interventions/processes where designs may have not been implemented
Collaborate with other members of the data science team to coach/mentor on experimental design & research best practices
Be a willing learner and potential contributor to other team responsibilities, including Machine Learning, Dashboard/Visualization development, & general ad hoc requests.

Required Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Economics, Behavioral Sciences, Applied Statistics, Engineering or related field
Extensive experience conducting lab or field experiments
Extensive experience conducting retrospective/observational studies
Advanced programming experience in Python, R, or SAS
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Successful demonstrated experience in working on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial
Experience in creating analysis, projections, models, and presentations to support business
Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
Ability to works under minimal supervision, using independent judgment
Ability to communicate statistical & complex concepts in a simplified manner
Strong interpersonal and consulting skills

Preferred Qualifications

Master’s or PhD Degree in Economics, Behavioral Sciences, Applied Statistics or related field
Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health

Additional Information

This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or work from home (remote)

Scheduled Weekly Hours

40",3.8,"Humana
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1961,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
39,Data Scientist - Clearance Required,$76k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"TUVA, an Akima Company, provides turnkey solutions that offer better systems, tools, and methods to further your goals, reduce costs, and streamline operations. From requirements analysis, design, and implementation to operations and training TUVA’s personnel are well-versed in best practices across Enterprise IT, Mission Support Services, and Specialized Technologies. Our personnel enjoy competitive benefits packages and challenging roles in work environments committed to innovation, diversity and opportunity for career growth. As an Alaska Native Corporation (ANC), 100% of our company’s profits go back to our 14,300 Iñupiat shareholders that have resided near and above the Arctic Circle for more than 10,000 years. Our business helps support their way of life and contributes to the survival of a culture that has thrived in a challenging environment.

Responsibilities:

Tuva is seeking an experienced Data Scientist with specific functional knowledge to work with a key customer in the Intel space.

Structure and analyze data using statistical techniques and provide detailed reporting.

Extract, clean and manipulate data from multiple sources and systems.

Develop analytical approaches to answering intelligence questions and produce. actionable intelligence products by developing complex queries, organizing data in large databases, and linking information.

Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets and provide detailed reporting of findings.

Minimum Qualifications:

BS Degree (in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Information Management or Computer Science Preferred).

Top Secret Clearance.

Proven working experience of Data Analysis, Database Administration and Database Development.

Technical expertise regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques.

Experience with Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) data input.

Familiar with data visualization products (Tableau, Gephi, ggplot).

Ability to create ad hoc queries and reports using Transact SQL

Strong knowledge and experience with reporting packages.

Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (Excel, SAS, etc).

Strong analytical skills with the ability to organize, analyze, and convey information through key analytical processes.

Excellent communicator with the ability to clearly articulate findings verbally and in writing.

Capable of evaluating and recommending new technologies and software in support of ongoing operations.

It is important for the selected candidate to be familiar with/lightly skilled in the following computer languages and databases:

My SQL, Oracle JavaScript, XML, C++, R, Virtual Studio, Perl, VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access and Excel.

The selected candidate will provide detailed analysis and advice to both Managers and Intelligent Analysts.

The duties and responsibilities listed in this job description generally cover the nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. This is not intended to be a complete list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Subject to the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement, the company management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as may be necessary. We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for the position; however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.

We are an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, gender or gender-identity, age, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or parental status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you have a physical and/or mental disability and are interested in applying for employment and need special accommodations to use our website to apply for a position please contact, Recruiting Services at job-assist@akima.com or 571-353-7053. Reasonable accommodation requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

The dedicated email and telephonic options above are reserved only for individuals with disabilities needing accessibility assistance to apply to an open position using our website.

Please do not use the dedicated email or phone number above to inquire on the status of your job application.

In order for our company to stay compliant with government regulations, please apply on line. Please DO NOT email resumes or call in lieu of applying online unless you have a physical and/or mental disability and need assistance with the online application.",3.3,"Akima, LLC
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
40,Data Scientist,$94k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Analytics.

Our analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - including Product, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a data scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Analytics team, providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require extensive experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.

Responsibilities:

Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Build models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team

Skills Required:

3+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL required
Scripting skills, preferably in Python. Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plus
Knowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Familiarity with common KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
41,Cheminformatics Data Scientist,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"30-Oct-2020

Job ID
305764BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""250! That’s the number of data scientists leading a digital revolution at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

We are looking for a highly motivated data scientist to leverage deep learning and cheminformatics to enable our early drug discovery portfolio. As a domain specialist, you will collaborate closely with an innovative global team of in silico drug hunters in the Chemical Biology & Therapeutics Data Science (CBT DS) group at Novartis Institutes for Biochemical Research (NIBR).

You will also be part of a larger, global Data Science team with expertise in bioinformatics, computational biology, screening analytics, data engineering and predictive modeling, that combine expertise to gain a molecular understanding of disease etiology, to identify novel targets and chemical matter, assess preclinical model translation relevance and patient population heterogeneity. The team’s mission is to impact early stage drug discovery and advance biomedical research using innovative computational approaches with emphasis on data stewardship for predictive science. Together we are the brokers between data and the next wet-lab experiment.
This is a unique opportunity in an interdisciplinary environment at the intersection of chemical biology, genomics, biophysics, cheminformatics, and molecular modeling.

Your responsibilities will include:

•Champion in the group for current methods in deep learning.
•Develop novel deep learning workflows and apply them to lead discovery projects.
•Design, implement, and maintain robust methods, algorithms, and packages (python, R) that help the computational community solve old and new problems with ease.
•Ideate and implement visualizations, dashboards & webservices for data dissemination to computational peers as well as to non-computational collaborators.
•Engage as a collaborative member of the broader CBT Data Science community.

Posting Title
Cheminformatics Data Scientist",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
42,Data Scientist,$89k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist will be joining a team of extremely passionate data scientists, product managers, and engineerswho share a common interest in tackling some of the most difficult data science and machine learning problems today. With the data products you design, 7Park will arm influential decision-makers at financial and corporate giants with critical information they need to make smart, data-driven decisions. Our technologies and data power the insights for financial services and corporations.

The compensation package includes a competitive salary and incentive structure, generous benefits, and valuable business experiences, challenges, and excitement of contributing to the success of a fast-growing technology startup.

As Data Scientists at 7Park Data, we design and build data products that provide rich intelligence on real-time economic activity for our financial and corporate clients. To do that, we research and develop machine learning systems to extract decision-ready insight from massive volumes of structured and unstructured data.

Responsibilities:
Building, testing and maintaining all the components of 7Park Data’s product pipelines:
o Developing the transformation and enrichment logic that prepares messy, incomplete and inconsistent data for analysis

o Applying statistical modelling techniques to produce signals and packaging them in a client-consumable output
Work with 7Park Product and Commercial teams to understand business requirements, and their context, then translate them to a technical plan of action.
Evaluate new vendor data as part of our data acquisition process, form opinions on its future business value and the likelihood of success, and ultimately communicate findings to stakeholders at all levels of seniority
Collaborate with our Financial Research team to investigate hypotheses, produce commentaries and analyses on market trends, as well as refining new and existing products
Work with Product Managers at a strategic level to plan product roadmaps, recommend new products or enhancements, as well as estimating and prioritizing work. Ensure alignment of day-to-day activity with the overall product strategy
Develop systems to monitor the analytical quality of production models to discover anomalies, following through to investigation and resolution
Create technical documentation for both internal and external technical audiences, as well as contributing to client-facing content for non-technical audiences
Requirements:
3 – 5 years of relevant professional experience in an autonomous data analytics or data science role
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, computational finance, or a similar quantitative field (or relevant work experience)
Knowledge of statistics, computer science and machine learning
Strong programming skills in Python (highly preferred), R, and/or Scala
Strong proficiency with Pandas and Scikit-Learn
Experience with building distributed data pipelines using PySpark
Experience with several of the following concepts: decision trees, random forests, gradient boosting; linear regression; logistic regression; dimensionality reduction using PCA and clustering
Comfortable with general SDLC concepts and processes
Results-driven attitude with a strong desire to build data products and achieve results that matter- for us and for our clients. We come to play and play to win.
Deeply held conviction for the power of data, with high analytical standards and surgical attention to detail
Fearlessness in the pursuit of process improvement, implementation, and change
Flexibility and willingness to adapt to the changing demands of a fast-paced startup environment
Solutions oriented approach and multi-dimensional problem solving
Highly self-motivated and results oriented, proven track record of exceeding goals
Commitment to success and willingness to put forth the effort to achieve it
Strong written and verbal English communication skills – ability to communicate complex ideas simply and accurately to technical and non-technical audiences",4.0,"7Park Data
4.0","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Senior Food Scientist,$94k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Food Scientist *
We’re looking for a Product Developer/ Senior Food Scientist who thrives on the excitement of developing and innovating natural syrup products and contributing to project teams that are re-shaping the product portfolio.

YOU are a passionate product developer with a history of successful launches. Your background includes formulation experience across multiple manufacturing processes, ingredient types, and product lines. You have a strong understanding of flavor chemistry and can create amazing flavor combinations. You prefer to work in a high-energy, collaborative product development environment where you can take initiative. You’re practiced at taking new product ideas from concept through commercialization.

You’re the type of person who moves easily from project to project. You are a ‘go-to’ for development of natural flavor systems and ingredient functionality. Your “can do” attitude, relationship-building talent, and engaging communication skills make you an effective partner in and outside of Torani.

Look out a year from now: You’re being recognized as one of our most innovative contributors. You’ve developed an “out-of-the-box” formulation for a new natural syrup that exceeded expectations. You have become the anchor of the syrup cultivation team.
SUCCESS FACTORS (FIRST 12-18 MONTHS) *
_Overall _

 *New Products*: You have renovated and commercialized one product line and key line extensions at target cost, on time, and on trend. You’ve delivered amazing, customer-preferred, easy-to-use flavor with simple, natural ingredients.

 *Formula Renovation*: You have used your bench skills to improve existing products to beat competition in preference taste tests.

 *Collaboration*: Strong relationships are in place across the organization and with external partners, as demonstrated by the successful, smooth launch of new products and integrated ways of working with partner functions. You are a leader on the R+D team.

 *Project Management: * Your project management excellence is evident through fulfillment of your product plans and milestones. You are a go-to product development expert and go between line extension, cost optimization, and flavor improvement initiatives. You are detail oriented and can stick to set timelines.

 *Expertise: * Has brought synergistic technical expertise to enhance our capabilities, and has helped us deliver the more natural, simple profiles that have expanded our product portfolio and grown our new product business.

 *Has a little fun along the way! *
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS & ATTRIBUTES: *
 Bachelor’s Degree in food science or related discipline, Master’s preferred
At least 7 years of relevant, progressive experience in beverage or flavor product development
 Successfully developed consumer-preferred, delicious products with no artificial ingredients
 Experience developing products from concept to commercialization, including: Writing and documenting formulas and specifications, Calculating costs, Conducting plant trials Positive collaboration with internal and external manufacturing partners
 Implemented test protocols for sensory and shelf life studies
 Demonstrated experience in applied flavor chemistry
 Practiced with working in product data management systems (eg Oracle PLM or similar)
 Demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects well
 Live in SF Bay Area or willing to relocate at own expense
 Eligible to work in US without sponsorship (now & in the future)
 Proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook

Torani is one of the fastest growing and dynamic specialty food companies in the Bay Area. Perhaps you’ve been wondering if there’s a right company fit, where you might combine your deep expertise with purposeful work. If your core beliefs and values resonate with “Flavor for All, Opportunity for All”, we hope you’ll feel the spark. We’re dedicated to bringing our superb portfolio of natural flavorful products to people of diverse needs and incomes. And while our legacy of team and community focus started quietly in our passion for people development, it will flourish with B Corp certification. Torani is recognized as one of the most fun, friendly and warm companies you’ll come across.
_*_
_*_*

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Oracle: 1 year (Preferred)
Excel: 1 year (Preferred)
Microsoft Word: 1 year (Preferred)
Communication Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Microsoft Outlook: 1 year (Preferred)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative",3.5,"Torani
3.5","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
44,"Research and Development Scientist, Immunology Critical Raw Materials",-1,"*MiraVista Diagnostics *

*Job Title: *Research and Development Scientist\_Immunology CRM

*Department: *Research and Development

*Reports to: *Research and Development Division Manager

*FLSA Status: *Exempt

*Summary of Responsibilities *

The overall research focus of this position is the development, validation and implementation of new clinically relevant assays to aid in diagnosis of infectious diseases.

*Essential Duties and Responsibilities *

• Be part of a team tasked with development, validation and implementation of new immunology-based assays for clinical testing.

• Culture of BSL2 and BSL3 organisms, isolate storage and documentation.

• Purification and scale up of proteins and carbohydrates using AKTA, KrosFlo, electrophoresis.

• High level ability to analyze scientific data, assist in preparations of GMP documents.

*Qualifications *

• Fundamental understanding of immunology.

• Working knowledge of EIA test development.

*Education and Experience *

• PhD in biology, chemistry, immunology or related field or MS with 5 years experience in a research environment or industry.

• Strong interpersonal, communication and problem solving skills are required as well as demonstrated ability to work effectively in cross-functional teams.

MiraVista Diagnostics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Employee assistance program
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Professional development assistance
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus pay

Education:
* Master's (Required)

Experience:
* Research and Development: 5 years (Preferred)

Work Location:
* One location

Work Remotely:
* No",4.0,"MiraVista Diagnostics, LLC
4.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
45,Data Analyst,$37k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

We are OpenSquare. We believe that people with a purpose need a place to be their best. From Seattle area skyscrapers to the Pacific Northwest’s premier Universities and medical facilities, we design and create insightful spaces with the latest technology providing our clients an environment that embodies their image and encourages success. Splice is the professional services division of OpenSquare, providing FF&E project integration, post-occupancy and MAC management for some of the most well-known companies in the Seattle area.
The Data Analyst provides critical business intelligence for the Splice team, specifically focused on building in-depth knowledge of relevant databases, processes and programs. Additionally, this role provides strategic information to key stakeholders through data mining of corporate databases and by deeply understanding business processes and programs. This role will also drive the development and communication of business performance reporting analysis
Location: South Lake Union
*Please note that due to an influx of candidate submittals, we are only reviewing candidates located in the Seattle/surrounding cities area*
The Data Analyst will:
Work closely with account managers and other stakeholders to support customer data questions and analysis
Interpret data and identify trends using statistical techniques, generate reports and visualizations
Support development and maintenance of databases, data collection systems, analytics and other strategies to optimize operational efficiency
Develop a deep understanding of the processes underlying our data to identify opportunities for data integrity, normalization and quality assurance initiatives
Develop metrics and dashboards for monitoring data trends or telling stories
Train end users on new tools, reports and dashboards
Qualified Candidates will have:
1-3 years’ experience in data analysis, modeling and/or visualization. Education may be substituted in lieu of work experience
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university in a quantitative field
Experience with Python & SQL required
Experience with Tableau, Bokeh or other data visualization tools is heavily preferred.
Ability to work with stakeholders to assess potential risks
Ability to translate business needs into non-technical, lay terms
Experience handling large data sets
Benefits include:
15 days of PTO
9 Paid Holidays
Medical/Dental/Vision
401K
If this sounds like the right opportunity for you, please apply with your resume today! We look forward to connecting.
Exempt",3.6,"One Workplace
3.6","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1947,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
46,"Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing",-1,"Job Purpose*
Canventa has a new role for a Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing to provide scientific expertise for the development of multiple product lines for iPSC and iPSC derived differentiated cell types at Canventa Life Sciences. This role guides development strategies for diverse product portfolios and advances Canventa’s long-term success in current and emerging markets through product and technological innovation. This scientist drives collaborations both internally and externally to facilitate development of cutting edge products and scalable manufacturing processes.

Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for providing advanced scientific expertise for multiple product lines with particular emphasis on iPSCs, iPSC-derived cell types, organoids, and other culture-derived cell products.
Responsible for submitting new product proposals, setting performance criteria, experimental design, project planning, product optimization, and product launch .
Resolve complex scientific and technical investigations for cross-team and cross-functional operational activities.
Execute on department and corporate goals, projects and/or initiatives with the required stakeholders and subject matter experts. Contributes to the 5 - 10 year strategic plan.
Working closely with the Strategic Marketing and Marketing teams, participate in all aspects of the product lifecycle management and identify future trends to meet customer needs.
Evaluate new technologies, literature and patents independently, generate intellectual property, and respond to patent office actions with the Business Development Team; draft patent applications.
Identify and execute multiple product and process improvement projects including cost reduction and risk mitigation initiatives; responsible for initiating cost reduction projects.
Manage the assigned project research budget and report on monthly status updates.
Generate, review and approve technical documentation and provide pre- and post-product launch support.
Proactively research and analyze competitor activities, threats, and trends, and recommend new product development ideas to counter potential competitor threats.
Serve as a scientific ambassador of the company: i) deliver superior quality presentations to internal and external audiences; ii) promote the Canventa brand and mission; iii) facilitate and strengthen successful relationships with external experts at all levels.
Adhere to the Quality Management System (QMS) initiatives and requirements.
Proactively report and present on the product lifecycle activities to senior leaders across the company. Responsible for Executive reporting on corporate initiatives as needed.
Lead, manage, coach and mentor a cross-functional team to meet the deliverables and increase team productivity.
Qualifications
PhD with 4-8 years of relevant experience in iPSC generation, maintenance, differentiation and cell characterization.
Experience in creating master cell banks and cryopreservation is an asset.
Additional expertise in primary cell/ organoid/ organ tissue culture is an asset.
Additional experience in high-throughput screening, drug screening, disease modeling, or experience with bioreactor cultures is an asset.
Accomplished independent researcher with product, methodology, and/or technology development experience.
Proven record of complex experimental design and execution, including expertise in applying appropriate statistical analyses in complex data sets.
Broad technical expertise and knowledge of diverse laboratory techniques. Proven experience training staff on laboratory techniques and protocols.
Expert presenter with the ability to deliver technical summaries of data with critical thinking skills to provide in-depth analytical explanations and interpretations.
Managed successful collaborations with key opinion leaders.
Demonstrated expertise drafting business plans, patent applications, and related articles in the field of expertise.
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written and presentation) both in one-on-one and in group settings.
Personal Attributes
Ability to question and not always be satisfied with the status quo.
Willingness to learn and assume new responsibilities.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Self-motivated and independent work ethic.
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a fast paced environment.
Strives in a growing and changing environment.
Team orientated – ‘one-team’ behavior with demonstrated team leadership capabilities is a must.
Canventa Life Sciences is a company focused on the collection and processing of donated blood and bone marrow specimens into samples that are immediately used by researchers worldwide, increasing access to biologically relevant samples and accelerating the pace of research.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
All office and lab staff have access to plastic barriers, gloves, eye protection, masks, hand sanitizers, soap & water, and lab coats.

Experience:
Staff Training: 1 year (Preferred)
Cryopreservation: 1 year (Preferred)
laboratory: 4 years (Required)
Presentation Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Cell culture: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.Canventa.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/canventa/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Canventa Life Sciences,"Emeryville, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
47,Senior Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Analyst*
Responsibilities will focus on providing detailed financial and operational reporting as well as enhancing, creating and analysis of key performance indications via push reporting form a data warehouse.

DUTIES
Maintain the data warehouse, the data warehouse infrastructure, ETL pipelines from enterprise systems to the data warehouse, and the integrity of the data therein.
Hands-on experience working with MS SQL Server (MySQL, Hive and SSIS are a plus)
Building SQL reports and dashboards that interpret data to expose patterns and trends.
Automating the collection of data from available sources while identifying new opportunities for automation.
Assist in developing and tracking relevant business metrics that help drive business success, as well as the periodic communications of those metrics to key stakeholders.
Help with in-depth periodic analysis of business metrics and variance analysis.
Ensure all data warehouse reporting reconciles to existing management systems.
Aid in the preparation and development of detailed budgets and forecasts, including P&L, cash flow, and balance sheet projections on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.
Complete ad hoc analysis as needed.
Provide input to the management team as needed.
QUALIFICATIONS
Degree in accounting, finance or quantitative discipline preferred.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in FP&A, Business Analytics or Corporate Strategy
STARTING SALARY RANGE: $75,000

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analytics, Strategy or FP&A: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.hmespecialists.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"HME SPECIALISTS, LLC
3.2","Albuquerque, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
48,"Research and Development Scientist, Product Development",-1,"*MiraVista Diagnostics *

*Job Title: *Research and Development Scientist – Product Development

*Department: *Research and Development

*Reports to: *Research Division Manager

*Summary of Responsibilities *

The overall focus of this position will be the development, validation and implementation of new immunological assays to aid in diagnosis of infectious diseases.

*Essential Duties and Responsibilities *

• Be part of a team tasked with development and validation of new immunology-based assays, including reagent screening, feasibility, optimization and product release. Prepare research protocols, SOPs, work instructions and other documentation for efficient product development and product transfer.

• Effectively communicate scientific results within Research Department and cross- functionally.

*Qualifications *

• Fundamental understanding of immunology and test development.

• Experience with design, development and evaluations of EIA, LFA, cytokine assays.
• Experience in production of recombinant proteins using various expression hosts.

• High level ability to analyze scientific data, assist in preparations of GMP documents.
Must have good attention to details.

*Education and Experience *

• PhD in biology, chemistry, immunology or related field or MS with 8 years experience in a research environment or industry.

• Strong interpersonal, communication and problem-solving skills. Ability to work effectively in cross-functional teams.

MiraVista Diagnostics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Employee assistance program
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Professional development assistance
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus pay

Education:
* Master's (Required)

Experience:
* Research Experience: 8 years (Preferred)

Work Location:
* One location

Work Remotely:
* No",4.0,"MiraVista Diagnostics, LLC
4.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
49,Applied Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Redesign Health is a proud Equal Opportunity Employer we recruit, train, compensate and promote our team members based on qualifications. We know how important it is not only to include, but to actively seek out a diversity of opinions and voices.

We want to hear from you regardless of your race, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, age, veteran status, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.

About Anomaly


Anomaly is a healthcare technology company with a bold mission: to bring precision payments to healthcare.

Healthcare billing is complex, prone to errors, waste, abuse, and fraudat a cost of over $300 billion annually. Precision payments means the right amount is paid the first time, so the focus is on members, not on payment paperwork. Cutting-edge AI/ML technology immediately catches anomalous claims, enabling payments to flow with precision. Anomaly's team of technical, clinical, and operational experts is working with innovative payers and employers to implement this vision. Our team includes the former CEO of UnitedHealthcare Employer & Individual, head of engineering of Foursquare and Redesign Health, and formers from Optum, Apple, Google and other leading tech and healthcare companies.

Anomaly, currently in stealth mode, was incubated by Redesign Health.

About Redesign Health


Redesign Health is a healthcare innovation platform. The Redesign team brings together entrepreneurs, industry experts, and investors to fund and launch companies that transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives. Their first companies include Lively, Ever/Body, Vault Health, Springtide, HealthQuarters, Calibrate, and stealth ventures in payment integrity, sleep therapy, elder care, and complex care. Redesign is capitalized with permanent capital from world-class institutional investors and entrepreneurs.

About the Applied Machine Learning Engineer Role


As our Applied Machine Learning Engineer, you will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team in order to execute cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data. Your goal is to train and test models on millions of data-points, and help build-out a state-of-the-art human-in-the-loop ML infrastructure.

In this role, you will report directly to the Head of Data Science at our New York City headquarters. This role will remote until it is safe to return to the office. You will collaborate with other data scientists, as well as members of the platform engineering team. You will also engage in daily interactions with domain experts on the payment integrity team.

What you'll do:
Write production-level machine learning models
Executing cutting-edge machine learning techniques to find fraud, waste, and abuse in healthcare data.
Making infrastructural choices in order to ensure that the trained models scale well across millions of health insurance claims
Collaborate with the team to build internal tools to support our company mission
Working with domain experts in the health insurance field to incorporate their knowledge into trained models.
Building interactive internal tools to obtain expert feedback for the purposes of model validation.
Have strong impact on innovative engineering projects
Running unsupervised anomaly detection on millions of heterogeneous health-insurance features using PySpark.
Shining a bright light on black-box models to make all anomalous signals easily interpretable.
Interacting with domain experts and encoding their experience into simple heuristics. Pushing these heuristics to production for the purposes of weak supervision.
Training large-scale, weakly-supervised ML models using tools like Snorkel. Making sure these models are interpretable.
Tweaking models using expert feedback. Building dashboards to solicit that feedback using human-in-the-loop training techniques.
Experimenting with transformer model applications using the Pytorch / Tensorflow libraries.
What you'll need:


Background
Standard knowledge of Python data-science stack
5+ years in software engineering experience
Hacker mindset
Experience building out production-ready machine learning solutions
Skills
Communicates Effectively: Attentively listens to others. Adjusts to fit the audience and the message. Provides timely and helpful information to others across the organization. Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.
Manages Ambiguity: Deals comfortably with the uncertainty of change. Effectively handles risk. Can decide and act without having the total picture. Is calm, and productive, even when things are up in the air.
Courage: Readily tackles tough assignments. Faces difficult issues and supports others who do the same. Provides direct and actionable feedback.
Instills Trust: Follows through on commitments. Is seen as direct and truthful. Keeps confidences. Practices what he/she preaches. Shows consistency between words and actions. Gaining the confidence and trust of others through honesty, integrity, and authenticity
Action Oriented: Readily takes action on challenges, without unnecessary planning. Identifies and seizes new opportunities. Displays a can-do attitude in good and bad times. Steps up to handle tough issues.
Nice To Have
Exposure to PySpark, PyTorch, Snorkel
Experience working in a fast-paced, innovative environment
What Redesign is all about


Redesign's mission is to transform the healthcare system and empower people to live their healthiest lives by elevating patient experiences, increasing information transparency, and democratizing access to high quality healthcare.

Our vision is to connect extraordinary people and ideas with capital and resources to create better healthcare solutions.

At Redesign, we value achieving results thoughtfully, quickly, and compassionately. To give a sense of what our team is all about, these are the values that guide our work:
Solve for impact: Healthcare is complex and opaque, but we're positioned to meet the challenge. If not us, then who?
Patients first: We are all consumers of healthcare. We create real solutions for real needs.
Outcome over egos: Our work is bigger than us. What we're building together is greater than the sum of the parts.
Bias for action: We move fast, but we're deliberate. We don't delay success or failure.
Continuous learning: We seek feedback early and often. Iteration and insight allow us to connect the dots and are key to our process.
Practice good intent: We take our work seriously, but we're never too busy to be kind.
Why work with us?
Competitive salary and equity compensation
Comprehensive health & wellness benefits and perks
Lunch & Learn sessions hosted by internal and external industry experts featuring topics ranging from ""Qualities of a Strong Consumer Brand"" to ""Combating Unconscious Bias""
Variety of functional, social, and community focused groups and meetups across the Redesign ecosystem and portfolio
Annual learning stipend
16-week parental leave
Fully stocked kitchen with plenty of coffee and tea, cold brew and iced tea on tap, a Bevi machine, and a variety of snacks
Dog friendly office",5.0,"Redesign Health
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
50,"Associate Scientist, Virology (PhD Required)",-1,"The associate scientist in virology will be involved in conducting infectious diseases research programs directed at developing novel broad-based host-targeted anti-viral and immunomodulatory therapeutics against influenza and other viral infections. The candidate will write scientific publications, grant and patent applications, and investigational new drug (IND) applications. The responsibilities of this position include developing and executing cell-based assays, _in vitro,_ _ex vivo_ and _in vivo_ to characterize biological mechanisms of action of novel immunotherapeutic product candidates for the treatment of infectious diseases. The associate scientist will have ample and documented experience in cell culture, virus generation and propagation, as well as molecular biology, immunology and biochemical techniques. We are looking for a highly motivated and collaborative individual with a passion for research who enjoys working in a fast-paced and highly dynamic working environment. The candidate will be aligned with four fundamental pillars of BTI's entrepreneurial corporate culture: 1) Be bold and decisive, 2) Never give up, 3) Be solution-oriented, and 4) Do the impossible.
Key Responsibilities: *
· _Experimental Design: _ Generate and test novel experimental hypotheses to advance discovery-based R&D at BTI. Propose controlled designs capable of robustly testing respective hypotheses to draw conclusions relevant to drug development research.

· _Data analysis: _ Utilize established and novel methods to analyze data. Data types will include but are not limited to flow cytometry results, high-throughput sequencing, protein biochemistry assays, and histopathology.

· _Data communication and reporting: _ Provide detailed reports of experimental results. Generate figures, presentations and publications to communicate results with scientific community, investors, and collaborators. Support the development of peer reviewed scientific publications, patents and grants relevant to ongoing research. Demonstrate innovation and strong problem-solving skills.

· _General Laboratory Procedures_: Perform various standard experimental assays including quantitative real-time PCR, Western blot, flow cytometry, and ELISA. Work in sterile conditions to conduct cell culture experiments and maintain the growth of cell lines. Express and purify recombinant protein. Collect and analyze generated data.

· _Personnel Training_: Training of BTI personnel on laboratory upkeep, experimental assays and research projects. Guide the personnel resourcing of projects and tasks.

· _Animal Procedures_: Conduct various IACUC approved laboratory animal procedures and techniques for BTI’s projects including but not limited to basic rodent handling, oral gavage, intraperitoneal injection, blood collection, and euthanasia. Interact with animal facility personnel to maintain organization and compliance of animal facilities. Will design new animal studies for projects related to therapeutic efficacy or mechanisms of action of new drugs for infectious diseases.

· _Virology_: Perform mammalian cell culture and independently develop, run, analyze and troubleshoot in vitro assays, such as cell-based activity assays, virus generation and propagation, and high throughput screening assays. Use developed screening assays to validate the characterize novel therapeutic products.

· _Teamwork_: Work independently and collaboratively in a matrixed environment. Be able to successfully work with other BTI team members in experiments.

· _Regulatory Compliance_: Support regulatory compliance efforts as instructed by the senior leadership in accordance with IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocols. Implement, organize and maintain regulatory compliance records.

· _Record keeping_: Timely documentation of experiments and activities in electronic archive systems. Keep detailed records of all activities, record these activities in Google Drive, laboratory notebook, the BTI’s Colony Management System (CMS), and Labkey. Provide weekly updates of the BTI research progress to the CSO, and BTI team. Maintains confidentiality of all data, information and knowledge.

· Maintain the confidentiality of all company deliberations and plans.

· Any new responsibilities or changes in the reporting structure as directed by the executive leadership.

· Act in accordance with Company’s policies.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $48,590.00 - $69,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Company's website:
www.biotherapeuticsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"BioTherapeutics, Inc.","Blacksburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
51,Data Analyst,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"A Data Analyst interacts with different lines of business to gather information from various sources, interpret patterns and trends, and turns it into information, to support the business. The ideal candidate should be highly skilled in all aspects of data analytics, including mining, generation, and visualization and be committed to transforming data into readable, goal-driven reports for the business. With a focus on improving and building business intelligence, this role will support Sales and Marketing.

Basic requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Marketing, Economics, or related degree
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Excellent systems skills including Excel & PowerPoint with advance proficiencies,
Ability to learn other software – Power BI, Tagetik, Oracle and others
Proactively performs analyses of historical data to surface trends and insights using analytical methods and find opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets.
Create and automate standard reporting and analysis ensuring the commercial team and leaders have access to key data required to successfully manage the business.
Prepares, delivers and present reports and presentations that translate analytic insights into tangible, actionable solutions for business partners to implement.
Engages with internal partners to understand business strategy, questions, and goals, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis by integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources.
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources and verifies its quality, accuracy and reasonableness.
Create and automate standard reporting and analysis ensuring the commercial team and leaders have access to key data required to successfully manage the business.
Proactively performs analyses of historical data to surface trends and insights using analytical methods and find opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets.
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources.",4.2,"Carmeuse
4.2","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1860,Company - Private,Mining,Mining & Metals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
52,STAFF SCIENTIST,$24k-$51k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Staff Scientist

Requisition Number: 2020-2410-09

S&ME is a leading, employee-owned, multi-disciplined professional services firm that responds to clients with innovative, sustainable solutions. S&ME strives to create an environment where everyone can be their best by providing a supportive atmosphere of entrepreneurial growth, to build growing relationships, and to take on increasingly complex project opportunities.We recruit top talent and are currently seeking a Staff Scientist to join our team in Chattanooga, Tennessee.

The individual will perform field and office work associated with environment evaluations. Field work will include: soil sampling, groundwater sampling, surface water sampling, sediment sampling, wetland delineations, stream classifications, and fauna/flora identification. Other responsibilities include completing data entry to capture field activities, and the preparation of standard environmental reports. This individual will be expected to maintain knowledge of, and compliance with, regulatory requirements by attending environmental or natural resources training courses, or other in-house trainings. This position will require some travel and overnight stays.

Qualifications:
BS in environmental science, geology, biology, chemistry or related field;
2-4 years field experience in related field;
Ability to work outdoors in varying weather conditions;
Ability and willingness to accommodate overnight and out-of-town assignments;
Good technical writing, verbal communication, and computer skills.
To apply visit www.smeinc.com/careers and follow the ""Career Openings"" link.This is a full-time position with competitive pay based on experience. Successful candidate must meet requirements of the company's Fleet Management Program, Substance Policy and Reference Check program. Submit resume, cover letter, and salary expectations for consideration. Only qualified candidates with acceptable employment eligibility verification (I-9) will be considered. Visa assistance not provided. S&ME reserves the right to fill this position with an internal or external candidate at any time during the search. S&ME is not responsible for unauthorized job postings or submissions of resumes using external links/websites.

No candidate/recruiter calls, personal calls or walk-ins accepted.

An Equal Opportunity Employer.

Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.7,"S&ME, Inc.
3.7","Chattanooga, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
53,Data Analyst/ Senior Data Analyst,-1,"You will be a crucial member of the team tasked with capturing data workflows and use cases across EQRx and turn them into reproducible, democratizable tools on a modern data tech stack, enabling faster and more successful drug development. You will map how data is used to understand the complex web of interrelationships in taking drugs from a pharmaceutical company to a patient. You will translate and harden these workflows to a modern data tech stack in collaboration with data scientists and engineers.
You will understand how clinical scientists and staff capture, maintain, and use data and use these insights to organize data across EHR (Electronic Health Record), clinical trial, and other data sources. You will integrate data across sources and use cases (e.g. pricing, claims, and clinical) to enable end users to see across EQRx’s data asset to improve our program design, operations, opportunity targeting, pricing, and access. You will assist in building a digital-native life sciences company, identifying and prioritizing areas to pursue, where data tools could inform decision making throughout EQRx.
The Impact You'll Have
You will enable experts across EQRx to look across datasets to identify key opportunities to dramatically reduce prices and expand access to novel drugs, connecting information across market data, patient claims and adherence, and clinical datasets to enable experts to pinpoint the most salient opportunities for developing novel, more accessible medicines. This person will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines by bringing a digital and data native technology stack to drug development, powering a modern, and radically new paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have a Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative scientific, or social scientific field, e.g. biology, engineering, economics, etc.
You have 3+ years of experience in industry (Life sciences/healthcare background a major plus).
You are skilled at building insightful visualizations in a modern dashboarding tool (e.g. Mode, Looker, Spotfire); experience with D3.js a plus.
You are fluent in SQL and comfortable in a scripting language such as python.
You have worked with modern cloud data warehousing tools (e.g. BigQuery, Snowflake) and ETL tools (e.g. Stitch, Fivetran, DBT).
You are an excellent communicator, empathetic with end users and internal customers. You can translate a problem from a description of a business process to organization of data and pipelines.
You have a quick, flexible mind; always looking for clever ways to connect data and transform processes to a modern, digital and data native architecture.
You possess strong communication, organizational and presentation skills.
You can participate and work effectively on multiple cross-functional teams.
You play well in the sandbox. You understand relationships are key and have strong interpersonal skills.
Teams love working with you and learning from you.
You can thrive in a smaller company environment and love the pace of a true startup.
You’re a team player who is willing to roll-up your sleeves and get the job done.
Job Code: #LI-JR1
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
54,Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Canal Insurance

Canal Insurance Company specializes in insurance for commercial trucking and specialty transportation operations. Canal was founded in 1939 and is located in Greenville, South Carolina. At Canal, we recognize that our success would not be possible without the hard work and dedication of our employees. We know that happiness and productivity go hand in hand, and to that end, we consciously cultivate a culture that enables us to recruit and retain the very best talent in the business.

BI Analyst

***Must be willing to relocate***

Job Summary: The BI Analyst role is responsible for the continuous delivery of analytic solutions and data quality. Working cross-functionally, the BI Analyst will democratize data, support BI quality efforts, and maintain frontend BI solutions systems in a data warehouse environment.

Major Accountabilities:
Work independently with users to define BI concepts, information needs and defining functional requirements, specifications and recommendations related BI solutions.
Lead BI request triage process, maintain Features in Azure DevOps, and organize iteration planning sessions.
Monitor and administer automated ETL jobs to verify execution; Build reports to audit, monitor& validate BI jobs.
Decipher existing reports and database processes to assist users and data stewards in understanding BI solutions.
Support quality assurance testing throughout the agile development cycle.
Interacts with internal team members to assure that the requirements are clearly communicated and documented.
Assist with the review, consolidation and reduction of data discrepancies.
Design, build, enhance, and maintain BI solutions, including dashboards, scorecards, and reports, using IBM Cognos Analytics and other Microsoft BI products.
Migrate and refactor legacy reporting to current BI environment.
Train users in the operations and scheduling of reports.
Perform other duties as assigned by management.
Qualifications:

Education/Training Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent work experience required.

Experience/Specialized Skills: Minimum of three years’ experience in Business Intelligence and reporting field required. High-level proficiency required in analyzing user requirements, and building front-end BI applications according to specifications. Strong organizational skills required. High-level proficiency in working with semantic layers, star schemas and dimensional data modeling. High-level proficiency required in master data management, data profiling, automated testing, process automation, and data quality subjects. Intermediate to high-proficiency level proficiency required in T-SQL for SQL Server (2016, 2017), Reporting Services (SSRS), SQL Server Analysis Services (SSAS), Microsoft Excel. Intermediate to high-proficiency desired in IBM Cognos Analytics (V11), Report Studio, Framework Manager, Cognos architecture and development best practices.

Special Considerations:

Physical Requirements: Constant use of vision, hearing, and communication (oral and written). Frequent standing, walking, handling, reaching, grasping, and periods of prolonged concentration. Frequent bending, kneeling and lifting (up to 50 lbs.) Frequent use of computer and office equipment.

Travel/Hours of Service: Occasional travel may be required. Periodic work outside of standard business hours or on weekends may be required.",3.8,"Canal Insurance
3.8","Greenville, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1939,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
55,Senior Data Analytics/Scientist,$73k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Senior Data Analytics/Scientist to support the Chief Human Capital Office (CHCO) for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

Primary Responsibilities

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insights and trends in human capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance HCA across the IC. Centralize IC CHCO data collection and synthesis, including survey data, enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data-driven problem-solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operation questions; and incorporate insights and findings into a range of products.

Create detailed write-ups of processes used, logic applied, and methodologies used for creation, validation, analysis, and visualizations. Write- ups shall occur initially, within a week of when process is created, and updated in writing when changes occur.

Adapt freeware solutions such as R, and modular solutions for maximum flexibility. Provide an advanced capability for data analysis of human capital information from disparate data types, promoting visualization and storytelling to discover insights that help guide business decisions. Be forward leaning, exploring HCA solutions that benefit IC elements individually and collectively. Let the data tell the story including what is inconsistent or contradictory, and automate data cleansing as much as possible. Integrate data solutions and collection with IC Information Technology Enterprise to enhance connectivity with IC Elements.

Identify and customize, if necessary, Commercial Off The Shelf (COTS) Information Technology (IT) tools for administration and data collection, or to leverage, support, and integrate the process with tools built for the IC and/or its component elements. Any tools developed shall be web-based and web-enabled, designed to maximize feedback effectiveness while protecting employee assessment information, and include both structured interview and web-based tools for gathering feedback.

Assist in the development and maintenance of financial procedural guidance, templates and data formats, for identifying IC-wide workforce numbers, to include government, military, and contractor support. Review, assess data, identify data deficiencies and recommend solutions for remediation. Support quantitative and analytic efforts for workforce planning, development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to the Congressional Budget Justification Book (CBJB) planning displays, and analytic support for budget management and planning. Assist with ad hoc data requests from Congress, IC elements or as required by IC CHCO.

Coordinate and facilitate community of practice and working group meetings, to include meeting logistics, agenda development and presenter coordination, day-of execution and facilitation, documentation and distribution of meeting minutes and presentations. Present or coordinate presentations on relevant topics as directed by IC CHCO.

Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.

Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).

Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.

Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative- tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.

Preferred Experience:

C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.

Demonstrated expertise in supporting quantitative and analytical efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.

Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.

Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.

Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on-line and automated survey instruments.

Years of Experience: 7 years of relevant experience in a related field (computer science, mathematics, statistics, etc.).

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance/ SCI Eligibility with a CI Polygraph. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc.
4.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
56,Pilot Plant Technician -Scientist III,-1,"Position Title – Pilot Plant Technician - Scientist 3

Requirements:

The ideal candidate must have three years of small scale to large scale bioprocess experience, strong attention to detail and ability to learn quickly. Experience with microbial fermentation, cell culture or protein purification experience and a good understanding of sterile techniques and working under a biological safety cabinet are highly desired. Must be able to do early morning and some weekend work. Education: BS degree or equivalent required.

Responsibilities:

Support shake flask work, small scale to large scale microbial and cell culture process development and deliveries. Assist in preparing media and buffers, setting up, sterilization, sampling, and cleaning reactors along with protein purification at pilot scale. Document process steps electronically and draft training material. Enter process data into database. Troubleshoot equipment and do minor repairs. Responsible for using safe laboratory practices and for maintaining the work area in a clean, orderly and safe manner.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.execupharm.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ExecuPharm FSP,"Kenilworth, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
57,Data Scientist – Protein Sciences,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"13-Oct-2020

Job ID
304587BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""127! That’s the number of drug discovery projects impacted this year by protein science data at Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

Are you a curious and inspired Data Scientist passionate about bringing protein science data to the next level of informing and impacting drug discovery projects? Do you like working in cross-functional and multidisciplinary teams? Do you enjoy transforming scientific challenges into computational solutions to catalyze efficiency in data-driven drug discovery? As a team member of a global Data Science group with expertise in protein data science, data engineering, computational biology, bioinformatics, screening analytics and predictive modelling this is a unique opportunity waiting for you to leverage protein science data at scale.

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Engage in an interdisciplinary environment with structural biologists, biophysicists, protein chemists, proteomic scientists and molecular modelers to advance structure-based drug discovery using innovative computational approaches.
Champion data stewardship in protein crystallography, biomolecular NMR, cryo-EM and biophysics to enable predictive science.
Design and implement robust applications, methods and end-to-end analysis workflows for automated data processing, quality control and publishing.
Exploit and integrate internal and external protein data sources to generate drug discovery impact.
Ideate and proto-type tailored visualizations and webservices for data dissemination across the organization.
Mentor scientists who are developing their computational skills.
Posting Title
Data Scientist – Protein Sciences",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
58,Scientist,$46k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist
Organization


Eurofins S-F Analytical Laboratories, Inc.

Location


NC, Wilson

Job Code

21103

Apply Now

Eurofins Craft Technologies is searching for a Scientist in Wilson, NC. The Scientist II performs testing activities as directed by Business Unit Manager in accordance with all applicable company and regulatory guidelines and designs experiments, operates instruments, assists other chemists, collects and interprets data, writes but also peer reviews data and/or reports especially for challenging, non-routine investigations, custom method development, method validation, unknown/material identification, failure analysis, simple deformulations and select product testing/development work.

Scientist responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following :

· Perform testing activities as directed by Business Unit Manager in accordance with all applicable company and regulatory guidelines.

· Perform quality work within deadlines with or without direct supervision.

· Work independently while understanding the necessity for communicating and coordinating work efforts with other employees.

· Interact professionally with other employees, customers and suppliers.

· Work effectively as a team contributor on all assignments.

· Promote Lean activities to improve lab efficiency.

· Monitor backlog and plan testing schedule to ensure quoted turnaround times are met.

· Perform wide range of analytical methodology utilizing sample preparative methods as needed for separation of water and fat soluble vitamins.

· Preparation of mobile phases, calibrate pH meter, balance or scale validation, etc.

· Utilizing a good working knowledge of Chromatography, Analytical Chemistry, Biology and/or Biochemistry, Immunology, Genetics and/or Molecular Biology in preparation analysis, quality control, data collection, data evaluation in a variety of complex matrices.

· Knowledgeable in all routine and non-routine methodology, in simple and complex matrixes and compounds using turn-key SOP’s and development of new approaches and preparative procedures.

· Proficient and can demonstrate the ability to perform all routine analysis.

· May train and assist lab technicians and other staff, informing and teaching technical data or applications through verbal or written presentations.

· Prepare and submit written analytical reports of laboratory findings and recommend repetition of testing and corrective action in abnormal findings.

· Handling and analytical testing of biological samples.

· Prepares calibration standards and calibrates instrumentation and equipment.

· Perform studies in support of quality control parameters for instruments utilized HPLC, UHPLC, GC and others as needed.

· Works with colleagues to develop new and improve problematic analytical testing through literature findings and research.

· Diagnose, troubleshoot and maintain some laboratory equipment and instrumentation.

· Instrumentation utilized will include a wide array including but not limited to HPLC, UHPLC, GC, Spectrophotometer, ELISA and highly complex equipment (LC-MS/MS) interpretation and other instruments and techniques as needed to meet customer expectations (includes outsourcing selective testing when appropriate).

· Perform and document method transfers, development work, validations/verifications.

· Maintain neat and accurate records.

· Interact with clients to assist in selection of test methods and interpretation of test data. Assist Sales and Business Team members on quote review if requested

· Enter testing data into LIMS and monitor for QC failures.

· Assist lab staff in determining corrective actions for QC failures.

· Review and approve laboratory analytical data including peer review

· Review and issue reports to clients.

· Support the maintenance of controlled documents related to laboratory operations/testing through editing of documents and/or reviewing revisions.

· Support quality system improvements through completion of Corrective and Preventive Action forms, documenting Non-Conformances and Client Complaints, and assisting with internal audit findings as assigned by Analytical Chemistry Operations Manager.

· Support the completion of unknown and failure investigations through testing performance and/or imparting chemical knowledge.

· Maintain regular attendance and punctuality

· Conducts all activities in a safe and efficient manner

· Assist with case studies, white papers if requested by Sr. Management for marketing purposes.

· Attend industry-appropriate symposia, training, webinars, journals to remain current on analytical techniques, new developments.

· Maintain chemical/reagent traceability.

· Performs other duties as assigned

The ideal candidate would possess :


· Use of highly complex equipment, such as LC-MS/MS and ELISA, is desired

· Experience with GLP or peer-reviewed complex studies

· Knowledge of ISO 17025, USDA, FDA and related guidance; experience in method validation and method development

· Excellent written and communication skills

· Excellent attention to details and good organization skills

· Ability to work well independently as well as in a team environment

Basic Minimum Qualifications :


· MS or PhD in analytical chemistry

· HPLC/LCMSMS experience especially with vitamins, supplements, nutritional components, metabolites, pharmaceutical components; proficiency at GC, HPLC, UHPLC and knowledge of all other major analytical instrument capabilities is imperative

· 5+ years’ experience in a commercial laboratory

· Must be available for occasional travel to other Eurofins sites

· Authorization to work in the United States indefinitely without restriction or sponsorship

Position is full-time, Monday-Friday, with overtime as needed. Candidates currently living within a commutable distance of Wilson, NC are encouraged to apply.

As a Eurofins employee, you will become part of a company that has received national recognition as a great place to work. We offer excellent full-time benefits including comprehensive medical coverage, life and disability insurance, 401(k) with company match, paid holidays and vacation, personal days, and dental and vision options.

To learn more about Eurofins, please explore our website www.eurofinsus.com.

Eurofins is a M/F, Disabled, and Veteran Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer.",2.8,"EAG Laboratories
2.8","Wilson, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Research & Development,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
59,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
60,MicroStrategy Business Intelligence Analyst,$73k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Modesto, CA, G3 Enterprises has been supplying the wine and spirits industry for over 50 years. As a single source packaging solution, its products and services include labels, stock and custom closures, warehousing, transportation, bottle etching, and mobile bottling.

The Business Intelligence Analyst creates reporting and analytical solutions that enable translating data into knowledge and maintains MicroStrategy infrastructure across G3 organization. Analyzes business intelligence data to inform business decisions. Partners with other areas of the business to model the outcome of implementing potential business strategies.

Essential Functions
• Utilizes data architecture to enable business decisions and recommend technical solutions to management based on scalability and complexity.
• Provides guidance and analytical support to include analysis and research in areas across G3 corporation.
• Satisfies ad-hoc requests for information from G3 teams that aid in uncovering new understandings that drive decisions which move the organization forward.
• Acts as technical expert, addressing infrastructure needs, systems/applications integration, compatibility, and multiple platforms.
• Analyzes data to create and maintain reports, dashboards, visualizations, and other tools (such as cubes and views) in multiple development and production environments.
• Responsible for executing the implementation of the BI strategy related to G3’s SAP ERP and OTM systems.
• Sources data from various systems via Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) and external data sources.
• Designs user driven analytics structure using existing data architecture.
• Influences data warehousing teams to recommend data layer structures and integrate systems.
• Translates business requirements to functional and technical design solutions, specifications, and prototypes.
• Collaborates with development teams to design business intelligence solutions to facilitate data gathering, storage, and retrieval.
• Consults with users or decision makers to identify data sources, required data elements, or data validation standards.
• Develops test plans and facilitates testing prior to promotions.
• Creates and maintains technical documentation
• Performs cross-functional analysis and collaborates with stakeholders across departments. Partners and presents findings to senior leadership.
• Responsible for understanding and complying with applicable quality, environmental and safety regulatory considerations. If accountable for the work of others, responsible for ensuring their understanding and compliance.

Qualifications
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, Data Analytics, Data Science, or Engineering plus 3 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management; OR High School diploma or State-issued equivalency certificate plus 7 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management.
• Ability to build and understand basic SQL queries.

Preferred Qualifications
• Master’s degree in Computer Science, Operations Research, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, or Engineering.
• MicroStrategy Intelligence Server Development experience.
• Experience designing and executing Application objects and Schema objects using MicroStrategy Desktop.
• Experience analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of complex reports, ETL scripts and dashboards.
• Experience troubleshooting high level issues to identify and resolve problems caused by the database, source data, ETL, or the Business Intelligence software (common examples: nulls in data causing joins to function incorrectly; ETLs running out of sequence; MicroStrategy Objects not set up properly).
• Experience with cloud computing and “big data” processing and analytics.
• Understanding of web servers and applications.
• Knowledge of components of an enterprise systems architecture
• Knowledge of business process re-engineering processes including Lean Six Sigma principles.
• Lean Six Sigma Green or Black Belt Certified.
• Strong understanding of network architecture and application development methodologies
• Experience reading, analyzing, and interpreting common scientific and technical journals and financial reports.
• Knowledge of emerging technologies and development platforms.
• Experience applying machine learning or artificial intelligence to BI applications.
• Possesses a passion for technology and its impact on the enterprise, customers and consumers along with a breadth of experience that can balance business, application and operational requirements.
• Strong understanding of systems and “systems thinking” with the ability to make trade-off decisions to accomplish system-wide goals.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Excellent planning and organizational skills.
• Skilled in balancing long-term and short-term goals and perspectives of challenging situations.
• Skilled in applying multiple technical solutions to business problems.
• Remains unbiased toward any specific technology or vendor choice.
• Excellent analytical and technical skills.
• Skilled in navigating complex political situations to ensure successful change management.
• Exceptional interpersonal skills, including teamwork, facilitation and negotiation.
• Demonstrates strong technical thinking and developed high credibility with the technical community. Recognized by the IT community as someone who solves complex technology related business problems.
• Experience with performance tuning of business intelligence applications.
• Strong knowledge of SQL queries including writing, reading, and debugging.
• Experience working with Enterprise Data Warehousing, specifically SAP Data Warehousing (HANA).

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.

Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

EEO/AA M/F/Vet/Disability",3.9,"G3 Enterprises
3.9","Modesto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
61,Data Engineer,$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
62,Data Engineer,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data engineer who is well versed with SQL, database optimization, data processing platforms & analytics.

Responsibilities:
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Manage ingestion process of various input data sources (healthcare, claims data etc) and develop/maintain the common schema to store the healthcare information of members.
Manage tools and processes to process the data to derive key insights and analytics to power the intelligence of our platform.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience is a plus.
Technologies:
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
64,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,"American Bureau of Shipping
3.5","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1862,Other Organization,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
65,"Data Scientist, Analytics - AI Commerce",$114k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

The mission of the AI Commerce team is to leverage AI to grow Commerce as a new line ofbusiness for Facebook's family of apps. In 2 to 3 years, we envision people coming to our family of apps as their primary shopping destination, with AI helping them find products they want to buy through a personalized and contextually relevant shopper journey.We are looking for a strong statistical and business thinker to be responsible for driving AICommerce effectiveness and growth. AI Commerce technology is applicable to the wide array ofuse cases, from video search to making every post shoppable, and is relevant to the whole familyof apps, from IG to Marketplace, and from Ads to new user experiences. We want to support our AI Commerce journey and guide it to higher effectiveness and larger impact through providingmetric definitions and facilitating goals settings. This Data Scientist will be creating and implementing measurement and opportunity sizing frameworks, experiment design and analysis, constructing training, evaluation datasets, and understanding major success drivers through data analysis and visualization.
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products.
Define problems and opportunities in a complex or ambiguous area.
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches.
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify new levers to improve user experience.
Monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics.
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, and clearly communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams.
MS or other advanced degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math/Statistics, Physics, Economics, or equivalent practical experience.
7+ years experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Experience in SQL or other programming languages.
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, regressions, ML systems).
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product.
Experience in machine learning, deep learning, statistical analysis, or social network analysis.
Development experience in any scripting language such as Python or R.
Experience with distributed computing in Hive or Hadoop.
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
66,"Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"18-Sep-2020

Job ID
303124BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

The Oncology Data Science (OncDS) group in NIBR brings together projects spanning the entire clinical development pipeline, across a wide and unique range of novel therapeutics (e.g.: targeted and immunotherapies, radioligands, cell and gene therapies). OncDS:
•Oversees NGS data generation and performs analysis for thousands of oncology clinical samples, informing drug discovery and development
•Integrates internal and external data across distinct clinical trials to produce recognized translational impact
•Applies cutting-edge technologies and analytic approaches to discover and characterize the molecular mechanisms of therapeutic response in individual cancer patients

Description:
We are seeking a data scientist who will advance the translation of multi-dimensional molecular data (e.g. NGS) to biomarker discovery in clinical trials. The successful candidate will nurture close collaborations with oncology clinical trial teams, interpret candidate biomarkers and contribute to large-scale meta-analyses across trials and indications. Specific job responsibilities include:
•Collaboration on the design and execution of molecular biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Exploration of molecular data in the context of clinical variables to discover biomarkers of response/resistance to therapy
•Communication of key findings to trial teams and diverse group of scientists
•Application of biostatistics and machine learning methods across datasets from multiple clinical trials to gain actionable biological insights
•Application and development of computational methods for analyses of longitudinal biomarker and clinical data to characterize patients’ response to treatment
•Development of innovative analytic approaches to integrate and visualize complex clinical datasets
•Interaction with clinicians, project managers, data engineers, and other scientists to facilitate progression of projects across milestones

Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
67,Sr. Data Scientist,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST- Temporary Assignment (Remote)

Description:

The senior data scientist will be part of Rubicon’s Data Science team and will be responsible for designing, prototyping, deploying and testing machine learning, computer vision based and deep learning models. This role will also support the translation of big data into internal and external dashboards& reports to drive company and partner performance. This role will play an integral part in building Rubicon’s competitive advantage through leveraging data for unique customer and vendor insights.

Key Responsibilities:
Design, implement, test, prototype, and deploy ML (machine learning), Computer Vision, DP (deep learning), and AI (artificial intelligence) applications from unstructured and structured data assets
Dive into large, complex real-world datasets and produce innovative analysis and predictive models
Conduct statistical analysis of big data to develop insights from the measured performance metrics, and contribute to root cause analysis and resolution of identified performance gaps
Propose and prioritize changes to reporting and create additional metrics and processes based on program changes and customer requirements
Support efforts to ensure data integrity across all platforms and departments
Contribute to idea generation for additional process improvements and automation
Provide guidance to data scientist team in developing new and improved analytics systems, all the way from prototyping to production
Work closely with the rest of the Rubicon team to create ad-hoc reports to support timely business decisions and project work
Preferred Experience/Qualifications:
Bachelors or Master’s degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Sciences, Engineering or a related field; 3 years of experience with model building as a data scientist.
Solid programming skills with Python
Knowledge and in-depth understanding of machine learning and related open source libraries such as Scikit-Learn; data manipulation libraries such as Numpy, Pandas; and deep learning libraries such as TensorFlow
Proficient with Python related computer vision and image processing libraries such as OpenCV
Proficient SQL skills; ideally with experience in Microsoft SQL server, MYSQL, PostgreSQL, Microsoft Access, R, SPSS and PowerBI (or any business intelligence tools)
A basic understanding of AWS cloud service products such as Lamda, Elastic Search, EC2, S3 etc. is a plus
Ability to work effectively with IT and internal customers to mine the right data sources efficiently and accurately
Proven statistical skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause analyses
A clear passion for learning new business analysis techniques independently and continuously
Understanding of BI best practices/methodologies, relational database management concepts, dimensional data modeling, data warehouse concepts and reporting techniques
Ability to work directly with end users to ensure results meet their needs
Strong interpersonal skills, capable of writing recommendations and interacting with company personnel on complex topics
Ability to present clear, concise reporting on concurrent projects and issues
Effective verbal and written communication skills


About Rubicon Global

Rubicon Global is a technology company that provides waste, recycling, and smart city solutions to businesses and governments worldwide. It develops and deploys a full suite of cloud-based solutions to help its customers and network of independent waste haulers work towards more sustainable waste and recycling practices, uncover cost savings, and improve operations through data analytics. Using its proprietary technology platform, Rubicon helps its partners find economic value in their waste streams and confidently execute on their sustainability goals, always with an eye towards those solutions that have long-term economic viability. The company has over 1,000,000 service locations worldwide, is headquartered in Atlanta, GA, and has core teams in New York City and San Francisco. Rubicon is a Certified B Corporation and was named a Great Place to Work™ in 2018. Learn more atwww.RubiconGlobal.com.

Rubicon Global is a Certified B Corp and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We also maintain a Drug-Free Workplace.",3.9,"Rubicon
3.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
68,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
69,Senior Data Engineer - Solovis,$80k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Solovis

Solovis is a revolutionary new SaaS platform offering a multi-asset class portfolio management and reporting solution for foundations, endowments, pensions, OCIOs, and family offices. Our firm is on a mission to set a new industry standard for performance, exposure, and portfolio analysis. The key to that success is to continue disrupting the industry with transformational technology designed specifically for limited partners. At Solovis, we recognize our employees by personally investing in them and providing a rewarding corporate culture centered around growth, training, and an opportunity to shape the future of our product.

Senior Data Engineer

We are looking for a savvy Sr. Data Engineer who will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for use across existing products. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing and designing data systems. The Data Engineer will work alongside our software engineers, architects, and data analysts on data and integration initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting multiple systems, products and data flows. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support uses cases in the FinTech arena.

What you’ll do
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Sets technical direction by designing solutions to complex problems
Improves the performance, observability, and reliability of our data pipelines.
Work with large, complex financial data sets that require sophisticated processing and transformation.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build resilient and maintainable infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Work as part of an Agile development team with stakeholders to develop new features to support their data infrastructure needs.
Manage data cross multiple platforms, including Azure SQL and Snowflake.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Mentor less experienced team members by providing counsel and constructive oversight
Requirements

What you bring
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases. Must have the ability to write complex analytical queries.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured and semi-structured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disparate datasets.
Experience supporting and working with several products in a dynamic environment.
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a degree in Computer Science, and/or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience creating data pipelines and utilizing scheduling and workflow management tools is required. Experience with Airflow and/or dbt is strongly preferred.
Cloud experience strongly preferred with a strong preference towards Azure. Snowflake, RedShift, or Google BigQuery is a major plus.
Experience with object-oriented/object and functional scripting languages is required: C# and/or Python. Candidate must be proficient in either C# or Python.
Ability to lead, understand, and contribute to technical discussions
Effective communicator with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be comfortable communicating with development teams, Product Owners, Product Management, and company leadership
High level of accountability for program execution, deliverables, and reporting to technical management
High motivation and drive to help product teams excel and deliver based on roadmap and associated timelines
Excellent interpersonal skills – ability to work well in a team with diverse personality types
This is a hands-on role in which 85% of your time will be spent architecting and developing.
Benefits

What we bring

Purpose – we are about providing our customers investment knowledge when they need it so that they can positively impact the world around them
Top notch team members and collaborative environment.
Endless opportunity with the ability to progress into various disciplines and expertise or into a leadership role as company growth continues
Solovis is an Equal Opportunity Employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind: Solovis is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Solovis are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, marital, status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.",4.7,"eVestment
4.7","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
70,"Research and Development Scientist, Product Development",-1,"*MiraVista Diagnostics *

*Job Title: *Research and Development Scientist – Product Development

*Department: *Research and Development

*Reports to: *Research Division Manager

*Summary of Responsibilities *

The overall focus of this position will be the development, validation and implementation of new immunological assays to aid in diagnosis of infectious diseases.

*Essential Duties and Responsibilities *

• Be part of a team tasked with development and validation of new immunology-based assays, including reagent screening, feasibility, optimization and product release. Prepare research protocols, SOPs, work instructions and other documentation for efficient product development and product transfer.

• Effectively communicate scientific results within Research Department and cross- functionally.

*Qualifications *

• Fundamental understanding of immunology and test development.

• Experience with design, development and evaluations of EIA, LFA, cytokine assays.
• Experience in production of recombinant proteins using various expression hosts.

• High level ability to analyze scientific data, assist in preparations of GMP documents.
Must have good attention to details.

*Education and Experience *

• PhD in biology, chemistry, immunology or related field or MS with 8 years experience in a research environment or industry.

• Strong interpersonal, communication and problem-solving skills. Ability to work effectively in cross-functional teams.

MiraVista Diagnostics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Employee assistance program
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Professional development assistance
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
* Bonus pay

Education:
* Master's (Required)

Experience:
* Research Experience: 8 years (Preferred)

Work Location:
* One location

Work Remotely:
* No",4.0,"MiraVista Diagnostics, LLC
4.0","Indianapolis, IN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
71,Senior Data Scientist,$136k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNSs powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",3.0,"GNS Healthcare
3.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
72,Product Development Scientist II,$12k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"We make pet food taste great! For over 30 years, AFB International has been providing pet food solutions that enrich the lives of pets and their people. Our palatants are specially designed to make pet foods, treats and supplements taste better, ensuring pets receive the vital nutrients they need. We know wagging tails, licking whiskers and empty bowls equal happy pets and happy pet parents.

Join AFB and you'll be a part of a team of highly skilled professionals that provide the greatest contribution to our success as an organization. Our team members are diverse, creative, passionate experts who are genuinely dedicated to our mission, our customers, and the pets we serve worldwide.
Job Description*
Summary* The associate will be responsible for providing technical expertise, and interfacing with internal and external cross-functional teams for customer specific projects. The associate will execute product development in the lab as well as data analysis. The associate will be process driven and possess excellent communication and inter-personal skills.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities* including but not limited to:
Provide scientific and technical expertise to customer specific opportunities by integrating relevant past experience and new development within the research & development department
Responsible for new product and line extensions for assigned customer accounts
Manage, develop and execute customer specific technical projects for cat and dog palatability
Build and develop relationships with technical personnel at customers
Engage, educate, collaborate with internal partners to problem solve issues through process-driven approach
Support project execution through scale-up of products and processes in benchtop, pilot plant and plant as necessary
Understand and utilize food product manufacturing equipment at bench and pilot plant scale to conduct research as required for projects
Liaison cross-functionally with both regional and global Sales, Marketing, Engineering, Supply Chain, Quality and internal R&D teams with the objective of addressing customer needs
Effectively communicate project progress through phone calls, written report and in-person presentations both within and outside the organization
Share knowledge and mentor junior technical associates within R&D team
Qualifications *
Required:
Bachelor’s Degree in food science, animal science, flavor chemistry, food engineering or other similar field
5 years of demonstrable experience with product development, food ingredients, technical service, product concepts or new technology in human or pet food industry
Proficient skill level in MS Office Applications such as Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Desired:
Master’s Degree in food science, animal science, flavor chemistry, food engineering or other similar field
>3 years of related experience in human or pet food industry
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities *
To perform this job successfully, an individual should have the following knowledge, skills and abilities:
Knowledge of food science, food technology and/or similar major for R&D
Ability to execute trials at lab and pilot plant scale using equipment’s including but not limited to retort, meat grinders, spray dryer, canning equipment, extruder, reactors and mixers
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, dynamic working environment and on multiple projects according to project deadlines.
Excellent interpersonal communication skills to interact effectively with technical experts, higher management, customers and suppliers as required.
Knowledge of safety practices applicable to food research laboratory environments and ability to follow designated safety procedures.
Knowledge of properties and applications of ingredients and materials involved in research
Ability to maintain accurate records (also electronically when applicable) relating to projects as they are planned performed and completed.
Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts and draw valid conclusions.
Ability to effectively present information to team members, top management, public groups, etc.
Proficient skill level in MS Office Applications such as Word, Excel, Power point and ability to learn and utilize software that is necessary for the role (LIMS, IFS, Vivaldi, Sharepoint, Concur etc)
Ability to travel upto 25% domestically and Internationally
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Signing bonus
Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Saint Charles, MO 63304 (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply
A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
afbinternational.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"AFB International
3.4","Saint Charles, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
73,Data Scientist - Medicare Advantage Generalist,-1,"A bit about us:

We’re on a mission to change healthcare — how it’s paid for, delivered, experienced. We want to put people center stage, not process or profit. We are guided by a deep belief that every person on Medicare should be treated like we would treat a member of our own family: with loving care and a profound commitment to their health and well-being.

That’s why we’re gathering a whole bunch of smart, big-hearted people to create a new kind of healthcare company — one that combines compassion, health insurance, clinical care, and technology seamlessly.

We want to throw the long ball with people we love for a cause we believe in. Life is short. Join us.


A bit about this role:

We are looking for a data scientist who can serve as a liaison to our Operational teams to answer important and timely questions about the health of the business. We are looking for someone who has broad experience in Medicare Advantage analytics functions — e.g. Finance, Risk Adjustment, Stars, Pharmacy — and deep experience in at least one area. This role will report into our Data Science team, and will work alongside Product Managers, Software Engineers, and Business Leads to solve key challenges for the company.
Responsibilities will include:
Working closely with key business stakeholders to understand the analytical needs of the business and providing insight in a rapid, iterative, and collaborative process
Developing thoughtful reports and dashboards that help Operations teams improve their business decision-making
Identifying patterns in the analyses you conduct, and using those patterns to improve our tools and processes so we can deliver results more quickly and accurately
Sharing your domain knowledge with technical team-members who do not have an MA background
Communicating results to an audience of mixed technical backgrounds
Required skills and experience:
Ability to work in a fast-paced startup environment
5+ years of technical work at a Medicare Advantage plan or service provider
Experience collaborating effectively with stakeholders
Experience with SQL
Experience with dashboarding and creating reports
Experience with Risk Adjustment
If you love running towards complex challenges and transforming them into solutions, if you want to make a potentially huge impact on many lives, and if you are looking for a disruptive startup with an inspiring and talented team, Devoted Health may be the place for you!

Devoted is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to a safe and supportive work environment in which all employees have the opportunity to participate and contribute to the success of the business. We value diversity and collaboration. Individuals are respected for their skills, experience, and unique perspectives. This commitment is embodied in Devoted’s Code of Conduct, our company values and the way we do business.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, the Company does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy status, marital status, national origin, disability, age, sexual orientation, veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, gender expression, or any other factor prohibited by law. Our management team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment.",4.3,"Devoted Health
4.3",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
74,Data & Analytics Consultant,$81k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE LOOK FOR

An SEI Consultant is a master communicator and active listener who understands how to navigate an audience. Self-aware, almost to a fault, SEI consultants keenly understand how to adjust their approach based on the situation. Following a logical, fact-based approach, our consultants possess the superior ability to see correlations others may not, ask the right questions and drive solutions.

As super-connectors, our consultants connect not only people, but data, trends and experiences. Mature, humble, and genuine, SEI Consultants frequently go above and beyond for both their clients and their colleagues. SEI Consultants are ethical and trustworthy individuals who do what they say. SEI Consultants have an insatiable curiosity and love to learn. These individuals are commonly tech savvy and early adopters. Their passion for learning is infectious and excites others.

As every project is different, an SEI Consultant must be adaptable and comfortable with unexpected situations. An SEI Consultant must be at ease with ambiguity because although a client knows that a problem exists – they need SEI to figure it out and drive a solution. SEI Consultants define ambition differently. SEI Consultants are authentic, low-maintenance individuals who like to hang out with colleagues outside of work. Whether it be cooking, traveling, hiking, or volunteering, SEI Consultants enjoy working with genuine, thoughtful folks who want to steer clear of the traditional grind and share the joy of day-to-day life and activities with colleagues, friends and family.

WHAT WE DO

Our consultants work with clients at all levels of the organization, from the C-suite to the shop floor, helping them to deliver on their most strategic initiatives. We’re known for making realistic, data-driven decisions that deliver value in tangible ways to our clients. Our clients ask for us on projects that require a superior combination of technical and business capabilities, people and management skills, and a collaborative mindset. We excel in understanding complex programs and strategic initiatives and breaking them into actionable pieces.

We are actively looking for professionals in the following areas:
Data Strategy and Governance
Database Architecture and Development
Data Analysis
Reporting and Data Visualization
The ideal candidate will:
Have experience understanding and solving real business problems
Solid writing and speaking skills to support data storytelling
Ideal candidates may call themselves Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Analysts and Data Governance professionals. Experience may include but is not limited to the following:
Experience with statistical and mathematical modeling, artificial intelligence and machine learning software and methods
Specialization in architecting enterprise solutions with visualizations and data-discovery tools such as Tableau, QlikView, Spotfire, Amazon Web Services, Cloud, Salesforce
Technical capabilities that include designing scalable data architectures, solution performance tuning, and hardware sizing
Experience and knowledge of programming and scripting languages, such as , Python, Java, C#, PL/SQL, R and SAS
Experience and knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practice used in data warehousing and analytics solutions
Experience managing, populating, and querying database technologies including RDBMS, NOSQL, and big data platforms and experience working with these technologies' ecosystems
QUALIFICATIONS

Required
Demonstrated business and technology acumen
Proven track record of delivering results
Experience working with and/or leading a team
Ability to work independently
Ability to work across industries, roles, functions & technologies
Positive can-do attitude
A curiosity for new technology
Authorization for permanent employment in the United States (this position is not eligible for immigration sponsorship)
Preferred
Bachelor’s degree (Mathematics, Computer Science, or related field preferred)
8+ years professional experience
Consulting experience
Experience across our service offerings",4.6,"SEI
4.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
75,Machine Learning Engineer,$65k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description
This role will be part of our Applied Data Team and will be responsible for providing Machine Learning Engineering support.
Tasks & responsibilities required of this role include but are not limited to:
Construct machine learning models including data collection, normalization, and standardization, data pipeline construction, model selection and hyperparameter tuning, working ml systems that can add new data into ml model.
Create apps to present ml models and host them in the cloud or locally.
Create pipelines to query and retrieve and update data for existing applications to keep them updated
Supervise the scaling and management of the machine learning modeling ecosystem
Find orthogonal data sets to supplement models and increase alpha
Stay abreast of new technology and machine learning methodologies and implement them into the model building architecture
Work alongside (re)insurance domain experts to improve predictive aspects of their lines of business
Requirements:
3+ years of demonstrative excellence in building, scaling, and productizing machine learning models
Experience working with sparse, high dimensional, and time series data
Python ml stack
Experience dealing with imbalanced classes
Deep Learning Architectures
ML Optimization Techniques
Cloud Services: Azure, AWS, Google Cloud
Distributed systems: Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark
Databricks
Ensemble Stacking and Meta Learners
Classification and Regression Metrics
Regularization Methods
Version Control
Quant trading experience welcome but not required
Kaggle ranking of expert or higher a plus",3.5,"TransRe
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
76,Sr. Data Scientist,$99k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Data Analyst,$35k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


At Grow Financial, we believe in service—to our 200,000+ members, 550+ team members and local communities. We know happy, engaged people provide the best service, so we live by our mantra: Be Bold. Be Great. Have Fun. (Especially the fun part!) Yes, our work is serious, but we don’t take ourselves too seriously. Consistently named a Top Workplace by the Tampa Bay Times and a Great Place to Work among 100 Best Medium Workplaces by FORTUNE Magazine®, we cultivate a positive, collaborative work environment where you can grow personally and professionally. In fact, 94% of our team members say Grow is a great place to work. And the most common word they use to describe the Grow culture? Family.

Responsibilities


Performs advanced business analysis using various techniques, e.g. statistical analysis, predictive modeling, machine learning and data mining. Responsible for gaining an in-depth understanding of business problems as it relates to the visibility (insights), and feasibility an analytic solution would provide. Works closely with functional areas and business leaders to identify analytical requirements. This includes development and deployment of analytic models, supporting overall Grow and departmental strategic objectives, recommending profitable and/or cost-effective solutions that enhance member experiences or modernize processes; and collaborating with business partners to promote data-driven decision making.

Data Analytics
Interprets and analyzes large amounts of data using exploratory mathematical and statistical techniques.
Builds predictive models, selects features, and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques.
Identifying and extending credit union’s data capabilities with third-party sources of information.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Analyzes problems and determines root causes.
Business Analysis
Works with functional areas and business leaders to identify analytical requirements and define a problem statement.
Identify assumptions, limitations, constraints, and the key metrics of success to business problems.
Summarize analytical data into user-friendly reports translating highly technical, detailed data into appropriate recommendations and key metrics requested by management and various business lines.
Advise business partners on options, constraints, risks, costs, and benefits of proposed projects.
Qualifications
Bachelor of Arts/Science degree from an accredited college or university in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or related discipline required. Master’s degree preferred.
3 – 5 years of work experience with financial, analytical, or related research experience required.
Expert knowledge of Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, and Power Point) required.
Strong quantitative analysis skills using statistical software such as R, SQL and Python required.
Experience working with large datasets. Extensive knowledge of statistical methodologies including hypothesis testing, linear regression, modeling, simulation, and analysis of variance.
Knowledge of relational database technology and business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau).
Must be comfortable working on projects in an agile, iterative or multi-generational manner.
Eager to learn, enthusiastic, motivated and a self-starter.
Must be an analytical thinker and problem solver, as well as possess and display effective organizational and communication skills.
Ability to manage multiple priorities and work under deadline with minimal supervision required.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
Must be able to sit for extended periods of time.
Must be able to read, write, speak and type English.
Must be able to hear and use a telephone.
Use of computer requires repetitive keystrokes.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
Traditional office setting; remote work available.
Sedentary role
Excellent Benefits * 401K Plan * Competitive Pay * Business Casual Environment * Service-Minded Team Attitude * Positive Workplace * Exciting Growth Potential & More

An Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Veteran/Disabled",3.6,"Grow Financial
3.6","Brandon, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1955,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
78,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst - Developer,$82k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1886, Buckeye Partners, L.P. has a proven track record of stability and success. We pride ourselves on the laser focus we apply to safely providing service and value to our customers, operating under a strong set of values, and empowering our employees to make decisions. We have a tenacious commitment to environmental responsibility and regulatory compliance in all that we do.

It is our internal culture that sets us apart from other companies. Our goal is to provide our employees with a greater span of responsibility, the ability to make decisions, and access to experts to help you build your skills and experiences. Each of our career tracks provides employees with the ability to innovate and be a significant contributor from their first day on the job.

Buckeye Partners is currently seeking aSr. Business Intelligence Analyst - Developerwith experience in the design and support of new and existing enterprise planning and business intelligence information systems. in the Oil& Gas Industry to join our team!

Role Summary:

The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst– Developer works with business and IT counterparts and is responsible for the design and support of new and existing enterprise planning and business intelligence information systems, dashboards and reports. This role prioritizes data and information requirements and helps to solve complex technical and analytical problems. This position participates in project teams to define and implement new or updated technologies, standards, testing methodologies, training for enterprise wide business intelligence and planning solutions.

Responsibilities& Essential Functions include:
Serve as an expert/lead technical specialist for the direction and development of complex, enterprise class business solutions.
Drive the planning, budgeting, business intelligence and data warehouse design in concert with business and IT resources.
Responsible for the design, documentation, development, testing and deployment of various business intelligence and planning applications, dashboards and reports in support of the business.
Help to support, troubleshoot and maintain existing legacy business applications (Microsoft environment, Cognos, etc.).
Communicate and demonstrate design concepts and development principles to others on the team.
Act as subject matter expert for Business Intelligence in support of all business applications.
Participate with other teams in integration efforts as new systems are deployed or legacy systems are retrofitted into Buckeye business practices.
Develop and provide training for new and existing applications.
Support other areas/special projects as needed.
And other duties as assigned.
Position Requirements:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in an Information Technology, Data Science, or Data Analytics
10+ years related experience in appropriate specialty areas including but not limited to: Analysis and design, Business Intelligence principals, database analysis, application support management, financial applications and related data
Experience in the Microsoft platform (Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate, Microsoft Azure Cloud) is desired
Knowledge base with Azure Cloud BI data architechture including but not limited to Azure Data Factory, Azure Databricks, Azure Analysis Service, and Azure Synapse Analytics is desired
Prefer experience with ETL processes
SQL Server experience is required
Cognos experience in any of the following areas Cognos 10 BI, PowerPlay, Report Studio, Metric Studio, Analysis Studio.
Ability to travel up to 20% domestically and internationally
Certificates& Licenses:
Microsoft Certification preferred
Other Business Analysis, Business Intelligence and Data Architecture certifications desired
Other Skills, Attributes and Abilities:
This position requires exceptional analytical and technical skills. One must be able to pay particular attention to detail and accuracy, and be able to recognize symptoms, analyze business scenarios, and take appropriate action to define and implement successful business strategies
This position requires strong communication and interpersonal skills. One must be able to assist users in a pleasant, non-technical manner for problem resolution.
Essential Functions:
This position requires the ability to safely and successfully perform essential job functions consistent with ADA, FMLA and other federal, state and local standards, including meeting qualitative and or/quantitative productivity standards.
This role requires the ability to maintain regular, punctual attendance consistent with the ADA, FMLA and other federal, state and local standards.
This position requires compliance with all personnel policies.


Physical& Safety Requirements:
The person in this position needs to occasionally move inside the office to access file cabinets, office equipment, etc.
This role continuously operates a computer and other office productivity equipment (i.e. a calculator, copy machine and computer printer).
About You:

To be successful in the Buckeye culture, our employees must Possess excellent communication skills, both written and verbal. You must be able to work independently. You must also be able to exercise tact, discretion, and professionalism when dealing with internal clients and external counterparties (customers, vendors, etc.), as well as when handling sensitive and confidential information.

Buckeye Partners wants to create and reward an organizational focus that stimulates the creative and entrepreneurial actions of our employees and results in innovative ways of reducing costs, generating revenues, improving productivity, or improving processes.

About Us:

Buckeye Partners, L.P. is the logistical solutions partner of choice for the global energy business and one of the nation’s largest independent petroleum products pipeline transportation and terminalling service provider; our strength is to create centers of expertise around our products, technologies and client needs.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP on the following website:http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm",3.3,"Buckeye Partners, L.P.
3.3","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1886,Company - Public,Oil & Gas Services,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
79,Senior Environmental Scientist,-1,"Spangler Environmental, Inc. is a consulting firm serving land developers, engineers, architects, attorneys and governmental agencies across the Southeast U.S. We are looking for a qualified candidate to join our team as a Senior Environmental Scientist.

The primary responsibilities of the Senior Environmental Scientist:
Lead multiple and manage multiple projects, with client, schedule and budget constraints.
Perform site evaluations and write reports for Phase 1 Environmental Site Assessments per ASTM E1527-13.
Perform Property Condition Assessments. May perform ACM inspections if properly accredited.
Perform GPS field data collection for sketch map preparation. Experience with Trimble hand-held GPS data collectors is preferred.
Identify, evaluate and recommend risk and remediation strategies to ensure compliance with federal, state and local regulations.
Environmental due diligence, Phase II site assessments, regulatory compliance services, and permitting
Utilize professional and field experience to prepare well-written technical reports, letters, memoranda, email communications, plans, specifications, and proposals.
Data analysis, including preparing maps, tables, and figures; and
Gather, organize and evaluate field data for use in written reports.
Operate and maintain field monitoring equipment
Prepare material samples or documents for lab testing and analysis.
Requirements/Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in an environmental or related field of study required
Minimum 5 years’ experience in private sector environmental consulting on land development projects.
Minimum of 2 years of relevant experience successfully leading multiple team members and managing multiple projects, with client, schedule and budget constraints.
Full-time position based in Raleigh, NC. Travel to project sites in the Southeastern US, occasionally overnight, is required
EP status per the ASTM 1527-13 standard preferred.
Must be able to work independently outdoors in variable weather and site conditions.
Proficient in soil and groundwater sample collection
Knowledge and experience in basic computing skills including Microsoft Office and ArcGIS.
Must possess valid driver’s license with a clean driving record.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
environmental consulting: 5 years (Required)
project/team leadership or management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Raleigh, NC 27609 (Required)
License:
Driver's License (Required)
EP (Preferred)
Required travel:
25% (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.spanglerenvironmental.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Spangler Environmental, Inc.","Raleigh, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
80,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
81,Process Development Engineer/Scientist,$54k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: *Genus PLC is a market leader in porcine, dairy and beef genetics and is uniquely positioned as a global player, with a dedicated, multi-species research and development function and an international distribution network. Food consumption is expected to rise by 60% in the next 20 years. Our challenge is to affordably and sustainably meet that escalating demand while global resources diminish. Our vision is clear: _Pioneering animal genetic improvement to help nourish the world._
Overview: *We have an exciting opportunity for a highly talented, motivated professional to join our team as a Process Development Engineer located just outside of Madison, Wisconsin.
Key Responsibilities: *
Works with research to further develop consistency and scalability of product and process between the research, development and manufacturing.
Research and develop ways to manufacture products and monitor existing processes and products for quality and efficiency with a focus on reagents and chemicals.
Establish process to produce a new product on a large scale with standardized protocols, while looking for ways to make improvements in methods and technology by reviewing and interpreting analytical test results and data.
Utilize sophisticated technology to monitor production and identify faults.
Work closely with research scientists, with process engineers and with quality control technicians. Combining extensive knowledge of biotechnology and biomanufacturing, process development scientists also use computer-aided design models to develop manufacturing processes.
Qualifications: *
7+ years of experience in a bio-technology or bio-manufacturing environment
B.S. or M.S. degree in a scientific discipline (e.g., Biochemistry, Biotechnology, Molecular Biology, Microbiology)
Strong demonstrated problem-solving skills
Works independently, with guidance in only the most complex situations
Must have an investigative and analytical mind and a methodical approach to testing new processes
Need to be creative and have strong problem-solving skills
Good teamwork and motivation skills are essential
Must have strong ability to write and communicate effectively
Capabilities and behaviors: *
*Customer impact: * builds strong, profitable, sustainable customer relationships, anticipating and exceeding customer expectations to increase demand for services and products in order to build loyalty.
*Managing external environment: * anticipates and responds quickly to environmental changes for the benefit of the business and customers, through strong external networks and deep understanding of the markets.
*Execution Orientation: * Drives to set ever higher standards and achieve results through determination, resilience and commitment. Develops solutions to enhance the service offering and drive continuous improvement.
*Setting Direction: * develops simple, deliverable plans based on pragmatic new thinking, ideas or concepts. Assesses accurately commercial risk and return.
*Change management: * Champions, leads, support or embeds change to improve things. Communicates well and helps others by overcoming barriers.
*Analysis and Decision Making: * Analyses opportunities and problems thoughtfully and thoroughly to make good and timely decisions.
*Team Mobilization: * builds high performing diverse teams, investing resources effectively. Recruits, develops, motivates and retains talent by setting stretching goals and developing capability of self, team and organization.
*Collaboration*: ‘One team’ approach – gains commitment to strategic vision and goals. Builds and maintains networks and relationships, sharing knowledge and experience, delivering on commitments.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Biology: 3 years (Required)
Research Laboratory: 1 year (Preferred)
Location:
Windsor, WI 53598 (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
www.genusintelligen.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"Genus PLC
3.4","Windsor, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
82,Lead Data Scientist,$111k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
83,Data Engineer - Solovis,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Solovis

Solovis is a revolutionary new SaaS platform offering a multi-asset class portfolio management and reporting solution for foundations, endowments, pensions, OCIOs, and family offices. Our firm is on a mission to set a new industry standard for performance, exposure, and portfolio analysis. The key to that success is to continue disrupting the industry with transformational technology designed specifically for limited partners. At Solovis, we recognize our employees by personally investing in them and providing a rewarding corporate culture centered around growth, training, and an opportunity to shape the future of our product.

Data Engineer

We are looking for a savvy Data Engineer who will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for use across existing products. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing and designing data systems. The Data Engineer will work alongside our software engineers, architects, and data analysts on data and integration initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting multiple systems, products and data flows. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support uses cases in the FinTech arena.

What you’ll do
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Work with large, complex financial data sets that require sophisticated processing and transformation.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build resilient and maintainable infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Work as part of an Agile development team with stakeholders to develop new features to support their data infrastructure needs.
Manage data cross multiple platforms, including Azure SQL and Snowflake.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Requirements

What you bring
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases. Must have the ability to write complex analytical queries.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured and semi-structured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disparate datasets.
Experience supporting and working with several products in a dynamic environment.
We are looking for a candidate with 3+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a degree in Computer Science, and/or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools. Experience with Airflow and/or dbt is strongly preferred.
Cloud experience strongly preferred. Experience with Azure and Snowflake is a major plus.
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: C# and/or Python
Ability to understand, and contribute to technical discussions
Effective communicator with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be comfortable communicating with development teams, Product Owners, Product Management, and company leadership
High level of accountability for program execution, deliverables, and reporting to technical management
High motivation and drive to help product teams excel and deliver based on roadmap and associated timelines
Excellent interpersonal skills – ability to work well in a team with diverse personality types
Benefits

What we bring

Purpose – we are about providing our customers investment knowledge when they need it so that they can positively impact the world around them
Top notch team members and collaborative environment.
Endless opportunity with the ability to progress into various disciplines and expertise or into a leadership role as company growth continues
Solovis is an Equal Opportunity Employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind: Solovis is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Solovis are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, marital, status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.",4.7,"eVestment
4.7","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
84,Business Data Analyst,-1,"The Business Systems Data Analyst position will be expected to develop expertise across multiple functional areas, in both business process and technical configuration knowledge. This role will also consult with and provide advice to end users and manage small projects under general supervision. The primary responsibilities of this role are to ensure that end users can use the Company’s software and systems to accomplish business tasks. This position will work with and support the senior analyst and will work closely with users of our enterprise systems and will gain knowledge in identifying solution requirements, and designing, configuring, and training on the solutions. The position will employ both traditional and Agile Project management methodologies when working on projects.
KEY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES *
• Design, develop, testing and deployment SSRS report and perform Ad Hoc report per

request.

• Perform ETL design, development, testing, and deployment activities effectively while

maintaining existing ETL code and developing new code using SSIS.

• Coordinate with third party vendor for any upgrade, data loads and trouble tickets.

• Work closely with staff users and management to establish requirements for reports or

modifications and to ensure proper testing and validation of completed reports.

• Provides day-to-day support to a variety of business users of the company enterprise

systems, including access requests, troubleshooting errors, and aiding in their use.

• Identifies and responds to requests for systems training needs; develops and provides

both group and individual training to end users.

• Apply systems analysis techniques and procedures, including consulting with users, to

determine software, hardware, or system functional specifications

• Develop requirements. Write specifications for developers, under general supervision.

• Configure, test, and implement software to meet customer requirements.

• Redirects and escalates application problems to senior Analyst or third parties

(vendors, contractors, and others) as necessary when additional assistance is

required.

• Fields incoming requests as needed from end users via both telephone and e-mail in a

courteous manner.

• Documents problems, resolution, and new solutions for future reference using service

management tools and resources.

• Performs additional duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Education & Experience*
• Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience

• 2+ years’ experience with SSIS data analysis and SSRS report writing

• Strong experience with developing MS-SQL objects (tables, stored procedures, views,

etc.)

• Experience with SSRS and SSIS highly preferred

• Experience with EZCAP 6x or other Healthcare management system preferred
Skills/Knowledge/Abilities*
• Ability to work in a fast-paced team-oriented environment

• Ability to work both independently and as part of a collaborative team

• Ability to multi-task effectively

• Strong problem solving and analytical ability, ability to troubleshoot

• Excellent written and verbal communication and organizational skills

• Exposure to process flowcharts or process maps
Technical Skills*
• Strong knowledge/experience with MS Office Suite

• Strong analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
business analysis: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"CareAccess MSO, Inc.","Cerritos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
85,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Analyst*
ABOUT US*
For more than 20 years, WINFertility has been managing family-building benefits that are delivered with care and support by the highest quality providers. WIN is the largest, most experienced fertility benefit management company in the country. It offers inclusive family-building solutions to employers, health plans and individual patients. From integrated fertility management, including medical treatment, pharmacy and reproductive genetics, to surrogacy and adoption, WIN’s mission is to help build families by providing access to the best network doctors, technology and emotional support at the lowest cost.

WIN’s managed fertility programs include an integrated medical and pharmaceutical model that is unique to the industry. Its dedicated nurse care managers, all with experience in reproductive endocrinology clinics, guide employees through every step of their fertility journey, and are available 24/7.
POSITION SUMMARY*
This analytical position will develop data solutions to assist in the advancement of initiatives needed to support our business growth and operations across key customer segments. It includes the creation of analytical solutions used to manage operational programs and mentoring other data analytics resources on how to best provide value to the organization. The position will require building dashboards and visualizations through BI software to support business analytics and reporting.

The position will also serve as a proactive change agent within the business by understanding the long-term functions of the Data and Analytics Team and developing systems, databases, and other critical analytic tools needed to support the growing and complex nature of customer relationships.

The position is responsible for working closely with various internal teams to understand, define, and produce program related reports and analysis. Responsibilities include interpreting data, creating ad hoc reports, modifying and updating standard reports when applicable, perform statistical analysis, analyze data to forecast trends and conduct predictability outcomes. They will also participate in operations meetings, strategy sessions, and business reviews. He/she must possess knowledge and experience necessary to offer recommendations and propose solutions for complex business problems and/or systems enhancements.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES*
Responsible for creating business value for company by understanding data environment, designing data strategies, performing extract, transform, and load activities, and operationalizing models. Work closely with the team members and business partners to interpret the data and develop implement solutions that create visibility for internal management and operations across all customer programs. This position will require collaboration across the business to develop and implement data-driven solutions.
Support the development of customer-level metrics needed to manage operations with Clients. Manage the compilation, analysis, and reporting of data to forecast trends, apply various analytical techniques to support operational efficiency and productivity.
5+ years RDBMS experience (MySQL, PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, etc.); must have the ability to write complex, optimized queries across large volumes of data
5+ years of experience analyzing and manipulating data from a variety of production systems and data platforms required
Experience in query tuning and database engine optimization
Knowledge of ETL and data warehouse concepts and processes
Demonstrated ability to identify data quality issues and recommend the best course of action to address them
Experience translating data extractions and analyses into formats and outputs that other departments and clients can understand
Experience in Data Visualization tools like (e.g. Tableau, Business Objects, Cognos, Power BI, etc…) or other related tools
Problem solver with high attention to detail and superior organization and documentation skills
Design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and requests utilizing Business Objects, and other data visualization tools.
Document and understand project requirements, reporting data mapping and data warehouse repositories for assigned programs.
Complete full documentation of reports developed utilizing Business Requirement Documents
Receive and respond to data requests to ensure projects in queue are accurately prioritized, designed, estimated and delivered to all shareholders
Ensure reports are scheduled, audited and delivered according to agreed upon expectations and established Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
Develop and execute acceptance test plans (UAT) to ensure data warehouse structures, universes, and associated data accurately meet business requirements.
Other responsibilities and projects, as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Minimum Requirements*
5+ years of healthcare data management experience or 2+ years of advanced healthcare analytics experience
Critical Skills*
3+ years' experience in analytics or data related fields.
Strong knowledge of SQL and statistical packages (SAS, SPSS, STATA etc.).
Ability to design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and delivered according to client expectations and established SLAs.
Knowledge of healthcare industry with the ability to review all program data, perform analysis, notice trends, research and suggest solutions.
Significant data mining, analysis, and reporting experience, and demonstrated experience with IT and/or operations project management.
Experience in predictive modeling and machine learning.
Ability to lead and conduct customer meetings and understand business needs.
Advanced Microsoft Office experience (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, MS Project), Visio, SharePoint, and Business Objects.
Additional Knowledge & Skills*
Healthcare reporting experience, highly desired
Excellent written and verbal communication, and presentation skills
Exercise excellent judgment within defined standards and guidelines to manage conflict resolution and/or ambiguous situations
Experience developing partnerships with the technical, business, teams, and Clients utilizing strong communication and team building skills
Track record of strategic thinking and independent problem solving
Attention to detail and a high level of understanding of how to produce accurate and meaningful metrics to deliver high quality, actionable, efficient, and interactive reporting and insights to drive business and financial KPIs.
EDUCATION*
BA or BS degree or equivalent experience required.
WIN BENEFITS AND PERKS*
WIN *offers our employees competitive and comprehensive benefits to include but not limited to:
Paid vacation, sick and holiday time
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life Insurance (company paid and supplemental)
Disability Insurance
Health Savings Account (HSA) with a per month company contribution
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Transit Account
401k plus company match
Pet Insurance
WIN Perks and Plum Benefits*
Employee Assistance Program
Free access to Fitness Center at our main office location
Free indoor parking at our main office location
Transit Account
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
WINFertility adheres to all COVID-19 CDC Return to Work Guidelines including but not limited to social distancing, face coverings, maintaining daily employee health self-reporting log etc.

Experience:
SQL and Statistical Packages: 3 years (Required)
Design, create and implement Reports: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare Data Management: 5 years (Required)
Advanced Healthcare Analytics: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Greenwich, CT (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"WINFertility
3.3","Greenwich, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
86,Consumer Lending Data Analyst,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are searching for a Consumer Lending Data Analyst to research and analyze data in order to make strategic business recommendations. In this role, you will perform competitor research to enhance our product strategy and direction. Having 3 years' experience in a complex analyst role will help you succeed in this role. Additionally, having an understating of lending principals and risk metrics will help the candidate be successful.
Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job Duties:
In partnership with key stakeholders, analyze, test and launch new initiatives to increase productivity
Provide data driven insights and recommendations to various departments within the credit union
Perform key competitor research and analysis to better inform product strategy and direction
Creating advanced reports, dashboards and deep dive analyses that inform and drive the
credit union’s product and business strategy
Create and refine predictive models on product, marketing, and risk initiatives
Uncover actionable insights for increased product performance
Partnering with marketing, finance and digital teams to enable business and systems synergy
Essential Skills:
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role; financial institution strongly preferred
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience with data collection methodologies
Experience with relational databases, e.g., SQL, Alteryx, and Tableau will help you succeed in this role
Familiarity with coding languages, e.g., R, Python
Strong understanding of statistical overlays and models for predictive analytics
Ability to analyze data from a strategic point of view and contribute to and influence discussions that drive the business
Ability to use key performance metrics and data to provide insights and make strategic business recommendations
Proficiency to organize, analyze and interpret data to explain complex irregularities or trends
Form strong relationships with cross-functional teams where support, resources and synergy is needed
Basic understanding of lending principals and risk metrics
Project Management experience; familiarity with Six Sigma/DMAIC methodologies
Expert knowledge of Excel
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, other related fields of study or equivalent experience
Location: Hillsboro, OR 97124

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position

FT123

#LI-EK",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","Hillsboro, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
87,Senior Formulation Scientist (3 years experience required),-1,"*Job Description* Vici Health Sciences is a Pharmaceutical R&D company focused on developing products to serve unmet patient and doctor needs. We develop innovative formulations, analytical test methods and manufacturing processes for oral, sterile injectable and ophthalmic dosage forms. As a growing company, work is fast-paced, challenging, and exciting. The ideal candidate will have a degree in science or engineering and at least 3 years formulation development experience in the pharmaceutical industry. Job responsibilities include: - Work with management to create a product development plan - Participate in and oversee R&D experimental batch manufacturing - Submit samples for analytical testing, summarize and Interpret data - Make presentations to senior management - Interact with clients and provide verbal and written reports - Troubleshoot formulation and processing problems - Author or review protocols, batch records, and tech transfer documents - Participate in tech transfer of tablet, capsule, solution, suspension, and injectable products - Represent the Formulation R&D department in cross-functional meetings - Write and review the PDR for NDAs and ANDAs - Understand and stay current with all FDA related regulatory aspects of formulation and manufacturing process development Vici will provide competitive salary and benefits. In addition, selected candidates will be provided necessary job training. Career-oriented individuals who are looking to make an impact in the Pharmaceutical Industry are ideally suited for this position. Please note we have an immediate need to hire for this position. Job Type: Full-time Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * Dental insurance * Health insurance * Paid time off Schedule: * Monday to Friday COVID-19 considerations: Please note we are an essential business and remain open during the COVID-19 pandemic. We have PPE available for use by our employees. Education: * Bachelor's (Preferred) Experience: * Laboratory Experience: 3 years (Required) Work Location: * One location This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is: * Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous * Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture * Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail This Company Describes Its Culture as: * Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented * Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture * Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative Company's website: * www.vicihealthsciences.com Work Remotely: * No",4.0,"Vici Health Sciences LLC
4.0","Elkridge, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
88,Deep Learning Algorithm Scientist,-1,"VIDA is a growing company with BIG focus. Our amazing team is focused on transforming pulmonary care through a combination of AI-powered analysis and image analysis services. We are on the leading edge of artificial/augmented intelligence (AI) in medical imaging, with a focus on computed tomography, and are working with the industry's biggest players. We are fighting to provide greater precision and personalization across a range of lung diseases from emphysema and airway obstructive diseases (COPD) ―to asthma, interstitial lung disease, and lung cancer. While we are a small company, our benefits reflect those of a larger company. We love and are very passionate about the work we do and want to add to our VIDA team!

LOCATION: Coralville IA, Minneapolis MN, or Remote
POSITION SUMMARY: *
VIDA is seeking an experienced Deep Learning Algorithm Scientist to develop imaging-based AI and predictive analytics to transform pulmonary care. VIDA has an extensive, curated database of images and associated metadata, as well as strong research and clinical collaborators to leverage for the development of AI-enabled workflows and analyses to aid in the detection, diagnosis, treatment and management of patients with lung disease. The ideal candidate is creative and innovative, loves to solve problems, has a strong technical background and a passionate desire to help patients. This role comes with the opportunity to be a high performer within a company that’s fast-paced, dynamic, and quickly growing in all areas.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS*
Develops novel algorithmic approaches to solving clinical challenges, leveraging image and associated metadata information
Defines data requirements for training and testing of machine learning methods and works with the broader team to amass data from internal and external sources
Seeks out important problems to be solved and/or improvements to existing solutions
Develops research plans, designs feasibility studies and outlines research procedures to be followed.
Provides expertise in their scientific field of specialty to managers, other department members, research partners and customers.
Packages algorithms for incorporation into VIDA’s products, ensuring algorithms meet resource, robustness, and performance requirements as well as clinical requirements.
Prepares reports and authors detailed findings. Supports research partners’ publications and publishes in line with company’s research goals
Contributes to patent strategy of the company, identifying patentable ideas and supporting the patent process
Ensures that research and algorithm development activities are conducted in compliance with company processes and requirements
POSITION REQUIREMENTS*
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge skills and abilities required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE*
_*Must*_
PhD in Computer Science, Applied math, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related field (or MSc with additional experience)
Advanced understanding of deep learning with applications in image processing, with a strong track record of publications or significant product contributions in these areas
Strong mathematical background, especially in optimization theory, stochastic algorithms, and/or numerical methods with a passion for solving hard math problems
Strong Python programming skills and experience with Tensorflow and Keras
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills are required along with the ability to work in a dynamic, clinically-focused, distributed team. Your history of mentoring other engineers and interns is a great bonus
_*Desired*_
Medical and clinical background
Strong C++ programming skills
Experience translating research to commercial product and clinical utility
Experience developing data mining applications
Systems software engineering knowledge and expertise in optimizing software for computational performance.
Education and Credential Requirements*
PhD in Computer Science, Applied math, Electrical Engineering, Artificial Intelligence, or related field (or MSc with additional experience)
Supervision Requirements*
This position reports to: COO

This position supervises: None

Job Type: Full-time

Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Fully Remote
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Day shift
Company's website:
www.vidalung.ai
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.6,"VIDA
3.6","Coralville, IA",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
89,Data Engineer,$85k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineers develop, construct, test, and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems. They clean, prepare, and optimize data for consumption through the design and construction of massive reservoirs for big data. They solve problems associated with database access and integration and unstructured data sets to provide clean, usable data for customers and IT counterparts. These engineers serve as integrators between data architects, data scientists, and other data consumers. They apply knowledge of scripting tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build the data pipelines that enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the Agency.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. NGA is in search of Data Engineers who understand data, data architectures, data pipeline infrastructure, cloud solutions, and security best practices. Data Engineers create data infrastructure and integrated data pipelines; transforming, enriching, and delivering data for consumers. They may work independently and/or as part of a team of data and non-data professionals on projects of varying complexities. They will design logical and physical data models for data warehousing; develop robust data models, data dictionaries, and data flow diagrams. Data Engineers must be able to operate at the tactical and strategic level while working in a dynamic and sometimes ambiguous environment to deliver impactful results. They will leverage their strong interpersonal skills to effectively communicate with mission owners at varying levels inside and outside the Agency. As a Data Engineer, you will be tasked against the Agency's biggest data challenges in support of missions such as National Intelligence, National Security, Military Operations, and Disaster Relief and Preparedness, for a diverse audience including the Department of Defense, the Intelligence Community, and senior government officials up to and including the United States Congress and the President of the United States. Other duties may include: \* Utilize a variety of languages and tools (e.g., scripting languages) to build data pipelines to pull together information from different source systems. \* Design, construct, install, test, and maintain highly scalable data management systems; \* Develop data set processes for data discovery, modeling, mining, and production. \* Integrate and prepare large, complex data sets that meet functional /non-functional business requirements. \* Design and implement high performance data pipelines for distributed systems and data analytics for customers. \* Build, deploy, operate, and maintain big data analytics infrastructure. \* Orchestrate large PB sized data storage and compute clusters across bare-metal and cloud. \* Deploy and manage infrastructures based on Docker, Kubernetes, or OpenStack, and public Clouds such as Azure, AWS or Google Cloud Platform. \* Create tool-chains for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing AI workflows. \* Experience with engineering data pipeline from collection and processing to visualization of SQL and NOSQL cyber security data sources for threat analysis and modelling. \* Work with Agency data and machine learning experts to improve functionality in our data and model life cycle management capabilities. \* Develop enterprise interoperable coding and data standards and create processes to ensure use of enterprise-wide data architecture capabilities. \* Solve problems and deliver solutions with database access and data integration, define data conflation, fusion, and de-confliction rules. \* Collaborate with data architects, data scientists, data stewards, and customers to enable more efficient and effective data-informed decision-making. \* Apply expert knowledge of scripting, tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build databases and data pipelines. \* Accomplish data cleansing, preparation, storage, and security. \* Web-based data creation and editing through iD editor or JDSM. \* Data conflation activities through Hootenanny. \* Upgrades to the UI and system capabilities to enhance user experience. \* Use business analytics and data validation to improve campaign focus and output. \* Establish and sustain a NOME User Forum. \* Create and brief presentations around the community and conferences. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R or Java. 2. Demonstrated experience working with one or more database management systems, e.g. relational (Oracle, MySQL, Postgresql, etc.), noSQL (MongoDB, Accumulo, etc.), graph (Allegrograph, JanusGraphy, Neo4J, etc) to include experience with database retrieval methods and optimizations. 3. Demonstrated experience working with a range of data storage/access options, e.g. File(S3, FTP,etc.) and/or API(WFS, FeatureServer, Elasticsearch, SDK, etc.). 4. Demonstrated experience enabling access to data by way of databases or dashboards. 5. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems Management, Mathematics, Operations Research, Physical Sciences, Statistics, Technology Management, or a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. -OR- C. Experience: A minimum of 4 years of experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. -AND- IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies: Attention to Detail, Customer Service, Oral Communication, and Problem Solving.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Familiarity with Department of Defense (DoD) and Intelligence Community (IC) activities, functions, and organizational structures 3. Knowledge and understanding of NGA operations, data infrastructure and architecture 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Knowledge of simplification and optimization of data automation workflows; streamlining of extract-transform-load (ETL) operations. 6. Knowledge of emerging technical skills, tools, and best practices.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
90,Scientist / Senior Scientist,$31k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"PPD is a leading global contract research organization providing comprehensive, integrated drug development, laboratory and lifecycle management services.  At PPD, we are passionate, deliberate, and driven by our purpose- to improve health!

Envision a workplace where you have a direct impact on improving health, work alongside expert scientists, use newest technologies and collaborate with industry thought leaders and therapeutic experts. Welcome to PPD® Laboratories, where science is our passion, quality is our commitment and people are the cornerstone of our success.

As a *Scientist / Senior Scientist *you will perform a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and/or biological matrices.

At PPD we hire the best, develop ourselves and each other, and recognize the power of being one team. We offer continued career advancement opportunities, award winning training and benefits focused on the health and well being of our employees.
Position is based in the Madison, WI area and offers relocation support.*
Summarized Purpose: *
Possesses a thorough understanding of laboratory procedures and can reliably conduct complex analysis with increased independence. Performs a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and/or biological matrices. Follows validated or experimental analytical procedures with periodic direct supervision. Responsible for review and compilation of results and data comparison against SOP acceptance criteria, methodology, protocol and product specifications. Enters data into databases and reports. Performs self-review for own data prior to QC submission.
Essential Functions:    *
Performs a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and /or biological matrices for stability and analytical testing.
Works with multiple functional groups to meet business needs.
Plans and organizes work with periodic supervision.
Sets up and maintains analytical instrumentation.
Trains on routine operation, maintenance and theory of analytical instrumentation, SOPs and regulatory procedures and guidelines.
Ensures QA findings are addressed appropriately.
Aids and training to other team members.
Problem solving, either independently or with assistance pertaining to extraction and/or instrumentation problems.
Communicates project status to project leader.
Performs work assignments accurately, and in a timely and safe manner.
Reviews, interprets, and analyzes data for technical, quality and compliance to protocols, methods, SOPs, client criteria and Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP) or Good Laboratory Practices (GLP).
Performs self and peer review of the data for accuracy and compliance with reporting requirements prior to submission to QA and issuance to customers.
Job Qualifications*
Education and Experience:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent and relevant formal academic / vocational qualification
Previous experience that provides the knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the job (comparable to 2+ years for Scientist level and 5+ years for Senior Scientist level).
In some cases, an equivalency, consisting of a combination of appropriate education, training and/or directly related experience, will be considered sufficient for an individual to meet the requirements of the role.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Demonstrated knowledge of multiple applicable techniques such as: HPLC, GC, MS, Dissolution Testing, Inhalation Testing, Biopharmaceutical Testing, Karl Fischer, UV-Vis, FT-IR, TOC
Proficient in Microsoft Excel and Word
Proven ability to interpret data by performing trend analysis
Proven ability in technical writing skills
Ability to independently optimize analytical methods
Proven problem solving and troubleshooting abilities
Good written and oral communication skills
Time management and project management skills
Ability to work in a collaborative work environment with a team
Working Environment:   *
PPD values the health and well being of our employees. We support and encourage individuals to create a healthy and balanced environment where they can thrive.  Below is listed the working environment/requirements for this role:
Able to communicate, receive, and understand information and ideas with diverse groups of people in a comprehensible and reasonable manner.
Able to work upright and stationary and/or standing for typical working hours.
Able to lift and move objects up to 25 pounds
Able to work in non-traditional work environments.
Able to use and learn standard office equipment and technology with proficiency.
May have exposure to potentially hazardous elements, including infectious agents, typically found in healthcare or laboratory environments.
Able to perform successfully under pressure while prioritizing and handling multiple projects or activities.
PPD Defining Principles:   *
We have a strong will to win - We earn our customer’s trust - We are gamechangers - We do the right thing - We are one PPD

If you resonate with our five principles above, and ultimately wish to accelerate the delivery of safe and effective therapeutics for some of the world’s most urgent health needs, then please submit your application – we’d love to hear from you.
Diversity Statement*
PPD is proud to be an affirmative action employer that values diversity as a strength and fosters an environment of mutual respect. PPD is committed to providing equal employment opportunities without regard to age, race, color, pregnancy, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status or status within any other protected group.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $66,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are committed to our purpose of improving health, and hold the health and safety of our candidates and employees as a top priority. In keeping within coronavirus (COVID-19) guidelines, the majority of interviews have shifted to virtual platforms.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Laboratory Experience: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"PPD
3.9","Middleton, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
91,Research Scientist,-1,"MatMaCorp is a materials engineering and biological science company located in Lincoln, Nebraska. We are actively developing small, portable and easy to use medical and scientific instruments along with accompanying DNA and RNA based test kits. Currently, we have an opening within our Biology Group for a Research Scientist.

We are looking for dynamic individuals with creative abilities who can work within a multidisciplinary team of scientists and engineers. Individuals must have experience in basic DNA/RNA technology and familiarity with molecular biology and/or biochemistry. Ideal candidates will have experience in experimental design, assay development, and a proven track record of project management. Experience in the industry setting is plus.

Qualifications: Master’s or Ph.D. in Microbiology, Molecular Biology, Virology or other related areas. This is a full-time position with benefits including health, dental and paid vacation. *To apply, please forward your resume along with cover letter to Andrew Rush, Human Resources.*

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.matmacorp.com
Work Remotely:
No",2.9,"MatMaCorp
2.9","Lincoln, NE",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
92,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
93,Associate Director Data Science and Public Impact,-1,"The American Society of Nephrology (ASN)—which represents over 21,000 physicians, scientists, nurses, and other health professionals dedicated to leading the fight against kidney disease—seeks a full-time Associate Director of Data Science and Public Impact.

The ASN Associate Director will help lead a new department encompassing marketing, communications and data science. This department will employ evidence-based decision making as well as a strong creative focus to advance the mission and goals of ASN, reflect the tremendous changes occurring in nephrology practice, research and education, expand existing audiences and build new audiences for a field experiencing dynamic growth and change.

Responsibilities
Develop and lead external marketing efforts to advance the reputation and reach of the ASN Alliance for Kidney Health.
Help ensure the work of the Data Science and Public Impact center advances mission, goals and programs of the ASN Alliance.
Expand visibility and impact of individual ASN Alliance programs, such as educational, publishing, and policy initiatives.
Supervise staff involved with promoting ASN Alliance initiatives.
Identify and build relationships that should be created/developed to enhance visibility with target audiences.
Create and implement mapping and segmentation strategies, trend analyses, and custom reporting/querying that support strategic dissemination of material.
Develop and execute ASN's brand, marketing strategy, and branding guidelines.
Oversee editorial direction, content, design, production, and distribution of promotional material. Write and edit material as needed.
Help the ASN Alliance maintain a consistent organizational voice and message.
Support a service-oriented approach to working with other ASN departments to identify marketing goals and develop strategic, effective campaigns that include reporting of performance metrics.
Remain current with emerging technologies, integrating technological upgrades as appropriate.
Apply critical and creative thinking to every aspect of the center’s portfolio and how it relates to the ASN Alliance.
Skills and experience:
A minimum of eight years of relevant experience with a demonstrated track record of success including strong leadership skills.
A minimum of five years’ proven success supervising staff at various levels, and a track record of advancing professional development on staff teams.
Demonstrated ability to develop, execute, and modify strategic marketing plans that support complex organizations, and proven success overseeing market research, assessment, and analysis.
Experience using Association Management System (AMS) software, including Customer Relationship Management (CRM) and Membership lifecycle tracking, and an understanding of high-level AMS integrations with key partner systems, including broadcast email platform.
Superb oral and written communication, project management and collaboration skills.
Familiarity with science and medicine and the non-profit environment, including mission-based marketing.
Proven success facilitating and managing excellent working relationships with volunteers and external partners.
Experience conducting/overseeing relevant market research.
The ability to direct multiple projects and lead teams that work across departments.
Willingness to make difficult decisions when needed to ensure the success of organizational priorities.
Experience directing projects that rely on internal staff and external experts.
ASN offers a competitive salary commensurate with experience and a comprehensive fringe benefits package.

Interested applicants should email a cover letter, resume, and salary requirements (with the subject line: Associate Director of Data Science and Public Impact) to ASN. Please note the society can only accept online applications for this position.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45.00 - $97.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"The American Society of Nephrology
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
94,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist*
Budderfly, Inc*. (Budderfly - www.budderfly.com) is a fast-growth, venture backed energy management outsourcing company that delivers energy savings with no out-of-pocket costs to our customers through our unique Energy Efficiency-as-a-Service solution. We provide the technology, the capital and the expertise to deliver the energy efficient savings solutions without the project risks or the frustration of competing financial tradeoffs. We combine monitoring, maintenance, and upgrades such as LED lighting, superior HVAC, Budderfly IoT devices, and temperature and refrigeration controls into an easy, one-stop solution.
We are seeking a highly motivated and experienced individual to join our team as a Data Scientist. In this role, the individual will report to our Vice President of Technology and be responsible for all energy saving solution analysis, working with business teams across our leading energy management company.

Job Responsibilities:
• Utilize data from multiple sources to evaluate both the performance of energy saving technologies across multiple sites, as well as aggregate performance of all technologies at a single site.
• Provide the analysis required to support performance targets for energy saving solutions.
• Identify and validate sources of third-party data to augment Budderfly data, resulting in more comprehensive data sets.
• Perform statistical analysis to assist in identifying energy consumption that is outside of normal bounds.
• Perform and interpret energy data case studies and solution experiments published by third parties, and incorporate best practices.
• Develop prototypes, proof of concepts, algorithms, predictive models, and custom analysis. Design and build new data sets.
• Assist in establishing strategies for handling and processing of data gaps.
• Design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production use.
• Determine new ways to improve data and search quality and predictive capabilities.
• Create dashboards that turn data into information.

Desired Characteristics:
• Strong interpersonal, analytical, verbal and written communication skills.
• Able to work independently.
• Creative problem solver with the ability to think out of the box and bring a new perspective.
• Passion for energy savings and the green economy.

Qualifications:
• BS in Computer Science, Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics or related quantitative field (Masters or PhD is a plus).
• Five or more years’ experience in statistical analyses, preferably with relevant experience in energy savings evaluation and quantification.
• Experience preparing, performing statistical analysis, and presenting findings on large data sets, including timeseries data is required.
• Experience building data models and using Machine Learning algorithms (for example forecasting with DeepAR and ARIMA) is required.
• Strong background coding in Python, SQL and Linux, or other programming or scripting language such as R or MATLAB in required.
• Experience building ETL pipelines using tools like Prefect, Airflow, and AWS Glue is required.
• Experience with Machine Learning tools such as Jupyter notebook, SageMaker is a plus.
• Experience working with AWS tools such as S3, Kinesis, Glue, EMR, and EC2 is a plus.
• Experience using reporting tools such as QuickSight, Tableu, Qlik, etc. is a plus.

Job Location: Shelton, Connecticut (company headquarters), but remote work a possibility.
The policy of Budderfly is to provide equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, citizenship status, age, national origin, ancestry, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected status and to affirmatively seek to advance the principles of equal employment opportunity.
Budderfly is committed to being an Equal Opportunity Employer and offers opportunities to all job seekers, including job seekers with disabilities. If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access the Company’s career web page as a result of your disability.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Statistical Analysis in Energy Field: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Shelton, CT 06484 (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Budderfly Inc
4.0","Shelton, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
95,Data Scientist,-1,"About us

Boxy Charm was founded in 2013 and continues to be a leader in the beauty subscription box industry experiencing immense growth of more than 100% year over year. We work with some of the hottest brands including Butter London, Dr. Brandt, Elemis, GlamGlow, Smashbox, Tarte, Too Faced and many more.

Today, Boxy Charm has a community of more than 2.4 million followers across its social media platforms, 10 million monthly visitors online and is the #1 searched beauty box brand on YouTube. In 2018, Inc magazine named it as one of the fastest growing companies in the nation. Boxy Charm is headquartered in South Florida and has an office in Toronto, Canada.

About you

Boxy Charm is seeking a Data Scientist who will use a range of data science and machine learning methodologies to build solutions for a variety of business initiatives. Additionally, the ideal candidate will be able to solve complex problems and apply those solutions within a cutting-edge cloud-based technology platform.

The role will be filled with a solution-oriented candidate that thrives on working in a highly dynamic and engaging environment.

What you will be doing
Work closely with different business units and translate high level business problems into actionable deliverables for the Data & Algorithms team
Work with a wide variety of data ranging between social media and email to customer transactions and logistics
Develop a variety of machine learning models including customer recommendations, customer propensity, forecasting, and marketing performance.
Collaborate closely with the Software Development and DevOps teams to ensure continued delivery of high-quality data through our data processing pipeline
Partner with various business stakeholders and implement solutions that improve their business process
Conduct big data analysis using SQL, Python, Snowflake, Spark and other technologies
Break down complex projects and problems into actionable tasks that be delivered quickly and iteratively and provide value to the business stakeholders
Key Understandings
Customer lifetime value, regression analysis, cohorts, retention, customer lifecycle, customer segmentation, machine learning, large-scale data analysis, classification and propensity modeling
What you will bring to the table
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related field
3+ years of experience programming in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, Ruby, R
3+ years of experience working with SQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Experience with one or more machine learning algorithms such as neural networks, regression, clustering etc.
Working experience with machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow, Keras, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, MXNet, Caffe, Gluon etc. is highly desirable
Experience working in an Agile (SCRUM, XP etc.) development environment
Experience with AWS or other cloud environments is desirable
Knowledge of Big Data and NoSQL systems such as Snowflake, Hadoop, Spark, MongoDB, etc. is a plus",3.1,"Boxy Charm
3.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
96,Data Scientist - Two Sigma Insurance Quantified,$131k-$217k (Glassdoor Est.),"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most challenging economic problems. Our work spans across markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

Two Sigma IQ works closely with its industry partners to deliver products and solutions, which lead to enhanced automation and data-driven decision making. Comprised of a diversified and growing team of highly skilled data scientists, engineers, and business professionals, Two Sigma IQ possesses the agility and innovation of a dynamic startup with the resources and long-term view of Two Sigma. Learn more about TSIQ at https://twosigmaiq.com/

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Work with large, possibly unstructured datasets;
Perform exploratory data analysis and develop predictive models using large data sets
Carry out independent investigations/research studies and produce reports and visualizations to communicate your results;
Generate statistical models for a variety of phenomena;
Interact with industry professionals to understand their business and propose technical/statistical approaches;
Write libraries and research tools, developing and maintaining a research infrastructure to accelerate future results.

You should possess the following qualifications:
A strong academic record with at least one degree in a technical discipline.
Solid knowledge of Computer Science and Statistics.
Experience with data analysis tools (R, numpy/pandas/scikit-learn) and SQL.
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience producing research reports and predictive models.
Good communication skills, both written and verbal.
Interest in working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

You will enjoy the following benefits:
Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.4,"Two Sigma
4.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Point72 Data Scientist,$119k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Point72
Point72 Asset Management is a global firm led by Steven Cohen that invests in multiple asset classes and strategies worldwide. Resting on more than a quarter-century of investing experience, we seek to be the industry’s premier asset manager through delivering superior risk-adjusted returns, adhering to the highest ethical standards, and offering the greatest opportunities to the industry’s brightest talent. We’re inventing the future of finance by revolutionizing how we develop our people and how we use data to shape our thinking. For more information, visit www.Point72.com/working-here.
A Career with Point72's Market Intelligence Group
Market Intelligence is shaping Point72 for the future by combining the most innovative data sources, analysis, and investment tools with the Firm’s traditional strengths at deep fundamental analysis of how companies and industries operate. Market Intelligence finds, tests, analyzes, and models alternative data; conducts deep fundamental research; and helps our investment teams generate alpha-producing ideas using our data and research. We produce investment insights by using machine learning techniques, fundamental company analysis, macro and sell-side research, and quantitative methodologies.
Role
As a Data Scientist, you will support an idea generator testing investment theses using alternative data and building models to execute on the results of that research.
Responsibilities
Test research hypotheses and assumptions of researchers
Pull data from disparate sources
Design and validate models that transform data into actionable insights
Identify and deploy statistical, machine learning, and deep learning methods that strike the right balance between predictive power and robustness
Write efficient, modular, and dependable code, packages, libraries, and scripts
Iterate quickly to test the additive impact of new data and research findings on alpha generation
Document all work extensively
Stay abreast of new research
Desirable Candidates
Ph.D. (preferred) or M.S. in a technical field with an applied or experimental component
3+ years of experience in a relevant field researching real-world data problems (though not necessarily in finance)
Extensive experience developing algorithms and production-grade code
Strong programming skills in Python and SQL/NoSQL
Experience with cloud infrastructures
Strong written and verbal communication skills and a proven ability to collaborate with others",3.9,"Point72
3.9","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,Data Scientist II,$56k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
99,Nextracker - Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer,$79k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description
At Nextracker, we are leading in the energy transition, providing the most comprehensive portfolio of intelligent solar tracker and control software solutions for solar power plants, as well as strategic services to capture the full value of solar power plants for our customers. Our talented worldwide teams are transforming PV plant performance every day with smart technology, data monitoring and analysis services.


As a company driving the clean energy transition, sustainability is not just a word. It's a core part of our business and our operations. Our sustainability efforts are based on five cornerstones: People, Community, Environment, Innovation, and Integrity. We are creative, collaborative and passionate problem-solvers from diverse backgrounds, driven by our shared mission to provide smart solar and software solutions for our customers and to mitigate climate change for future generations. Make your mark with Nextracker.

NEXTracker is seeking a ML Engineer/ Data Scientist.He or She will work within the NEXTracker Asset Management and Support team and be responsible for gleaning insights from data collected from the world’s largest installed base of solar array single-axis trackers. The position will be located in our Fremont, CA office.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do:
Design and develop large scale distributed ML pipelines on cloud.
Take end to end ownership of Machine Learning systems - from data pipelines and training, to real-time prediction engines.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment with a quick cadence of research, experimentation, and product launches.
Create visualizations and presentations for a wide range of technical and non-technical audiences.
Develop tools to create daily monitoring reports on product health and product performance.
Here is some of what you’ll need (required):
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, mathematics).
3+ years of relevant work experience in Machine Learning, building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including Supervised (Regression, Classification) and Unsupervised ML algorithms (clustering, anomaly detection), optimization, neural networks
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression analysis.
Excellent hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and using ML/statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn
Intermediate MS Excel experience (Data Analysis, Pivot Tables, Formulas).
Experience in pattern recognition methodologies
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
#LI-LD1
LD50

Here are a few of our preferred experiences:
Programming experience in SQL, NOSQL and PowerBI, Tableu is a plus.
MATLAB
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide:
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Design, Process & Technology Engineering

Relocation

Eligible for domestic relocation only
Is Sponsorship Available?
No

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accessibility@flex.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
100,Data Analyst,$33k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"divvyDOSE is a new kind of home-delivery pharmacy in a hyper-growth phase focused on adherence packaging.

Our company is professional but fun, dedicated yet quirky. We are fast-paced, highly-motivated doctors, pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, and support staff who focus on health and wellness (and if we’re being honest, sometimes pizza) and most of us have slight obsessions with our pets. We want to make a difference in the lives of our customers by treating them like friends and family. We offer a work-hard, play-hard environment with competitive pay and a comprehensive benefit plan.

Vision/Mission

Our vision is to fix and reimagine healthcare for everyone. Our mission is to engage customers by fixing all the problems around getting and taking their medications. We've taken the first step by simplifying adherence.

We’re now part of Optum and the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, backed by the resources of a global health organization working to help people live healthier lives and to help make the health system work better for everyone. Are you looking for a way to create next-level results with a human-level approach? Then look at opportunities with divvyDOSE, where changing the world is just one result of doing your life’s best work.SM

About the job:

Our data operations team is the pharmacy support system for our customers - we help them transition to divvyDOSE, manage their prescriptions, answer their questions, and coordinate care with their health team. This work is coordinated across pharmacists, technicians, and customer support staff to ensure we provide the best care for our customers. Among other things, we transfer prescriptions to and from other pharmacies, contact medical care providers to understand treatments and request prescription refills and answer inbound questions from our customers.

You will:


Your goal is to help the operation run more effectively and efficiently through data analysis, reporting, dash-boarding, and special projects. You will help us build context through better reporting and drive the business forward by providing data-driven recommendations on ways to improve efficiency and optimize our operation. On any given day you might be presenting to our executive team, doing a deep dive on call analytics, or working with a small team to prototype and test new processes.
Become an expert and go-to resource for our process flows and our operational data
Work with operations management to develop actionable operations performance dashboards across all areas of the organization
Perform ad-hoc data analysis to identify measurable improvements to our operation, and advocate for those improvements via presentations and reports
Maintain and improve operations forecasting models
Collaborate with Finance and Technology teams to ensure we are able to continue to effectively measure our operation as technology improves
Communicate effectively and efficiently across multiple teams and work groups
Requirements
You have strong analytical and problem-solving skills
You are used to tackling very loosely defined problems and still deliver high-quality output
Advanced proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and strong written and oral communication
Ability to adapt quickly to a changing environment
3-5 years of analyst experience
Bachelor's degree, with major in analytical or technical field strongly preferred
Experience with BI tools such as Looker or Tableau is a plus
Job Title: Data Analyst

Job Type: Full-time

FLSA Status: Exempt

Benefits

In addition to competitive salary and a unique opportunity to thrive at a growing company, divvyDOSE offers various formal benefits as well.

INSURANCE, PAID TIME OFF, & RETIREMENT

Full-time employees receive Sick days, Vacation days, and Holiday Bonuses as well as employer-paid Medical (including a Health Savings Account with an employer contribution), Dental, Vision, and Life insurance. In addition, we're proud to offer Voluntary Life & AD&D, Short Term Disability, and Long Term Disability coverage. A 401k plan with employer contribution is available, too.

SOCIAL EVENTS

In our company description, you can tell the divvyTEAM likes to have fun. Regular potlucks, company events, pizza days, wellness challenges, and divvyNEWS You Can Use updates maintain our work-hard play-hard culture.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment. In addition, employees in certain positions are subject to random drug testing.

Employment with divvyDOSE is AT WILL, and can be terminated at any time, for any reason, by either party.",3.4,"divvyDOSE
3.4","Moline, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
101,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst - Cost and Utilization Analysis,$53k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst is responsible for providing analysis and recommendations regarding the Utilization and Cost of Behavioral Health Services at Community Behavioral Health.This position will provide analysis of based on Budget to Actual utilization and PMPM of services as well as coordinate with various departments including Finance, Data Informatics, Clinical and Provider Network Management in the determination of recommendations regarding Utilization and Cost findings.

Essential Functions:

·Coordinate with various CBH teams and departments through effective communication, report generation, solution development and team building.

·Provide or work with various departments to provide, and present various complex financial analyses and reports to Utilization Management Committee, the Clinical, Finance and Network Operations Departments.

·Maintain, modify and create SQL code used for financial analysis and reports.

·Identify, research and bring to resolution any issues with the financial data and reports.

·Develop detailed financial projections.

·Review monthly Quality Assurance Reports prior to issuance to Finance Executive Staff.

·Coordinate the processing of compliance claims adjustments and reporting results to the Compliance Department.

·Development of Value Based Contracting Models and Evaluation of Value Based Contracting.

Position Requirements:

·Education: Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics or Mathematics

·License/Certification: N/A

·Relevant Work Experience: Minimum of 5 years of experience in financial forecasting and analysis

·Skills:

·Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Office applications

·Proficient in using SQL, including querying and troubleshooting

·Thorough understanding of data manipulations and reconciliation

·Excellent analytical skills

·Excellent interpersonal and verbal and written communication skills

·Able to work independently",3.2,"Community Behavioral Health
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
102,Lead Data Engineer,-1,"Lead Data Engineer
At CAVA we love what we do, and we try and make every day as fulfilling as the last. Our Data Management and Shared Services Teams need fanatics in technology and development to support our growing brands and help develop the next generation of the CAVA Data management platform.

At Cava we value technology and talent and understand the benefits of data driven decision making. Therefore, we are setting the standard for restaurant technology innovation and understand the challenges are worth the rewards. We have a creative and open team that uses modern tools, delivering solutions via emerging Cloud and SaaS technologies all developed with agile and lean methodologies. We also know the core of an organization it’s people and thrive to make Cava a great place to work.

We foster a culture built on five core values:
• Positivity – Every one of us can change someone’s day for the better.
• Transparency –We use transparency to help us make decisions through open dialogue
• Humility – We can always find ways to improve.
• Fanaticism – We are passionate about the opportunity to turn every guest into a fanatic.
• Thoughtfulness –We go above and beyond for our guests, our teams and communities.

The Role:
As a Lead Data Engineer with Cava you’ll work with a team to create solutions to support over 300+ restaurant locations nationwide. You’ll help build the pipeline that feeds our new data warehouse solution and modernize our existing tech-stack. You’ll assist in mentoring the next generation of Cava developers and work with other talented engineers to define what the next iteration looks like. You’ll be part of a team driving technology as a solution and providing great experiences for the entire Cava organization.

What You’ll Do:
Lead the design of scalable system architectures to support cross-functional interfaces based on interactions with the user community and knowledge of enterprise architecture practices. Assure solutions meet all user requirements, as well as to provide for future growth and expansion. Work with the business to identify high-level functional and technical requirements, develop ETL processes between multiple endpoints (including SOAP/REST APIs, SQL Server, S3, Redshift, and others), and support expansion of future “big data” projects. Work hands-on with a talented team of engineers to design, develop, test, and document (high-level system design diagrams and workflows) backend systems.

Preferred Skills:
• Strong experience writing SQL queries for SQL Server or another Relational Database is required
• Experienced with ETL tools such as Informatica, Talend, Boomi, SSIS etc a plus
• Data integrations between cloud and SaaS solutions
• Experience with Linux, Python, XML, Redshift, JavaScript, Groovy, JSON
• Understanding of cloud-based technology, preferably AWS
• Successful track record of developing quality Enterprise scale software products and shipping production ready software for cloud/SaaS Solutions
• Experience debugging distributed systems with high data loads
• Experience with logging, monitoring, and alerting
• Knowledge of Development IDEs and ability to use version control software such as GIT
• Understanding of Web Services protocols such as REST, SOAP and API design
• Data Modelling experience
• Experience as an applications programmer on large-scale database management systems

Benefits at CAVA?
We’ve got you covered. Here are just some of the benefits available to support center team members:
• Competitive base salary, plus bonus
• Unlimited PTO
• Health, Dental, Vision, Telemedicine, Pet Insurance plus more!
• 401k enrollment with CAVA contribution
• Paid sick leave, parental leave, and community service leave
• Free CAVA food
• Casual work environment
• The opportunity to be on the ground floor of a rapidly growing brand
INDEXECINDUS",-1,CAVA - Support Center (HQ),"Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
103,Scientist - In Vitro Assays and Drug Discovery,-1,"At Visikol, our mission is to accelerate the discovery and development of therapeutics through transforming tissues into quantitative data sets that we mine for actionable insights. We do this through leveraging our imaging, image analysis and advanced in vitro services that are based on a suite of proprietary software and cutting-edge research. As a company, we operate as a contract research organization and conduct contract research for the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. We are currently looking for a Scientist to join our team that will be responsible for the execution of research projects for our Clients and designing novel drug discovery assays. Specifically, we are looking for a Scientist who will lead complex in vitro assay services as well as developing novel cell based assays. This will be a unique opportunity to work side-by-side with our team of Scientists to develop novel drug discovery technologies for use with our pharmaceutical Clients. We are looking for a Scientist and are open to broad backgrounds within the imaging, cell culture and image analysis spaces. Specifically, we are looking for Scientists that have the following skills and background.
Great project management skills and the ability to manage several complex research projects simultaneously.
An ability to troubleshoot complex assays and develop novel solutions for problems.
Excellent presentations skills and the ability to communicate complex scientific findings with diverse audiences.
A thorough understanding and demonstrated track record of designing, implementing and reporting on assays to address specific research questions.
Substantial wet lab experience running and interpreting assay results.
BS + 5 years of experience, MS + 3 years of experience, PhD + 0-2 years of experience
The candidate should have a strong background in several of the below fields.
Fluorescent microscopy - confocal microscopy a plus.
Routine mammalian cell culture - 3D cell culture a plus.
Execution of in vitro assays.
Experience immunolabeling and optimizing fluorescent labeling.
Traditional histology - grossing, embedding, sectioning, staining.
Image analysis experience using ImageJ or other software tools.
Details: *
Position is located in Hampton, NJ

Compensation will be commensurate with experience

In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",-1,Visikol Inc.,"Hampton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
104,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
105,Optical Data Analyst,$69k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction

ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.

Job Mission

ASML is seeking an experienced data analysis engineer with expertise in processing of images for metrology process development of ultra-high precision flat optics and ceramics. This person will join the Advanced development center in Wilton, Connecticut - A Research and development team focused on proto-typing of next generation wafer/reticle clamping systems. The main job function is to understand the existing coatingand etching systems and process, to extend / improve capability and to solve challenging engineering problems associated with achieving nanometer scale precision.

This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.

Job Description

The main focus of this position will be:

Develop / improve image processing algorithm to extract nm flatness, roughness, morphology and chemicalinformation from scientificimaging equipment like interferometer, SEM, AFM.
Integrate algorithm from developers in to image processingsoftware package for analysis and process development cycles for engineering and manufacturing users.
Maintain Version controlled software package for multiple product generations.
Perform software testing to identify application, algorithmand software bugs.
Validate/ verify / regression test software to ensure it meets the business and technical requirements.
Developed machine learning model to predict trends and behaviors relating to lifetime and cycle time improvement of the product.
Develop & execute roadmap of analysis, software, and systems, to mitigate product & process risk and prevent software performance issues.
Lead the design team in software analysis tool development to find solutions to difficult technical problems in an efficient manner.
Develop/ maintain /improvedatabase structures and capabilities.
Write Matlab scripts to search analyze and plot data from Database.
Support query code to interrogate data for manufacturing and engineering needs.
Support image analysis on data and derive conclusions.
Some travel ( ~ 10%) to Europe, Asia, and within the US can be expected.
Education

Minimum: Bachelor degree in Computer Science / electrical engineer / optical engineering with minimum of 4 years’ experience in developing signal processing & image processing algorithm and software or equivalent experience.

Preferred: Master's degree in similar disciplines with a minimum of 2 years of related experience; or PhD degree in similar disciplines.

Experience
Experienced in software like: MATLAB, Python, C/C++.
Experienced in scientificimage/signal /data process algorithm, statistics and software development.
Theoretical expertise in to image/signal /data processing, Transfer Function Convolution, filtering and data fitting techniques.
Clear understanding in: optical measurement techniques like interferometry, scatterometry, optical sensor, Imagingsystems, etc.
Familiarity with Software Configuration Management.
Personal skills
Have strong written and oral communicative skills and a commitment to achieving results on time.
Demonstrated “team player” with a quality orientation and interpersonal skills.
Be able to interface with multidisciplinary groups and work effectively in a team and be willing to take on responsibility, follow through and keep multiple simultaneous assignments on schedule.
Be able to quickly acquire technical knowledge from documentation and on-the-job training and be capable of thoroughly investigating technical issues (analytically and hands-on in a lab).
Be willing to own the integrated systems performance, and support the entire product life-cycle (development through sustaining engineering), strive to deliver the right design solution for the right cost at the right time.
Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work.
Can learn and apply new information or skills.
Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents.
Strong customer focus and commitment to customer satisfaction through prioritization, quality, efficiency and professionalism.
Ability to complete assignments with attention to detail and high degree of accuracy.
Proven ability to perform effectively in a demanding environment with changing workloads and deadlines.
Result driven-demonstrate ownership and accountability.
Identifies bottlenecks and drives improvements.
Work independently or as part of a team and follow through on assignments with minimal supervision.
Demonstrate open, clear, concise and professional communication.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative working relationships with manager, co-workers and customer.
Work according to a strict set of procedures within the provided timelines.
Other information

The Advanced development center in ASML Wilton, Connecticut is seeking is seeking an seeking a well-rounded engineer with direct experience in optical data analyst. Advanced development center in Wilton, Connecticutis an multi-disciplinary group of engineers and scientistsfocused developing on learning loop solutions, proto-typing of next generation wafer/reticle clamping systems and industrialization of proto-types that meet the system performance requirement.

Role within Office
Responsibilities:

Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
May require travel dependent on business needs.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability

Internal Reference: #LI-KG1",3.9,"ASML
3.9","Wilton, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
106,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
107,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Provider Data Analyst in the Population Health - Information Exchange & Interoperability practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
108,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst,$50k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blending customer advisory, customer support, and customer experience, Carousel’s supercharged Customer Success Obsessed mission goes beyond any one IT function. Rather, it’s a mindset, a mantra, and a company-wide drive to bring extreme technology value to Carousel customers—so they can bring value to theirs.
With deep expertise across a vast portfolio of technologies, including security, unified communications and collaboration, data center, networking, managed services, and cloud solutions, Carousel can design, implement, and support solutions tailored to meet the unique needs of each customer. By offering professional and managed services with flexible deployments in the cloud, Carousel ensures customers achieve agility and use technologies in the way most effective for their business.
A legion of 1,300, the Carousel team has been committed to the art of customer success for its more than 6,000 highly satisfied customers since 1992. The company has been recognized by multiple publications and industry consortiums as a top technology integrator and managed services and cloud solution provider—including the Inc. 500/5000, Healthcare Informatics 100, and CRN MSP Elite 150. Headquartered in Exeter, RI, the company has offices across the United States and internationally—with three Network Operations Centers. To learn more, visit CarouselIndustries.com.

Position Summary:
The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for leveraging large quantities data to assist executives, business partners, and operations teams to make data-driven decisions. This position will focus largely on sales operations data defining data relationships (inclusive of off-system spreadsheets), data mining and data modeling which will be the basis for actionable intelligence dashboards and reports. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will utilize their experience to explore data, applying statistical techniques, and designing sales dashboards and reports that provide value to the company and its operational leaders. This role will collaborate with all Business Systems Teams and business subject matter experts to deploy a robust reporting universe that is streamlined and transparent. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will report to the Vice President of Business Intelligence and join a highly agile cross-functional team that leads some of the most critical projects for the Business Intelligence department and Carousel Industries as an organization.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Commitment to the Sales Organization to develop and deliver analytical reports that support and enable actionable intelligence to achieve strategic and operational goals.
Provide descriptive data analysis, and creative problem-solving using SQL programming language
Lead projects regarding data exploration, relationship management and data-driven story telling
Ability to create practical, actionable plans that are coherent and understood by stakeholders
Partner with Business Systems teams, business leaders, and functional groups to provide actionable intelligence regarding operational effectiveness and revenue growth
Gather, manipulate, and explore large datasets to test hypotheses and extract useful insights
Create and manage reporting, data narratives, and analytics deliverables for the CI Governance board and committee
Build innovative data models, reports and dashboards
Troubleshoot data conflicts and inconsistencies through data mining and collaboration with the business teams
Evaluate and develop data monitoring reports to provide further insight into process and change management
Develop roadmaps with proposed solutions from an end-to-end perspective
Partner with clients to promote evidence-based decision-making and devise action plans that influence behavior changes
Investigate and create trend analysis models to promote operational effectiveness

Qualifications:
B.S. in a quantitative field required.
Prior experience and expertise with Salesforce strongly desired.
Experience in financial and/or sales driven data modeling is a plus.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI and SNOWFLAKE cloud data warehouse preferred.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Demonstrated advanced analytical, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to deliver and support a quality service experience.
Demonstrated experience with industry report writers such as Einstein Analytics, Business Objects, Power BI, SSRS, Tableau or other BI reporting solutions.
Prior experience with CRM, ITSM and ERP reporting preferred.
Experience with writing/updating (SQL) queries.
Strong problem-solving skills.Superior verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to organize and prioritize concurrent projects.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively.
Create, maintain, and optimize reports, including SQL statements, views, functions, and stored procedures.
Effectively gather requirements and design new reports, troubleshoot, research, and correction of reports and database objects requiring review.
Accurately estimate effort for requested custom reports.",3.2,"Carousel Industries
3.2","Exeter, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
109,Senior Systems and Data Analyst,$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Pursuit

Pursuit is a social impact organization that creates transformation where it's needed most. Through our intensive, four-year software developer training program, we teach high-need, high-potential adults the technical skills and industry smarts needed to get their first tech jobs, advance in their careers, and become the next generation of leaders in tech. Our graduates are hired by leading companies like Pinterest, Kickstarter, LinkedIn, BlackRock, and JPMorgan Chase, and increase their average annual salaries from $18,000 to over $85,000.

Our graduates are hired by leading companies like Pinterest, Kickstarter, LinkedIn, BlackRock, and JPMorgan Chase, and increase their average annual salaries from $18,000 to over $85,000. By connecting talent with opportunity, Pursuit empowers graduates to transform their families, tech companies, and communities across the nation. Read about our work in the New York Times: Income Before: $18,000. After: $85,000. Does Tiny Nonprofit Hold a Key to the Middle Class?

About the Role

As Pursuit's Data Analytics and Systems Analyst, you will play a critical role in managing and making useful all the information and information systems that drive our mission. You will take charge of Pursuit's data collection and storage systems, further strengthen their linkages, and develop the dashboards, reports, and analyses that drive the organization forward.

This is an excellent opportunity for a data and systems guru who is looking to use their skills to make a clear daily impact on people's lives.

About You
You find joy in a beautiful and useful data dashboard
You love to use analytics to find the important human stories and insights within big datasets
You know how to make disparate portals, platforms, and spreadsheets work nicely together
You're always looking for ways to automate everyday tasks
You find satisfaction in combing through data to make sure the details are correct and complete
You enjoy working across different teams and functions of a buzzing organization
Key Responsibilities
Develop and maintain information collection and storage systems across Pursuit
Lead updates, train staff users, and troubleshoot for systems like our CRM, Applicant Tracking System, and public-facing website
Develop live dashboards and analyses for Pursuit's program and business teams
Build and sustain linkages across data systems
Create and maintain notification and alert systems for key events and data changes
Respond to needs for ad-hoc reports for Pursuit's program and business teams
Support build and rollout for new data tools and features
Requirements
2-5+ years working in an analytics and/or data management role
Expertise in Google Sheets or Microsoft Excel
Proficiency in SQL
Working knowledge of JavaScript (Experience with Google Apps Script a plus)
Experience with CRM software, especially Salesforce
Experience building and maintaining ETL processes
Understanding of analytic techniques and tools
Experience with Python and/or R a plus
Positive attitude and enthusiasm for Pursuit's mission
Location: Long Island City, NY (Currently fully remote due to coronavirus)

Compensation: In addition to competitive compensation, we are happy to provide employees with a range of benefits. Our offerings include premium health, dental, and vision insurance, flexible paid time off, robust 401k matching, discounted gym memberships, and an active workplace that includes drinks, snacks, and fun team events.

Time Commitment: Full-time

Diversity

Our team has a wide range of backgrounds and experiences, and we value the richness that diversity brings to our organization. We welcome new perspectives and affirm that all employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, ancestry, religion, national origin, age, familial or marital status, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity or expression, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or any other classification protected by federal, state, or local law. Pursuit is an equal opportunity employer.",2.9,"Coalition for Queens
2.9","Long Island City, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Nonprofit Organization,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
110,Software Engineer - Data Science,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
111,Senior Data Scientist,$130k-$215k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

In 2018, Fashion Nova was the #1 most-searched fashion brand on Google. We are among the top e-commerce brands in the world engaging with millions of consumers, and global fashion influencers. We have built a platform and brand through innovative marketing and merchandising strategies that we believe connects with the next generation and redefines fashion retail.

At Fashion Nova, we have strived for success and creativity to make this the top e-commerce brand in the world. With a team based out of Los Angeles, California, we are motivated to take Fashion Nova to the next level. Our goal is to hire candidates that are positive go-getters and problem solvers who love fashion. The right candidate should be able to work independently in a fast-paced and always evolving environment.

About the Role

Fashion Nova is looking to hire a Senior Data Scientist who will be a trusted partner to business leaders that can translate business questions/requirements into analytical problems and ultimately develop and deploy models into production that support ongoing decision-making. You will help enable the long-term strategy, development, and execution across the organization.

Responsibilities
Fully leverage our data assets by developing algorithms to give our customers an unparalleled, highly personalized experience on our website and mobile app.
Improve and/or automate everyday decision-making using data, including occasionally building dashboards.
Work closely with our engineering teams to take ideas from offline prototypes to scalable production services.
Communicate with product management and other business teams on problem definition and writing requirement documents for efficient model building and deployment.
Play a foundational role in helping shape data science. Lead the development and execution of our data strategy.
Propose solutions driven by data that help enable growth and drive revenue.
Champion a data lead culture through the entire organization.

Required Skills
6-8 years of E-Commerce Retail data science experience; grasp applied probability and statistics commensurate with a Master's degree in a quantitative discipline
Highly proficient in Python, R, Sql (and their accompanying data science stacks)
Experience with cloud computing
Experience with natural language processing and computer vision
Experience developing code and production ready algorithms in collaborative environments
Experience in data visualization platforms (e.g. Looker, Google Analytics)
We build our own datasets, so you need to have the ability to write SQL in your sleep
You can put together a decent slide deck and communicate complex ideas to colleagues in other areas of the business
You take initiative, naturally curious and eager to learn
Benefits
Employee Discount
Full health care coverage
Dental and vision coverage
401k Match
Kitchen stocked with great snacks and drinks
Fun and friendly culture
Fashion Nova, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workplace environment.

#LI-EC1",3.3,"Fashion Nova - Careers
3.3","Vernon, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
112,Senior Research Scientist – Security and Privacy,$77k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"Returning Candidate? Log back in to the Career Portal and click on 'Job Browsing/History' and find the job you're looking for.

2020-008-OIC: Senior Research Scientist – Security and Privacy

Directorate Open Innovation Center
Location Beavercreek, OH
If you want to be not just on the cutting edge of technology but creating the cutting edge of technology, Riverside Research is the place for you. We are searching for an individual to join our Trusted and Resilient Systems research group to help shape a more secure future. This position provides maximum flexibility in pushing forward new ideas, new technology, and ground-breaking research. The team has ongoing research in security of machine learning, cryptography, hardware and hypervisor security solutions, as well as developing cutting edge solutions to the security of open architecture systems. The ideal person for this position is interested in broad areas of technology and can leverage their interests to develop and study creative solutions to some of the most difficult challenges. The current team resides in Riverside Research’s Beavercreek, OH, but we are willing to consider candidates that would prefer to work out of one of our Washington DC (Centerville or Crystal City) offices, our New York City office, or our Boston office.

Job Responsibilities:
•Conduct independent research in the area of security and privacy
•Publish and present research in conferences and journals
•Mentor junior researchers and interns
•Work with the team to identify future areas of research investment and develop research plans
•Author technical proposals

Qualifications:
•Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
•PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or similar or Master's degree Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering with five plus years experience in research.
•Proficiency with software development and revision control (Git)
•Ability to work independently and with a team
•Superior written and verbal communications skills
Desired Qualifications:

•Demonstrated publication record
•Experience with DARPA, IARPA, and government funded research

IND1
CA
Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.

Apply Now",3.4,"Riverside Research Institute
3.4","Beavercreek, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
113,Data Engineer,$73k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Window Nation, the 5th largest home remodeler in the Country, is experiencing explosive growthin ALL areas. As we look to further disrupt our industry, we are currently seeking a Data Engineer based out of Fulton, MD.

Window Nation is growing and adding an additional Data Engineer. This growth role will join the current Business Applications Manager reporting directly to the COO and working closely across departments. The primary responsibility of this role is to develop, manage and provide architectural and technical guidance for key information systems. The Data Engineer will collaborate with various stakeholders across the organization and outside vendors to provide solutions (i.e., SQL, Dynamics and Power BI) based on business requirements. This person will also collaborate with company executives and management to develop, deliver and manage business applications that provide meaningful and actionable business insights through recurring reporting and a self-service portal.

Responsibilities and Duties
Build, develop and manage key technical solutions architecture and development guidance for Window Nations business data warehouse, ERP and reporting platforms
Collaborate with department leaders on process enhancements. Validate proposed enhancements, evaluate technologies to support enhancements, and work to implement changes as a leader and high-level contributor/specialist
Define and document complex business requirements, technical requirements and processes
Lead process design sessions and review with technical and business staffs, including all levels of management
Prioritize and manage multiple, parallel technical projects using formal project planning techniques
Assist in developing technical project plans, goals, and budgets; identify resources needed, develop schedules and methods of measuring results
Organizes and manages all phases of the development project delivery to ensure on-time, on-budget completion
Assembles and coordinates project team members, both internal and external resources
Plans and oversees the preparation and dissemination of project communications
Manage development projects through various lifecycle stages from business need through design and delivery, Manage IT solution delivery workflow
Establish and maintain business customer relationships and manage solution delivery communications
Qualifications and Skills
Bachelors degree in technology, business or related field required
Extensive knowledge and experience with IT and project/portfolio management best practice methodologies (Agile/SCRUM, Kanban, ITIL)
Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Technologies (O365, D365, SQL, .NET, Visual Studio, Azure, MS Project)
Knowledge of server, networking technologies and capacity planning experience in Dynamics 365 CRM, POS, & ERP a plus
Technical development background a plus
Knowledge of Business Intelligence concepts and methods
Demonstrate the ability to work systematically and logically to analyze situations, resolve problems, identify causes and anticipate implications
Knowledge of Business Processes Modeling and proven experience identifying and enhancing business processes through technology solutions
Success Factors
Curious, independent worker focused on continuous learning and development
Proven strategic planning experience at the management level
Good interpersonal skills and team working capabilities enabling one to interface at all levels
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual's race, color, sex, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

Powered by JazzHR",4.0,"Window Nation, LLC
4.0","Fulton, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,General Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
114,Big Data Engineer - Chicago - Future Opportunity,$71k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT US

Are you ready to transform an industry? At Centro we are building a comprehensive tech platform that radically increases efficiencies and impact across businesses, teams, and campaigns. Our clients can run all their digital business through Basis, with robust business intelligence, workflow automation, search and social integrations, and the number one rated DSP.
We’re taking the digital advertising world by storm and are proud to be headquartered in the rapidly growing tech hub of Chicago, with offices that span across the United States, Canada, Mexico, and London. Join us in our mission to improve the lives of everyone working in the industry!
WHY WORK WITH US?
At Centro, we believe that lasting success is achieved through continual dedication to the growth and well-being of the individual. Our people are the core of what makes Centro unique. Driven by the Centro Manifesto and our guiding principles, we look to hire the best and brightest minds—curious, passionate learners who are driven to create impact.
We are committed to building a culture of highly motivated individuals who create a positive and supportive environment together. When we work hard, stay focused, and act in service to others, we believe that anything is possible. Come grow with us!

ABOUT THE TEAM

Technology is at the core of what we do. Centro’s innovative Engineering team designs and develops new features and integrations for Basis, our industry-leading, comprehensive software solution. Our platform processes over 300 billion events per day and uses AI and machine learning to automate and simplify the entire digital campaign process.

This team is all about data—and in order to create value from the massive amount of data we collect, engineering leverages their dynamic Data Engineering, Data Science, and Business Intelligence teams to create insights that benefit the industry as a whole.

Our Tech Stack:
• Ruby, Java, Python, and React.js
• Kubernetes, Docker, Kafka
• PostgreSQL, NoSQL
• AWS

Ways You’ll Contribute
We are looking for engineers who are excited about building distributed data pipelines. We want you to help us shape our internal and external brand-new data warehouses, leveraging the latest advances of big data processing: a combination of Kafka Streams, Hadoop, and traditional RDBMS. You will also contribute by:

Implementing scalable, fault tolerant and accurate ETL pipelines that work in a distributed Hadoop environment.
Developing platform services to operate the big data applications at scale.
Gathering and processing raw data at scale from diversified sources into Hadoop.
Building enterprise business analytics and reporting applications on Hadoop.

What You Bring to the Table
Solid understanding of distributed system fundamentals.
Experience in developing, troubleshooting, diagnosing, and performance tuning of distributed data pipelines at scale.
Demonstrated professional experience working with various components of Big Data ecosystem: Spark/Spark Streaming, Hive, Kafka/KSQL, Hadoop (or similar NoSQL ecosystem), et. al, in a production system.
Strong software engineering skills with Python.
Knowledge of some flavor of SQL (MySQL, Oracle, Hive, Impala), including the fundamentals of data modeling and performance.
Bonus Points
Skills in real-time streaming applications.
Knowledge of Scala.
A development workflow using Docker containers.
Compulsion for automating your day-to-day processes.
LIFE WITH CENTRO

We take care of our people. Our team has put together a thoughtful benefits package and provides a wide range of perks, including competitive 401k matching, a tax-free health savings account, tuition reimbursement, generous maternity/paternity leave, and more.

Aside from benefits, we’re always finding new ways to invest in the personal and professional growth our employees. We’re proud to support a variety of employee-led communities that enrich our culture of uniqueness, inclusivity, and empowerment. Centro is more than a workplace.

Centro is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and support an inclusive workplace diverse in thought, perspective and culture. We celebrate all team members regardless of gender/identity, sexual orientation, race or cultural background, religion, physical disability and age. We are better together.",4.0,"Centro
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
115,Software Engineer - Data Visualization,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels who are experienced with data visualization, interactive data-driven visualizations, and user interface design. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for the design and development of data visualization software, techniques, and algorithms.
The candidate should have experience creating and building custom, re-usable data visualizations based on statistical and mathematical modeling and data analysis to be used to solve a variety of problems related to data reporting. Seeking engineers with the ability to overcome information overload, are familiar with accessibility compliance, information design, and human factors and usability design.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy analytic software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Designing, developing, and deploying data visualizations, interactive dashboards, and user interface solutions
Applying knowledge of technical computing platforms, tools, and techniques to analyze information and data requirements obtained from data scientists, analysts, and other business stakeholders
Planning and proposing solutions for the optimization of data integration strategies, intuitive designs, and enterprise interactive dashboards
Formulating simulation models of operational problems and proposed solutions related to integrating and analyzing using dynamic data visualizations that incorporate intuitive interfaces, infographics, interactive drill-downs, movements
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams on the use of data visualizations developed
Collecting feedback to make continuous improvements to new and existing data visualizations
Contributing to guidelines and design conventions and standards for modeling and data visualizations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Front-end application frameworks such as Vue, React, Angular
HTML/CSS frameworks such as Bootstrap, Zurb, Material
Experience developing client-side applications using JavaScript
JavaScript libraries such as Bootstrap, jQuery, Leaflet, D3.js
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Customer technical support experience
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
116,Senior Data Scientist,$131k-$207k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Earnin:

Earnin is a community-supported financial platform with a suite of tools that let people take control of their financial future. Earnin started out by solving one of the greatest – and least discussed – inequities in the American financial system: the practice of employers paying workers bi-weekly. Earnin's core product, Cash Out, allows people to access the pay they've already earned. There are no loans or hidden costs. People pay what they choose. Other products include: Balance Shield, which helps prevent overdrafts, a financial calendar that helps people budget and schedule payments, and Tip Yourself - a revolutionary free social savings app.

Funding: Series C, current funding partners include Andreessen Horowitz, DST, Matrix Partners, Ribbit Capital, Felicis Ventures and March Capital.

Join us and help build a new financial system focused on fairness and people's needs.

You can help make a difference.

About the Team:

We're looking for a talented and motivated data scientist to build sophisticated models with data collected across our business to aid Earnin's mission in giving the world access to their pay as soon as they've earned it.

Data Scientists are the central node to every team within Earnin. As a data scientist, you'll be interfacing with analysts to gain insights, our product managers to evaluate areas where we can protect and improve our business model, and our engineering team to advance our product utilizing artificial intelligence.

Every decision made at Earnin is backed by data; our company trajectory is defined by the systems, tools, and analytics powered by our exceptional team. We integrate multifaceted data streams such as rapidly changing market data, customer data based on app activity and feedback, and financial banking operations data to perfect our processes and workflows. Improving these systems and maintaining scalability across a growing user base (X million and counting) is thrilling.

What Sets Us Apart:
We care more about the thought process, perseverance, tenacity in solving really difficult problems (rather than checking off all the technology boxes)
Solving unique problems in the financial payments industry
Helping people on a human level
As a Data Scientist you will:
Build machine learning models with large-scale datasets across personal finance and user employment information
Research and explore with various machine learning algorithms to best help on products
Work very closely with cross-functional teams to come up with machine learning approaches to improve the user experience or business metrics.
Collaborate with product teams on ad-hoc product analytics
Optimize models by adding more features, improving algorithms, tuning parameters
Create monitoring systems to track the quality of models
Apply statistical concepts such as hypothesis testing, statistical significance etc to model explanation, reporting and decision making.
Come up with and implement decision strategies based on model predictions
Requirements:
Deep understanding of machine learning and statistics
Strong product sense and analytical thinking
Experience building predictive models from scratch data to production
Strong SQL abilities and experience.
Proficient in Python
Experience with Spark, R and Scala is a plus
3+ years industry experience in data mining, machine learning, statistical analysis, and modeling
Excellent communication skills
A MS or PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or any quantitative disciplines
At Earnin, we believe that the best way to build a financial system that works for everyday people is by hiring a team that represents our diverse community. Our team is diverse not only in background and experience, but also in perspective. We celebrate our diversity and strive to create a culture of belonging. Earnin does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related medical conditions), gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, legally protected medical condition, family care status, military or veteran status, marital status, registered domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal laws. Earnin is an E-Verify participant.

Earnin does not accept unsolicited resumes from individual recruiters or third party recruiting agencies in response to job postings. No fee will be paid to third parties who submit unsolicited candidates directly to our hiring managers or HR team.",3.7,"Earnin
3.7","Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
117,Data Analyst Internship - Paid,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Learn all aspects of operations across a wide variety of functional areas throughout the corporation.
Perform advanced analytics functions including data modeling and prescriptive analytics in the context of real business scenarios and problems.
Utilize sophisticated techniques and business intelligence (Power BI) to create dashboards and ad hoc/refreshable reports to address current business problems or to streamline processes.
Support or adapt existing T-SQL/VBA applications, tools and reporting as needed.
Complete other projects, analyses, and data extraction as required.

Minimum Requirements
This internship is open to Junior-status students only.
Expertise with MS Excel a must, with proficiency in SQL required
Experience in spreadsheet automation using Visual Basic for Application (VBA) preferred.
Knowledge of R, Python, and Power BI or Tableau preferred.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",3.6,"Uline
3.6","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
118,Medical Laboratory Scientist,$17-$23 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Performs and interprets tests at all complexity levels. Demonstrates an understanding of the theory and scientific principles of laboratory testing as well as the technical, procedural and problem solving aspects. Correlates abnormal laboratory data with pathological states, determines the validity of test results and the need for additional tests. Determines the validity of test results through the monitoring and/or verifying of quality controls, standards, etc. Communicates test results, reference ranges, specimen requirements, and other pertinent information to authorized sources.

Job Responsibilities:

Follows the laboratory's procedures for specimen handling and processing, test analyses, reporting and maintaining records of patient test results.
Performs laboratory testing in a compliant manner.
Maintains regulatory knowledge and awareness as it pertains to specific job duties.
Adheres to the laboratory's quality control policies, document all quality control activities, instrument and procedural calibrations and maintenance performed.
Assumes responsibility for and takes action regarding any quality control or quality assurance issues as it pertains to specific job duties.
Maintains instruments and equipment in accordance with manufacturer’s specifications.
Assumes responsibility for good documentation practices and maintains clear and legible records.
Performs proficiency testing in compliance with Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) regulations i.e. analyze proficiency survey sample in the same manner as a patient specimens, no communication with other CLIA laboratories, complete record retention and accurate documentation and result reporting.
Assumes responsibility for participation in continuing education, professional development and required annual competency assessment.
Follows the laboratory's established policies and procedures whenever test systems are not within the laboratory's established acceptable levels of performance.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or reporting of test results and either must correct the problems or immediately notify the General Supervisor, Technical Supervisor, Clinical Consultant, or Laboratory Director.
Exercises good judgment, analytical and problem solving/troubleshooting skills.
Recommends solutions and improvements.
Documents all corrective actions taken when test systems deviate from the laboratory's established performance specifications.
May function in an educator and provides instruction and training in theory, technical skills, safety protocols, and the application of laboratory test protocols to students, employees, residents, etc.
Other duties as assigned.
Follows Hospital and department policies and procedures with special attention to attendance and punctuality, confidentiality, dress code and display of ID badge, and safety.
Completes mandatory education and training in order to maintain organization and department-specific competencies and requirements.

Education:

Bachelor's degree in a chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science or medical technology from a four-year college or university.
One year training in approved program with registry/certification at Medical Technologist/ Clinical Laboratory Scientist level (MLS or MT) or registry eligible.
OR
Meets the CLIA qualifications for high complexity testing personnel grandfathering clauses.
See Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, §493.1489(b)(3), §493.1489(b)(4), §493.1489(b)(5), §493.1491 Standards; High Complexity Testing Personnel Qualifications.
Diploma and/or transcripts must be provided.
Education will be verified.
Education outside of the United States requires diploma/transcripts translated into English and proof of foreign equivalency from by an HHS approved agency or nationally recognized organization such as NACES (National Association Credential Evaluation Services, Inc.) or AICE (Association of International Credential Evaluators, Inc.).

Languages:

Certifications:

Certification as a Medical Technologist (MT) or certification eligible preferred upon hire, from the American Society of Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or American Medical Technologists (AMT).
Certification must be obtained within one year of hire.

Complexity of Work:

Requires critical thinking skills, decisive judgment and the ability to work unsupervised or with minimal supervision.
Must be able to work in a stressful environment and take appropriate action.

Work Experience:

None required.

Physical Requirements:

Physical demands include: Visual acuity to study specimens under a microscope.
The ability to distinguish colors.
Fine motor skills and manual dexterity to handle specimens and lab equipment required to process specimens and repair equipment.
May be required to stand for long periods of time.
Light lifting may be required.
May be exposed to hazardous chemicals, biohazards, radioactive materials, etc.

Personal Protective Equipment:

Follows Standard Precautions using personal protective equipment as required.

The policy of Cleveland Clinic and its system hospitals (Cleveland Clinic) is to provide equal opportunity to all of our employees and applicants for employment in our tobacco free and drug free environment. All offers of employment are followed by testing for controlled substance and nicotine. Job offers will be rescinded for candidates for employment who test positive for nicotine. Candidates for employment who are impacted by Cleveland Clinic’s Smoking Policy will be permitted to reapply for open positions after 90 days. Decisions concerning employment, transfers and promotions are made upon the basis of the best qualified candidate without regard to color, race, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, ancestry, status as a disabled or Vietnam era veteran or any other characteristic protected by law. Information provided on this application may be shared with any Cleveland Clinic facility.

Cleveland Clinic is pleased to be an equal employment employer: Women/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities",3.8,"Cleveland Clinic
3.8","Akron, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1921,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
119,Data Scientist,$69k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Design, implement and optimize algorithms for unsupervised and supervised learning based on structured and unstructured data. Develop powerful business insights from social, marketing, industrial data and public policy using advanced machine learning techniques. Work closely with the software engineering team to productize analytic software. Collaborate with system integration and data warehouse engineers on data extraction and data cleaning. Work in a highly interactive, team-oriented environment. Requires a bachelor’s degree in a STEM or related field and 5 years of experience, or a Master’s degree in same with 3 years, or a PhD.",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
120,Data Analyst,-1,"*Position: *Data Analyst

*Department: * Information Technology

*Schedule: *Monday – Friday/ 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

*SACHS is a part of National Health Service Corps for loan repayment assistance*

*SACHS Core Values: *

Quality Healthcare – providing patient-centered, culturally-sensitive, equitable care that is safe, timely, effective, efficient, while seeking to prevent illness & disability
Teamwork – working together to achieve a common goal, with a willingness to serve each other in a Christ-like manner
Wholeness – ministering to the spiritual, physical, mental & emotional needs of others
Integrity – living & working in an authentic, honest way that inspires trust
Compassion – engaging with the needs & suffering of others, out of concern for their well-being
Excellence – striving to exceed expectations for our patients, community, & staff
Humble Service – caring with a kind & selfless spirit
Respect – holding others in high regard by empowering them

*Requirements for Success in Your Role: *

The Data Analyst’s responsibilities include conducting a full life cycle analysis to include requirements, activities, and design. The Data Analyst will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements. Other duties as assigned by the Data Manager. This is not a* _Remote_* position.

*Job Duties and Responsibilities*
* Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
* Develop and implement databases, data collections systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
* Ability to acquire data from primary and secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
* Responsible for database administration, data consolidation, data analysis and management reporting.
* Utilizes software to generate metrics and develops actionable recommendations. Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
* Provides support to teams or management by collecting and analyzing data and reporting results.
* Ability to organize technical work; demonstrate excellent planning, problem-solving, analysis, documentation, presentation, and organization skills; analyze and interpret data, processes and needs based on limited information.
* Works with the core reporting team to ensure the application teams fully address users' reporting needs. Responsible for ensuring reports for specified application(s) are implemented successfully.

*\*\* This document is not all-inclusive as to the Essential and Marginal functions of the job and is subject to change.*

*Education and Experience: *

*Required*
* *Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or other quantitative field.*
* *Valid CA Driver’s License; will be required to travel to all SACHS locations.*

*Preferred*
* *Minimum of 2-5 years of healthcare experience with SQL, Tableau or other BI tools*
* *Familiarity with EPIC or other EHR/EMR/EDR products*
* *Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings*

*Full Benefits Package; Vacation and Sick Leave Plans*

*Medical / Dental / Vision packages.*

*!! Rates among the lowest in the industry!!*

*Retirement Account with up to 8% employer contribution*

*Employer paid Life Insurance*

*Fitness Facility access*

*8 Paid Federal Holidays*

*1 Paid Birthday Holiday*

*SAC Health System complies with applicable Federal and State civil rights laws and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity.*

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $29.00 - $32.00 per hour

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Employee assistance program
* Flexible schedule
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Parental leave
* Retirement plan
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* Epic: 2 years (Preferred)
* Healthcare: 2 years (Preferred)
* SQL, Tableau or other BI tools: 2 years (Preferred)
* EMR/EHR/EDR products: 2 years (Required)

Education:
* Bachelor's (Required)

Location:
* San Bernardino, CA 92410 (Required)

License:
* CA Driver License (Required)

Company's website:
* www.sachealthsystem.org

Work Remotely:
* No",2.9,"SAC Health System
2.9","San Bernardino, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
121,Data Engineer,$60k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


The Data Engineer participates in the design and build of modern data products that comprise of raw data stores (data lakes) and cleansed data repositories, populated by batch or streaming data pipelines. The Data Engineer works with a team to create a robust, sustainable and flexible design and leads the technical delivery using Agile delivery frameworks like Scrum or Kanban.

Responsibilities
Developing and managing data processes to ensure that data is available and usable
Creation and automation of data pipelines and platforms
Managing and monitoring data quality via automated testing frameworks (Data Driven Testing, TDD, etc.)
Working closely with Architects, Data Scientists, and DevOps to design, build, test, deliver, and maintain sustainable and highly scalable data solutions
Researching data acquisition and evaluating suitability
Integration of data management solutions into client environment
Actively managing risks to data and ensuring there is a data recovery plan
Building data repositories such as: data warehouses, data lakes, and operational data stores, etc.
Qualifications
3+ years relevant professional work experience.
Experience and expertise in the following:
Creating robust and extensible data pipelines for production systems
Use of cloud platforms, preferably AWS
Creating secure, performant, and well-modeled data stores
Common analytical platform architectural patterns (Star Schema, data integration patterns, ABAC, data quality frameworks etc.)
Data lake design patterns and technology options (schema on read, metadata capture, search framework)
Use of scripting languages, preferably Python
Familiarity with NoSQL databases
Source code version control management using git
Project experience using the Scrum or Kanban framework.
Professionalism; to include written and oral communication – the ability to communicate collaboratively in front of a whiteboard. An ability to understand your audience and adjust your communication style to fit
Aptitude and desire for learning new technologies.
Technically savvy, entrepreneurial spirit who thrives in environments that reward self-initiative and resourcefulness.
About Excella


Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact.

Here's what you can expect from us:
You'll work with great people who love what they do: our team includes published authors, certified trainers, and internationally renowned speakers.
We have a ""bring your own device"" workplace and will share the cost of a new computer of your choice -- Mac or PC. It's up to you.
We'll invest in your career by providing 3 days of paid professional development every year, including travel and registration fees to attend classes and conferences, in addition to tuition assistance for degrees and certifications.
Starting day one, every employee is bonus eligible and receives 15 days of paid vacation, 6 federal holidays, and 4 floating holidays.
You can bike, drive, or metro to work -- our commute reimbursement plan has you covered.
You'll have fun! We hold monthly social events all year long, including a summer event for you and your family.
Excella is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.0,"Excella Consulting
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
122,Senior Data Scientist,$140k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.
You will report to the Manager of Data Science.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:
Among our many benefits:
- 100% medical, dental, and vision
- Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
- 401K
- Commuter Benefit",2.9,"Formation
2.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Supply Chain Solution - Data Scientist,$68k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description


The Supply Chain Solution – Data Scientist will be based in Austin, TX. In this role you will be responsible for creating reports using a variety of tools and methods.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do…
Use various analytical techniques including visualization, statistical methods, machine learning/AI to create scalable solutions for business problems
Translate Supply Chain business problems and questions into specific quantitative questions to be answered w/ available data using robust methodologies. In many cases, the data collection at scale will be part of the task and may involve co-work with software development team
Coordinate and perform testing on data quality and solutions
Analyze and extract relevant information from big data to help automate and optimize key processes
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings to stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information
Build scalable prototype analytics solutions
Work closely with software development/engineering teams to build model implementations and integrate successful models and algorithms in production systems at scale
Here is some of what you’ll need (required)…
Minimum 4 years’ experience with R
Demonstrated skill and experience of data analysis within open source scripting languages (e.g. R, Python)
Strong experience with SQL and working with relational databases (SQL Server, Teradata, MySQL etc.)
Strong demonstrated knowledge of applied statistical and machine learning methods
Experience with XML, JSON data formats, working with REST API’s, SVN/Git or other version control tools and techniques
Experience with Tableau in dashboard development, deployment and administration
Demonstrated ability to manage projects and implementation of solutions/applications
Effective written and oral communication skills, team player
Here are some nice to have’s…
Master’s degree in STEM field/Operations Research/Data Science/Supply Chain
Work experience in Supply Chain/Manufacturing
Be able to present quantitative results in the right context to various target audiences
Experience within the RStudio ecosystem (Shiny dashboards and applications, Plumber API’s, RStudio Connect)
Experience working with non-relational databases like MongoDB
Experience of deploying ML applications on platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Google Cloud preferred
Demonstrated experience in business applications of distributed computing (e.g. MapReduce, HIVE, HADOOP)
Demonstrated capability in building scalable analytical solutions
Experience in ownership of solutions – life-cycle, roadmap, implementation, business value generation
Portfolio of data science projects on Github.com, RPubs.com etc.
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Demonstrated ability to communicate and influence executives and upper management
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide…
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Global Procurement & Supply Chain

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accesibility@flextronics.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
124,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,"Steady
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
125,Data Scientist,$84k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an early to mid-career Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you tired of having your performance tied to billable hours?
Do you want to work in the public interest?
Do you want to feel like your ideas are valued and you are more than just an FTE?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
The Model-Based Analytics Department is seeking a motivated, creative Data Scientist for MITRE’s Mclean, VA or Bedford, MA locations to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis.

Our employees are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are truly an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives.

Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. We also actively conduct independent research in areas of interest to our government partners. Once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Work on or lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Required Qualifications

Candidates will be required to have:
Ability to obtain a DoD Secret Clearance.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least one modern programming language like Python (utilizing packages like scikit-learn, pandas, or dask), SAS, R (utilizing packages like caret, dplyr, or data.table), Matlab, C++, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau, Looker, or QlikView.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with working in cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure.
Demonstrated experience working on or leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Preferred Qualifications

Preference will be given to candidates with desired experience including:
Advanced degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or other related technical field of study.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Experience utilizing notebooks (e.g., Jupyter, R Markdown, Zepellin),
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (e.g., Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (e.g., Shiny, Plotly Dash).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack containerized web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
126,Associate Clinical Scientist,$42k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Associate Clinical Scientist will serve as a clinical scientist providing pharmacology support and execution of the development, update and maintenance of the TRHC?s clinical decision support system (CDSS) of drug-drug interactions based on drug pharmacokinetics properties. The successful candidate will have a working knowledge of clinical pharmacology, drug metabolism, drug transporters, and related pharmacokinetics principles. This person will work in collaboration with other research and clinical scientists in the Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development institute for the integration of generated information and of knowledge into the overall program strategies, to improve the efficiency of the TRHC?s CDSS, improve our mechanistic understanding and provide scientific rationale. This individual will also work in close collaboration with the TRHC academy to provide advanced training and review educational programs related to the TRHC?s CDSS. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a high-impact clinical pharmacology team and collaborative setting.

TRHC Scientific Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development Institute (SPPRDI) is committed to the development of proprietary products, their validation and recognition by the scientific and regulatory communities to optimize medication regimen in order to improve patient outcomes, reduce utilization of various healthcare services, lower healthcare costs, and manage risk.
Accountable and responsible for ensuring maintenance and update of drugs into the CDSS.
Performs, integrates and interpret PK analysis including pre-clinical and clinical studies.
Interpret enzymatic assays, in vitro/ex vivo drug metabolism studies. Integrate metabolism and transporter data to provide mechanistic interpretation into the CDSS.
Fully knowledgeable about PK?s drugs; to address, identify and resolve scientific issues.
Contributes to expert pharmacology input into educational training programs and materials.
Complies with all applicable regulations, maintains proper records in accordance with SOPs and policies
Education:
PharmD or MD equivalent and PhD from an accredited institution in Clinical pharmacology, Pharmacokinetics, Drug metabolism, or other relevant fields or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience:
Experience in clinical pharmacology research.
Experience in research (post-doctoral formation/fellowship; up to 2 years) would be advantageous.
Specific Skills:
An in depth knowledge of drug metabolizing enzymes and transporters would be considered highly beneficial.
Demonstrated ability and strong understanding with preclinical and clinical PK data.
Demonstrates ability to drive for results independently.
Participates in team for ensuring valid methods and in assessing review process.
Applicant should be organized, self-motivated and capable of working autonomously and in a collaborative environment.
It would be advantageous for the candidate to have knowledge on pharmacogenomics.",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Orlando, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
127,Data Engineer,$58k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Engineer at CoverMyMeds, youll be the expert for our data that is used to make decisions about the future of our business. Youll be a liaison for our teams, creating solutions to keep the AMP program working as effectively as possible, and solving the tough problems when they arise. Partnering with our data architecture team, youll be responsible for the continuous delivery of data and data enhancements, managing and building out the AMP data mart, and monitoring our data sources and extracts for scheduling and performance. Youll work with everyone from the technical side to the operations side with endless opportunities to take on responsibility and continue learning. The ideal candidate is someone who is a consultant and teacher at heart, with an innate desire to mentor and educate other teammates.

Tech Stack

SQL-Server, PostgreSQL, Git, Tableau, Google Analytics

What You'll Do
Provide exceptional technical support to our teams by working through requests in our ticketing system
Create new and improve existing ETL processes, testing practices, scripts and tools to manage first-line, backend data
Design and build architectural models that support analytical systems with use of relational and non-relational data stores.
Schedule and support our production, test, and development environments
Document everything important you do for our data
Research and implement new tools to take AMP and the Analytics practice to the next level
About You
2+ years of technical support experience
2+ years of SQL coding experience in a relational database
2+ years of SQL testing experience
2+ to data profiling, ETL concepts, and BI tools
Experience with cloud database architecture, deploying machine learning models and/ statistical models
Experience with database administration tasks, such as patching, replication, and addressing performance issues
Advanced programming knowledge a plus
About Us

CoverMyMeds, part of McKessons Prescription Technology Solutions, is a fast-growing healthcare technology company. Our mission: Help patients get the medications they need to live healthy lives. Our solutions seamlessly connect the health care network to improve medication access, increasing speed to therapy and reducing prescription abandonment for patients like you and me.

We hire ambitious people and make it a priority to invest in them by providing opportunities to grow their careers and connections within the community. On-site culinary team, flexible hours and paid benefits? Yeah, we have those too. But dont take our word for it. Weve been recognized as a Best Place to Work by Glassdoor, a Best Company to Work For by FORTUNE, and our employees have great things to say, too.

CoverMyMeds is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We embrace diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",4.7,"CoverMyMeds
4.7","Columbus, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
128,Sr Data Scientist,$80k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will use AI and machine learning technique to drive the main purpose of increasing HouseCalls program member engagement and penetration through leveraging internal enterprise data sources including member medical history and behavior information and external information.

As HouseCalls enabling operation continues to grow, there are specific skills sets that are needed to help us achieve the financial goal and member experience satisfaction. Strategic solution team is seeking a director role of outreach strategy with advanced technical expertise, marketing background and great healthcare industry experience. We are looking for an innovative individual who is not only able to strategize via data, but also able to implement the strategy through the end.

You’ll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:

The Sr. Data Scientist will play an analytical role researching, designing, implementing and deploying full-stack scalable machine learning solutions to support house call member engagements
Develop intelligent solutions to drive increase in HouseCalls penetration rate by using unstructured data like voice and text
Consolidate internal and external data to establish member journey line across different programs
Establish analytic machine learning models to increase member outbound reach experience and NPS scores, implement the solutions into applications or operation
Drive inbound scheduling through text mining in scripting and NLP

You’ll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Actuarial Science or a related technical field; MS or PhD strongly preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in data analytics and machine learning modeling
Minimum 5 years’ experience working with large databases to create meaningful, usable data structures to extract information out of application transactional data
Minimum 5 years’ experience leading technical and non-technical resources in the area of Information Management, Data Strategy, Business Intelligence development, data mining and predictive analytics with machine learning/statistical modeling techniques
Minimum 3 years' experience in Python
Strong ability to communicate highly technical issues/results to a diverse audience both verbally and in written
Experience working for a large enterprise with fragmented data sources, lack of documentation, unstructured requirements and ambiguity
Experience working with business stakeholders and senior leaders in understanding data analytics and information needs, and executing on transformation of high-level, abstract data needs into meaningful data management solutions, information and analysis
Experience understanding and managing business data and information, and the ability to correlate business processes to data
Experience converting raw data into processed, actionable, insightful information is required
Strong execution mentality
Preferred Qualifications:
MS in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Sciences, Information Management, Statistics, Actuarial Science or a related technical field
Minimum 3 years of Speech Recognition modeling and/or NLP preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience in correlating business processes and front-end applications to back-end databases and systems

Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)

OptumCare is committed to creating an environment where physicians focus on what they do best: care for their patients. To do so, OptumCare provides administrative and business support services to both owned and affiliated medical practices which are part of OptumCare. Each medical practice part and their physician employees have complete authority with regards to all medical decision-making and patient care. OptumCare’s support services do not interfere with or control the practice of medicine by the medical practices or any of their physicians.
All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Group’s Telecommuter Policy.
Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: OptumCare is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employers and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

OptumCare is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.",3.4,"UnitedHealth Group
3.4","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1977,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
129,Data Scientist Intern,-1,"More About Silicon Labs:

We are Silicon Labs. We are the leading provider of silicon, software and solutions for a smarter, more connected world.

We hire the most innovative talent in the world to solve the industry’s toughest problems, providing our customers with significant advantages in performance, energy savings, connectivity and design simplicity. Silicon Labs’ software and mixed signal engineering teams create solutions for customers in diverse markets including theInternet of Things, (IoT), internet infrastructure, TV tuners, as well as automotive and consumer radios. Our solutions arein products from the market leadersin home automation, electric vehicles, green technology, smart TVsand home voice control automation. We take pride in our products and in our people, and that’s one of the many reasons we continue to be awardedMost Respected Public Semiconductor Company by the Global Semiconductor Alliance.

As a Silicon Labs Data ScienceIntern, you will help develop insights, strategy, and data visualizations for marketing the industry’s leading products in IoT and Infrastructure and Automotive (I&A) all while being mentored and closely guided by the best operations experts who have a vested interest in your success. And don’t worry, you’ll still have plenty of opportunities to learn, network, and develop new skills through our social events, development lectures, and volunteer opportunities.

Excited? See what it’s like to be a part of the Silicon Labs Team

bit.ly/SiliconLabsInterns

bit.ly/WomenatSilabs

bit.ly/WhySilabsInternship

What You’ll Do:

Projects are specifically tailored to each intern, ensuring a meaningful contribution to both your skillset and Silicon Labs. Here are just a few of the challenges you might get to tackle:
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics visualizations and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Collaborate with our Marketing and IT business intelligence team to drive analytics, give updates to the business, and gain a deeper understanding of our development process.
Understand our tool integrations that bring data into a central location for analysis and help optimize.
Work on ad-hoc analysis of customer engagement, buyer’s journey’s, and campaigns to provide deeper insights.
Learn more about the I&A (Timing, Isolation, Power) products and IoT (Wireless, MCU,Sensors) products you’ll have exposure to.

Who You Are:

You are an innovator, builder, and tinkerer. You have a curious mind and a drive to succeed. You want to work with a global team of technology enthusiasts and design pioneers. Here’s what you need:
Completion of 2+ years of study
Enrollment in BS/MS Information Systems, Marketing, Computer Science, or Statistics
Any coursework or internship experience in the follow areas will be considered a plus:
Experience with Microsoft Power BI or Tableau
Familiarity with Mark-Ops tools, Adobe Analytics, Marketo, Salesforce
Interaction with data sources and working with data lakes
Knowledgeable use of Excel and Pivot Tables for analysis
What’s in a World-Class Internship?

Apply what you’ve learned in school to build technology that solves some of the planet’s most significant challenges. You will join a community of fellow interns and alumni who engage and empower your excellence. Take it from our previous interns:

""I enjoyed my internship because of the projects I worked on, my manager and fellow interns, and the company culture. These 3 aspects all contributed to a well-rounded internship experience, and I was excited to show up to work every morning!"" - 2018 Marketing Intern

“I learned so much about technical marketing and the skills needed to be successful. I greatly enjoyed working in a positive, relaxed, yet professional environment full of extremely smart people. I loved working on a small team and immersing myself into the team.” – 2017 Marketing Intern

Curious for more feedback? Check out our Glassdoor (bit.ly/SilabsGlassdoor)

bit.ly/SilabsURàDiscover why we attract the best and brightest!


We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.6,"Silicon Labs
4.6","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
130,Data Scientist,$60k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux
Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

Oversight is the world’s leading provider of AI-based spend management and risk mitigation solutions for large enterprises. Based in Atlanta, GA, Oversight works with many of the world’s most innovative companies and government agencies to digitally transform their spend audit and financial control processes.

Oversight’s AI-powered platform works across our customers’ financial systems to continuously monitor and analyze all spend transactions for fraud, waste, and misuse. With a consolidated, consistent view of risk across their enterprise, customers can prevent financial loss and optimize spend while strengthening the controls that improve compliance. Learn More.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,"Oversight Systems
4.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
131,Senior Scientist - Learning Technology,-1,"Title: Senior Scientist *(Learning Technology)
Purpose: *
The role of the Senior Scientist is to lead the planning, execution, and evaluation of applied research and development projects in support of defense, other government, or industry clients. Research topics will include the design and development of next-generation learning and development technologies, human performance assessment, and other related topics. The Senior Scientist will develop mission and business-relevant prototypes and practices, co-author papers and research proposals, execute research studies, and present findings. The Senior Scientist will also support management in business development efforts by managing an active portfolio of new and existing clients.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
· Serves as Principal Investigator and/or project manager on Federal and DoD research and development contracts related to learning, training, and educational technology and performance support technologies

· Leads and mentors multidisciplinary teams of learning science professionals

· Secures funding through proposal writing and other business development opportunities

· Manages relationships with government and industry clients, stakeholders, and end users

· Ensures project tasking is executed in an efficient way consistent with company and industry standards and scientific understanding
Qualifications: *
• U.S. Citizen

• Ph.D. in a field related to learning sciences, technology design, instructional design, applied psychology, human factors, or other relevant area of study _and_ 10+ years of related post-graduate work experience

• Subject matter expertise in technology-based training, human performance assessment, game-based training, simulation, immersive reality (e.g., AR, VR, MR), adaptive training, mobile learning or instructional design

• Experience performing on government research and development contracts and interacting with military and other government customers

• Experience leading experimental research projects

• Experience leading field data collection efforts

• Strong written and oral communication skills

• Familiarity with Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, SPSS
Work Environment: *
The majority (75%) of this position is situated in a typical office environment and includes the use of a computer (6-8 hours per day), telephone, and web-based video communications. The remaining 25% of time may include activities at customer sites such as military installations and other commercial industrial or office settings. Working in any field environment you may be exposed to the elements (hot or cold temperatures, sun, wind, snow, rain, etc.). Military installations may require work in wilderness settings and handling or being near live ammunition and weapons. Activities required will include traveling (flying or driving) for long periods, may require walking or standing for long durations (6-8 hours), crouching, kneeling, and carrying equipment. You may be required to wear additional safety equipment including but not limited to a helmet, eye and ear protection, safety vest, and steel-toed boots.
Travel: *
The Senior Scientist will be expected to travel up to 25% of working hours per month for the following purposes:

• Business development opportunities

• Conference presentations and attendance

• Team and organizational meetings (if remote)
Security Clearance: *
All employees must have or be capable of acquiring a Secret DoD security clearance. Guidelines indicating those items that may prevent you from obtaining a security clearance can be found here: http://www.fas.org/sgp/isoo/guidelines.html.
Background Check and Drug Testing: *
Our clients may require background checks and drug testing.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.quantumimprovements.net
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/quantumimprovements
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Quantum Improvements Consulting
5.0","Dayton, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Senior Data Modeler,-1,"Senior Data Modeler/Business Analyst
Location: Midtown Atlanta (remote during COVID)
Duration: 24month +

MUST HAVE
Business Analysis experience - capable of accurate requirements gathering and display excellent written communication skills.
Apache Hadoop environment
Exceptional SQL querying
Strong Data Relational & Dimensional modeling (Dimensional design, Entity Relationship diagrams)
Job Description
Seeking Senior Data Modeler/Business Analyst The successful candidate must have solid data modeling and business analyst experience and must demonstrate an affinity for working with others to create successful Business Intelligence (BI) and Data Warehouse (DW) solutions. He/She must be an excellent communicator, both written and verbal, and have experience working with business areas to translate their business data needs and data questions into project requirements. He/she must also have an educational background in Data Analysis and Data Modeling as well as on the job experience as a data modeler.
This position provides the opportunity to be involved in new BI and DW solutions, such as Dashboards and Reports, and to work with many different business areas within the company. The candidate will participate in all phases of the BI/DW development life cycle and will independently and collaboratively write project/enhancement requirements and perform data modeling duties.
He/She will coordinate with technical BI/DW development staff through design, construction and implementation as a business area liaison, consultant and UAT tester.

Skills and Experience:
Required:
Strong Data Relational & Dimensional modeling (5+ years) on the following platforms:
Teradata and either Oracle or DB2
Experience in using data modeling techniques and tools (focused on Dimensional design), Entity Relationship diagrams, ERWIN, etc.
Exceptional SQL skills with ability to write complex queries
Experience in translating business requirements to SQL-based ETL
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Proficient testing skills unit, system and integration
Strong business analyst and requirements gathering/writing skills
Experience in developing according to SDLC and accustomed to working with technical documents (flowcharts, programming specifications, etc.)
Excellent verbal/written communication and presentation skills
Apache Hadoop ecosystem
Nice To Have (candidates will get preference)
Data Relational & Dimensional modeling on the following platforms:
Oracle, DB2, SQL Server, MS Access
Knowledge of CA Erwin Data Modeler
Knowledge of DataStage development techniques
Knowledge of Unix/Linux platform and shell scripting
Experience with Teradata or Oracle/Exadata database performance tuning
Experience with ChangeMan MVS code versioning software
Experience with Zeke MVS/Zeke Agent Job scheduler
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite
Railroad knowledge and experience
Analyst Attitude Profile:
Self-starter, responsible, professional, accountable
A finisher, seeing a project or task through to completion in spite of challenges
Strong team ethic and customer-support focus
Ability to contribute knowledge by sharing business & technology skills with peers
Good troubleshooting and problem-solving skills and instincts
Education
Bachelors Degree preferred. Preferably in Information Systems, Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related field

#aptonetjobs",5.0,"Aptonet Inc
5.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
133,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,$130k-$150k (Employer Est.),"KnowBe4, Inc. is the provider of the world's largest security awareness training and simulated phishing platform. KnowBe4 enables organizations to manage the ongoing problem of social engineering by helping them train employees to make smarter security decisions, every day. Tens of thousands of organizations worldwide use KnowBe4's platform to mobilize their end users as a last line of defense and enable them to make better security decisions, every day.

We have ranked a best place to work for women, millennials, and in technology nationwide by Fortune Magazine as well as #1 or #2 in The Tampa Bay Top Workplaces Survey for the last five years.

****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
134,"Scientist I, Quality Assurance - Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy",$51k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
The Scientist I, Quality Assurance Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy supports the on-going enhancement of the PTC total quality system by performing Quality Assurance (QA) functions related to the disposition of Raw Materials/Consumables. This position enables the manufacture of clinical and commercial gene therapy products while ensuring product quality through the control of incoming materials.

The Scientist I, Quality Assurance- Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy develops, implements, and executes procedures for the timely and compliant testing and disposition of raw materials and consumables.

The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments such as manufacturing, logistics, QC, and external vendors on Quality-related issues.

The Scientist I, Quality Assurance Raw Materials Disposition, Gene Therapy supports adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate.
Job Description:


Responsibilities:
Lab responsibilities include raw material testing and release, sampling of raw materials, and disposition of consumables
Methods of testing include FTIR, Raman, HPLC-CAD, Description, Osmolality, pH, wet chemistry
Develops novel testing methods for the identification of raw materials
Performs method and material qualifications and validations
Aides in the sampling and disposition of raw materials
Performs manufacturing consumable and processing aids inspections and release
Maintains sample and reference material inventory
Qualifies and validates new laboratory instrumentation
Supports activities related to vendor/material approval and management of Contract Testing Laboratories
Authors and reviews new specifications for raw materials and consumables
Data and material management via electronic systems such as LIMS and SAP
Manages outsourcing of raw materials for Contract Lab Testing
Authors or revises procedural SOPs and testing methods
Participates in Vendor Audits and the review of quality agreement
Contributes to and participates in vendor change notification program
Assesses new in coming raw materials and proposes testing plans
Recommends QA system and procedure changes to enhance overall job performance and QA functions
Maintains electronic and paper-based documentation, as needed
Performs other tasks and assignments as needed and specified by management, i.e. audits
Qualifications:
Masters degree in a related scientific discipline and a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in a QA, logistics or related role OR a Bachelors degree in these same disciplines and a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience
Detailed/Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of GMP regulations and Food and Drug Administration (FDA) requirements
Experience with SAP, LIMS, ELN, Veeva Vault Quality Document Management System or equivalent
Working knowledge of global pharmacopeias such as USP, EP, JP, BP, Ph. Eur
Knowledge of biopharmaceutical manufacturing process workflows
Proficiency with Microsoft Office and Excel
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and collaboratively, as required, in a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines
0-15% travel
Office/Laboratory-based position. Requires the ability to lift items weighing up to 15kg
Special knowledge or skills and/or licenses or certificates preferred.
Experience working directly with the FDA or other health authorities
QC laboratory experience
Experience with Quality Risk Management and Quality Management Systems such as Deviation Investigations and CAPAs
EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","Pennington, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
135,Machine Learning Senior Data Scientist,-1,"CodaMetrix is a well-capitalized and early-stage company focused on solving some of the more interesting problems in healthcare administrative and clinical areas. The company was formed by the Massachusetts General Physician Organization to help commercialize and build upon internally developed, and highly utilized AI-based applications.

CodaMetrix is led by proven entrepreneurs, technology and healthcare veterans, whose vision is to create a highly desirable atmosphere for technical talent to flourish and develop innovative, significant, reliable, and broadly utilized solutions.

As an early-stage company, specific responsibilities will evolve, and significant job expansion and promotion opportunities are available.
Job Description*
The Machine Learning Senior Data Scientist reports to the Senior Director of Machine Learning and AI. The machine learning team is responsible for the invention, analysis, and deployment of new machine learning techniques using healthcare data to improve administrative and clinical medicine.

This is a unique opportunity for a passionate individual about innovation in machine learning, and AI. This is a fast-paced, collaborative and iterative environment requiring quick learning, agility and flexibility.
Responsibilities*
Innovate, implement and test machine learning and deep learning techniques at scale.
Analyze the quality and calibration of predictive models.
Collaborate with machine learning and engineering team members for deployment of new machine learning techniques, and follow deployments tracking issues and successes.
Interface with medical coders, administrators, and physicians to understand the strengths and weaknesses of existing products and to help develop new machine learning-empowered products.
Requirements*
PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field.
Excellence in technical leadership and working an independent individual contributor
Minimum of two years hands on experience with machine learning approaches and understanding of the analysis, testing processes of machine learning techniques.
Familiarity with deep learning approaches such as CNN, RNN and Reinforcement learning.
Minimum one year experience with cloud computing environment such as AWS
Hands on experience with databases and Elastic Search.
Proficiency in one or more of programming languages such as Python, or Java.
Demonstrated end-to-end project leadership.
Strong verbal, visual, and written communication skills.
Beneficial Experience*
Experience mentoring junior data scientists
Experience with AWS EC2, S3 and AWS SageMaker
Demonstrable experience with NLP applications.
Publications in major ML/NLP conferences, and/or participation in Kaggle or similar competitions
Some knowledge of US healthcare systems.
Location*
Boston, MA with the ability to work remotely.
Job Type*
Regular, full-time.
Compensation*
Highly competitive and commensurate with the level of experience.
EEO Statement*
_CodaMetrix is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. _

_Our company, as well as our products, are made better because we embrace diverse skills, perspectives, and ideas._

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
AWS: 2 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 2 years (Required)
Elasticsearch: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.codametrix.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,CodaMetrix,"Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
136,Molecular Biology Research Scientist PhD,-1,"*Company Name: *Avance Biosciences Inc.

*Job Title: *Research Scientist
*Department: *Operations
*Reports To: *Department Manager
*Classification: *Full-time, Exempt
*Date: *September 2020

Avance Biosciences Inc., a fast-growing biotechnology CRO, is recruiting several Research Scientists (PhD) in its GLP and/or GMP biological testing departments. This position plans, directs, and manages research and testing projects on behalf of our biopharma and biotech clients, as well as development projects to improve laboratory operations.

*ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *

The omission of specific statement of duties does not exclude them from the position if the work is similar, related or a logical assignment to this class. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
* Plan and execute biological assay development, validation, and sample testing activities.
* Prepare study protocols and/or test plans according to client's requirements.
* Direct laboratory associates to execute experimental plans.
* Lead in incident and OOS investigation and root cause analysis per company quality policies.
* Perform data analysis and prepare project reports.
* Communicate to clients on project progress regularly.
* Establish standard operational procedures and train laboratory associates as needed.
* Ensure all project related work are done in compliance with GLP and CGMP regulations.
* May supervise a small group of lab scientists.

*QUALIFICATIONS: *

A successful candidate for this position must have the following experience, knowledge, and skills:
* Must have a PhD degree in biological sciences
* In-depth knowledge of and hands-on experience in ddPCR, NGS, and QPCR
* Post doctorate independent research experience is preferred
* Detailed-oriented and multi-tasking skills
* Strong problem-solving skills

*SPECIAL JOB CHARACTERISTICS: *Demonstrated excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Able to work independently and as part of a team on complex tasks with minimal supervision. Able to create accurate work in a fast-paced environment with constant change and interruptions. Able to prioritize effectively and manage multiple tasks simultaneously. Commitment to the mission and values of Avance Biosciences Inc.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* Molecular Biology Lab: 4 years (Required)

Education:
* Doctorate (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Work Location:
* One location

Company's website:
* www.avancebio.com

Work Remotely:
* No",3.4,"Avance Biosciences Inc
3.4","Houston, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
137,"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development",$86k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development
Location: Bedford, MA
Homology Medicines is seeking an outstanding Senior Scientist to assist in the advancement of viral gene therapy production processes for novel adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The individual in this role will be a highly-skilled, talented and motivated researcher who will lead the work to develop and characterize next generation plasmids for large scale manufacturing of AAV vectors. We seek candidates with proven ability to work independently and collaboratively who are driven to pursue cutting edge science and develop next generation therapies to transform the lives of patients.
Essential Functions and Duties
Design, development, and characterization of novel plasmids for AAV production using molecular and cell-based assays
Analyze vector specific characteristics including packaging efficiency and product quality, as impacted by packaging and inverted terminal repeat (ITR) plasmid and integrity
Advance technical understanding and development of critical parameters in mammalian cell culture production systems for AAV vectors
Collaborate closely with analytical characterization team to evaluate critical vector attributes and process performance parameters for AAV vector production
Lead a team of research associate and scientist completing assigned tasks and serve as scientific mentor to overseeing laboratory experimentation and data analysis
Author technical reports and technology transfer documents as needed
Skills and Experience
PhD or MS in molecular biology, virology, or related fields with 4+ (PhD) or 6+ (MS) years industry experience in viral vector production
Expertise in molecular cloning techniques preferably with AAV/ITR experience
Thorough understanding of virus characterization methods including nucleic acid and protein-based approaches
Familiarity with using lab-scale production platforms including adherent cell systems, shake flasks, and bioreactors for live virus or viral vector production
Adept at conducting routine testing and limited troubleshooting of multiple methods
Independently motivated, detail oriented, and good problem-solving ability
Excellent interpersonal written and oral communication skills
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line: www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
138,Data Scientist,-1,"At Acxiom, our vision is to transform data into value for everyone. Our data products and analytical services enable marketers to recognize, better understand, and then deliver highly applicable messages to consumers across any available channel. The Audience Solutions division is responsible for enabling true people-based marketing with identity resolution and rich descriptive and predictive audience segmentation. We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a versatile skill set to undertake data science supporting the development of next-generation products for Acxiom’s business. As part of the Audience Solutions Analytic COE, the Data Scientist will work hands-on with Machine Learning and Big Data technologies and build scalable machine learning data products and solutions for our domestic and global businesses. The Data Scientist’s responsibilities include collaborating with internal and external stakeholders to identify insight requirements and applying creativity to test hypotheses, prepare data, build models, analyze and visualize results and integrate the solution into innovative data products. The Data Scientist will be a champion of the latest and greatest Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence technologies.

This role can be homebased in the US>

At Acxiom, our vision is to transform data into value for everyone. Our data products and analytical services enable marketers to recognize, better understand, and then deliver highly applicable messages to consumers across any available channel. The Audience Solutions division is responsible for enabling true people-based marketing with identity resolution and rich descriptive and predictive audience segmentation. We are seeking an experienced Data Scientist with a versatile skill set to undertake data science supporting the development of next-generation products for Acxiom’s business.

As part of the Audience Solutions Analytic COE, the Data Scientist will work hands-on with Machine Learning and Big Data technologies and build scalable machine learning data products and solutions for our domestic and global businesses. The Data Scientist’s responsibilities include collaborating with internal and external stakeholders to identify insight requirements and applying creativity to test hypotheses, prepare data, build models, analyze and visualize results and integrate the solution into innovative data products. The Data Scientist will be a champion of the latest and greatest Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence technologies.

What You Will Do:
Apply state-of-the-art algorithms relying on knowledge of statistical modeling, machine learning, and optimization to develop new data products or improve the performance/quality of existing products
Build, evaluate and optimize models which incorporate machine learning and artificial intelligence
Collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to understand business and insight goals, define a learning agenda, and identify relevant KPIs and diagnostics to pursue
Collaborate with other data scientists and team leads to define project requirements including data sources, algorithms, and implementation
Build expert knowledge of the various data sources brought together for audience segmentation solutions – survey/panel data, 3rd-party data (demographics, psychographics, lifestyle segments), media content activity (TV, Digital, Mobile), and product purchase or transaction data
Work with Product and Engineering teams to transition development projects to production systems
Prepare and present compelling analytical presentations and effectively communicate complex concepts to marketing and business audiences
Provide mentorship and guidance to data scientists where necessary
What You Will Need:
Experience with applying statistics and data science tools on large datasets
Deep knowledge of supervised vs. unsupervised learning algorithms, including neural networks/deep learning, SVM, decision trees (bagging, random forests, boosting), clustering, regression, and dimensionality reduction techniques
Expert at model training approaches, hyperparameter tuning, tuning learning rates, and model evaluation approaches
Extensive experience with data preparation (normalization, scaling, etc.) for modeling
Exposure to Python or R libraries for machine learning
Exposure to Spark/ PySpark systems in a distributed computing environment
SQL mastery, including techniques for writing efficient code over large datasets
Experience using Hadoop stack, including Hive and Impala. Knowledge of Apache-based open source technologies such as Storm, Cassandra, Ruby, etc. a plus
Ability to leverage critical data-driven thinking and enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight to generate consistently accurate and useful analysis and models
Balances desire for quantitative rigor with realities of inconsistent business data
Attention to detail and time management delivering high-quality work for multiple projects across several engagements while meeting deadlines
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field (Data Science, Statistics, Math) or related degree programs and 8+ years of relevant work experience OR Master's Degree in a quantitative field and 6+ years of relevant work experience
#GD17


Primary Location City/State:

Homebased - Conway, Arkansas

Additional Locations (if applicable):

Acxiom is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE/W/M/Vet/Disabled) and does not discriminate in recruiting, hiring, training, promotion or other employment of associates or the awarding of subcontracts because of a person's race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, protected veteran, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics or other protected status.",3.9,"Acxiom
3.9",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
139,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
140,Data Engineer III,$57k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUTGROWN YOUR OWN BACKYARD? COME PLAY IN OURS.

At Columbia, were as passionate about the outdoors as you are. And while our gear is available worldwide, were proud to be based in the Pacific Northwest, where natural wonders are our playground.

Every product we make and every task we undertake is inspired by the famous words of our founder Gert Boyle: Its perfect. Now make it better. As pioneers of relentless improvement, we are constantly evolving.

We believe the outdoors is ours to protect and strive to keep our planet healthy.

We believe in empowering people to experience the outdoors to the fullest.

And we believe in you.

ABOUT THE POSITION

Although we're an apparel and footwear focused company, technology is central to everything we do. Columbia Sportswears Global Information Services (GIS) teams enable an IT infrastructure across four global brands, a global supply chain, and 500+ geographically dispersed stores. These teams support in-store, mobile, and data platforms to enhance customer interface and service in an ever-evolving industry.

The Data Engineer is a member of the Enterprise Information Management team and is responsible for the design, development, testing, maintenance, and support of Columbias enterprise data assets. The Data Engineer will provide technical design, development and analytical support for Columbia Enterprise initiatives.

HOW YOULL MAKE A DIFFERENCE
Lead activities that include: data modeling (relational and dimensional), data lake & data warehouse development, data integration / ETL process development, and support.
Continuously deliver and improve prioritized enterprise data assets that enable the growth of Columbias global analytics, reporting and visualization solutions.
Coordinate frequently with several enterprise support organizations and Columbia end users.
Manage scheduling, support, tools and maintenance of integration processes.
Identify project risks and impediments, notify management, and proactively work with other members of the team to complete assigned tasks as defined by project scope, timelines, and budgets.
Identify data quality issues and support Columbias data governance initiative by participating in necessary activities including data profiling.
Participate in the use of Agile practices to elicit and refine requirements through an iterative process of planning, defining acceptance criteria, prioritizing, developing and delivering enterprise data asset solutions.
YOU ARE
An expert in data design & development and have a deep understanding of complex organizational analytical and data needs that enable improvements in environment design, efficiency, controls and the overall user experience of enterprise data assets
A strong communicator that has an ability to work with all levels of the organization to advance Columbias vision for information management and analytics
Highly conversant in the culture and changing landscape of information technology
Curious and creative, always looking to deliver a superior product while working closely with a small scrum team
YOU HAVE
A Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or a related field or a combination of education and experience
3+ years of hands-on experience architecting, developing and/or managing the implementation of Business Intelligence solutions and 2+ years professional experience with one or more ETL tools such as Informatica, SQL Server Integration Services, Business Objects Data Services, or Spark
Experience in SQL and query optimization for data platforms such as Azure SQL DW, HDInsight, Teradata, SAP HANA, Oracle, or equivalent required. Experience with Microsoft Azure BI Stack: Azure Data factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse is a bonus
Proficient in relational database concepts, including normalization, indexing, physical and logical modeling, creation of SQL queries and performance tuning.
Familiar with the Kimball and/or Inmon methods of data warehousing techniques, standards and best practices. Experience with management of a star schema implementation and related concepts such as slowly changing and late arriving dimensions
Familiar with Data Lake and Spark concepts and have some hands-on experience working with Spark DataFrames, pySpark preferred. Experience with large scale data processing, data structure optimization and scalability of algorithms a plus
#LI-JD1

Columbia Sportswear Company and our portfolio of brands, including Columbia, SOREL, Mountain Hardwear and prAna, know a thing or two about adventures. After all, we've been on one since 1938, working to perfect the art of enjoying the outdoors. Behind everything we make is an employee who's found that the greatest adventure starts with joining a company that strives to do the right thing.

This job description is not meant to be an all-inclusive list of duties and responsibilities, but constitutes a general definition of the position's scope and function in the company.

At Columbia Sportswear Company (CSC), we are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants and teammates without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy (including childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military and veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by applicable law. CSC believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",3.7,"Columbia Sportswear
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1938,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
141,Data Governance Data Analyst,$33k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

This position is expected to extract, analyze, review validate and report on the quality and use of system data. Responsibilities include creating a data base for service and aftermarket parts, correlating service parts to finished goods, and owner of the customer item master data. The role will have multiple projects in order to create reporting that support improved data quality that can be leveraged across the business to gain operational efficiency. This is a highly cross- function role as it will leverage both current data sets as well as create new processes with engineering, product management, supply chain, sales, and customer service.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Work with Engineering and customer service to create a service parts data base
Create reporting to efficiently show business partners correlation between service parts and finished good units
Create Service Item hierarchy and maintain data integrity
Work with Engineering to ensure data is accurate and aligns with technical requirements
Partner with supply planning and demand planning to review related items and create item relationships in Oracle
Cleanse current data set and define process for future maintenance
Work with other companies under the TTI umbrella to streamline service part and aftermarket documentation and data relationships
Analyze service data and develop future improvements for both internal and external customers
Partner with IT to create easily accessed reporting for the entire organization
Register new hazardous products with WERKSmart and transportation companies
Collect, interpret, analyze and customer master data to ensure accuracy
Consistently review and bring up to date customer hierarchy reporting
Proactively improve and streamline customer item master data
Identify solutions and opportunities to leverage data to grow the business
Ensures quality of data, across all systems, as well as development and documentation of processes
Assist in writing documentation as needed for training, policies, standards, controls and procedures and train accordingly
Ensure all UL and AGHS documents are current and up to date
Work with business partners to create cross-functional process and rules regarding data integrity
Bachelor's Degree in Business, MIS or equivalent is preferred
1+ years of hands-on functional experience with data management and modeling with integrated business and technology systems.
Ability to interact with and influence business leaders in creating master data management definitions, processes and standards.
Strong experience in the design and documentation of data models, dictionaries and processes.
Ability to translate between business data usage to master data management concepts through to technical implementation of the data, i.e. in Oracle EBS.
Travel Requirements:

Minimal travel required.

#LI-SM1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.3,"TTI Floor Care North America Inc.
3.3","Charlotte, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
142,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Responsibilities *
Develop features and models to improve the capabilities of systems that use machine learning.
Scale up models, build training datasets and tune parameters to improve system performance.
Build software that improves your rate of experimentation and helps you make better decisions about what to try next.
Build analysis tools and simulations to understand the performance of complex systems. - Conduct original research to solve hard problems applying machine learning in new areas - Work with the team to deploy models for a mission critical application.
Come up with Machine Learning roadmap and be responsible for its execution.
Improve current models
Integrate Machine Learning projects with Knightscope Security Operations Center (KSOC).
Provide technical guidance in Machine Learning experiments and projects.
Take end-to-end ownership of Machine Learning systems.
Identify new opportunities to apply Machine Learning to different parts of the Knightscope offering.
Stay up-to-date with new technology innovation. Introduce what would be beneficial for the Company to continue to be the market leader in security.
Qualifications *
PhD/MS/BS in Computer Science.
5+ years professional work experience with Machine Learning.
Deep understanding of the mathematical foundations of Machine Learning algorithms.
Demonstrated expertise of working hands-on in analyzing and modeling large data sets.
Ability to quickly prototype new ideas and use creative approaches to solve complex problems
Experience with cloud (Amazon AWS, MS Azure, etc.) as well as embedded environments (NVIDIA Jetson, Raspberry Pi, etc.).
Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, Caffe, etc.
Experience with Machine learning libraries such as scikit-learn, numpy, scipy, pandas, PIL, OpenCL.
Python experience.
Ability to collaborate closely with cross functional teams
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Self-motivated and self-starter
Bonus Points*
Experience in a startup environment
Location*
Remote Work-from-Home (in the U.S.) Flexibility Available
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Machine Learning: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you require visa sponsorship to work in the U.S.?
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Knightscope, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
143,Quantitative Analyst,$99k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quantitative Analyst

Are you ready to explore a world of possibilities?

Join our DTCC family, and you’ll grow your expertise and become the best version of you. As you embark on a new journey, you’ll tackle challenges with flexibility and grace, learning new skills and advancing your career while having the time of your life.

Why You’ll Love This Job:

Being a member of our Risk Management team, you’ll work to protect the safety and soundness of our systems and are responsible for identifying, managing, measuring and mitigating a spectrum of key risk types including credit, market, liquidity, systemic, operational and technology in all existing and new products, activities, processes and systems.

Responsibilities:

The candidate is primarily responsible for designing, developing, testing, and maintaining stress test models or tools and performing Stress Test related analyses and reporting.
Design and implement stress testing scenarios
Perform analytical analysis such as attribution analysis to explain stress testing risk metrics results
Conduct quality assurances and controls on data
Maintain stress testing related functions in QRM's Production System, including setting up scheduled jobs to perform stress testing calcuations
Aligns risk and control processes into day to day responsibilities to monitor and mitigate risk; escalates appropriately
**NOTE: Responsibilities of this role are not limited to the details above. **

Talents needed for success:
1+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferable in credit risk or market risk modeling
Minimum 6 years of related work experience
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written.
Must have excellent interpersonal skills
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Have a general knowledge about the financial market, products, risk management (such as VaR modeling) and risk metrics (such as back testing).
Solid programming skills in data processing language such as SQL, Python. R, Matlab are pluses.
Must have a Ph. D or a Master’s degree in a quantitative field, preferably in applied economics, econometries, statistics or financial engineering.",3.9,"DTCC
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
144,Data Analyst I - Data Science Team,$78k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Wednesday, October 14, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

JOB DECRIPTION/ DUTIES

Data Analysts I in the Data Science Program work on projects to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. Data Analyst I learn CNA's unique approach to analytics that combines an understanding of the technical capabilities with insights acquired from up close and current experience with real-world military operations.
1. Leverage R and/or Python to develop machine learning models for, e.g., regression, classification, natural language processing, and/or image recognition.

2. Develop an understanding of Navy and Marine Corps operations, maintenance, supply, training, and personnel datasets.

3. Extract, transform, load (ETL) data from various data sources in order to initiate analysis.

4. Conduct data preparation including cleaning, wrangling, joining, and converting data in order to provide a useable analytic dataset.

5. Conduct Exploratory Data Analysis (EDA) to include the use of data visualizations (e.g. Dash, MATPLOTLIB, R Shiny, ggplot2, Power BI, etc.), correlations, empirical/theoretical distributions of data, and summary statistics.

6. Apply statistical methods including descriptive and inferential techniques using parametric and nonparametric statistics.

7. Communicate analysis and results clearly, concisely and precisely.

8. Support projects by analyzing complex datasets and using effective visualizations of data in their results.

9. Serve as an effective team member by fulfilling assignments in a timely and efficient manner. Works cooperatively and accepts guidance and direction from others. Exhibits a positive attitude, and takes responsibility for own actions and outcomes.

10. Interact with functional peers within the organization, as well as sponsors / clients/ vendors; sometimes with guidance from others. Interaction normally involves exchange or presentation of factual, but somewhat varied and complex information.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

1. Education: Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Programming, Statistic or related field or equivalent experience required.

2. Experience: Relevant experience demonstrated from course work and/or relevant work history including internships.

3. Skills: Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to apply machine learning techniques, building models (statistical, mathematical, simulation, etc.) in programming languages such as R or Python. Ability to analyze complex datasets using effective visualizations of data in achieved results; skilled in programming, statistics, machine learning, and data visualization. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices.

4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Technical
Job Function
Career Path I - Research
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
145,Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consultants,$33k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Language Assessment Division of the Center for Applied Linguistics has occasional need for qualified consultants to work with the Psychometrics and Quantatitive Research team. We accept CVs from professionals with Master’s degrees in statistics or other fields with strong quantitative content, or with PhDs in educational measurement. We also accept CVs from PhD candidates.

Consultants may be tasked with completing analyses, replicating analyses for quality control purposes, or supporting the production of technical reports.

Essential skills include experience producing analyses in a professional setting using SPSS and R. Desired skills also include experience with Rasch analysis and DIF analysis. Experience with language assessment is also a plus.

Application Process
Email a CV and cover letter indicating your experience with the skills listed above to jobs@cal.org, with the subject line: Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consulting.
CAL will add your information to our files and contact you as consulting opportunities arise that meet your qualifications.

For any additional questions or comments, please contact us at jobs@cal.org.",2.8,"Center for Applied Linguistics
2.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
146,"Data Scientist, Product Development",$55k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

We are looking for a Data Scientist, Product Development to join us in Pasadena, CA, and help us turn our vast repository of data into usable information leveraging solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Spokeo product suite. This is part of Spokeo's Data Operations Team and is not an analytics-based role.

Responsibilities:
Profiling, processing, and evaluating large structured and unstructured data sets.
Developing data-driven models.
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods.
Collaborating with product and engineering to understand the needs of the company and assisting with the development of innovative solutions to meet those needs.
Productionalizing and maintaining algorithms primarily focused on entity resolution, linking, and scoring.
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and quality assurance metrics to constantly track performance.
Keeping up to date with the latest technology trends.
Performing Ad-hoc analysis and presenting results.
Requirements:
Degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields.
Minimum of 3 years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling.
Proficiency in working with statistical tools (such as R, SAS), database query languages (SQL), and scripting languages (Python required).
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as MapReduce, Spark, Hive, ElasticSearch, and DynamoDB.
Comfortable training and communicating complex ideas to non-technical audiences.
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish.
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.7,"Spokeo
3.7","Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
147,Data Engineer,$48k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Olive is healthcare's A.I. workforce and has been successfully deployed at health systems across the country. Olive automates work to allow healthcare professionals to concentrate on what's most important, their patients. Olive's promise to her customers is that she figures out where she can have an impact, onboards quickly, shows up for work everyday, does her job extremely well, and gets smarter over time.

Olive is made possible by a technology platform which allows her to understand the data emanating from the work that she does and to use that data to get smarter over time. Data Engineers work with the Olive Product Management team to deliver features that allow Olive to store and process large amounts of data. They also work on developing new tools that allow our Omega teams gain insight into the work Olive is doing and deliver ever increasing value back to our customers. Our team gives Data Engineers the ability to own independent small-to-medium features all the way from technical design to launch. A successful Data Engineer will possess strong analytical as well as technical skills, and have the ability to communicate the logic behind technical decisions to non-technical stakeholders

Responsibilities:

Collaborate with Engineers and Product Managers to design and implement features
Ability to meet deadlines and satisfy requirements from other Engineers and Product Management
Peer review and code review participation to provide valuable feedback during every step of the development process
Quickly produce well-organized, optimized, and documented code
Communicate effectively and efficiently across all divisions including with the business, technical teams, and leaders
Take technical ownership of tasks and successfully work independently
Demonstrate the ability to become a domain expert in projects

Bachelor's in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or relevant equivalent experience
4+ years of relevant programming experience
Hands-on experience working data pipelines and data architecture
AWS experience preferred (S3, Glue, RDS, EMR, Athena/Presto DB, IAM)
History of designing and delivering software solutions to real world problems across a variety of technology stacks and programming languages with deep experience in several modern programming languages (e.g. JavaScript, Python, Go, JVM based languages)
Experienced in the development of highly maintainable and reliable code using practices such as unit testing, integration testing, proper code documentation, and appropriate logging
Strong communication, critical thinking, and problem solving skills
Demonstrated understanding of fundamentals engineering concepts
Knowledge of software and application design and architecture
Experience writing and reviewing detailed Technical Design Documents (TDDs) is a plus

PI125021823",3.9,"Olive
3.9","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Data Analyst,$47k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Analyst to join our team based in Falls Church

Requirements:
Must have good interpersonal and communication skills both verbal and written.
Must have strong time management and organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to multitask.
Must have a good understanding of data structure and management.
Must be organized, self-motivated, and self-directed.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Desired Skills:
A fair understanding of SQL, Python and R is a plus.
Experience in developing Pivot Tables/Charts as well as complicated formula is desirable.
BI Dashboards
QLIK OR Tableau
Excel:
V lookup
Data Validation
Data Clean up
Education:
Must have a bachelors degree (in a similar discipline preferred) in any related field.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go tohttps://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
149,Data Science Manager,$96k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytical. Data Driven. Excellent Communicator. Strong Business Partner.

Does this sound like you? If so– look no further! Our Analytics team is looking to expand and complement their team with a new Data Science Manager.

As ourData Science Manager, you are responsible for developing predictive models to assist our Underwriting and Claims teams. You will collaborate closely with internal and external peers, pro-actively collect and address feedback from business units, and create actionable models which enable better business decisions.

At Constellation, we’re doing things differently. Our organization empowers you and believes that together, we can make a difference.

So, join us! We invite you to join a company where you can stretch your abilities and rocket your career to the stars!

You will be responsible for:
Participating in the design and delivery of accurate and robust predictive models
Collaborating with Subject Matter Experts to and design analytic solutions which enable better decision making
Clearly communicating findings, collecting feedback, addressing questions and concerns, with the ability to clearly translate technical concepts to non-technical audience
Managing large, long term project timelines with cross functional dependencies and transparently communicating progress on these timelines, obstacles, and solutions to any gaps
Working with a team of data scientists to build out actionable statistical models (GLMs / ML / AI) within R / Python
Mentoring other data scientists on model development, best practices, technical coding, Analytics Environment
Assisting in expansion and development of analytics department, finding internal and external vendor partners to support long-term business objectives
Determining requirements for Analytics platform. Collaborating with IT to deliver and maintain environment
You will have:
3+ years working with R or Python
3+ years leading analytics projects
Demonstrated strong verbal and written communication skills
Bachelor’s Degree with 7 years’ experience or Masters / PhD with 5 years’ experience",4.5,"Constellation (MN)
4.5","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"*Title: Machine Learning Engineer*
*Location: Remote*
*Part Time (10-20 hrs./week. Work hours are flexible)*

*Minimum Qualifications: *

* Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related discipline.
* Mid/Senior level accepted
* Machine learning engineers who have the experience in voice recognition, language translation, computer vision and face recognition (OR)
* Mobile Developer with language and navigation experience (OR)
* Developer with facial/object recognition experience

Job Types: Part-time, Contract

Experience:
* Machine learning: 4 years (Required)

Education:
* Bachelor's (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Work Remotely:
* Yes",3.7,"GBTI Solutions, Inc.
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
151,Project Coordinator - Data Analyst,$35k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Project Coordinator - Data Analyst
Location


Hauppauge, NY

Company Order Number

2123

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Custom Computer Specialists, Inc. is one of the largest Technical Consultants on Long Island, celebrating over 40 years in business! We continue to successfully provide network integration, support services, products solutions, and applications services to our valued clients in the northeast. Our focus is simple...our goal is to make technology easy and to help our clients use it as effectively as possible.

Position Title: Project Coordinator

Division: MSP

Reports to: James Szwed, Manager

OVERVIEW

This individual will provide project support and coordination for our healthcare sector. We are looking for a person who wants to challenge him/herself that will take ownership and assist with daily project production. Requirements include having technical and analytical capabilities, knowledge of office suite, an understanding of technical concepts, ability to plan and manage multiple tasks, outstanding written and verbal communication skills.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Responsibilities of this position include:
Creating and closing request tickets for each device
Communicating with teams to ensure timely completion of tasks
Responsible for managing inbound support tickets
Updating assets in the database with corresponding tickets
Assisting other coordinators with scheduling work to technicians
Updating assignment of new assets with client’s ITAM system
Providing operational support of physical inventory in Custom’s warehouse for old and new assets
Covering for other team members when on leave
QUALIFICATIONS

The right candidate will have:
Minimum of 6 months’ experience working as an administrative assistant or project coordinator
Capable of working with Microsoft word, excel, and power point
Professional verbal communication, customer service, organizational skills and professional manner required
Candidates must be customer oriented, self-motivated, ambitious and dedicated team players
Custom Computer Specialists Offers:


Competitive salaries
Comprehensive benefits including:
Medical and dental plans
Company Paid Vision and Short and long term disability plans
Flexible spending programs including Healthcare, Dependent Care, Transit and Parking
401K with employer match
Tuition reimbursement
Onsite Fitness Center (or gym membership reimbursement for client or satellite based employees)
Company paid life Insurance
Paid holidays and vacation
Technical certification gift card rewards program
Come experience our unique culture and see how our “right people, right results” philosophy has led to our outstanding success! We are great place to start your IT career!

EEO Statement:


Custom Computer Specialists is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other protected characteristic.",2.5,"Custom Computer Specialists
2.5","Hauppauge, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
152,"Senior Data Analyst, Marketing",$54k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why We Need You

As part of the PEMCO Brand & Communications team, the Senior Data Analyst plays a critical role in making our marketing and communications efforts intelligent, efficient, and competitive. We’re looking for someone who can work with every member of the marketing organization to understand our data and turn raw numbers and research findings into compelling narratives and strategic recommendations.

In this role, you’ll collaborate cross-functionally to identify prospects and customers for targeted campaigns. You’ll conduct competitive research to identify gaps and opportunities in customer experiences, product mix, marketing strategies, and more. And you’ll create and review reports to identify strategic opportunities, monitor our sales funnel and forecast its performance, and own team reports including our comprehensive dashboard.

What You'll Be Doing
Work directly with users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Develop, implement, and maintain analytic systems
Develop source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Define and implement data acquisition and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Demonstrate behaviors consistent with PEMCO's policies, values, code of ethics, and business conduct
Authentically support the PEMCO Brand and constantly are on the lookout for top talent to join us to achieve our Mission to Worry Less and Live More
Other duties as assigned
What You'll Bring
B.A. or B.S. degree or equivalent work experience (Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or Statistics) is required
6 years of experience in a data analyst role is required
One (1+) years of experience in working with automated testing tools (Quick Test Professional / Selenium)
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Access is required
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in MS Visio is required
Excellent written communications skills sufficient to write systems documentation, reports, and business correspondences in an organized and concise fashion is required
Ability to verbally present complex concepts and technical information to a non-technical audience is required
Communicates clearly and informatively, verbally and in writing, with colleagues, customers, and the community in both technical and non-technical professional language is required
Passionate about working with disparate datasets bringing data together to answer business questions
Collaborates to create, manage, and translate data to meaningful insights. Can work with external vendors to integrate data for analysis; knows how to build efficient and scalable infrastructure and data models
Ability to analyze, diagnose and resolve complex unstructured problems quickly, efficiently, and collaboratively
We've Got You Covered
Competitive salary
200% match on your 401(k) up to 6% of your pay
Generous medical, dental, disability and life insurance plans
A friendly, professional work environment
The opportunity to work at a place of integrity, where customer service is emphasized
At PEMCO, we celebrate and support our differences. We know employing a team rich in diverse thoughts, experiences, and opinions allows our employees, our products and our community to flourish. PEMCO is honored to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation or Veteran status.",4.3,"PEMCO Insurance
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
153,Data Scientist,$65k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Embark on a career putting innovative, reliable, and agile products and ideas into orbit, and beyond. Northrop Grumman has opportunities waiting for you that play a vital role in human space exploration, national defense, and scientific discovery, supporting multiple programs across the universe. With us, you'll discover a culture of curiosity and collaboration that will have you Defining Possible from the day you start. Our space systems connect and protect millions of people on earth every day, now and for the future. Explore your future and launch your career today.

Northrop Grumman Space Systems is seeking a Data Scientist This position will be located at Hill AFB, UT and will support the Ground Subsystems Support Contract (GSSC) program.

The successful applicant will:
Develop and implement artificial intelligence and machine learning models to solve complex data problems
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools
Merge and transform big datasets to ensure data integrity and usability
Develop a process to maintain quality and performance of statistical models and quickly identify enhancements opportunities
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency
Maintain an up-to-date knowledge of technology trends
Properly document code, artifact description, implementation, and use cases
Be an eager and fast learner
Work on a fast pasted collaborative team in an agile environment
As a full-time employee of Northrop Grumman Space Systems, you are eligible for our robust benefits package including:
Medical, Dental & Vision coverage
401k
Educational Assistance
Life Insurance
Employee Assistance Programs & Work/Life Solutions
Paid Time Off
Health & Wellness Resources
Employee Discounts
This position's standard work schedule is a 9/80. The 9/80 schedule allows employees who work a nine-hour day Monday through Thursday to take every other Friday off.

UTSpace

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of a Bachelor of Science in Data Science, Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, or related quantitative field
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience with a bachelor's degree; or 0 years with a Master's
Demonstrated experience with Programming in Python, R, or Node.js
Demonstrated experience manipulating dataframes through SQL, pandas, or tidyverse
U.S. Citizenship and the ability to obtain a Secret Security Clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Active Secret Security Clearance or higher
Familiarity with any of the following: Tensorflow, Theano, Keras, PyTorch, NLTK, PyStan, PyMC3, Rstan, ElasticSearch, PyCuda
Familiarity with Graph, NoSQL, Hadoop, SMACK, or Neo4J/OWL
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Hill AFB, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
154,20-0031 RD Associate Scientist 1,$37k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Streck is seeking to grow their research and development team by recruiting an innovative and results-driven scientist to join the team. This scientist will be responsible for the initiation, design, development, execution, and implementation of scientific research projects. The person selected for this position will be a member of the growing and dynamic Molecular group within Streck’s R&D team. As a member of this group, the person key contributor in both proposing and investigating new and innovative product opportunities for clinical diagnostics and/or related markets.

Theprimary responsibilitiesinclude:
Design and execute research and development experiments for the investigation of new and innovative products for clinical and/or related markets
Conduct research according to applicable regulatory guidelines - including FDA design control requirements
Support process/product validation, process/product improvement initiatives, and investigational studies
Collect, record, analyze, and interpret experimental data and report results
Carry out a diverse range of tests utilizing chemical and molecular biological analysis techniques
Requirements include:
B.S. in microbiology, molecular biology, biochemistry, or related biomedical discipline. M.S. is a plus
Experience developing molecular diagnostics tests and/or instrumentation in a clinical and/or industry setting
Certified molecular or microbiology technologist by the American Society of Clinical Pathologists MB(ASCP), M(ASCP), or equivalent is a plus
Experience with microbiology-based applications, including molecular and phenotypic tests is a plus
Hands-on experience with routine molecular tests, including DNA/RNA extraction, PCR, Sanger and next-generation sequencing
Works well in a collaborative and team-oriented environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Visitwww.streckcareers.com to learn more about Streck and apply for this opportunity.

Streck develops and delivers quality control and diagnostic products that touch millions of lives and help validate the reputations of laboratories, hospitals and clinicians all over the world.
For all of us at Streck, our job is not simply about scientific accuracy. It is just as much about responsiveness, commitment and responsibility.
The result is something science alone cannot create: Trust.

Streck is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and forbids discrimination against any employee or applicant because of race, color, religion, gender (including pregnancy, gender stereotyping and caregiver status), sexual orientation, gender identity, transgender status, national origin, disability, genetic information, citizenship, marital status or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.6,"Streck
3.6","La Vista, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1971,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
155,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
156,Senior Data Analytics Lead,$57k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"About CXD Analytics

We are a dynamic team and this is not a “Business as Usual” type of analytics role. Everything we do is to evolve and enhance our client’s digital experiences. In this capacity you will play a key role and lead analytics and insights engagements which support business efforts that deepen the understanding of Vanguard investors in our Client Experience - Digital (CXD) department.

Our Group: The CXD team at Vanguard has recently been established to improve Vanguard client’s end-to-end experiences when performing specific tasks, such as opening an account or placing a brokerage trade. Our goal is to transform the way our clients experience Vanguard using data, analytics and insights that support strategic decision-making and drive digital solutions.

How We Work: CXD hosts a team of highly talented, cross-disciplinary individuals including advanced data analysts, UX strategists and designers, front-end developers, data scientists, data engineers, scrum masters, and market researchers who work together in highly collaborative agile “labs”. We follow the “Stacked Agile” model made famous by Spotify. Each lab is fully dedicated to one part of a specific client journey and each analyst is fully dedicated to their lab.

Core Responsibilities
Engages with internal partners to understand business strategy, questions and goals. Brings structure to business requests, translates requirements into an analytical project approach, and leads projects through completion. Delegates tasks and provides tactical and strategic guidance to peers.
Be a thought leader for the Mobile analytics at Vanguard and be the catalyst for change
Lead tag-based data collection, build client-side integrations, and implement third party acquisition tracking into the mobile app's tag management system
Acquires and compiles structured and unstructured data and verifies its quality, accuracy and reasonableness.
Understand and collaborate on end-to-end user experience of online channels (web, mobile web, native app and kiosk UI)
Drive implementation of mobile strategies and user adoption of Vanguards evolving and cutting edge mobile app
Explain higher level statistical methods, test results and experimental design to a diverse audience with varying degrees of analytical capabilities
Drive and execute optimization strategies, work with marketing, product, design and engineering
Work with UX design to understand impact of page flow changes and calculate ROI’s
Develop personalization and segmentation strategies to target the right customers with the most relevant offers
Performs analyses of historical data to surface trends and insights using advanced analytical methods
Prepares and delivers visualizations and internal presentations that translate analytic insights into tangible, actionable solutions for business partners to implement.
Mentors, coaches, trains, and develops junior analysts. Proactively expands knowledge of business and analytics and shares with team members. Develops and documents best practices.
Qualifications
Graduate degree in an analytic/quantitative field
A minimum of 5+ years of relevant professional experience in a data analysis role.
Strong experience querying data with SQL and programming with Python or R
Experience with mobile digital analytics and channels preferred
Solid understanding and experience of statistical methods with regards to study design and analysis
Experience leading, designing and implementing marketing or digital experimentation (A/B or MVT) to improve marketing performance or improve the client experience
Understanding and working knowledge of quasi-experimental study design
Leverage NLP and text mining packages to better understand client feedback
About Vanguard

We are Vanguard. Together, we’re changing the way the world invests.

For us, investing doesn’t just end in value. It starts with values. Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return. We invest with purpose – and that’s how we’ve become a global market leader. Here, we grow by doing the right thing for the people we serve. And so can you.

We want to make success accessible to everyone. This is our opportunity. Let’s make it count.

Inclusion Statement

Vanguard’s continued commitment to diversity and inclusion is firmly rooted in our culture. Every decision we make to best serve our clients, crew (internally employees are referred to as crew), and communities is guided by one simple statement: “Do the right thing.”

We believe that a critical aspect of doing the right thing requires building diverse, inclusive, and highly effective teams of individuals who are as unique as the clients they serve. We empower our crew to contribute their distinct strengths to achieving Vanguard’s core purpose through our values.

When all crew members feel valued and included, our ability to collaborate and innovate is amplified, and we are united in delivering on Vanguard's core purpose.

Our core purpose: To take a stand for all investors, to treat them fairly, and to give them the best chance for investment success.",3.3,"Vanguard
3.3","Malvern, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,Data Engineer,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to get a foot in the door at an online Advertising and Media company that has seen tremendous growth? Do you want to work in the world of online video; one of the fastest growing advertising formats in the world? Then Playwire is the place for you…

Playwire Media is a full-service digital innovation partner that leverages online advertising and proprietary technologies to build publishing brands in the gaming and entertainment verticals.

To keep pace with our explosive growth, we are currently seeking a data engineer to extend our data collection, warehousing, and analysis capabilities. You’ll use your skills to facilitate objectives ranging from simple data pipelining and summarization for use in internal dashboards, to supporting our prediction initiatives by collecting and transforming data from a variety of sources and then crafting prediction algorithms to run at scale. As such, you’ll need to bring a variety of skills to bear, from pipelining to ETL to algorithmic manipulation of data.
Playwire’s services are responsible for delivering millions of ads daily to sites and apps that depend on our technology and expertise for their ad revenue. Data is central to our latest advances in this regard; if you want to participate in the early expansion of our data-related capabilities, and thrive in a fast-paced, rapid-development environment, then talk to us.
This position requires full-time employment; availability at our main office in Boca Raton, FL is preferred, but remote work is a possibility.

Essential functions:
Architect and maintain data pipelines, data lakes, and databases, both independently and as part of a data engineering team.
Work with the development team to support data-centric applications.
Design and deploy algorithms best suited for Playwire’s optimization and prediction needs.
Integrate data from external sources, gathered both via API and from email-based reports.
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems.
Help maintain data-related code and service quality, organization, and reliability.
Required qualifications:
Experience with Amazon AWS’s data-related services.
Knowledge of common data design patterns.
Experience with data pipelining.
Experience with ETL.
Experience using APIs to access data.
Knowledge of business intelligence tools, and the relationship between data and BI-type instrumentation.
An understanding of source control, particularly git and Github.
Comfort with big data principles and management.
Nice-to-haves:
Experience with digital ad servers, SSPs, or ad exchanges.
Experience with Amazon AWS, particularly RDS and S3.
Proficiency with one or more coding languages; Ruby, Go, and Javascript are all plusses.
Knowledge of machine learning principles and technologies.
Experience with digital advertising units, terminology and standards.
Experience working in a team using Agile development and project management practices.
A basic knowledge of CDNs and the role they fill, including edge computing capabilities.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Company's website:
https://www.playwire.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"Playwire Media
3.3","Boca Raton, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
158,Quality Control Scientist,-1,"Position Summary:

The Quality Control Scientist will provide oversight of contract analytical labs and manufacturers. This includes, review of analytical data from release and stability studies and review of method validation protocols and reports. The candidate should have a strong understanding of cGMPs and relevant ICH and FDA regulatory guidelines. Prior hand-on experience working in a QC lab and thorough understanding of root cause analysis for investigations is required. This position will interact and work closely with cross-functional teams, including, manufacturing, quality assurance and regulatory.

Responsibilities:
Review analytical data packages generated during GMP release/stability testing of drug substance and drug product at the contract manufacturing sites
Assist in investigations and formulate a plan to identify/confirm root cause for anomalous results
Write and/or review method validation and transfer protocols and reports
Write and/or review protocols and reports related to stability studies as well as prepare tables summarizing results from stability studies
Track and trend release and stability data for batch analysis and shelf life establishment
Initiate change control for internal specifications and regulatory documents
Evaluate and perform risk assessment for change control documents provided by the contract manufacturing sites
Manage reference standard program for drug substance, impurities and degradants
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S in analytical chemistry or related scientific disciplines with 5+ years of experience in analytical development with minimum of 3+ years of experience in quality control
Skills, Knowledge & Abilities:
Hands-on proficiency and problem-solving skills with chromatographic techniques e.g. HPLC, UPLC and GC. Familiarity with mass and UV/VIS spectroscopic techniques is an advantage
Prior experience in interacting with contract labs and manufacturing sites is a plus
Hands-on experience with method validations and transfers in support of pharmaceutical manufacturing
Proficiency in performing root cause analysis for investigation
Experience with iStability software is a plus
Passion for learning, creating, relating, communicating, and leading cross functional teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience in a start-up environment preferred
Must be pro-active team player, flexible, and open to change
Working Conditions: Will work from the Company's San Francisco Bay Area office, with additional travel as required to oversee the virtual development and manufacturing network (estimated at 25%).

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

This is largely a sedentary role; however, some filing is required. This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand on a stool as necessary.

This job operates in a professional office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.

Benefits and Perks:

Apellis offers a great benefit package which includes: health insurance with full premium coverage, 401K with company match, paid time off (PTO), long- term disability insurance, life insurance and more! Visit http://apellis.com/careerbenefits.html to learn more.

Company Background:

We are a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of novel therapeutic compounds to treat disease through the inhibition of the complement system, which is an integral component of the immune system, at the level of C3, the central protein in the complement cascade. We believe that this approach can result in broad inhibition of the principal pathways of the complement system and has the potential to effectively control a broad array of complement-dependent autoimmune and inflammatory diseases.

Visit http://apellis.com/about.html to learn more.

EEO Statement:

Apellis is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state and local fair employment practices laws. Apellis strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against employees, applicants or any other covered persons because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex (including pregnancy), gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender or transsexual individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, genetic information, marital status, AIDS/HIV status, smoker/nonsmoker, and occupational pneumocononiosis or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

#LI-BE1",3.5,"Apellis
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
159,Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist,$60k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist
Aurora, CO · Computer/SoftwareApply Now
Are you interested in developing advanced software systems to support national security? At Stratagem, we work with the U.S. Government to solve some of the most challenging problems concerning critical national missions.

Who is Stratagem
Stratagem is a small high-end software technology company that delivers operational solutions and performs advanced R&D for the DoD and Intelligence Community. We are built around the idea that we can make a lasting impact for our customers and employees and believe in a culture of innovation, fun, empowerment, and family. We want you to learn new skills so you can become more fulfilled in both your personal and professional life.

At Stratagem, our goal is to make our company the last company you work for!

Stratagem is hiring passionate, creative, and uniquely talented individuals to join our growing team. We look for candidates with exceptional problem-solving skills, a high level of creativity, and the ability to quickly learn evaluate and deploy new technologies. We also seek out individuals that are clear communicators and support their teammates with a sense of positivity and open-mindedness.

** TS/SCI Clearance with SSBI REQUIRED**
* DOD TOP SECRET or SECRET will be CONSIDERED **
** US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED **

This position, in either Aurora, CO or Valley Forge, PA, is for an early-career Data Scientist or a Python developer interested in transitioning into data science. You will support the development of cutting-edge predictive analytics by creating software tools and curating datasets containing adversarial behaviors (such as vehicle track data).

Responsibilities & Skills

Our ideal candidate is a software engineer or data scientist with experience creating software tools in Python and familiar with Python data science / machine learning libraries (e.g. Pandas, and scikit-learn).

As a Python Developer / Data Scientist, your responsibilities include:
Working with a small team consisting of developers and researchers to implement algorithms for tracking and fusion, and pattern of life software
Identifying statistically relevant features within big datasets to provide analysts with actionable data
Writing, evaluating, and integrating software into the existing architecture
Reviewing relevant publications in order to gain enough of an understanding of the underlying concepts in order to break down key ideas to government customers, and implement in software
Your core skills/experience include:
Experience with Python and any of the following Python data science / machine learning libraries: Pandas, and scikit-learn
Experience applying and/or developing algorithms based in statistical analysis
Experience with big data sets, preferably comprising of sensor data (e.g. GEOINT, and SIGINT)
Effective communicator with the ability to write and present technical reports
Experience writing technical documentation supporting code, program capabilities and user-guides
Experience with Gitlab, Github, Bitbucket, and/or Jenkins
Experience with Linux
2-5 years of experience, preferably in software development or as a data scientist
You are the proud owner of at least a DoD SECRET clearance
Bonus points if you have experience in any of the following:
Experience with implementing tracking and fusion, and pattern-of-life algorithms
Experience in application deployment, virtualization, and containerization
Experience with kinematics
You are the proud owner of a TS/SCI SSBI clearance",4.3,"Stratagem Group
4.3","Aurora, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
160,"Senior Data Scientist, Trello (Remote)",-1,"Atlassian is continuing to hire with all interviewing and on-boarding done virtually due to COVID-19. All new and existing Atlassians will continue to work from home until its safe to return to our offices. When our offices re-open, every Atlassian will have the choice to work from an office or from home.

Millions of people use Trello every day, generating billions of data points. We are looking for a savvy data scientist to examine user behavior and advise decision-making across the organization. Our data team is lean, forward-thinking, and remote-friendly.

As the ideal data scientist, you are someone who can do a deep technical dive and communicate effectively with others. You love wrangling messy data into an elegant solution, and helping others understand the power of their data. This role is a chance to have a huge impact on how millions of users collaborate.
*You will...**
Partner with engineering, product, and leadership teams passionate about strategic improvements to Trello.
Dive deep into a wide range of data (behavioral, financial, etc.) to identify opportunities and recommend solutions.
Contribute to data team initiatives passionate about ensuring fast, reliable, and comprehensive data.
Serve as a trusted consultant and promote data literacy to drive improvements across the company.
Unblock data questions using Redshift, Athena, Databricks, Python, R, Mode Analytics, Tableau.
Do your best work in a lively, respectful, and encouraging environment.
*About you...**
U.S. Bachelor or higher degree, or its equivalent, in Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems Management or a closely related field of study
You have experience analyzing data and experimentation in a business setting. You know how to pick the right approach to a data question. You know that sometimes the simplest solution is the best.
You are adept at prioritizing, and can bring good opinions to the table.
You enjoy collaborating with non-technical consumers of data, and turning loosely-defined questions into clearly prioritized projects.
You are creative and inventive, with a passion for deriving insights from data and telling a story.
Youre curious about the business side of Trello. Youre eager to get to the guts of Trellos data in order to answer questions across the company.
Youre self-motivated and thrive when working autonomously. You know when to run with something, and when to ask for help.
Youre extremely proficient when it comes to writing SQL and Python/R.
You strive to master new technology or language when the need arises.
*Bonus points for **
Prior experience working in a remote-friendly company.
Proven experience working on projects around user acquisition, retention, purchasing drivers.
Referenceable work with some seriously huge datasets.
We encourage all applicants, regardless of race, color, ethnicity, actual or perceived sexual identity, gender identity, gender expression, economic status, ability, disability, religious beliefs or disbeliefs, national origin, age, military service eligibility, veteran status, marital status, parental status, or geographic location.

More about our benefits

Whether you work in an office or a distributed team, Atlassian is highly collaborative and yes, fun! To support you at work (and play) we offer some fantastic perks: ample time off to relax and recharge, flexible working options, five paid volunteer days a year for your favourite cause, an annual allowance to support your learning & growth, unique ShipIt days, a company paid trip after five years and lots more.

More about Atlassian

Creating software that empowers everyone from small startups to the whos who of tech is why were here. We build tools like Jira, Confluence, Bitbucket, and Trello to help teams across the world become more nimble, creative, and alignedcollaboration is the heart of every product we dream of at Atlassian. From Amsterdam and Austin, to Sydney and San Francisco, were looking for people who want to write the future and who believe that we can accomplish so much more together than apart. At Atlassian, were committed to an environment where everyone has the autonomy and freedom to thrive, as well as the support of like-minded colleagues who are motivated by a common goal to: Unleash the potential of every team.

Additional Information

We believe that the unique contributions of all Atlassians is the driver of our success. To make sure that our products and culture continue to incorporate everyone's perspectives and experience we never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Learn more about Atlassians culture, interviewing flow, and hiring process by checking out our Candidate Resource Hub.",4.6,"Atlassian
4.6",North Carolina,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
161,Senior Data Scientist,$145k-$239k (Glassdoor Est.),"COVID-19 UPDATE: The NYC office will remain closed until we feel it is safe to return. All interviews will be virtual until further notice.

Small Teams; Big Data

At Tapad, we look for individuals who are motivated by complex and challenging work. We want to work with people who share compelling solutions to those challenges, solutions informed by their unique experiences, passions, and expertise.

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist with profound experience in advertising and marketing technology to research and develop state-of-the-art algorithms and build models to support Tapad's mission to create the world's largest identity graph. As part of Tapad's Data Science team, you will leverage cutting edge technologies and techniques to impact our core intellectual property and commercial products. This includes, but is not limited to, machine learning, deep learning, NLP, Google Cloud AI Platform, BigQuery, TensorFlow Extended, and Kubeflow Pipelines.

Tapad Data Scientists are responsible for turning new ideas into innovative products. With your deep industry experience, you will lead critical work programs, actualizing your research and solutions into concrete commercial products and services. In addition to collaborating with Tapad's technologists, you will work closely with product managers and business stakeholders to understand our customers' needs, the broader addressable market and participate in identifying new opportunities.

When you work with us, you matter. We ask our employees to make an impact and feel it is only right to give a lot in return. We offer every employee a 401k with matching, generous parental leave, and unlimited PTO (and we mean it!). We believe if you're sick, feel like you're getting sick, or just need a personal day, you should take that time to get better. We have free virtual lunches every month, free continuous education, and an open-door policy every day. We make sure our virtual office is a welcoming space full of individuals who can teach and learn from one another every day.

Technologies we use at Tapad (don't worry, we'll teach you):
Python, SQL, Scala
Spark, SparkML, AutoML, SciKit Learn, BigQuery ML, Airflow, etc.
Google Cloud Platform (GCP), Tensorflow Extended (TFX), BigQuery
We are looking for candidates who meet some of the following qualifications:
Ph.D. in a Quantitative Discipline (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Chemistry, etc.) or 6+ years of equivalent experience
6+ years of experience as a Data Scientist, specifically in applying Machine Learning techniques, advanced analytics, and statistical modeling
1+ years of experience in the advertising technology or marketing technology industry
Proven track record of leading projects from ideation through solution to implementation
Experience working with large data sets using SQL, Spark, Hadoop, or MapReduce Understanding of programming concepts and experience with programming languages, such as Python, R, Java, Scala, MATLAB
Strong communication skills both verbal and written
Experience in working on large-scale, distributed system environment(s)
Bonus Experience:
Experience using cloud computing technologies
A day in the life as a Tapad Senior Data Scientist:
You will use machine learning (e.g., deep learning), clustering, statistical modeling, and other advanced techniques to infer connections from petabytes of data
Employ predictive modeling, data mining, graph algorithms, and other data science techniques to contribute to and enhance our cross-device identity resolution portfolio Design experiments and apply appropriate metrics to measure the impact of the developed modelsLead projects from ideation through research and development to productization
Partner with other data scientists and engineers to turn various machine learning, clustering, and statistical solutions into viable and scalable products
Collaborate with product managers and business partners to understand market needs and identify new opportunities for Tapad
Tapad Perks:
Generous PTO - no accruing necessary
401k matching, Life, LTD & STD Insurance, dental, vision, and telehealth plan with 24/7 access to a dedicated team of physical and mental healthcare providers
Scala School (we'll teach you!), Coursera, LinkedIn learning, peer-lead professional development, and an abundance of resources to help you stay sharp
Unlimited snacks and beverages, collaboration catered lunches (virtual lunches until we're back in the office)
Discounts on gym memberships
Foosball, ping pong, diversity and inclusion group, book club, Tough Mudder, push-up challenges, and tons of other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family (virtual game nights and happy hours until we're back in the office)
Check out our #TapadLife page to see what our employees have to say
Find more about our engineering culture HERE
About Tapad:

Founded in 2010, Tapad cracked the code on cross-device marketing technology. Our groundbreaking, proprietary technology assimilates trillions of data points to find the relationship between smartphones, desktops, laptops, tablets, and connected TVs. Ten years later, we are processing data at petabyte scale, with an engineering team that comprises roughly half of our entire organization. When you work with us, you matter, and your work matters.

We use Scala, in combination with large-scale data processing and open-source technologies, to build our device graph. Across our engineering teams, we also use Scala, GCP, Spark, Kubernetes, Python, TypeScript, Angular, and anything else that helps us get the job done. We're open-minded about new technologies, we're passionate about what we do, and we make time for everyone to learn and grow as the industry changes. Engineers at Tapad are approachable and ambitious people who think outside the box and solve big problems collaboratively. Are you up for the challenge?

Tapad is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants regardless of age, sex, race, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or family status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

Tapad does not accept resumes from unsolicited search firms nor recruiters. In no event shall fees be paid to any unsolicited search firms nor recruiters, regardless of whether the candidate is made an offer or accepts a placement at Tapad. All resumes received through any channels will be considered the sole property of Tapad.",4.2,"Tapad
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
162,"PhD Scientist, DMPK",$34k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
The Scientist, DMPK is responsible for planning and performing scientific experiments that contribute to PTCs research and drug discovery activities. The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments, and external resources as appropriate, as part of PTCs discovery science project teams.

The Scientist, DMPK supports adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate.
Job Description:


Primary duties/responsibilities:
With guidance from the advisor plans, initiates, directs and executes scientific research and experiments and interprets and communicates results as part of multi-disciplinary team(s). This includes performing analyses of primary research literature.
Work with research teams in planning, scheduling and conducting DMPK studies per the development candidate nomination and IND/NDA timeline requirement.
Identify and qualify the CROs if the external resources are needed. Work with Study Directors at CROs in study design, execution and report finalization.
Conduct in vitro and in vivo DMPK studies, such as metabolic stability and metabolite profiling, CYP inhibition and induction studies, pharmacokinetic studies in lab animals and ADME studies using radiolabeled materials.
Serve as DMPK representative to interact with other project teams. Collaborate with medicinal chemists to design drug candidates avoiding metabolic liabilities and work with cross-functional teams to evaluate and select drug candidates based on potency in the biological target and on DMPK properties and drug-drug interaction liability.
Work with clinical, CMC and other teams in support of human AME studies.
Presents findings internally and externally to cross-functional teams.
May Participate in the development and writing of patent applications
Abides by all safety and regulatory guidelines.
Maintains a detailed laboratory notebook.
Performs other tasks as assigned.
Interviews and contributes to the evaluation of candidates.
May provide scientific advice to research leadership on projects and areas of expertise.
Abides by all safety requirements.
Contributes to general lab needs such as:
Equipment maintenance.
Capital equipment purchases.
Troubleshoot
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS/ABILITIES REQUIRED
Extensive knowledge of drug metabolism and biotransformation, pharmacokinetics, pharmacodynamic and bioanalytical principles.
Competent in the study design, execution, critical data analysis and interpretation of study results.
Proficiency and hands-on experience in conducting DMPK studies.
Hands-on experience with operating and maintaining mass spectrometers for the purposes of structure elucidation of metabolites /degradation products in complex biologic matrices.
Excellent interpersonal skills and ability to represent DMPK in a team environment.
* Minimum level of education and years of relevant work experience.
Ph.D. in scientific discipline preferably in chemistry, biology, pharmaceutical science, pharmacology or related scientific discipline with at least 1 years relevant postdoctoral or industry experience.
* Special knowledge or skills needed and/or licenses or certificates required.
Demonstrate ability to work on complex problems to produce experimental data across one or more projects.
Exercises independent judgement within defined procedures and practices.
Demonstrates technical proficiency, collaboration with others within a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members.
Possesses detailed and expert knowledge of scientific principles and concepts.
Demonstrate ability to work effectively in a multi-disciplinary team environment.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office preferably MS Excel and MS PowerPoint or similar
Excellent verbal and written communication and skills.
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills.
Demonstrates an understanding of the strategic alignment of his/her work with corporate goal(s) and demonstrates the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines.
Excellent planning, organization and time management skills including the ability to support and prioritize multiple projects.
*Special knowledge or skills and/or licenses or certificates preferred.
Hands on experience in operating and general troubleshooting of contemporary LC-MS instruments and automated liquid handlers.
Hands on experience with cell-based assays (hepatocytes, etc.).
Proficient in using WinNonlin or other pharmacokinetic software.
* Travel requirements

upto10%

*Physical requirements (only note if the job requires physical capacity beyond general office work)

Office/Laboratory based position

EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
163,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Mesh Recruiting has supported the hiring needs of this data analytics company for nearly six years.

Understanding a company’s philosophy, its team, and culture generates insight as to the expectations of a client. If you enjoy working with large, varied datasets and delivering measured results that impact a company’s competitive edge then this job is worth your time and investigation. My client offers a very distinctive culture, providing incredible experience and satisfaction for those that do not necessarily have to know exactly what they will be doing every day of the week. Diversity in work and collaboration with others makes this company a step ahead of others. If you are a hands-on person and enjoy seeing a project from start to finish, then this job is for you! My client fosters an atmosphere of constant learning and solving challenges through team collaboration.

Data Scientist Skills and Responsibilities:

Bachelor’s degree in Analytics, Statistics, Economics, Math, or other related fields of study (Master’s degree preferred).

At least 3 years’ experience leveraging quantitative analytics to provide operational or marketing performance analysis.

Experience performing statistical analysis, regression modeling, time series analysis, data mining, and financial analysis.

Experience utilizing statistical software packages such as R, SAS, or SPSS and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Shiny or Power BI.

R, R studio experience preferred over SAS or SPSS

Shiny/Shiny Server experience preferred over Tableau or Power BI

Experience assimilation, cleansing, validating, and presenting large quantities of complex data

Web development (HTML/CSS/JS apps) experience a definite plus

SQL/ MySQL experience a definite plus

Professional Qualifications:

Passionate about data and discovering new trends, tools, and techniques.

Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.

Excellent communication skills to converse with clients and team members

Location:

Louisville, Kentucky, state of the art facility.

Work Location: Onsite or work remotely with the flexibility to be onsite when requested.

Salary range: Competitive salary

Schedule: Monday through Friday with short Fridays during summer months

Benefits are offered

We are seeking 2 individuals for this company due to tremendous growth. If interested in learning more please submit your resume. I have been a recruiter supporting various companies since 1996. I look forward to working with you!

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $95,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Flexible schedule
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
My client offers the option to work off-site or on-site in their state of the art office facility. Must be able to travel weekly to office site when needed for business meetings etc.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Mesh Recruiting,"Louisville, KY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
164,Senior Research Associate/Scientist I - Flow Cytometry,-1,"Abveris is an antibody discovery biotech organization providing contract research services for biopharma companies of various sizes. We provide high quality, rapid antibody discovery services for critical reagent development and therapeutics discovery.

We are seeking an experienced and motivated individual to join our team to facilitate flow cytometry screening for new and ongoing projects.
Key Responsibilities*
Perform flow cytometry screening for both internal research and Partner projects, assist in the design and analysis of flow cytometry experimentation using ForeCyt or FlowJo software.
Maintenance and troubleshooting of iQue flow cytometer, including daily startup, QC, and shutdown.
Interpret and summarize experimental data and prepare data reports for Partners.
Understand a variety of cell-based methods with a strong understanding of tissue culture, cell biology, and general laboratory techniques.
Help train at least one additional user on all aspects of flow cytometry (planning and running experiments, data acquisition, and analysis).
Key Qualifications: · *
A bachelor’s degree in Biology, Biotechnology, or a related scientific discipline.
Understanding of flow cytometry fundamentals, working knowledge of flow cytometry software.
At least one year of experience running flow cytometry experiments, experience with iQue preferred but not required.
At least three years of general biology laboratory experience.
Ability to diagnose and troubleshoot issues on flow cytometry instrument and software, as well as manage instrument maintenance.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and the ability to work constructively with colleagues throughout all laboratory departments.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Biology Laboratory: 3 years (Required)
Flow Cytometry: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Canton, MA 02021 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.abveris.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Abveris Antibody,"Canton, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
165,Senior Data Engineer (TS/SCI with Polygraph),-1,"We're looking for game changers. People who love what they do and who they do it for. Providing consulting services in operational support, intelligence collection, reporting, and data governance, R2C is a leader in delivering solutions for high priority national security concerns. Are you ready for a change?


R2C is seeking a Senior Data Engineer who will manipulate data and data flows for both existing and new systems. In this role you will provide support in the areas of data extraction, transformation and load (ETL), data mapping, data extraction, analytical support, operational support, database support, and maintenance support of data and associated systems. As a member of the team, you will work in a multi-tasking, quick-paced, dynamic, process-improvement environment that requires experience with the principles of large-scale (terabytes) database development, large-scale file manipulation, data modeling, data mapping, data testing, data quality, and documentation preparation.
We welcome the most challenging problems facing our national security and apply intellect, talent, and innovation to reach feasible and valuable solutions to each challenge. That means we expect our employees to bring their “A game,” and you have the right to expect the same from the company that employs you. We want to hear your ideas. We want to hear your concerns. We want to make sure you have what you need to do the best you can on the job and grow in your career with us over time. Almost all companies say they have a culture of inclusiveness and that they value employee input, but R2C puts that statement to work every day. It’s time for a change. Come and experience a company that actually cares.

TOP SECRET/SCI with Polygraph
Build and maintain data flows in NiFi or Pentaho
Research, design, develop, and/or modify enterprise-wide systems and/or application software
Develop complex data flows, or make significant enhancements to existing pipelines
Resolve complex hardware/software compatibility and interface design considerations
Conduct investigations and tests of considerable complexity
Research emerging technologies to determine impact on application execution
Provide input to staff involved in writing and updating technical documentation
Troubleshoot complex problems and provide customer support for the ETL process
Advise hardware engineers on machine characteristics that affect software systems, such as storage capacity, processing speed, and input/output requirements
Prepare reports on analyses, findings, and project progress
Provide guidance and work leadership to less-experienced software engineers

Knowledge of servers operating systems; Windows, Linux, Distributed Computing, Blade Centers, and cloud infrastructure
Strong problem solving skills
Ability to comprehend database methodologies
Focus on continual process improvement with a proactive approach to problem solving
A bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology, or similar discipline
Two (2) additional years of related application/software programming experience in lieu of a Bachelor's degree
10+ years' programming and software development experience
An active Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph clearance
Experience with any of the following languages: Java/J2EE, C, C++, SQL, XML, XQuery, XPath, Ruby on Rails, HTML/XHTML, CSS, Python, Shell Scripting
The Reports and Requirements Company, LLC (R2C) is a wholly owned subsidiary of Buchanan & Edwards, and provides consulting services in operational support, intelligence collection, reporting, and data governance. Located in Arlington, VA, R2C offers expertise on a variety of national security topics, with specific focus on operational support, technical operations, policies and management of large volumes of data, analysis of large amounts of data, & effective approaches to evaluating and sharing data, and innovative techniques for information collection. Our consultants develop and deliver training programs on subjects including cyber intelligence, data governance and information sharing protocols, intelligence collection, and reporting techniques. R2C has a mission first culture and boasts the benefits & perks of a small company with the resources, stability, and career mobility of a large corporation. R2C is dedicated to fostering, cultivating and preserving a culture of diversity and inclusion. We are committed to crafting a workplace that endorses creativity and innovation, and promotes engagement through open communication, acceptance of new people and ideas, and a supportive team dynamic. R2C is an equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities / Women / Veterans / Individuals with Disabilities / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation.
#CJ",3.4,"Buchanan & Edwards
3.4","DC Ranch, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
166,Healthcare Data Analyst,$37k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
Company: Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization
Job Title: Healthcare Data Analyst
Department: Data
Reports To: Chief Data Officer
FLSA Status: Exempt
Prepared Date: 5/13/2020
DISCLAIMER:
Job descriptions are not meant to be all-inclusive and/or the job itself is subject to change. Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties
Summary:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Applies knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Applies in-depth knowledge of health care operations and systems.
Responds to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Works with other analysts to perform evaluate the performance of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Works with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identifies, develops and implements methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Performs checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintains and applies knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educates and assists in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Suggests ways to both increase healthcare quality and reduce costs.
Applies knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within healthcare technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Abides by all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.

Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Strong knowledge of health care models including ACO’s.
A working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD 9/ICD10 classifications, CPT codes, etc.).
Strong knowledge of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Advanced-level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment
Strong skills in Microsoft Excel
Strong internet research capabilities
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus
Attention to detail
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience:
Required: Bachelor's degree in a related area and 2-4 years of experience in the field or in a related area.
Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area (ex. MHA, MIS, MBA)
Language Skills:
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills:
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Intranet, Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools.
Other Skills and Abilities:
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a MUST. Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands:
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.",3.8,"Palm Beach ACO, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
167,"Machine Learning - Computer Scientist, Lead",$132k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking a Senior / Lead Computer Scientist to cultivate and lead highly skilled technical staff to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics. As our Computer Scientist you will promote and provide MITRE-unique value across multiple sponsors. Additionally, you will be expected to initiate and contribute to various research projects & efforts across MITRE and in collaboration with academia, industry and sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, and Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Cybersecurity, Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field
8 + years applicable experience including machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Hands on work experience will include tools / packages such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Outstanding presentation skills, both development & delivery, are required for both MITRE facing and Sponsor facing communications
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government clearance are preferred
Proven experience with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
168,Principal Scientist,-1,"Myeloid Therapeutics *
Role: *Principal Scientist, Translational Sciences
Myeloid Therapeutics is an immuno-oncology company developing its proprietary
ATAKTM myeloid cell program to cure cancer. ATAKTM cells are autologous myeloid cells that have been engineered to unleash their power to cure cancer. Our platform technology has demonstrated activity against hematological and solid tumor targets in preclinical models and we are translating these findings to the clinic.
Purpose: *
We are seeking an energetic and committed Principal Scientist that will be responsible for building the pre-clinical team within the Translational Sciences group. The successful candidate will be an outstanding scientist with expertise in immunology and experience in overseeing the design, execution and interpretation of all in vivo pharmacology studies.
S/he will also be expected to develop and maintain strong collaborations and relations with external experts in the non-clinical and clinical fields of immunology, immuno- oncology and autoimmune diseases. This individual will join a dynamic, rapidly growing, and highly collaborative team that combines significant drug discovery experience, including with pioneering technologies driving novel biological platforms.
Essential Job Responsibilities: *
• Propose, plan and manage and execute studies to characterize the anti-tumor activity of Myeloid’s proprietary cell therapies
• Lead a team of 1-3 scientists/ research associates
• Responsible for preparation of study reports, regulatory filings and project presentations
• Interface with external partners, clinical and academic collaborators, and CROs
• Provide high-level updates and advice to senior management, including evaluation of data and their potential impact on drug programs and clinical/regulatory strategy
• Provide development opportunities and mentoring to direct reports
Qualifications: *
Required:
• PhD. with more than 8 years of experience in immunology, or MS with 10+ years
• At least 5 years of experience working with rodents in a biopharmaceutical setting

• Deep understanding of rodent experimental models in both immuno-oncology and autoimmunity

• Proven experience in designing and executing _in vivo_ experiments, including hands-on experience with IP, IV, IP, PO injection, blood collection blood and tissue harvest
• Driven to deliver results to meet the company’s goals and timelines with the ability to handle multiple projects in parallel
• Rigorous with strong problem-solving and analytical skills
• Proficient in data collection/documentation of all study results in the form of notebook reports and regulatory documents
• Strong leadership, interpersonal and communication skills with an enthusiasm for participating in a fast-paced environment characterized by rigorous science and innovative thinking
• Ability to follow and promote safety instructions and regulations
• A team player and mentor, who listens effectively and invites response and discussion. A collaborator who communicates in an open, clear, complete, timely and consistent manner

Preferred
• Experience with flow cytometry (FACS and cell sorting), T cell activation assays, ELISA and/or histology
• Experience with engaging and managing external efforts with contract research organizations and academic collaborators
• Experience in cell therapies
• Contributed to the authorship of regulatory submission documents
• Broad disease related experience with firsthand knowledge in immno-oncology and/or autoimmune diseases
• Experience working within start up environment

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
In vivo models: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.myeloidtx.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Myeloid Therapeutics,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
169,Unstructured Data Analyst,-1,"ITAC Solutions is assisting one of our clients in Alexandria, VA, in their search for an Unstructured Data Analyst.

What you’ll be doing (duties of this position):

Follow detailed instructions on all work
Complete assigned metadata creation related tasks that are routine in nature
Review documents
Identify metadata information from the documents
Key in the metadata information
Perform other duties as assigned.

What you’ll need to be considered (requirements):

Trained and skilled in overall computer systems and applications (i.e., Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, and Excel)
Meet certification level requirements to the degree defined in the GSA contract
FS08, the individual should have at a minimum, a Bachelor’s Degree with two years of experience
FS09, the individual should have at a minimum, an Associate’s Degree with three years of related experience
FS10, the individual should have at a minimum, an Associate’s Degree with five years of experience.
Hold current United States of America citizenship
Minimum Top Secret security clearance is required to perform this task.

What could set you apart from the rest (preferred skills / experience / knowledge):

Previous military or DOD experience is a plus",4.0,"ITAC Solutions
4.0","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,GMP QC Scientist,-1,"ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS*
· GMP QC: Follows Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), protocols and other instructions from management to perform release testing for raw materials and finished products, validate analytical methods, and qualify analytical instruments (OQ/PQ/PM).

· Perform GMP analytical testings for drug products.

· Perform GMP stability studies for drug products.

· Under supervision, the scientist will write/revise SOPs, test methods, protocols, and specification documents.

· Under supervision, the scientist will write and conduct out-of-specification (OOS) investigations and deviations.

· Conducts peer review of data generated in QC lab.

· Maintains the inventory of laboratory consumables and clean glassware.

· Performs routine maintenance of laboratory instrumentation including maintaining instrument qualification, coordinating and scheduling for maintenance / requalification services. Maintains complete and accurate records of instrument service and repairs in conformance with company SOPs and policies.

· Maintains general cleanliness of the lab, including personal bench space and common use areas.

· All other tasks and duties assigned as perceived and agreed upon by management.
KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS*
· Software proficiencies include, but not limited to Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, as well as data acquisition software.

· Analytical skills with hands-on instrumentation knowledge and experiences in HPLC, FT-IR, UV-Vis, Karl Fisher, pH, viscosity, particulate matter, dissolution analysis, etc.

· Clean room Experience with environmental monitor, and aseptic process is a plus.

· Experience with Agilent Openlab is a plus.

· Good attitude, good work ethic, and great attention to details.

· Excellent written and verbal communication.

· experiences with GLP, GMP, and GDP
Requirements: *
· BS and above degree in Chemistry with 2 years of work-related experience in cGMP setting.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,"LATITUDE Pharmaceuticals
1.0","San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
171,Senior Data Engineer,$94k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Novavax, Inc.(Nasdaq:NVAX) is a late-stage biotechnology company that promotes improved health globally through the discovery, development, and commercialization of innovative vaccines to prevent serious infectious diseases.Novavaxrecently initiated development of NVX-CoV2373, its vaccine candidate against SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19, and achieved positive Phase 1 clinical trial results. NanoFlu, its quadrivalent influenza nanoparticle vaccine, met all primary objectives in its pivotal Phase 3 clinical trial in older adults. Both vaccine candidates incorporate Novavax' proprietary saponin-based Matrix-M adjuvant in order to enhance the immune response and stimulate high levels of neutralizing antibodies.Novavaxis a leading innovator of recombinant vaccines; its proprietary recombinant technology platform combines the power and speed of genetic engineering to efficiently produce highly immunogenic nanoparticles in order to address urgent global health needs.

Novavax is seeking an experienced, hands-on software systems integration leader to directly oversee data and analytic initiatives and support our research, development, manufacturing and sales of vaccines through integration of our many transactional systems.

Working with the Director of Data and Analytics, you will define the integration strategy and governance program for the organization. As the Data Engineering SME, you will help determine the appropriate software solution and translate business needs into actionable projects. You will be an integral part of the IT Team and expected to develop and deliver enterprise-wide solutions for complex data challenges.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Identify and Deliver on Business Needs: Works with internal business partners, including IT, Clinical, Manufacturing and administration teams in order to identify business needs and how software integration and automated workflow solutions can meet those needs.

Deploy an Integration Platform: Identify, review and evaluate iPaaS providers to determine the vendor and product that best meets Novavax's business needs. Achieve buy-in on solution from key stakeholders within the organization. Manage the deployment project of the iPaaS solution and own the lifecycle of the solution.

Defining Strategy: Define the technical and business workflow strategy for developing and maintaining the integration platform. Create a strategic roadmap for the integration platform, including software roadmap and integration roadmap.

Establishing Governance: Establish needed governance practices and policies for the integration platform and iPaaS solution. Communicate and enforce governance.

External Collaborations: Maintain relationships with external partners and vendors.

Identifies New Opportunities: Identify new technological opportunities that help Novavax achieve our mission of Creating Tomorrow's Vaccines Today.

Skills:
Ability to translate business needs into integration and automated workflow projects.
Ability to lead projects in an agile manner.
Ability to effectively drive business, culture, and technology change in a dynamic and complex operating environment
Knowledge of trends and developments in the fields of data management, workflow automation and software data integration.
Information management and quantitative skills, including working knowledge of IT infrastructure, various technologies/platforms, and enterprise-specific vendor solutions
Industry-specific knowledge of data security protocols, policies, and regulations
Proven ability to quickly learn new applications, processes, and procedures
Able and willing to collaborate in a team environment and exercise independent judgment
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Professional image with the ability to form good partner relationships across functions
Advanced knowledge of programming languages like Python, SQL and Visual Basic.
Minimum Requirements:

The position also requires hands-on experience working with:
At least 5 years of relevant experience in data management and integration services. Direct, hands-on experience with at least 1 iPaaS solution (Boomi, Informatica, TIBCO, etc.) or strong experience with ETL and data warehousing software.
At least 1 year of experience in workflow automation technology (Boomi, Workato, Power Automate, etc.)
Experience in computer programming and query languages. Experience writing SQL queries is a must.
Exposure to Web API/Services. Familiarity with big data technologies (e.g. Hadoop) and Extract Transform Load (ETL) tools is desirable.
Experience with Microsoft's Power Stack (Power BI, Power Apps, Power Automate) is preferred.
Demonstrated experience with successfully executing programs that meet or exceed expectations in a dynamic environment
Experience with storing, handling and analyzing commercial data sets preferred.
Experience creating tools and capabilities to assist with data discovery & collaboration, ensure data quality, and to load, clean, enrich, manage, and share data and metadata from a variety of sources
Working knowledge of Life Sciences industry, regulatory compliance and computerized system validation (CSV)
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Data Science, Analytics, Computer Science or related fields.
Novavax is headquartered in Gaithersburg, Maryland with additional facilities in Uppsala, Sweden and Bohumil, Czech Republic. Novavax is traded on the Nasdaq Stock Market under the symbol NVAX and is dedicated to developing novel vaccines to address infectious disease.

Novavax offers a base salary, annual bonus, equity grants, professional career development/growth opportunities, and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, vision, Rx, STD, LTD, Life, Optional Life, 401(k) plan.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Novavax is an equal employment opportunity employer. Employment and advancement opportunities are available to all individuals on an at-will basis, regardless of their race, color, national origin, religion, ancestry, citizenship status, military or veteran status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, disability, genetic information, protective hairstyle, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.4,"Novavax
3.4","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
172,Data Engineer,$95k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Why consider OPI, and why do people dig working here?
Variety of consulting; new technologies, projects, and people on a regular basis.
Stability; we’ve been around since 1996 and have a diverse mix of clients and technologies to keep us busy, very busy. And we keep a bench. If you’re not on a project, you’re writing software for our internal business functions or you’re learning new technologies. It’s in our benefit to make our consultants as marketable as possible. That’s good for your career.
No politics or management; we don’t get in the way. Why sit in meetings all day when you can code and be productive?
Awesome benefits; free healthcare for your entire family (yes, free), 24 days of PTO + 10 days of sick time, quarterly profit sharing bonuses, you get paid OT, company trips (to Mexico), 3 company lake cabins/homes, various quarterly company events, new Macbook Pro’s, free beer/soda, chips, candy, and so much more.
You work with the best. Do an Object Partners search on LinkedIn and see the types of talent we hire. You truly get to work with intelligent, passionate engineers that share the same goal of building great software the right way.
Low company overhead. It all means more money back into our consultants pockets (profit sharing) or company trips and events to share in the financial success.

Qualifications

Architecture and design of highly available/scalable distributed systems.
Design and development of streaming data platforms using Kafka Streams, Spark, Flink, Storm, Beam or Cloud Dataflow.
Experience with functional/event-driven programming.
NoSQL technologies such as ElasticSearch or Cassandra.
Messaging technologies such as RabbitMQ, Kafka or Kinesis.
SQL on Hadoop technologies such as Hive, Impala or Presto.
Cloud services such as AWS, Azure, GCP or OpenStack.
JVM languages such as Java, Groovy, Kotlin or Scala.
Service frameworks such as Spring Boot, Ratpack, Vert.x, or Play.
Knowledge of data analytics, visualization and governance.
Knowledge of operating big data production solutions at scale.
Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and DevOps culture.
Passion for software development. Someone that loves what they do, that aren’t just in it for a paycheck. Do you have dev projects going on at home at all times?
New projects, new teams, new technologies means having to adjust and learn all the time. You might get thrown on a DevOps project as well, so having the ability to jump in and get your feet wet without hesitation is important. If you don’t want to grow and learn, we’re not a fit.
Positive, can-do attitude. We can teach the technology, but we can’t teach how to approach client challenges with a positive, helpful demeanor. The best consultants aren’t the most technical (although that sure helps), it’s the consultant that will do whatever it takes to see a client be successful, no matter what they throw at you.",4.6,"Object Partners
4.6","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
173,"Scientist / Senior Scientist, Bioinformatic",-1,"POSITION SUMMARY: *
The Bioinformatics Scientist/Sr Bioinformatics Scientist will catalyze computational analysis of large volumes of genomic and clinical data with the aim of developing precision medicine approaches for the rescue of drugs that have failed late stage clinical trials. This individual will play a key scientific role leveraging innovative computational analysis strategies and a wide range of data sources to discover novel clinical biomarkers to improve therapeutic outcomes in complex diseases of unmet medical need with specific focus on the identification of genetic biomarkers that relate to disease subgroups and therapeutic response. Areas of particular focus include systems-level analysis of genetic association studies to discover novel biomarkers for oncology and CNS diseases. Successful candidates include individuals looking to bridge the gap between academic and industrial research environments to impact delivery of truly innovative and life-changing therapies.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES: *
These include, but are not limited to:
Coordinated application of novel computational analysis and biological interpretation approaches to leverage internal, public and partner datasets to empower pharmacogenomics biomarker research.
Data integration across various omic platforms.
Participation in and oversight of scientific report writing. Presentation of methods, results and conclusions to a publishable standard.
Contribution to planning and execution of collaborative projects with leading academic and commercial research groups.
Participate in brainstorming sessions, maintain a highly productive and motivating work environment.
EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED*
Ph.D. in computational biology, bioinformatics, or related field.
5+ years post-doctoral experience of inter-disciplinary computational and drug discovery research in a university, hospital or biotechnology environment.
2+ years’ experience in pharma/biotech research environment is preferable.
Experience working with data from clinical trials and health care data.
Track record of peer-reviewed publication in relevant scientific journals.
Expertise in genetic association studies and the analysis and interpretation of next-generation sequencing data are prerequisites.
Previous experience in the field of precision medicine is preferred.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
Strong knowledge required of genetic association analysis and interpretation, and applied computational research of large multivariate datasets.
Expertise in algorithmic implementation, statistical programming, and data manipulation, using R/Bioconductor, Matlab, Python, and a wide range of contemporary open-source bioinformatics tools and databases.
Strong proficiency and understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Fluent verbal and written English language skills are prerequisite.
A strong interest in the inter-disciplinary application of computational analysis to life sciences data is imperative, as is a rich background and experience in bioinformatics and computational biology research.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Company's website:
www.denovobiopharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Denovo Biopharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
174,Research Scientist,-1,"FesariusTherapeutics has developed DermiSphere™, a dermal regeneration scaffold indicated for full thickness skin loss. Early pre-clinical data testing DermiSphere against market leading competitors indicates game-changing advances in efficacy in the treatment of full thickness skin loss wounds.

This is a newly created position reflecting the growth and opportunities facing the company. You will report to the Chief Scientific Officer (“CSO”) and will play a material role in the R&D activities of the company. Compensation will be competitive including equity participation for the right candidate.

Responsibilities:
Apply principles and methods from biopolymer science, protein chemistry, cell culture and small and large animal work towards product formulation and performance evaluation.
Independently design, conduct, troubleshoot and analyze experiments.
Communicate results, conclusions and recommendations to colleagues and leadership.
Acquire and maintain relevant technical expertise in relevant fields: polymer science, protein chemistry, and biomaterials.
Mentor other team members and work closely with other researchers in the group.
Develop original ideas to advance the execution of the company’s research and development objectives (we are looking for someone who can execute the R&D plans developed by the company as well as provide original thinking to shape the ongoing formulation of those plans)
The right candidate will possess some or all of the following academic credentials, skills and experience:
PhD or MSc in Materials Science and Engineering, Polymer Science (experience in biomaterials) or related field, with at least 2 or 5 years of experience in an industrial or commercial lab setting.
Strong background in polymer materials, polymer chemistry, physics, morphology and rheology
The candidates should have a thorough understanding of structure/property relationships
Independent experimental design capability and manuscript preparation and have previously published high impact papers as first author.
Strong expertise in fabrication and testing of hydrogels and/or protein-based materials.
Capability to develop custom assays.
Experience with CAD modeling software (e.g. SolidWorks) and 3D printing methods.
Ability to mentor researchers and lead a research project independently
Exceptional attention to detail and organizational skills
Goal oriented, motivated, and ability to work independently
Excellent communication skills and comfortable working in a fast-paced environment
Willingness to learn and develop expert proficiency in new skills and applications relevant to your role as directed by the CSO
Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Industrial Laboratory: 2 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,FesariusTherapeutics Inc.,"Brooklyn, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
175,Staff/Lead Data Engineer,$80k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2300 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

As a Staff Engineer with Freedom Financial Network in its Tempe, AZ or San Mateo, CA office, you will contribute directly to the success of the business and have a meaningful impact on our customers’ lives.

We are looking for seasoned engineers to bring new and innovative ideas and tackle challenges across the full-stack. We believe in building teams that are passionate about solving complex problems and ready to grow and evolve alongside our expanding business and technology footprint.

THE ROLE:

Lead product requirements and advanced analytics requirements gathering efforts, interfacing with Data Engineering, Data Scientists, Analytics, and stakeholder teams •
Work with analytics, data science, and wider engineering teams to help with automating data analysis and visualization needs, advise on transformation processes to populate data models, and explore ways to design and develop data infrastructure
Use technology to solve business problems and drive positive outcomes
Build a scalable technology platform to support a growing business
Deliver high-quality code to production, consistently
Integration with various third-party systems
Play a key role in building out a large scale distributed and event based Data Platform that serves as an underpinning for all of Freedom’s businesses and products

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

10 years’ experience building large scale, real-time distributed systems with solid coding, problem-solving, and design skills
Experience working in highly collaborative teams
Ability to demonstrate a team-first attitude towards software development
Hands on Experience with Python, Java, SQL
Experience working with various data stores: SQL, NoSQL, and/or key-value store
Mature engineering practices (CI/CD, testing, secure coding, etc)
Experience with, or willingness to learn:
Event-driven architecture and messaging frameworks (Pub/Sub, Kafka, and/or RabbitMQ)
Cloud infrastructure (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, and/or Azure)

EDUCATION:

Bachelor’s in Computer Science or related field, or relevant experience in software development

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace a healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted the Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday",3.3,"Freedom Financial Network
3.3","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
176,SAP Materials Master Data Analyst - Temp,$58k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is a 6 month temporary assignment.

The Mizuho OSI Way

In 1978, we set out to change the way patients undergo surgery. As a Mizuho OSI customer, you can expect our commitment to the following…

We commit to your satisfaction. If you are dissatisfied, we will strive to make it right.

We do things the right way. We commit to hire people with competence, generosity and a caring attitude. We motivate our employees to use their individual strengths to provide creative solutions, changes, and innovations. We anticipate your needs through customer experiences, thus nurturing our relationships.

Collectively, this creates an environment that enables and inspires healthcare professionals to improve the lives of patients.

Dare to go further. Care to do more.

TOP REASONS TO JOIN THE MIZUHO OSI TEAM
Privately held company with a tradition of market leadership and best-in-class innovation
Fast-paced entrepreneurial culture focused on dramatically improving patient outcomes through personal empowerment
Emphasis on continuous improvement and celebration of our values of R.E.S.P.E.C.T. and the Mizuho Way.
Create innovative solutions designed and manufactured at our HQ in Northern California
POSITION OVERVIEW
The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 1 to 2 full life cycle SAP implementations and have participated or have led roles in blueprint activities, creating SOP, work instructions and training users to maintenance and sustain the master data. In addition be a savvy self-directed and capable individual who’s accustomed to delivering time critical work products.
Bachelor's degree in business, and or in systems applications such as SAP Modules or equivalent work experience
Experience with full life cycle SAP implementations
Formal training or experience with ASAP implementation methodology
Excellent written and oral communication skills
We are looking for you, if you have the ability to:
Hold meetings on Material Master and Item Master Data Management.
Assist with refining Business Process Design for Item Material Master including tactical MDM process.
Coordinate with functional disciplines in OPS/SCM and their IT counterparts.
Identify MDM Classifications of data and assist with identifying local data attributes.
Assist with the MDM governance model, including documenting processes with identified data owners, master process owners and SAP module owners.
Assist with identifying KPIs to improve quality and productivity.
Assist with workflows within MDM tool.
Here is what you will do day-to-day
Analyze business process requirements, design a solution approach in close collaboration with business teams
Write functional specifications and advise business teams of feasible solution designs
Work with IT in unit test efforts and with business in regression test efforts
Deliver BPP and solution documentation for implemented solutions
Work with functional teams (SD, MM, PP, FICO, QM)
Application Configuration and Support
Support SAP modules to meet business needs.
Unit test SAP software applications, including customizations and interfaces
Application Analysis and Design
Assist SAP users analyze and identify business process requirements.
Develop SAP functional application designs and specifications, individually or collaboratively.
Work as a member of cross-functional teams and add value by providing a technical perspective.
Guide Application Developers by recommending ways to design and unit-test applications. (SAP - PLM)
Change Management and Support
Provide QA function by reviewing/testing developer’s work.
Guide users in integrated testing, conference room pilot activities and applications startup activities.
Facilitate the process of change by clarifying new procedures and training system users.
Project Management and Control
Manage small projects, with responsibility for the quality and timeliness of project deliverables
Direct project resources and/or recommend and create internal development procedures and methodologies.
Understand scope and planned estimates of undertaken activities and manage actual time relative to the planned estimates.
Problem Solving:
Plays a key role in the Order to Cash team in the full project lifecycle, from the business blueprint of the project to post support.
Works with business analysts, business SMEs and various process owners to analyze their requirements: prepare and participate in workshops, requirement documentation, functional specifications and configuration documentation.
Provides support for Data extraction, data cleansing and loading
Works closely with IT resources for non-standard SAP objects.
Supports the development of test scripts and provide process expertise during test execution.
Assists and supports training document creation.
Finalizes the MDM configuration element s and triggers and support the solution after implementation.
Understand, follow and support Mizuho OSI’s internal Quality System policies, procedures and work instructions including but not limited to applicable external regulations (21 Code of Federal Regulations Part 820 Quality System Regulations and applicable International Standards).
What you will need to be successful in this role:
A minimum of 5 years of SAP process and configuration experience in Sales & Distribution, Materials Management, Production Planning and Quality Management modules and MDM.
Experience in at least 2 full life cycle implementations of SAP.
Experience in supporting all phases of SAP project life cycle including blueprint, design, build, test, deployment and support.
Experience in developing blueprint documentation, functional designs, test plans and scenarios as well as executing the tests.
Experience in and data validations during testing and implementation
Strong knowledge/experience in 1 additional SAP module is a must.
Experience with integration testing and implementation.
Thorough business understanding of Supply Chain processes.
Familiarity with SAP architecture.
Strong verbal and written communications skills, with an ability to express complex business concepts in technical terms.
Strong analytical, problem solving, and conceptual skills.
Strong interpersonal skills; ability to work well on cross functional project teams.
Experience in the construction and distribution industry.
What you need to be prepared for:

The physical demands are representative of those needed to perform the essential functions of the job in an office environment. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

NOTE: This job description in no way states or implies that these are the only duties or functions to be performed by the incumbent. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform any other job-related duties/functions requested by their supervisor.",3.7,"Mizuho OSI
3.7","Union City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Research Scientist,$38k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business: Boys Town National Research Hospital

Boys Town National Research Hospital (BTNRH) is seeking Junior, Mid, or Senior career level Research Scientists in the Center for Childhood Deafness, Language & Learning (CCDLL). The Center for Childhood Deafness, Language, and Learning is directed by Karla McGregor, Ph.D.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital are full-time researchers with no teaching or administrative responsibilities and reasonable service commitments.

Our vision is to grow the CCDLL into a program with tightly integrated research and clinical arms that work synergistically on issues of language learning and development. Work that fits this focus could involve examination of differences between learners with varying diagnoses; determination of the influences of intervention as well as family, academic, and social environments on language outcomes; identification of developmental processes that support language learning during infancy, childhood, adolescence, and young adulthood; and investigation of brain plasticity and neurologic pathways that support language learning and development. We are assembling a faculty that can offer a unique perspective on such issues, one that is informed by a commitment to understanding and ameliorating the effects of childhood disabilities on language learning and development.
All scientists will have access to new, state-of-the art laboratory facilities, generous start-up funds, and extensive supports for grant management, IT, participant recruitment, and clinical measurement.
Senior scientists aim for 50% salary support on external grants. Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.
Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital have the advantage of working alongside an outstanding, internationally recognized group of colleagues. In addition to clinicians and scientists in the CCDLL, collaborations are possible with faculty in the Centers for Human Neurosciences, Neurobehavioral Research, Sensory Neuroscience Research, Audiological and Vestibular Services, and Hearing Research. Our intellectual community also includes colleagues at the University of Nebraska-Omaha, the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, the University of Nebraska Medical Center, Creighton University and the Creighton University School of Medicine. Our participation in the Great Plains IDeA-Clinical & Translational Research Center provides training opportunities, partnerships, and resources for scientists who wish to translate science into better health outcomes.

Required Qualifications : A successful candidate will have a Ph.D. as well as post-doctoral studies or faculty-level experience in Speech-Language Pathology, Cognitive Science, Developmental or Experimental Psychology or a related field, and a record that demonstrates a highly productive and excellent research program. Expertise in phonological development or disorders, neurodevelopmental disorders, or the interface between language development and emotional/behavioral health is of particular interest, but not required.

About Boys Town : Boys Town has been changing the way America cares for children and families since 1917. Our employees have helped us grow from a small boardinghouse in downtown Omaha, Nebraska into one of the largest national child and family care organizations in the country. With the addition of Boys Town National Research Hospital in 1977, our services branched out into the health care and research fields, offering even more career opportunities to those looking to make a real difference.

Our employees are our #1 supporters when it comes to achieving Boys Town's mission, which is why we are proud of their commitment to making the world a better place for children, families, patients, and communities. Unique perks to Boys Town employees and their families include free visits to Boys Town physicians and free prescriptions under the Boys Town Medical Plan, tuition assistance, parenting resources from our experts and professional development opportunities within the organization, just to name a few. Working at Boys Town is more than just a job, it is a way of life.

Date Posted : September 23, 2020

Boys Town National Research Hospital is a tobacco free campus. This advertisement describes the general nature of work to be performed and does not include an exhaustive list of all duties, skills, or abilities required. Boys Town is an equal employment opportunity employer and participates in the E-Verify program. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status. To request a disability-related accommodation in the application process, contact us at 1-877-639-6003.",2.9,"Boys Town National Research Hospital
2.9","Omaha, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Business Development and Analytics Manager,-1,"Summary: Lead the development of persuasive selling stories to capitalize on category and brand growth opportunities. Manage, motivate and develop a team of analysts to leverage our business intelligence tools for best in class analytics and insights for internal and external partners. Work closely with sales and marketing teams to provide the foundational insights for stronger business planning on distribution, shelving, merchandising and pricing. Transform analysis and insights to link to customer strategies for better engagement, sell-in and execution of annual business plans. Consistently challenge the status quo to bring fresh ideas to maximize the value of Gorton’s investment in analytics.

Responsibilities:
Lead a team to collaborate cross functionally; leveraging all available data and market knowledge to generate actionable insights to support short and long term plans
Develop creative and impactful analytical capabilities to uncover and capture growth opportunities
Define and implement business intelligence reporting to monitor Gorton’s market performance
Support the annual business planning process with strong quantitative insights, providing data driven guidance and recommendations
Create business review presentations, processes and tools to elevate Gorton’s ability to collaborate with retailers on brand category initiatives
Drive the use and understanding of available data sources and systems across the organization
Serve as a subject matter expert while participating in key retailer presentations
Proactively identify critical gaps in business intelligence needs to meet market demands
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in consumer product goods; customer facing experience preferred
Record of successful sales, brand and/or category management including progression within a previous employer
Demonstrated ability to recognize business building opportunities, develop creative approaches and design programs to capture these opportunities, driven by an intellectual curiosity and willingness to drive change
Demonstrated experience in the use of CPG analytics and tools (such as Nielsen, IRI, retailer specific data tools, category management, consumer insights, etc.)
Aggressive attitude/high energy level & demonstrated ability to work effectively in a team environment with a high degree of motivation to excel and win
Strong Microsoft Office skills with a focus on Excel and PowerPoint
Communication and storytelling skills; must be able to convey a compelling argument using data and analytics
Strong leadership, coaching and problem-solving skills
Minimum Bachelor’s Degree education
Willingness to travel 20% of time
Gorton’s offers excellent growth potential along with an attractive benefits and compensation package.

Candidates must have permanent U.S. work authorization (U.S. citizenship or permanent residency/green card.)

Gorton’s is an Equal Opportunity Employer
Please apply on Gorton's careers website using this link: **https://careers.gortons.com/current-openings/business-development-and-analytics-manager*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.gortons.com/
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Gorton's
3.8","Gloucester, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1849,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
179,Senior Data Engineer,$118k-$205k (Glassdoor Est.),"DISQO is a next-generation consumer insights platform. We provide the highest quality consumer data to the world's largest market research agencies, analytics companies, and brands. We operate one of the world's largest true consumer insights panels. This data helps our clients understand user behavior, build better experiences, and make better decisions. We utilize cutting-edge technology and innovative, out-of-the-box strategies to collect and analyze insights which help shape the products and services of tomorrow.

This is a great opportunity to join a fun, exciting & highly motivated team and upgrade your skills while creating real impact. We use a modern tech stack and cloud infrastructure. We are not only looking for work experience, but rather the willingness to step up to challenges and the ability to learn quickly.

We believe the best software is written and managed by small teams that know how to make the impossible possible. We use agile software development techniques and modern tools to focus our efforts on solving our business goals. We use OKR’s to track everything we do. We deliver early and often. We obsess over our code, architecture, and infrastructure. And we believe that these practices lead to higher quality products.

Check out the DISQO Developer Blog for the latest from our DISQTECH team.


What you will do:
Leverage your software development and data engineering skills to impact our business by taking ownership of key projects requiring coding and data pipelines
Collaborate with product managers, software engineers and data engineers to design, implement, and deliver successful data solutions
Define technical requirements and implementation details for data solutions
Design, build and optimize performant databases, data models, integrations and ETL pipelines in RDBMS and NoSQL environments
Maintain detailed documentation of your work and changes to support data quality and governance
Ensure high operational efficiency and quality of your solutions to meet SLAs and support commitment to the customers
Be an active participant and advocate of agile/scrum practices to ensure health and process improvements for your team
What you bring to the table:
5+ years of experience designing and delivering large scale, 24/7, mission-critical data pipelines and features using modern big data architectures
3+ years of Scala
3+ years of Spark
2+ years of experience with AWS data ecosystem (Redshift, EMR, Glue, Athena, ...)
Deep knowledge in various ETL/ELT tools and concepts, data modeling, SQL, query performance optimization
Experience with building stream processing applications using Kinesis or Kafka
Experience with workflow management tools (Airflow, Oozie, Azkaban, Luigi, etc.)
Comfortable working in Linux environment
Ability to thrive in an agile, entrepreneurial start-up environment
Perks & Benefits:

·100% covered Medical/Dental/Vision for employee
·Equity
·Unlimited Vacation
·Flexible work hours
·Catered lunches 3x a week
·Stocked pantry
·Happy Hours
·Onsite Fitness Program
·Discounted Gym Membership
·Quarterly Offsites
·401K
·Life Insurance
·FSA
·Paid Maternity/Paternity leave
·Employee Assistance Program
·Travel Assistance Program

DISQO is an equal opportunity employer. Discovery, innovation, and growth are possible when we open ourselves to new possibilities, perspectives, and approaches. That’s why, at DISQO, we welcome, support, and empower individuals from diverse backgrounds. Exceptional teams are rooted in extraordinary people, each with a unique story and a compelling set of skills. DISQO does not discriminate against employees based on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, gender identity or expression, age, disability, pregnancy (including childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical condition), genetic information, protected military or veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.

*Recruiting firms that submit resumes to DISQO without first entering into a written contract will not be entitled to any compensation on candidates referred by that firm.",4.7,"DISQO
4.7","Glendale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
180,Data Engineer,-1,"Now Hiring a Data Engineer

Ability to maintain a Interim Secret Clearance Required

As a Data Engineer, you will use cutting edge cloud and data technologies to streamline services to our clients. Join our team of Data and Cloud professionals and accomplish what others only dream of. An Interim Secret Clearance is required. This is a remote position, must be able to travel once every quarter.
Ability to apply your skills in Azure Cognitive Services, Azure PaaS, data science, data analytics, and data warehousing to pioneer Azure cloud and data services within the DoD, bringing Azure Data Factory to IL4 & IL5.
Work in a team using cutting edge technologies to solve challenging business problems and build solutions
Interact directly with our client(s) to understand their needs and meet, or exceed their expectations by meeting delivery deadlines
Work in an agile environment with participation in daily stand-ups/scrum
Design, write, test, troubleshoot, and document application code
Provide mentorship to junior developers
Learn new technologies and be aware of industry standards, best practices, and trends.
Profile of Success
Bachelor's degree in a related field and 6+ years of experience
Deep knowledge of data ingestion strategies and understanding of the V-dimensions of data (velocity, volume, variety, veracity)
Extensive experience with the Azure storage technologies (Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Azure SQL Database)
Extensive experience with Azure data movement and transformation capabilities (Azure Data Factory, Data Lake Analytics, Data Bricks, Stream Analytics)
Proven experience developing Big Data solutions in the Azure space
SQL Server 2014+ experience.
Comfortable with Microsoft SQL data technologies (SSAS/SSIS/SSRS)
Proven ability to work with clients to understand requirements and envision data ingestion solutions
Possess DoD 8570 security certification
Desirable Skills
Microsoft related certifications such as the MCSD/MCSE
Experience with Hadoop-based technologies (HDInsight, Spark, Hive, Pig, Scala, etc.)
Experience with visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau
About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:
Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals
Our Core Values
Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community
AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.5,"Applied Information Sciences
4.5",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
181,"Machine Learning - Computer Scientist, Senior",$124k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking a Senior / Lead Computer Scientist to cultivate and lead highly skilled technical staff to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics. As our Computer Scientist you will promote and provide MITRE-unique value across multiple sponsors. Additionally, you will be expected to initiate and contribute to various research projects & efforts across MITRE and in collaboration with academia, industry and sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, and Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Cybersecurity, Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field
5 + years applicable experience including machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Hands on work experience will include tools / packages such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Outstanding presentation skills, both development & delivery, are required for both MITRE facing and Sponsor facing communications
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government clearance are preferred
Proven experience with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
182,Data Engineer,$96k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

This individual will be supporting several analytical project teams deliver solutions to their clients. We are looking for a candidate with a strong understanding of analytics solutions and infrastructure. This candidate will have experience building databases, data pipelines, and data models from a set of defined requirements. They will also have experience with scripting and programming languages, specifically for streamlining and automating ETL operations. This individual will need to have a grasp of the end-to-end analytical pipeline in order to enable teams to deliver timely and accurate insights to their clients.

What you will do:
Optimize and maintain data piplines and architecture for the data analytics team
Standardize tools and automation for ETL across common data sources (Sprinklr, Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, etc.)
Work with project teams to assist with technical issues and support data infrastructure
Assure compliance with data security and privacy guidelines across project teams
What you will bring:
Advanced professional experience with SQL
Experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL), and working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.
Who you are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Self Sufficient. Comfortable with ambiguity, you take initiative but know when to seek guidance.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Visionary. Ability to see ""the whole picture"" and simultaneously remain slightly obsessed with the details
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
183,Data Analyst,$37k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Location: Arlington, VA
Education Required: Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in math, engineering, business, or the sciences.
Skills Required:

We are seeking highly motivated individuals to support a range of critical and exciting Department of Defense (DoD) projects at our office sites in Arlington, VA and Washington, DC. Ideal candidates will possess a Bachelor’s degree in business, engineering, or related fields and 3+ years of experience.

Successful candidates will also possess the following qualifications:
Experience obtaining, integrating, analyzing, and reporting client data, esp. acquisition data.
Ability to apply analytic techniques to define project objectives and strategic direction, resolving complex problems using an in-depth knowledge of analytic methodologies and principles.
Strong researching, data gathering, and technical reviews needed to produce written deliverables to include reports, spreadsheets, databases, formal process mapping, and technical designs.
Microsoft Access experience required
Experience with R and Sharepoint are required.
U.S. Citizenship required. Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance and/or DHS Suitability.
Responsibilities:
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings to various levels of government leadership.
Develop algorithms for data analysis.
Plan and conducts work requiring judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation and/or modification of methodologies and tools.
Consult with senior consultants or functional specialists on unusual or complex problems
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings.
Benefits:
We offer competitive salaries commensurate with education and experience. We have an excellent benefits package that includes:
Comprehensive health, dental, life, long and short term disability insurance
100% Company funded Retirement Plans
Generous vacation, holiday and sick pay plans
Tuition assistance

Benefits are provided to employees regularly working a minimum of 30 hours per week.

Tecolote Research is a private, employee-owned corporation where people are our primary resource. Our investments in technology and training give our employees the tools to ensure our clients are provided the solutions they need, and our very high employee retention rate and stable workforce is an added value to our customers. Apply now to connect with a company that invests in you.",3.9,"Tecolote Research
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
184,"Data Engineer, Education",$123k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded by Dr. Priscilla Chan and Mark Zuckerberg in 2015, the Chan Zuckerberg Initiative (CZI) is a new kind of philanthropy that's leveraging technology to help solve some of the world's toughest challenges – from eradicating disease, to improving education, to reforming the criminal justice system. Across three core Initiative focus areas of Science, Education and Justice and Opportunity, we're pairing engineering with grantmaking, impact investing, policy work, and movement building, to help build an inclusive, just and healthy future for everyone.

Our Values


We believe we can help build a future for everyone.
We aim to be daring, but humble: We look for bold ideas — regardless of structure and stage — and help them scale by pairing engineers with subject matter experts to build tools that accelerate the pace of social progress.
We want to learn fast, but build for the long-term: We want to iterate fast and help bring new solutions to the table, but we also realize that important breakthroughs often take decades, or even centuries.
Stay close to the real problems: We engage directly in the communities we serve because no one understands our society's challenges like those who live them every day.
Our success is dependent on building teams that include people from different backgrounds and experiences who can challenge each other's assumptions with fresh perspectives. To that end, we look for a diverse pool of applicants including those from historically marginalized groups — women, people with disabilities, people of color, formerly incarcerated people, people who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and/or gender nonconforming, first and second generation immigrants, veterans, and people from different socioeconomic backgrounds.

The Opportunity


Our goal is to provide every student, and every teacher, the opportunity to reach his or her full potential. The Chan Zuckerberg Initiative supports and develops personalized learning experiences that are passionate about and led by the learner - meeting them where they are cognitively, physically, socially and emotionally. We're looking for engineers to help bring a new personalized learning platform to the globe's generation of students and help advance the potential of humanity.

You will
Support data scientists' access to data that is accurate, easy to access, and reliable
Maintain key data pipelines
Ingest external data sets for use by the team
Improve data usability and data quality in our data warehouse
Launch new ETL (extract, transform, load) processes in production
Identify impactful improvements to our data warehouse infrastructure
Understand and improve the workflow of initiative members who use data for decision making
Help members of the initiative adopt and use tools that improve their access to data needed for their work
Educate initiative members about standard methodologies for use of data
You have
Experience in Software Engineering or Data Engineering
Expertise writing efficient and optimized SQL
Experience with dimensional data modeling and schema design in a database or data warehouse
Expertise with scripting languages such as Python
Experience with ETL tooling such as Airflow
Experience with large scale cloud data warehouses such as Snowflake
Passionate about education and bringing technology to improving education
Bonus Points
Experience working with large data sets
Loves to collaborate and work people in understanding data needs as well as scoping and executing on projects.",3.7,"Chan Zuckerberg Initiative
3.7","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Data Scientist,-1,"About Imperfect

Imperfect Foods was founded in 2015 with a mission to reduce food waste and build a better food system for everyone. We offer imperfect (yet delicious) produce, affordable pantry items, and quality meat and dairy. We deliver them conveniently to our customers’ doorsteps and pride ourselves on offering up to a 30% discount compared to grocery store prices. Our customers can get the healthy, seasonal produce they want alongside the grocery staples they rely on, without having to compromise their budget or values. We’re proving that doing the right thing for the planet doesn’t have to cost more, and that shopping for quality ingredients can support the people and resources that it takes to grow our favorite foods.

We're headquartered in San Francisco with operations all over the country. Check our website to see if there is an Imperfect near you!

We're looking for folks who are positive, motivated, and ready to change the world. If that sounds like you, drop us a line!

How we are protecting employees from COVID-19

At Imperfect Foods, employee health and safety is our top priority. We have implemented processes and precautions to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in our facilities. We provide gloves, masks, and hand sanitizer to all essential employees who must report to work. Before entering our warehouse, employees have their temperatures checked. In addition, we take great care to ensure frequently touched surfaces are sanitized throughout the day and all warehouses are fully sanitized weekly.

We have also implemented an Emergency Sick Leave policy providing full-time and part-time employees 2 additional weeks of paid time off and up to 26 weeks paid leave if they have a confirmed case of COVID-19.

About the Role:

We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate will develop and automate algorithms that integrate with various parts of the business to better our customer understanding, improve our customer experience, and drive operational efficiency. Our Data Scientist will collaborate with departments across the company, including Marketing, Operations, and Engineering, for a wide and deep impact. Some example projects include demand forecasting to help with warehouse labor and inventory planning, optimizations to improve warehouse efficiency, personalization and recommendation algorithms to enable customers to discover relevant products, and product subscription cadence optimization. As an early member of the data science team, your role will influence the tech stack and frameworks we develop. This role requires analytical horsepower to efficiently analyze, and communication skills to tell a story with data.

If you like the idea of swimming in data, fighting food waste, and working with a cohesive and productive team, we want to hear from you!
Responsibilities:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets by utilizing sophisticated statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Provide in-depth analyses and insights for strategic and business initiatives, while maintaining analytics roadmap to prioritize initiatives, communicate timelines, and ensure successful, timely completion of projects
Collaborate cross-functionally to identify impactful business problems and translate them into structured analyses, measurable insights, and reports and dashboards
Assist with the development and deployment of analytical tools and develop custom models to observe progress, uncover insights in the data, and automate analyses
Participate in code reviews and software development standard methodologies
Skills and Qualifications:
3+ years of professional experience as a data scientist, including deploying and maintaining code in a production environment
Confident with machine learning techniques and sophisticated analytics (e.g. regression, classification, clustering, time series, econometrics, mathematical optimization)
Highly skilled in SQL and Python. Experience running complex analytics in a scripting language
Bonus: experience using R and other languages
Has a solid grasp of statistical applications and methods (experimentation, probabilities)
Experience with preparing large data sets for analysis
About You:
You're able to clearly and dynamically translate data into a relevant story with initiative partners, including technical and non-technical audiences
You demonstrate intellectual curiosity, and a knack for translating information into impactful insights, with data big, small, structured, and imprecise
You have the insight to take ambiguous problems and tackle them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way
You're a self-starter with the ability to prioritize multiple projects at once
You're passionate about our mission to eliminate food waste and create a better food system for all
Details of the Position:
Full-time exempt position reporting to the Director of Business Intelligence
Candidate can be remotely located within the US
Salary and employee stock options commensurate with experienceCompetitive benefits package including health care, paid vacation, 401K, paid parental leave, and recurring credit towards your Imperfect account!
Physical Requirements:
Sedentary work; involves sitting most of the time
Occasional movement around the office may be necessary
Regular work with computers, including keyboards, mouses, and screens
Regular use of mobile devices, including smartphones and tablets
Individuals seeking employment at Imperfect Foods are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.

U.S. E-Verify Notice: Imperfect Foods participates in E-Verify in the United States. Imperfect will provide the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee's Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.4,"Imperfect Foods
3.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
186,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Software Developer*
Looking to be part of an amazing team that is solving challenges, growing, and attracting attention? Plus, do you want to work with data you can explain to your family? TravelPass Group is a close-knit group of technical, marketing, and business experts who are disrupting the travel industry.

We are creating cutting-edge travel technology and data systems. We uncover travel opportunities to help people travel more by saving money and booking easily. Since 2008, we have helped people book more than 8 million hotel rooms. We have been recognized locally and nationally among the fastest growing companies and as a top workplace. Here’s a sample: Inc. 5000 List of America’s Fastest-Growing Private Companies, Utah Business Magazine Fast 50 (#9), UV50 Fastest Growing Companies in Utah Valley (#9), Mountain West Capital Network’s Utah 100 (#22), Deloitte Technology Fast 500 (#155), and The Salt Lake Tribune Top Workplace.

Our data services team is looking for a mid- to senior-level Data Software Developer with a passion for creating an elegant yet simple data API primarily in python. The API includes ingestion, processing, storage, retrieval, and monitoring. The position will also help build a data science API for supporting building, testing, and deploying of statistical models.
Job Requirements*
Experience with the following:

· Python, Flask, ORMs

· AWS SQS, S3, EC2, Streams

· Docker

· Postgres
Benefits*
Health insurance, PTO, Paid Holidays, 401k with matching
Competitive compensation with quarterly bonuses
Flexible work schedule with remote days
Fun and casual company culture based upon respect and results
Great “friends and family” travel booking site that can save you and your friends a ton of cash! We want you to experience travel.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $94,488.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.9,"TravelPass Group
4.9","South Jordan, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,"Hotels, Motels, & Resorts",Travel & Tourism,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
187,Azure Databricks Data Engineer,$56k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Collaborate with business stakeholders to identify and meet data requirements
Management of data workflows and pipelines
Responsible for collecting, moving, storing, and preparation of data infrastructure
Manage and secure the flow of structured and unstructured data from multiple sources like ingest, egress , and transform data
Manage, monitor, and ensure the security and privacy of data to satisfy business needs
Other duties as assigned

5 +yrs of Azure experience
Experience with PySpark, Spark SQL, Databricks (notebooks), and Azure Synapse.
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,"BRMi
4.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
188,Associate Machine Learning Engineer,$78k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking recent college graduates and M.S. recipients in technical disciplines who are strongly motivated to contribute directly to solving real defense and intelligence challenges by providing ""game-changing"" operational solutions for our government sponsors. These individuals will join a team that is developing state-of-the-art algorithms to automatically analyze and identify key attributes from a wide variety of data sources. As part of the Advanced ISR Solutions team, you will work closely with domain experts and have access to cutting edge hardware to analyze large datasets, create new analytical tools, and address problems of critical national importance. This is an excellent opportunity to be part of an ambitious team committed to strong collaboration and intellectual rigor.

Responsibilities include:
Keep current with computer vision and machine learning research to replicate and baseline new techniques published in academia
Run experiments comparing state-of-the-art methods with a strong focus on performance when these methods are applied to sponsor driven data and real-world conditions
Adapt research done in academia and industry to our sponsors’ uniquely challenging data sources and problems sets
Develop prototype software to demonstrate feasibility of the algorithm/approach to our sponsors
Code in MATLAB, Python, or other scripting languages for prototyping/testing algorithms and software tools in a team environment
Analyzing data from cutting-edge sensor systems including video, infrared, hyperspectral, and others
Brainstorming/problem solving with experienced technical staff to develop solutions for challenging problems and working with small teams to implement those solutions
Developing front-end interface software for web applications or mobile devices
Possess demonstrated ability to provide deliverables or parts of deliverables to customer
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical, Computer or Systems Engineering or related field
1+ years of relevant experience
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with the ability to possess/maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Strong problem-solving skills and capable of working with scientists, analysts, and technical software developers
Strong software development skills, preferably with knowledge of machine learning and/or deep learning frameworks
Domain knowledge of machine learning and computer vision techniques for classification, detection, and key attribute extraction
Practical experience in statistics and knowledge of big data biases
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in technical field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active DoD clearance are preferred
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
189,Computer Science Machine Learning Engineer,$85k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

If you are a talented and motivated early career computer scientist (or equivalent) looking to put your skills to use in a challenging environment that includes supporting military tactical operations and military intelligence, then this is the opportunity for you! MITRE’s Army Division has openings for recent graduates in computer science, machine learning, software engineering or similar degree programs to work a variety of cutting edge projects in information warfare, command and control, fire support (artillery), smart munitions, intelligence, signal processing and much more. The technical work areas include applying machine learning for real-time signal processing, data modeling/management, sensor integration, and UML for software designs. Modern technologies such as React, Node.js, Angular, Protobuf, git, NOSQL, Atlassian, Slack, and more are utilized. Opportunities in research and development exist in such areas as Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Natural Language Processing, and Distributed Computing to support the Army command, control, communications and intelligence capabilities of the future!

MITRE’s Army division has locations in Aberdeen, MD; McLean, VA and other locations.

Responsibilities include:
Develop and hone machine learning algorithms and techniques for real-time operations
Develop software using agile processes and tools (JIRA, git, Jenkins/gradle, and more)
Deliver machine learning based designs and prototypes to Army R&D and Acquisition, Logistics and Technology sponsors
Develop methods and algorithms to represent complex data into usable formats and presentation for decision making
Evaluate technologies and commercial products for potential military applicability
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Programming Language experience with either
Java or similar object-oriented language
Python
Understanding of current machine learning techniques, methods and best-practices
Understanding of software design patterns and best practices
Enthusiasm and a desire to learn and grow
Candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance which requires US citizenship
Preferred Qualifications:
Advance degree Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Two years of relevant experience
Proven experience with machine learning
Building software with languages/frameworks such as Maven
Understanding of databases (relational or NOSQL)
Familiarity with serialization formats including JSON, XML, and Google Protobuf
Technical writing skills such as drafting software designs and technical guidance
Strong interpersonal, briefing, and communication skills
Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
190,Senior Data Engineer,$91k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
191,"Staff Scientist I, Life Sciences",$79k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"STAFF SCIENTIST I, LIFE SCIENCES

EH&E, the Company:
EH&E is an employee owned company that provides businesses, agencies and institutions with innovative and cost saving solutions for their health and safety, environmental and engineering needs. We protect hospitals, higher education institutions, biotech/pharmaceutical companies and governmental agencies against pollutants/contaminants such as mold, ensuring safety in the workplace. Headquartered in our aesthetically beautiful, remodeled office in Newton, Massachusetts; EH&E is a trusted, recognized partner engaged with international governmental agencies, Global 5000 enterprises, and leading education and healthcare facilities. www.eheinc.com
Job Description:
As a representative of EH&E's Life Sciences team, a Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who works with our biotechnology and research laboratory clients throughout New England. Educates, trains, and provides support to operations in the development and execution of consistent safety and environmental management programs. Directs accident investigation programs, develops accident trends, and develops programs for improving performance. Ensures compliance with all safety and environmental programs. Directs a proactive safety and environmental program. Improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Managing Principal Consultant or Senior Scientist. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, respectful and professional image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Consults with Principal Investigators and laboratory personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance.
QA/QC:
Participates in Institutional Biosafety Committee (IBC) and Laboratory Safety Committee meetings.
Conducts or oversees periodic inspections of laboratories by qualified personnel in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies; conducts air sampling for specific materials used in the research environment
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Assists clients with identification of appropriate biological laboratory containment levels, and strategies for hazard assessment and control
Assist in project/study design
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online biosafety and laboratory EH&S training programs. Topics include laboratory safety and chemical hygiene, biosafety, NIH recombinant DNA, OSHA Bloodborne Pathogens Standard, Shipping (IATA/DOT), and other customized training. Updates written materials regarding biological safety and laboratory EH&S (e.g., Biosafety Manual, Chemical Hygiene Plan, Hazard Communication, etc.).
Conducts follow-up with laboratory personnel as needed.
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a team member/project manager.
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Performs risk assessments and job safety analyses for work involving chemical and biological materials.
Conducts air sampling and personal monitoring for specific materials used in the research environment; inspects and/or tests and audits the performance of safety equipment such as but not limited to emergency safety showers and eyewash stations, chemical fume hoods and spill kits; performs respiratory protection fit-testing.
Assists in shipping hazardous materials and biological materials; investigates research environment incidents; responds to chemical, biological, and after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information.
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintain context and understanding the audience.
Financial Management:
Be able to work to timelines and report any deviations to this to management.
Achieve project profitability goals.
Key Skills:
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
Commercial awareness
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers).
Education / Training:
Bachelor of Science (BS) or Master of Science (MS) in Biology, Microbiology, Molecular Biology, or related subject.
Industrial experience in a research laboratory, clinical laboratory, or biotech industry environment; or, at least experience working within an environmental health and safety department for a biotech or research facility. Background working with radioactive materials or radiation safety.
Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:
Registered Biosafety Professional; Certified Industrial Hygienist; Certified Safety Professional; HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification; membership in the American Biological Safety Association; membership in the American Industrial Hygiene Association.",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
192,Senior Data Scientist,$116k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
193,Principal Data Scientist - Manufacturing Technology,$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"Climb to new heights on your journey when you start Defining Possible with Northrop Grumman. Enjoy a purposeful career in aeronautics that is crucial to the way we connect and protect our world across land, sea, and air. Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today. Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.

Our Aeronautics Systems sector is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals. This position will support our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation development team and will be located in Palmdale, CA.

Our organization is currently working to build a revolutionary kind of production factory, an IIoT Smart Factory, and we need your help to shape the foundation! As a member of the Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation team, you will identify, develop and implement data analytics, and machine learning technologies for production within our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation organization. The role will define, develop, and design manufacturing concepts and processes for production applications of manufacturing technologies with a focus on digital manufacturing technologies and applications including, but not limited to, point of use work instructions, industrial internet of things (IIoT), and data analytics solutions for manufacturing processes.

The position requires a strong understanding of computer and database systems as well as data analytics workflows. You will need to be familiar with data ETL processes and standard machine learning techniques. The position requires strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Strong written and oral communication skills are required as the position involves extensive interfacing with internal and external customers, program offices, engineering disciplines, and industry suppliers. You must have a proven ability to drive business results with your data-based insights. The role will require the individual to be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The desired candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Essential Job Functions:
Develop analytical models to support manufacturing operations
Perform in-depth data analysis and report findings
Build and support dashboards / visuals
Support ETL Pipelines as needed
Assess new technologies and software platforms to assist in development of IIoT capability
Support project management and planning as required
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency. Continuous interface with stakeholders and customers is required.
Support and enforce the Agile methodology and framework used by the project team
Keeps current on advances in the field of IIoT with demonstrating strategic big picture thinking.

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree in STEM with 3 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD STEM
Bachelor's Degree (non-STEM) with 7 years' of experience with information system, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree (non-STEM) with 5 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR PhD (non-STEM) with 2 years' experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming;
Experience with one or more: Python, R, C, C++, Java, JavaScript
Experience with querying databases and defining schemas (MS SQL)
Experience with high volume production ETL pipelines
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on production environments
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience manipulating data using pandas, NumPy, or similar
Experience building analytical models using scikit, SciPy, or similar
Experience with version control software such as Git
Experience with data visualization tools using Tableau or similar
Experience with Command Line / Terminal scripting
Ability to perform data analysis and report findings
Proven ability to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Extensive knowledge of MS Office Products
Self-starter who is able to work with minimal direction
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a DOD Secret or Top Secret Clearance as well as Program Special access within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the company to meet its business needs
Ability to travel 10-15% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:
STEM Degree (Science, Technical, Engineering, or Mathematical)
Experience in a fabrication and/or assembly manufacturing environment
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience using Kepware and/or Thingworx to develop IIoT technologies
Experience with Javascript, HTML / CSS to support IIoT dashboards and visuals
Experience with machine communication protocols such as MQTT, MTConnect, OPC
Experience with modern ETL / Big Data tools such as Kafka, Nifi, and Spark
Experience building system architectures using visual tools such as Visio
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in the development, capture, and/or execution of R&D technology initiatives and experience in Digital Manufacturing technology applications
Familiarity with DFARS-NIST-800-171 specification for cyber security
Current active Secret or Top Secret clearance preferred
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Palmdale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
194,Data Analyst - Case Specialist,$40k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a fast-growing company with a vibrant, entrepreneurial culture, dedicated to being the top provider in the class action recovery space! Financial Recovery Technologies has become a trusted partner to hedge funds, mutual funds, custodians, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investment firms. Our best-in-class people and technology have made FRT a market leader.

As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will work with case and client data to ensure we deliver accurate, high-quality damages and eligibility information to our clients, providing the information they need in order to make decisions about whether and how to pursue recovery opportunities after portfolio losses.

The Role: As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will:
Own and master case (lawsuit) information, as well as client data as it relates to specific cases
Dig deeply into clients’ transactions and holdings data to perform reconciliation, identify data gaps, and find potential solutions
Ensure the accuracy and quality of data relating to clients' eligibility to recover funds in connection with the settlement of lawsuits and enforcement actions
Bridge the gap between the technical and the nontechnical
Translate between our legal and technical teams, ensuring an accurate interpretation of legal and financial language in legal documents and an appropriate application of that language to the data at hand
Understand corporate actions and their impact on clients' trading history
Communicate results of client data analysis to non-technical client service professionals to facilitate client decision-making
Ask questions and test assumptions made in the handoff of information between our legal, case, and data operations teams
Build strong relationships with peers across corporate functions, including:
Client service professionals, who you’ll work with to provide clients with complex eligibility analyses
Operations professionals, who will rely on your analysis skills in filing claims, remediating deficiencies, and remitting payments
Product and technology teams, who will count on you to serve as a resource as they develop technology to support operational requirements
Our ideal candidate has:
Deep analytical experience, including hands-on work processing information and testing assumptions - a minimum of 3 years' overall professional experience is necessary
Solid experience in financial services (experience in trading or with derivatives would be a plus!), as well as strong SQL skills
Top candidates will be able to recognize and understand the relevant features of various financial instruments in client-provided data and incorporate that understanding into high-quality loss analytics
Experience evaluating existing processes and developing effective process improvements;
An ability to multitask, prioritize, and balance varied tasks on a daily basis;
Strong verbal communication skills
Self-confidence sufficient to execute on tasks independently, trust his/her judgment, and yet know when to ask questions
An intellectually curious personality and a demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement
WHAT FRT OFFERS:
Competitive salary and bonus
Health, dental, vision
401k (with company match)
Income protection plans (life, accidental death and dismemberment, short- and long-term disability) and access to a suite of voluntary benefits
Fun, smart, diverse colleagues
Currently we are remote but under normal circumstances we also offer:
Close to public transit (walking distance to Wellington T on Orange Line)
Free drinks and snacks
Free parking onsite
Free access to onsite gym
THIS POSITION IS BASED IN OUR MEDFORD, MA HEADQUARTERS. LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY, PLEASE.

AGENCIES: WE ARE NOT WORKING WITH AGENCIES ON THIS REQUISITION.",4.5,"Financial Recovery Technologies
4.5","Medford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
195,"Data Engineer, Warehouse",$41k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bookbyte is looking for a Warehouse Data Engineer to help architect and develop our evolving data platform. The Warehouse Data Engineer role will be part of our growing data team, interfacing closely with software engineering. If you are a highly independent worker and have excellent organizational and problem-solving skills, this is the job for you.

Working at Bookbyte also means full benefits, a competitive salary, and a friendly work environment. While Bookbyte is based out of Oregon, we are a remote-first company.

As a member of a small but growing data team, you will be working closely with business partners, and software engineering teams playing a vital role in the design, build, and maintenance of OLTP data stores; providing timely, accurate, and reliable information to all aspects of the business. As we incrementally improve and expand our company, you will be building new systems from the ground up or replacing legacy systems outright, free from supporting legacy code bases.
Duties and Responsibilities*
Development, construction, and maintenance of data models within Data Warehouse(s) (Dimensional modeling/Kimball)
Conduct testing on large scale data platforms
Handle error logs and build robust data pipelines
Ingest and transform structured and semi-structured data into data models
Administration of Data Warehouse(s)
Manage data lake(s)
Translate business requirements into technical specifications
Participate in all design reviews and requirement sessions, as required
Understand database design, programming concepts, cloud architecture patterns, and data modeling
Communicate ideas to both technical and non-technical people in all levels of the organization
Create or update technical documentation for transition to support teams, including data flows and transformations
Develop automated data audit, testing, and validation processes
Stay up to date on ever-evolving technologies
Minimum Job Requirements*
3+ years of data warehousing experience
Expert SQL skills and database ETL/ELT
Proficient with GIT
Experience with public cloud solutions (i.e., AWS (preferred), Azure, GCP)
In-depth knowledge of relational databases (e.g. PostgreSQL, MSSQL)
Preferred Qualifications*
Experience in delivering solutions based on Agile principles
Experience with DBT
Experience with Snowflake
BS in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field, or equivalent job experience
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $43.00 - $53.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
AWS: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
Fully Remote
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
Bookbyte.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",3.8,"BOOKBYTE
3.8","Salem, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
196,Data Analyst -,-1,"_DO NOT APPLY THROUGH INDEED -- PLEASE READ BELOW_*
Consideration of a candidate’s application requires completion of an online application by the expiration of this posting on the Brockport Central School District's website at https://www.applitrack.com/brockport/onlineapp/*.
Minimum Qualifications: *Graduation from high school or possession of an equivalency diploma, plus EITHER:
(A) Three (3) years paid full-time or its part-time equivalent experience in the organization, analysis and manipulation of data utilizing a database management system; OR,

(B) Graduation from a regionally accredited or New York State registered college or university with an Associate’s degree in any computer science, management information systems, or information technology field, plus one (1) year paid full-time or its part-time equivalent experience as described in (A) above; OR,

(C) An equivalent combination of education and experience as defined by the limits of (A) and (B) above.
Primary Responsibility: * The Data Analyst reports directly to the Assistant to the Superintendent for Secondary Instruction, and works closely with the Assistants to the Superintendent for Elementary Instruction and Inclusive Education. The role of the Data Analyst is responsible for maintaining various student and staff information databases in addition to compiling, reporting and managing data required by the NYSED.
Key Functions**: *
· Coordinates data collection including collaborating with all buildings and staff in the district to ensure timely and accurate submission to NYSED. Some of this data includes but is not limited to BEDS, APPR, personnel information, attendance/enrollment, student scores, district report cards, NYSED data warehouse, school lunches, etc.

· Compiles, organizes and analyzes student and staff data as requested by Administration as well disseminates data efficiently and effectively.

· Assists district administrators in understanding data and how to interpret and use data in the decision making process. May be required to facilitate meetings and discussions regarding data and support the administrative team in their responsibilities.

· Assists administrative staff in utilizing and troubleshooting network and other technology including but not limited to the use of the district web development tool and office productivity products.

· Performs other duties as assigned.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $19.50 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
There is a daily health screening for staff and students who will be on campus each day.

Company's website:
https://www.applitrack.com/brockport/onlineapp/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Brockport Central School District
4.1","Brockport, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,School / School District,Preschool & Child Care,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
197,Big Data Engineer,$76k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Big Data Engineer

Ann Arbor, MI

Are you looking for a stimulating company atmosphere where your efforts will have a significant impact on redefining the supply chain analytics market to fuel our company's success? Were driven by people who have a passion for technology and innovation; we are a fun, results-driven company that thrives on delivering value to customers and making a difference in the world leveraging our solutions. If this sounds like you, come join our herd!

At LLamasoft, our mission is to elevate lives and organizations through the science of smarter decision-making. Powered by AI and advanced analytics, our enterprise decision platform enables business leaders to solve problems in new ways and make smarter decisions faster as their business and operating models change. We are pioneering the use of a true digital twin of the extended supply chain combined with our powerful algorithms and deep supply chain, data engineering, AI and operational expertise. LLamasoft deploys decision solutions through enterprise ready apps, custom apps, and an extensible no-code App Studio.

The Role:

LLamasoft is looking for an experienced Big Data Engineer to join our amazing team and be part of our next-gen supply chain cloud platform. As a Big Data engineer, you will work as part of the Data Architecture team and interact closely with other data engineers & DBAs, Software Development, Architecture, DevOps, and Platform Success to build out our next-generation data architecture for our cloud platform in AWS and Azure.

You will be directly involved in the execution of tactical and strategic data related projects. You will develop data infrastructure and data pipelines to support data ingestion & enrichment, analytics, and visualization uniting data across disparate sources and scales, from small ad hoc datasets to cloud scale datasets. You will have the opportunity to learn, grow and prosper with the team along with maintaining the work-life balance and highest work ethics.

Job Description:

• Design, maintain and normalize multi-tenant enterprise data warehouse

• Ensure our data architecture supports the requirements of the business

• Help improve the volume, velocity and veracity of our data

• Implement cloud based ETL/ELT architecture for ingesting high volume data

• Enabling bi-directional data pipelines using APIs and cloud-based tools

• Implement best practices for data collection, partitioning and performance

• Ability to produce aggregated datasets for efficient cross-business analysis

• Mapping and designing ingestion and transformation from various data source

• Implement data modeling, security and data management best practices

The Qualifications:

• Bachelors in computer science, Software Engineering or related technical field

• 3+ years of experience in Big Data projects using Hadoop/Spark or similar technology

• Understanding of data warehousing and data lake design patterns

• 3+ years of data engineering / development / integration experience

• Build ETL pipelines with Kafka, Spark and RDBMS (MSSQL preferred)

• Experience with open source workflow tools like airflow, apache Nifi, mlflow and Apache Spark • Vendors integration with Databricks, Qubole, AWS Glue or Azure DF

• Fluent in SQL and at least one scripting language (Python, Java or Scala)

• Cloud computing on AWS, Azure, GCP

• Should have experience in leading teams and working with cross functional teams

• Ability to work with geographically distributed teams

• Strong oral and written communication

About LLamasoft:

Over 750 of the worlds most innovative companies rely on LLamasoft to design operational strategies to achieve profitability and growth goals. In addition to helping our customers identify billions of dollars in value, LLamasoft partners with humanitarian organizations, government entities and the World Economic Forum, using our solutions to design and optimize health supply chains around the globe in order to reach our goal of positively impacting 100 million lives by 2022.

LLamasoft is an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

If you require reasonable accommodation in completing this application, interviewing, or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please direct your inquiries to accommodation@llamasoft.com.

Powered by JazzHR",4.3,"LLamasoft
4.3","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
198,Data Scientist - Genomics,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualifications & Competencies:

Required

- Ph.D. or completion within 6 months in Computer Science, Applied Math or Statistics, - Computational Biology or related field; or M.S. degree with three or more years experience.

- Proficiency in quantitative modeling techniques such as statistics, machine learning, optimization, and simulation

- Proficiency in predictive modeling including comprehension of theory, modeling/identification strategies and limitations/pitfalls

- Proficiency in at least one modern programming language (e.g. Python, Java, etc.)

- Strong communication including the ability to make presentations and deliver complex quantitative analyses in a clear, concise and manner

- Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills

Desired

- Knowledge of a biological domain such as genetics, molecular biology, or plant breeding

- Experience applying analytical techniques to genetic or genomic data

- Experience with Cloud Computing environments",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
199,Data Engineering Lead,$85k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


The Data Engineering Lead manages the design and build of modern analytics environments that comprise of raw data stores (data lakes) and cleansed data repositories by batch or streaming data pipelines. The Data Engineering Lead creates a robust, sustainable and flexible design and leads the technical delivery using Agile delivery frameworks like Scrum or Kanban. Should be a proven leader and mentor skilled at enabling and serving the development team.

Responsibilities
Developing and managing data processes to ensure that data is available and usable
Creation and automation of data pipelines and platforms
Managing and monitoring data quality via automated testing frameworks (Data Driven Testing, TDD, etc.)
Working closely with Architects, Data Scientists, and DevOps to design, build, test, deliver, and maintain sustainable and highly scalable data solutions
Researching data acquisition and evaluating suitability
Integration of data management solutions into client environment
Actively managing risks to data and ensuring there is a data recovery plan
Qualifications
7+ years relevant professional work experience.
Minimum of 5 years of hands on development experience in a technical role.
Explaining technical concepts in a business value context.
Technically savvy, entrepreneurial spirit who thrives in environments that reward self-initiative and resourcefulness.
Experience and expertise in the following:
Creating robust and extensible data pipelines for production systems
Use of cloud platforms, preferably AWS
Creating secure, performant, and well-modeled data stores
Common analytical platform architectural patterns (Star Schema, data integration patterns, ABAC, data quality frameworks etc.)
Data lake design patterns and technology options (schema on read, metadata capture, search framework)
Use of scripting languages, preferably Python
Source code version control management using git
Experience using NoSQL (e.g. Mongo, Neo4j) databases and data structures.
Excellent communication skills to be able to interact directly with non-technical client stakeholders and act in a business-to-technical translation role.
Experience working in an onsite client technical consulting environment preferred.
Experience working within Agile Frameworks, such as Scrum or Kanban.
About Excella


Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact.

Here's what you can expect from us:
You'll work with great people who love what they do: our team includes published authors, certified trainers, and internationally renowned speakers.
We have a ""bring your own device"" workplace and will share the cost of a new computer of your choice -- Mac or PC. It's up to you.
We'll invest in your career by providing 3 days of paid professional development every year, including travel and registration fees to attend classes and conferences, in addition to tuition assistance for degrees and certifications.
Starting day one, every employee is bonus eligible and receives 15 days of paid vacation, 6 federal holidays, and 4 floating holidays.
You can bike, drive, or metro to work -- our commute reimbursement plan has you covered.
You'll have fun! We hold monthly social events all year long, including a summer event for you and your family.
Excella is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.0,"Excella Consulting
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
200,"Research Scientist, Genetics",-1,"ABOUT FULGENT: *
Fulgent is a leader in genetic and genomic clinical testing, a publicly traded company located in Los Angeles, California. We are a technology-driven company with extensive academic/clinical experience and capabilities in Next Generation Sequencing and bioinformatics. This distinction has advanced us to the forefront of the rapidly advancing genetic and genomic testing industry.

Fulgent's unique chemistries and superior proprietary bioinformatics pipeline has propelled our explosive growth in recent years. We offer the most expansive set of clinical genetic tests in the world, including 22,000+ single gene tests, 900+ preset panels, rearrangement testing, clinical exome/trios, whole exome/trios, whole genome and our All-in-One reflex test. We are a CLIA and CAP accredited laboratory. Fulgent has state-of-the-art clinical, sequencing and bioinformatics tools, including the latest Illumina sequencers such as the NovaSeq.
SUMMARY OF POSITION: *
The Genetic Scientist, R&D position will be responsible for the development, design, execution and implementation of scientific research projects in support of Fulgent’s new product development effort. Our Genetic Scientist, R&D will initiate study projects, investigate feasibility of potential projects, designs & develop methods and assays, generate and interpret study results through application of scientific principles and analytical techniques.
KEY JOB ELEMENTS: *
Develop, test and evaluate Next Generation Sequencing technologies.
Identify bottlenecks and potential solutions for streamlining testing procedures.
Design high throughput and scalable next generation sequencing assays for fully automated clinical laboratories.
Extensive hands-on use and troubleshooting of automated clinical laboratories’ preparation and Illumina sequencing instruments.
Responsible for analysis of next generation sequencing data and interpretation of results.
Identify clinical genetic variants and associated risks, contribute to reviews of genetic traits or clinically relevant diseases.
Identify genetic markers and corresponding phenotypes for reporting.
Develop criteria for marker selection and develop risk algorithms.
Conduct quality control of algorithms for new and updated panels.
KNOWLEDGE / EXPERIENCE: *
PhD or Master Degree in Molecular Biology, Biochemistry, Genetics, or related biological sciences field of studies.
5+ Experience with genetics or molecular biology techniques including DNA and RNA library preparation, Target amplification, and NGS.
Knowledge of human genetics, NGS, and genotyping experience required.
Prior experience with CLIA/CAP laboratory and genetic company is highly preferred.
Basic understanding of bioinformatics.
Knowledge of HIPAA and laboratory SOPs, regulatory and safety procedures.
Ability to correlate next generation sequencing data with changes in the laboratory procedure.
Attention to detail and accuracy are crucial for the position.
Ability to work independently and also in a collaborative environment.
Ability to multitask and prioritize laboratory and data analysis tasks.
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to successfully complete projects.
REPORTS TO: *
Director of R&D
COMPENSATION & BENEFITS: *
This is a full-time position. Fulgent Genetics offers competitive compensation and benefits package which includes but not limited to salary, health insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, life insurance, 401(K), profit sharing and continue education program.

Job Type: Full-time

Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Parental leave
Relocation assistance
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",-1,Fulgent Genetics,"Temple City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
201,Senior Data Engineer,$86k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"As the Senior Data Engineer, you are responsible for implementing Social Solutions’ data platform to enable strategic business outcomes in an inspired, world-class, high-performing culture. You will act as a key technical leader for our data architecture and implementation, working closely with our team of data scientists in the Product Development organization, reporting to our VP of Product Development.

Social Solutions uses a cloud data platform to advance the data-driven decision making capabilities of our clients. We continue to invest in our cloud platform as we strive to put data driven decisions at the forefront of our client’s day to day operations. We power the philanthropic work of thousands of non-profit and public sector organizations and are looking to increase the predictive power and collaborative capabilities of our platform.

As a Senior Data Engineer at Social Solutions, you'll perform work you can feel proud of in an environment full of passionate collaborators. You'll find a team of like-minded developers who live for building software and solving problems for our philanthropic clients. If you can't wait to take your skills to the next level, share your expertise with other brilliant technologists, and change the philanthropic landscape, this is where you belong.

What You’ll Do
Collaboratively develop the technology & capability roadmap for the Social Solutions data ecosystem.
Lead the implementation of sustainable tools & processes to support the big data ecosystem.
Lead the evaluation, implementation and deployment of emerging tools & process in the data space.
Work with your data scientist peers to ensure proper data pipelines are in place to support data modeling needs.
Partner with product owners and data scientists to develop technical architectures for strategic enterprise projects and initiatives.
Collaboratively troubleshoot technical and performance issues in the data ecosystem.
Work with complex Data modeling and design patterns for BI/Analytics reporting requirements.
Collaborate with both internal and external stakeholders to ensure data privacy and master data management needs are met.
Design and develop extract, transform, and load (ETL) mappings, procedures, and schedules.
Broad Solution/Enterprise architecture experience cross Data, API, and Cloud architectures
Experience with large scale, complex enterprise integration systems in a high availability, high volume, performance environment.
Understanding of cloud application design principles (micro-services, 12-factor apps, stateless application meant for cloud, containers, etc.).
Strong technical experience with designing data lake, pipelines, and data model.
Strong technical experience with ETL tools.
Experience in data warehouse environment, including data design, database architecture, metadata and repository creation.
Education
BS in Computer Science or equivalent

Why We’re Awesome

Recently named one of Built In Austin’s Best Places to Work for in Austin. At Social Solutions, we’re mission focused and results oriented! We’re a diverse team of innovators, creatives, and digital architects that come together to help organizations transform lives. Our clients affect countless lives every day. That’s why we go above and beyond to provide tools to get the job done. We help non-profits get to the heart of their data so they can maximize their efforts to be more impactful. In essence, we help those that are changing the world.

What You’ll Get
Amazing coworkers
Flexible PTO
100% employer paid benefits for employees
8 hours per quarter of paid volunteer time
Company sponsored events and happy hours
Career advancement opportunitiesand more!
To ensure candidate and employee health, Social Solutions is conducting the interview process remotely via Zoom for the foreseeable future. Thank you in advance for your cooperation!

In order fulfill Social Solutions’ mission to “help people transform lives,” we seek to build teams that leverage diverse perspectives to create an innovative and welcoming environment.

To that end, we make employment decisions based on qualifications, merit, and business need. Social Solutions does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability.",3.4,"Social Solutions
3.4","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
202,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Introduction to Shield
Shield AI’s mission is to protect service members and civilians with artificially intelligent systems. For our team, no idea is too ambitious. We don’t ever want to stop working to make possible what looks out of reach today. We have assembled a world-class team dedicated to shaping the future of artificially intelligent systems. We are backed by top tier venture capital investors, have been shipping product since 2018 and are rapidly expanding.

Job Description
Are you a passionate and innovative software engineer looking to help develop state of the art AI products? Are you eager to make a positive difference in the world? Do you want to work alongside mission driven and values focused teammates? Shield AI is just the place for you!
As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will work on exciting applications of machine learning for robotic systems. You will work alongside a team of passionate and driven engineers to solve a wide variety of challenging problems to include object detection, scene understanding, face verification, and action recognition. You will conduct literature reviews to drive team decisions and develop a framework for training, validation, and evaluation. Your contributions will help provide the situational awareness that is essential to the safety of our users!
Join us to push the state of the art in autonomous robotics for protecting lives.
What you'll do
Develop algorithms for the accurate detection, classification, and localization of high-value objects for tracking and analysis
Develop algorithms for scene understanding; build scene graphs, recognize obstacles for navigation, and estimate threat or intent
Contribute to our machine learning foundation tools for curating data and developing/analyzing models
Inform sensor decisions for optimal approaches to machine learning for product requirements
Develop state-of-the-art approaches in the areas described above, as applied to our unique problems
Projects you might work on
Improving the tooling and pipelines that allow us to develop models at scale
Developing and optimizing models for multiple tasks of interest
Extending models to optimize execution and pull in more functionality such as tracking or motion prediction
Developing robust APIs for easy interfacing with internal and external software components
People we're looking for have the following required education and experience
5+ years of professional work experience as a machine learning and/or software engineer
MS in Computer Science or Engineering, similar degree, or equivalent practical experience
Experience with contributing to large and complex software projects
Practical experience with machine learning frameworks such as PyTorch and TensorFlow
Competencies
Deep learning model development
Software Engineering
C++
Python
TensorFlow
Caffe/Caffe2
PyTorch
scikit-learn
OpenCV
Multi-threaded development
Excellent communication skills
Preferred qualifications
Experience producing, deploying, and improving production models
Experience with ROS
Experience with CUDA
Passion for solving problems that make a difference
If you're interested in being part of our team, apply now!

Shield AI is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To conform to U.S. Government regulations, applicant must be a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S., protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3), or eligible to obtain the required authorizations from the U.S. Department of State.",4.8,"Shield AI
4.8","San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
203,Associate Scientist NGS,-1,"Job title*
Associate Scientist NGS
Job description*
At Loop Genomics we strive to build genomics tools that bring clarity to genetic data. Our technology platform integrates innovation in molecular biology with the design constrain of
Illumina’s cost-effective short-read sequencers to bring researchers long read-lengths and ultra- low error rates.

We are looking for an outstanding team player to join and lead our NGS sample prep team. The individual will provide next generation sequencing service to our customers that incorporates Loop Genomics's long read technology with Illumina's short read sequencing platforms. This includes managing the timeline and progress of the various sequencing projects, as well as performing custom NGS library preparation for the various projects. The individual will also assist in testing and improving the robustness of Loop Genomics’s library preparation kits. This role requires excellent project management skills, outstanding laboratory liquid handling skills and consistent performance of various wet lab operations.

The ideal candidate is a dedicated and detail-oriented individual who thrives in a fast-paced work environment, has a solid background in molecular biology techniques, and shares our passion in bringing technology to change the current paradigm of DNA sequencing.
Key responsibilities*
• Manage the project details and timelines of the service lab sequencing projects and ensure a timely delivery of sequencing data

• Perform sample quality control, modified NGS library preparation, and sequencing according to established protocols

• Keep a detailed record and tracking the customer samples throughout the sample preparation and sequencing process

• Work closely with team members to analyze sequencing data and deliver results to our customers in a timely manner

• Support method troubleshooting efforts and resolve issues, ranging in complexity and scope

• Perform reagent testing and reagent QA/QC according to established protocols

• Prepare and set up kit shipment to domestic and international destinations
Qualifications*
• M.S./Ph.D. in one of the following disciplines -- Biotechnology, Molecular Biology, Bioengineering, Biological Sciences, or equivalent subjects

• 3-5 years of relevant molecular biology laboratory experience such single-channel pipetting, multi-channel pipetting, electrophoresis, DNA bead-based or column-based cleanup, and PCR

• Previous project management, especially at a sequencing core facility, is preferred

• Relevant knowledge of DNA sequencing or other nucleic acid-based technologies

• Good documentation skills and the ability to prioritize and multi-task are a must

• Exhibit strong attention to detail in every aspect of work, including execution, documentation, and communication

• Self-driven, strong ability to work independently as well as collaboratively

• Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Limited personnel in the lab, face masks on at all times, social distancing setup in the lab and office setting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
San Jose, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.loopgenomics.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Loop Genomics,"San Jose, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
204,Functional Data Analyst (2 + Yrs Experience Required),-1,"Company is seeking a Functional Data Analyst to assist senior data analysts in managing, updating, documenting and expanding capabilities of databases and tools using MS Office based products to support the Defense Logistics Agency (DLA) logistics and contracting services; assist in gathering, design, creation, programming, modification, documenting processes and routine maintenance and updating of databases or other data analysis tools used for tracking, managing and analyzing procurement related data elements, KPI's, metrics and data to support continuous process improvement initiatives; provide research and analytical support for reporting and presentations required by management; interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.

Strong interpersonal skills in communication and writing is required. May be required to provide training on the databases and tools to staff. Must possess working knowledge of and experience with MS Office Applications (Microsoft Access, PowerPoint, Word, Excel, and Project), supply chain processes, logistics and business to business procurement or contracting processes. Must be able to obtain a Level IT II access in the Federal Government. EOE

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $61,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
conducting analysis and presenting results: 2 years (Required)
Advanced Excel: 2 years (Required)
logistics as a government contractor: 2 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Company's website:
www.palcorp.net
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.6,"PAL Services
2.6","Richmond, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
205,Analytics Manager,-1,"ANALYTICS MANAGER*
POSITION DESCRIPTION: *This is a senior level, client-facing, management position. This role will work very closely cross-functionally with other teams (Media, AdOps, Channel leads) and requires experience and knowledge in B2B reporting and analytics across Display, SEM, and Social media. This person will need to have an understanding of digital analytics, as well as creative best practices for campaign effectiveness and content nuances by platform (online, video, social, paid search, in app, etc) in order to help drive strategy and measure success. Expect this role to be able to manage all the way from data pulls to presenting the final client deliverables. Candidate must have experience leading digital media reporting for complex campaigns, including a deep knowledge of attribution across media. This position is remote, but the candidate needs to be available during PST business hours. There is flexibility for this role to be FTE or PTE.
ABOUT MEDIA MATTERS WORLDWIDE: * Media Matters Worldwide is a full-service media planning and buying agency headquartered in San Francisco, with remote employees throughout the US. We develop plans across all media—Digital, TV, Radio, Print, Outdoor, Social, Mobile, Email, Direct Mail, and Search. We handle all aspects of media, from beginning to end—research, planning, negotiating, insertion orders, billing, tracking, and optimization. We work with BtoB and BtoC campaigns—direct response and brand campaigns. We pride ourselves on our negotiation skills, leadership, relationships with our clients and vendors, efficiency (we move faster than big agencies), transparency and high level of client service.
KEY QUALIFICATIONS: *
· Seasoned analyst with 8+ years of experience developing analytical dashboards (in-platform or within Excel), solutions and strategy across digital marketing platforms and social ecosystems

· 3+ years of management or team leadership experience

· 5+ years of B2B experience

· Excellent communicator with an eye for design and natural presentations skills that can weave results into a narrative for internal teams and clients to comprehend easily

· In-depth knowledge of digital analytics data, measurement, attribution methodologies and industry standards

· Strong cross-functional team player and self-starter can take a project from start to finish with minimal supervision and ability to balance multiple projects, maintaining an organized approach and patience

· Collaborate across different function teams to craft optimal campaign approach based on various KPIs

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Company's website:
www.mediamattersww.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/MediaMattersSF/",-1,Media Matters Worldwide,"San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
206,Genomic Curator Quality Scientist,-1,"Job Title: * Genomic Curator Quality Scientist
Department: *Product
Reports to: *VP Product & Engineering
Position Type: *Full Time Non-Exempt
PRIORITY RESPONSIBILITY*
Expand and maintain Golden Helix’s lead as curators of the largest repository of clinical and research genomic data. Master the capabilities of Golden Helix genomic analysis software to ensure the quality of new and changing features in conjunction with the development efforts of the product team.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES*
Genomic Data Curator *
Understand and make editorial decisions on genomic data source to prepare them for use in clinical genetic testing and research contexts
Wrangle raw genomic data files into forms ready for usage in Golden Helix software
Write one-off scripts to manipulate and harmonize genomic data for product integration
Write code or run existing tools to simulated genomic datasets that exercise the software feature under test
Write blog posts on new capabilities, FAQs and data curation achievements
Product Quality *
Help develop and run a quality process that covers Golden Helix’s products and bundled data
Master the new and changing capabilities of Golden Helix’s software to ensure their quality
Discover edge cases, off-by-one issues, resource limitations, and rare conditions in which the product does not perform nominally.
Prepare technical documentation for genomic scientists and clinical geneticists to perform their duties using Golden Helix software
Work closely with the product team in the entire lifecycle of bugs and issues.
Investigate customer problems referred by Field Application Scientists.
Other duties as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
_Must have ability to work for any US employer without restrictions_
PhD or equivalent experience in Molecular Biology, Cancer Biology, Oncological Science, Molecular Genetics or related field. A M.S. in Bioinformatics with hands on research experience and NGS domain expertise also encouraged to apply.
Exquisite attention to detail, with a knack for identifying discrepancies or mistakes
Experience in Python and command line bash shell scripting or equivalent
Track record of written and oral communication experience, such as publications, grant applications and conference presentations
Well organized, task-oriented and willingness to take ownership of the quality of a complex product, including performing manual and hands-on tests.
MEASUREMENTS*
The Genomic Curator Quality Scientist will be measured on:
Correct transformation and representation of curated data sources
Quality of products in versioned releases
Timely completion of tasks in regards to the software release schedule.
Contact Information*
If you are interested in this challenging and rewarding position with a fun and exciting company, please send us your resume and cover letter. We look forward to hearing from you!

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data curation: 3 years (Required)
Python programming language: 2 years (Preferred)
Linux: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
Bozeman, MT 59715 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.goldenhelix.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.0,"Golden Helix Inc
3.0","Bozeman, MT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
207,Data Engineer,$48k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"IZEA was built to connect the worlds top brands with influential content creators and publishers to enable influencer marketing and content production at scale. With over 500,000 Creators reaching over 3 billion fans and followers around the globe, IZEA is unmatched in its industry experience, network diversity, and technology ecosystem. A career at IZEA offers countless ways to make an impact in a fast-growing organization!

IZEA is looking for a Data Engineer to join our Core Technology group.

This team member may be located in the Orlando area or remote.

You will use the latest tools and technology to build and support IZEA's industry-leading data initiatives. Whether contributing to our data pipelines that ingest millions of records per hour, distilling vast amounts of data into meaningful insights, or operating the services that surface those insights, you will help define what the future of Influencer and Content Marketing looks like.

You will have direct access to end-users and stakeholders, and you are encouraged to build and leverage these relationships in your work. You will write and test your code, and work with our QA team to get it deployed to production. With the help of a homegrown, bot-driven CI/CD pipeline, your code will be delivered to users daily. This cross-functional team leverages Amazon Web Services for everything from ECS for containerized virtualization and hosting, to S3 for durable object storage, RDS and DynamoDB for persistence, EMR for the batch processing of billions of records, and Lambda for distributed workloads and stream consumption.

Aside from the day to day, we can offer you incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a trust-focused development process, a flexible and collaborative work environment where balance matters, stock ownership, and an annual company retreat.

The team strives to be ego-free and motivated only by building amazing software for our users. We seek to understand the ""why"" behind the ""what"". We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow.

Primary Responsibilities

You will...
Work with stakeholders to define the solutions to development problems and business requirements
Develop and maintain the features and capabilities of our data ingestion pipelines
Extract actionable and impactful insights from vast amounts of data
Develop and maintain the services that surface those insights and make them available for consumption in a performant manner
Create unit and integration tests for your code
Reproduce and fix bugs reported by internal and external users
Set goals and communicate often about your progress toward them
Contribute to the ongoing improvement of the engineering organization and our software
What Were Looking For

A problem solver at heart
Much of our work revolves around problems that have no existing off-the-shelf solution or consensus on best practices. You'll often need to break down large problems into smaller more manageable tasks and utilize critical thinking to come up with novel ideas.
3+ years of engineering experience
Things move quickly in the data group. Youll need to be comfortable and familiar with delivering highly scalable cloud based applications.
Professional experience with frameworks like Hadoop, Spark, or similar
This will be a significant component of your responsibilities. You will be working with large data sets in a distributed environment on a daily basis. Familiarity w/ the Hadoop/Spark ecosystem is a must.
Professional experience with Python data tools
Our data team uses PySpark and Jupyter notebooks extensively. Familiarity with these technologies will also serve you well.
Direct experience with relational and NoSQL databases technologies
We use the best tool for the job around here. When it comes to storing and accessing data, we recognize that the technology decisions we make directly impact our ability to provide a performant customer experience, and our own costs.
Experience designing and building JSON based RESTful APIs
Because we are building our application with a front end framework, we carefully design and document the APIs to power it. To help us, we follow the JSON API spec, but any experience in building a RESTful API will be useful. Remember, the API is your contract with the consumers of your data!
Understanding of monolithic and micro-service based architectures
IZEAx still has some legacy monolithic characteristics. We move more and more of our technology to a distributed set of services, there are new challenges to overcome. Understanding the differences between these two models will help you take those challenges head on.
Basic Linux skills
In order to develop our data pipelines and services, you need to run it on your laptop. This means opening up some terminal windows, running some commands, and keeping the log output open. Additionally, some of our technology stack is better accessed through CLIs. Examples include the Ember CLI, the Rails CLI/console, Docker commands, Gradle, and our own CLIs. We'll walk you through it, but you should be comfy in a terminal.
Ability to multitask and prioritize multiple incoming requests
IZEA's Engineering team strives to provide a great experience and great service to our users. In order to do that, you may need to context switch into a support issue or drop what you are doing to start work on something else. This is part of what Agile means to us.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Regular and timely communication is the key to a trust based development process. You should be able to simply and concisely ask for feedback and direction in terms that your audience understands, and relay requested information in a timely fashion to your leaders. You should prioritize documentation of processes and code.
Demonstrated experience with the following will be highly valued

Data Science Background
While not required, a fundamental understanding of statistics and modeling would be a great asset. Practical experience with Machine Learning and/or complex data pipelines would also be welcome.
Front End development experience
From time to time you may need to build visualization, or (lite) user facing experiences. Familiarity with modern web frameworks like Angular, React, Ember, or Vue would be helpful. Extra bonus points if you have familiarity w/ Javascript based visualization libraries like d3.js or Highcharts.
Amazon Web Services, or other cloud providers
IZEA's software is hosted on AWS, and you will need to acquire some familiarity with it. Previous experience in using a cloud provider, even if just for developer tooling, shows that you understand some of the nuances involved in working in the cloud. Familiarity with Amazons EMR would also be an asset.
Continuous Integration & Deployment
IZEA needs to get features and fixes out to customers as soon as we possibly can with as much confidence as possible. To facilitate this, we have developed a CI/CD pipeline (using 3rd party services). An understanding of what CI/CD is will help you understand how this pipeline works and how to make it even better.
GitHub
All of IZEA's code is source controlled on Github. We leverage Github Pull Requests for code reviews, Github integrations manage parts of our CI/CD pipeline, and Github releases define the code tags that ultimately get deployed. Much of our process documentation exists on Github pages. Familiarity with navigating Github's features will help you ramp up in our SDLC faster.
JIRA
IZEA uses JIRA to manage projects and report on progress to stakeholders inside and outside the company. While we strive to automate as much of JIRA as possible with bots, webhooks and reports, understanding how JIRA issues, links, attachments, and workflows work will help you understand our SDLC faster.
About IZEA:

We are IZEA: The Creator Marketplace. Our cloud-based technologies connect Brands and Publishers with content Creators who blog, tweet, pin, and post on their behalf.

Our driving belief is that the only way to thrive in our rapidly changing world is to change ahead of it. IZEA is in a constant state of evolution and reinvention. While we may have invented the industry, we still operate like an entrepreneurial, scrappy start-up. Your time here will be exciting, educational, and at times, a bit crazy.

With IZEA, you have the opportunity to join a non-traditional corporate culture, where creativity and productivity are valued over a suit and tie. We call it ""The IZEA Way.""

Why would you want to work here?

Our developers use the latest tools and technology to build the applications and services that make up the IZEA Exchange platform. We write in whatever language we need to get the job done including Ruby, Java, Python, PHP, Swift, and Javascript. We leverage the latest frameworks, such as Rails, Symphony2, and Drop Wizard for iterating quickly on our technology.

Our code is deployed and operated by the people who write it, with the help of Amazon Web Services. We leverage everything from EC2 for virtualization and hosting, to Amazon EMR and Machine Learning for advanced analytics.

Aside from the day to day, we offer incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a flexible trust-focused development process, and an open collaborative work environment.

Our team is ego-free and motivated to build great software. We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow as a team.

California residents, please follow this link to view the types of information we may gather from California residents who are applicants, employees, or contractors of IZEA, and how we use such information.

Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"IZEA, Inc
4.1","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
208,Senior Data Engineer,$99k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, August 11, 2020

This position is expected to lead the data architecture and design of the CSBS enterprise data platform. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists. They will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

They will work with analytical teams to gather technical requirements for both capabilities and tools, as well as, accessing and prioritizing ingest of data assets. They will work with the infrastructure and enterprise architect teams to develop and build out the enterprise platform. The will advise the CDO on technical solutions and tradeoffs, liaise with the Enterprise Architecture to ensure standards are met, and work closely with the Security and Policy teams to ensure the organization is in compliance with their policies. In addition, they will work closely with the modernization product leads to ensure the data needs for the analytical teams is built into the modernized application.

In addition, they will help establish and implement metadata strategy aligned with EA strategy to ensure clear visibility into mapping of data assets to applications, and understanding of impact of changes to data models

Essential Functions

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individual with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs.

Translate data analytic technical requirements to cloud architects, contractors, business leaders and IT functional leads in security, infrastructure, and application development

Build strong relationships across IT functions and data analytics teams

Oversee the buildout of the enterprise Data Warehouse/API strategy

Work with the analytics teams to prioritize data assets

Manage contractors and oversee solution delivery

Optimizing data ingest and ETL processes to ensure our products have maximum performance

Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

Navigate conflicting priorities and provide recommendations to the CDO when necessary

Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets

Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management

Work with the Enterprise Architect to establish modeling standards, data quality standards, data integration patterns or transactional and analytical systems.

Additional Responsibilities

Prepare polished technical and non-technical status reports and presentations for senior management

Minimum Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual should possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed and meet the amount of education, training and/or work experience required.

Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent coursework in data management/computer science

Advanced degree preferred

12+ years of experience in data management or data architecture

Experience managing vendors/contractors

Experience with feature/product ownership

Experience with Agile Scrum methodology

Experience writing clear and effective proposals, policies, research summaries, etc.

Development experience with MuleSoft and Informatica preferred; MicroStrategy a plus

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Knowledge of MuleSoft, Informatica, and MicroStrategy

Familiarity with data transformation, warehousing and data modeling

Working knowledge of MySQL and Oracle databases

Understanding of software development protocols

Fluency with AWS cloud storage

Ability to create well-designed, intuitive user interfaces

Skill in communicating with and translating between technical and non-technical people

Knowledge of the financial services industry a plus

Requirements

Must be eligible to obtain or currently possess a U.S. Government clearance at the Public Trust Moderate (NACI) level or higher

Must be a United States citizen or a Legal Permanent Resident (LPR) with at least three (3) years consecutive residence in the United States as indicated on the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) LPR issued card

Values Instilled Behaviors for Excellence

Member/ Customer Service

Capability to build and value relationships

Ability to prioritize work

Advocate and advance member's goals

Teamwork

Ability to give credit to others

Have a “pitch in” attitude

Learns from successes and setbacks

Respect/Trust

Listens and learns from others

Speaks the truth even when uncomfortable

Ability to honor the expertise of others

Collaboration

Recognizes the contributions of others

Ability to consult and communication effectively

Desires to make others successful

Ownership/Engagement

Ability to preserve through adversity

Willingness to experiment and take risks

Plans ahead and is a forward thinking individual

Leadership Competencies

Achievement Oriented Thinking

Has tough conversations and gives feedback to staff

Empowers others

Remains calm under pressure even when presented with unpredictable situations

Change Management

Communicates consistently and effectively with direct reports about the need for, vision for and impact of change.

Manages team through the change

Overcomes obstacles leading to resistance

Self-Awareness

Has knowledge/clarity about “fit” – the type of environment and people that brings out the best in you and your team

Possesses the ability to discern team’s triggers

Knows the consequences of your behaviors

Working Conditions

General office. Travel 3-4 times per year.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Conference of State Bank Supervisors
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
209,Senior Data Engineer,$54k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

JOB DESCRIPTION - SENIOR DATA ENGINEER

ClearOne Advantage is a fast-growing company that is aggressively hiring due to increased business. We are always improving our marketing, culture and technology to provide our employees with the best work atmosphere and our customers with excellent customer service. COA’s proprietary software is tailored to our industry and allows the client to receive the best service possible.

We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer who can develop and maintain COA’s data environment, including data warehousing, data ingestion, ETL/ELT, data exchange, data lineage, and data quality. This role will interact daily with our Data Analytics/Data Science, Finance, Operations, DBAs, Site Reliability, and DevOps teams. Ideal candidate will be smart, passionate about data and eager to continually grow.

If you are looking to work in a team environment, a place where you are more a name than a number, where you interact with leadership daily, then please send your resume for review!

Perks:

● For Baltimore candidates - great location, right on the water in the Canton Crossing Tower

● Casual work environment and remote flexibility

● Room for advancement


Job Requirements

JOB REQUIREMENTS

Job Duties:

● Design and implement data warehouse solutions (schema design, partitioning, data ingestion, security, encryption, scrubbing, optimization, etc.)

● Design and implement data exchange solutions with partners and other third parties (secure data integration, file integrity, data ingestion, data quality, file retention, etc.)

● Design and implement data streaming solutions (clickstream, phone, third party services) for real-time/near-time ingestion into the data warehouse

● Establish programmatic tasks and perform unit tests of code and solutions

● Interface and consume application APIs for batch data ingestion

● Work with Data Science group to design, implement, and optimize analytic solutions

● Work with other departments on reporting design and efficiency

● Follow corporate and team standards for design, security, efficiency, application logging, monitoring/alerting, and documentation

● Triage and fix production application issues

● Stay abreast of new technologies and practices to further enhance team capabilities and own skills

● Participate in on-call rotation to support new and existing products

Qualifications:

● 4+ years hands-on experience in Application Development

● 2+ years operating in an Agile environment

● 3+ years hands-on experience with Microsoft® SQL Server, including using indexes, stored procedures, views, and triggers

● 3+ years hands-on experience with ETL/ELT tools (Five Tran, Informatica, Switch, SSIS, etc.)

● 2+ years hands-on experience with Business Intelligence tools (Tableau, Looker, Microstrategy, Brio, etc.)

● 1+ years working with Snowflake, AWS Redshift, or other commercially scaled cloud data warehouse provider

● 1+ years working in Amazon Web Services (AWS) or other cloud environment

● Awareness of analytics tools (R, SPSS, SAS, etc.), machine learning (Jupyter, etc.), artificial intelligence

● Working knowledge of encryption protocols and data scrubbing methods

● Working knowledge of data streaming tools and methods for real-time/near-time data availability

● Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field / equivalent experience

● Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, rapid growth environment

● Ability to solve problems and learn business rules and processes

● Ability to demonstrate strategic, data-driven thinking combined with efficient implementation

● Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to both technical peers and business customers

● Ability work on a team as well as complete projects and tasks individually

● Hands-on, self-starter with a positive attitude and strong work ethic

● Authorized to work on US. At this time, ClearOne cannot offer sponsorship.

Technical Skills:

● Required – Microsoft SQL Server 2016-2019, T-SQL, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, Snowflake, Fivetran, Python, SFTP, Tableau, Amazon Web Services, JSON, GitHub

● Preferred – MongoDB, NewRelic, JavaScript, .NET Core 3.1, Confluent, Kafka, R, Jupyter

AAP/EEO Statement:

Clear One Advantage provides equal employment opportunity to all employees and job seekers without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under federal, state or local laws.",4.4,"ClearOne Advantage
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
210,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$74k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"About PLAYSTUDIOS

PLAYSTUDIOS is the developer of award-winning casual games for mobile and social platforms, including POP! Slots, myVEGAS Slots, myVEGAS Blackjack, and my KONAMI Slots. The apps are powered by the company’s groundbreaking playAWARDS loyalty platform, which enables players to earn real-world rewards from more than 70 iconic hospitality, entertainment, and leisure brands across 15 countries and four continents. playAWARDS partners include MGM Resorts International, Wolfgang Puck, Norwegian Cruise Line, Resorts World, Gray Line Tours, and Hippodrome Casino, among others. Founded by a team of veteran gaming, hospitality, and technology entrepreneurs, PLAYSTUDIOS apps combine the best elements of popular social games with exciting casino gaming mechanics. To learn more about PLAYSTUDIOS, visit www.playstudios.com

PLAYSTUDIOS is enthusiastically seeking a Senior Business Intelligence Analyst to join the myKONAMI Slots team in Austin. Does the idea of analyzing millions of records, forming insights, and guiding strategic direction for an entire app interest you? Are you a data ninja that can flawlessly write queries, aggregate data to any granularity, and go any length for a game hanging analysis?

If so, look no further. In this role, you will be building complex data sets, automating processes, overseeing A/B testing, and answering big picture questions through ad hoc analysis. You will be a leading voice among product managers, data engineers, and live ops managers to optimize the product. The data, insights, and conclusions you provide will be at the intersection of all strategic decision making.

myKONAMI Slots puts the hottest, real-world casino games in the palm of your hand, letting you enjoy the most authentic slot machine action, any time, any place.

myKONAMI Slots features robust live operations, game content, jackpots, and tournaments. We are a dynamic team working together in Austin, TX to deliver the best player experience.

Responsibilities
Serve as lead and mentor to other BI Analysts on the team
Work alongside the Product Director on monitoring the health of the app and areas of opportunity
Help drive the strategic direction and implementation of the data and architecture and data warehouse
Ensure the accuracy and completeness of the data accuracy and completeness of the data - be the data quality champion for myKONAMI
Take pride in the quality of your work output. Your code, analyses, and documentation all reflect that of someone who is extremely detail-oriented
Own the outcome and success of performance. Partner closely with teams responsible for revenue, product designers, and other teams across the studio to identify and prioritize the most impactful business problems through data-driven intelligence
Translate problems into structured analyses or data products that directly drive actionable insights that maximize value
Reporting and analysis
Update weekly and bi-weekly presentations with performance metrics and recommendations with Product Managers
Create presentations for and present to internal and external teams as well as executives
Conduct ad hoc analysis as needed
Manage all AB tests Instrument in-game actions by working in tandem with Engineering and Data Platform teams, enabling us to track, measure, and evaluate the performance of new features and game content
Required
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, or other quantitative disciplines
5+ years of work experience analyzing large datasets in analytics or product-centric role
2+ years managing others
Advanced Excel, SQL, and Tableau
Strong data visualization skills
Prior experience presenting to executives
Advanced Excel and SQL skills
Knowledge of data management, and working in both structured and unstructured data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and a capacity for translating product and business needs into technical specifications
Strong presentation skills (google slides, ppt) and experience representing internally, externally, and top executives
Ability to work with global cross-functional teams
Strong written and verbal communication skills to go with your technical expertise. It’s second nature for you to tell coherent and compelling narratives around complicated quantitative concepts that can be easily understood by non-technical stakeholders
A team player that is results-focused and an intellectually curious self-starter. You bring a ""can-do"" attitude and are looking to own initiatives end-to-end in a fast-paced, rapidly changing environment
Familiar with and passionate about analyzing user behavior on consumer mobile applications
Preferred
Deep understanding of mobile free-to-play games
Master’s degree in business, economics, statistics, analytics, or another related degree
Ability to build rich and complex data sets for analysis or tool building
Benefits and Perks
100% health benefit coverage for you and your dependents!
Performance-based bonuses.
401K plan and stock options.
Flexible vacation policy.
Great downtown Austin location with extensive nearby dining options and vibrant nightlife.
Employee-driven entertainment, happy hours, and team-building events.
Catered lunches multiple times per week.
Snacks and drinks available in the kitchen.
Casual work environment.
An open, collaborative workspace.
Commuter benefits program.
*** During COVID 19 we are currently working from home
PLAYSTUDIOS is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will be considered regardless of their sex (includes pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, and related medical conditions), race, age, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, military or veteran status, or other protected category under the law.",3.4,"PLAYSTUDIOS, Inc.
3.4","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
211,MANAGING CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS TEAM,$50k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"MANAGING CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS TEAM


Opinion Dynamics seeks a new team member to join our Data Analytics team. This person will act as a Technical Lead to drive innovative thinking, methodologies, and data analytics approaches in the energy space. The Data Analytics group is a dynamic and tightly knit team of individuals from a range of backgrounds working closely together on analytically challenging and methodologically innovative consulting, advising, and research projects to support energy efficiency, distributed energy resources, and grid-focused needs. Our ideal candidate will be adept at both performing complex modeling and analytic tasks and acting as a technical lead on data analytics projects, advising and mentoring staff on analytic approaches as well as performing quality control and assurance. A successful candidate will be able to thrive and perform effectively in an agile and dynamic environment of a consulting firm and is excited to work with a multidisciplinary team of data scientists, statisticians, data analysts, and programmers.

Opinion Dynamics is known for the excellence of our team and our commitment to a corporate culture that fosters innovative thought, growth and enrichment opportunities, passionate employees, collegiality and collaboration.

What we are looking for in an ideal candidate
Demonstrated experience in the energy field, especially in Energy Efficiency, Demand Response, and Distributed Energy Resources
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in engineering, quantitative social science, statistics, political science, economics, computer or data science, or related field
Advanced analytics and modeling skills/data science, including model evaluation and validation best practices
4-6 years of experience working on quantitative data analysis, including econometric modeling or data science, ideally in a consulting environment
Strong programming skills in Python (including the usual data science stack)
Expertise with data engineering in the context of advanced analytical modeling
Highly motivated, with a demonstrated track-record of thinking critically about your work and clearly communicating with other project staff and managers about your work
Strong written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate with clients. Ability to explain complex technical concepts to non-technical audiences.
Strong record of guiding teams and managing projects of various levels of analytic complexity, including client management, budget management, and management of staff hours
Ability to juggle and prioritize multiple tasks and deadlines simultaneously and flexibly
Experience with cloud-based infrastructure for large data management
Additional qualifications of value
Master’s or PhD in statistics, economics, engineering, or related field. An advanced degree and substantial coursework in statistics or data science is a strong plus
Programming skills in other programming languages (R, Java, SQL etc.)
Experience with version control software (e.g. Git) and collaborative code development
Experience with data science and machine learning methods
Experience with experimental and sample design
Demonstrated aptitude with data visualization tools and techniques (e.g. PowerBI, Tableau)
Experience working on a collaborative, cross-functional team
Location

Preferred: Waltham, MA (Company headquarters)

Other locations across Continental United States will be considered.

Submit Your Resume and Cover Letter to the Following Address

CareersMA@opiniondynamics.com

About Opinion Dynamics Corporation

Opinion Dynamics advances knowledge to address emerging energy and social issues

through sound and insightful research. Our inter-disciplinary team of consultants provides actionable research to support the needs of our clients, which include electric and gas utilities, regulators, and stakeholders. Our research and consulting services inform program planning and design, performance assessment, and optimization of energy efficiency, demand response, and distributed energy resources programs. Our company fosters innovative thought, collegiality and growth opportunities for our employees. The Data Analytics Group within Opinion Dynamics is especially focused on taking a data-driven approach to answering complex technical questions.

How to Apply:

To be considered for this position, please submit your cover letter (required) and resume with “Data Analytics Technical Lead” in the subject line. If contacted, please be prepared to complete analytical tests as part of the interviewing process; provide data analysis and writing samples that clearly demonstrate your experience and aptitude in the areas outlined above; as well as supply two or more references who can speak to your experience, work orientation, and work ethic.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.

Responsibilities
Qualifications


To be considered for this position, please send your cover letter and resume to:

Careers: Managing Consultant- Data Analytics Team

careersMA@opiniondynamics.com

Please submit a cover letter and resume to CareersCA@opiniondynamics.com.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics will not provide sponsorship for work authorization for this position. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.",4.2,"Opinion Dynamics
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
212,"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT",-1,"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT

The Scientist-Engineer, MSAT performs process and analytical experimental studies as part of a team that is effectively delivering cell therapy services to clients in accordance with defined scope of work, timelines, and budgets. This includes leading projects in process development, technology transfer and continuous improvement of our client's novel manufacturing processes. Our goal is to support our clients in developing commercially viable cell therapy products, so that they can become accessible to all.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Accountable for the design and execution of experimental studies in the laboratory, for example:
Perform laboratory experiments for client projects; perform analytical testing for client projects
Preparation and scheduling of laboratory equipment for experiments
Provide technical leadership of client products during manufacturing and development, for example:
Direct technical communication with clients during manufacturing and development
Support manufacturing in identifying and resolving manufacturing process constraints
Lead the generation of manufacturing and development documentation, for example:
Generating experiment protocols and reports for development projects
Generating draft batch records and other manufacturing documentation
Generating manufacturing risk assessments, such as FMEA
Perform data analysis to reach actionable conclusions, for example:
Compile and analyze experimental data
Present experimental data internally and externally to clients

Qualifications

Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in relevant life science or engineering discipline
Minimum of 3 years' experience in aseptic cell processing, cell culture and cell analytics under the guidance of scientific protocols
Demonstrated ability to deliver projects to specific timelines and budgets
Experience in working effectively and delegating tasks in a team-based environment
Demonstrated ability in technical writing and the preparation of, protocols and reports, presentations and/or other communications
Basic understanding of the technical principles, theories and concepts of cell therapy or similar products

Competencies/Candidate Profile

Collaboration, Accountability, Adaptability, Can-do, Technical Capacity, Problem Solving, Customer-centric, Communication

Supervisory Responsibility

No supervisory responsibilities

Minimum Required Training (optional)

Aseptic processing, Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP), communication skills, specific process and analytical equipment

Working Environment

This job may require occasional evening and weekend work

Physical Requirements

N/A

Direct reports

N/A

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
in a cell therapy, aseptic environment: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Mountain View, CA 94043 (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.pctcelltherapy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Minaris Regenerative Medicine, LLC","Mountain View, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
213,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$155k-$247k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
214,"Senior Technical Product Manager, Audience Data",$44k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Crossix is a health-focused technology company dedicated to advancing healthcare marketing with analytics and innovative planning, targeting, measurement, and optimization solutions. Positioned at the center of big data, innovative technology, and multichannel media, Crossix, a Veeva Company, provides our clients with insights to help make strategic business decisions and drive improved patient outcomes. Crossix knows that our employees are integral to our success, which is why we have created an inclusive culture where everyone can thrive. Crossix is headquartered in midtown Manhattan with opportunities to work in our NYC office and other locations around the country. Along with competitive salaries and benefits, we invest in opportunities for professional development and career growth, and provide other amenities like a beautiful rooftop, team bonding activities, etc.

Crossix is seeking an intellectually curious, adaptable, resourceful, and collaborative Senior Technical Product Manager, Audience Data to join our Analytics Products team. These are exciting times at Crossix as we grow our business and expand our product offerings to provide increasingly transformative insights to drive marketing decisions at the intersection of big data, health informatics, healthcare marketing, and media!
What You'll Do
Own the development, implementation, configuration, and support of Crossix’s audiences business
Own end-to-end technical product management of all audience products
Develop and own the roadmap for making enhancements to Crossix audience data both in terms of sourcing new data and optimizing usage of current data
Work with product strategy team to create and execute on roadmap for developing customer-facing programmatic targeting, and addressable TV data products
Work with product managers, engineers, data scientists, and analysts to integrate Crossix audience data into various media analytics and health care products
Work with data scientists and analysts to optimize our matching algorithm
Lead efforts to evaluate new data sources
Serve as the point person for all technical and product communication with Crossix audience data partners and internal stakeholders across engineering, analytics, client services, operations, and product strategy
Own product improvement timelines and project planning across a multi-disciplined team
Monitor usage of products in production and identify ways to improve efficiency and identify new required features
Build expertise in current media and data landscape including digital advertising, addressable TV, online video, etc.
What You've Done
5+ years working in a data-intensive product management role
3+ years of experience with audience segmentation, targeting, and measurement
3+ years of experience working with and commercializing large datasets in a digital media platform or environment
Practical understanding of machine learning and propensity modeling strongly preferred. We’re not expecting you to be a data scientist but we want you to be able to understand the basics of best practices for machine learning
3+ years of experience in SQL and databases required
Experience partnering with and integrating data providers
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Perks & Benefits
Flexible PTO
Allocations for continuous learning & development
Health & wellness programs
If this role and our exciting company culture seem appealing to you, please apply! We want to continue to grow our diverse team of hardworking and humble people who are passionate about their work. We hope that’s you!",3.3,"Crossix Solutions
3.3","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
215,"QC/Manufacturing Associate/Scientist, Assays",-1,"AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc., has an exciting Life Science opportunity to join our rapidly growing team responsible for Quality Control (QC)/manufacturing of novel *Protein Kinase* activity assays using peptide sensors. Our innovative and patented fluorescence-based sensor technology is exclusively licensed from MIT and we have a rapidly growing list of new products and services that enable our customers.
Minimum Requirements*
Bachelor's degree in biology, chemistry, biochemistry, or related field.
Highly motivated and self-driven - Thrive in a fast-paced and interdependent working environment.
2 years hands-on lab experience with quantitative microtiter plate-based assays in QC/manufacturing.
Excellent technique including small volume dispensing and strong attention to detail.
Ability to master new techniques and effectively multitask to achieve goals efficiently.
Strong computer skills including Microsoft Office/Access.
Demonstrated organizational, documentation and oral communication skills with ability to work independently and as a team.
Not Required but Preferred Skills & Experience - The ideal candidate should have mastered one or more: *
Practical knowledge of fluorescence-based assays and data analysis software to assess enzyme activity.
Familiarity with manufacturing of consumable reagent and kit products for the Life Science market.
Understanding of protein kinases and modern enzymology.
About Us: *
AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc. (www.assayquant.com; full web site being finalized) is located in Marlborough, MA near I90 & I495 in MetroWest. We are a rapidly growing USA-based provider of innovative Life Science products and services to enable biomedical discovery and drug development. AssayQuant® is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) and strongly supports diversity in the workplace.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We have been operational during the pandemic. We follow CDC/WHO guidelines and are able to physically distance at work and wear masks when in close proximity to others. We have not experienced any interruptions in delivering our products and services.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Biochemistry: 1 year (Preferred)
Laboratory Experience: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,AssayQuant Technologies,"Marlboro, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
216,Intern - Data Scientist - Product Management - Summer,$63k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Product Management Department will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Interns within the Product Management group will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Product Management leads the product strategy, financial targets, product requirements and go-to-market strategy for a product portfolio.The internship will take place in Tempe, AZ. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up and make an impact.

• Make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building advanced analytics models while utilizing structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher (preferred)
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university, in a rising junior, rising senior, or masters level status at time of internship.
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
Education/Degree: In pursuit of a bachelor’s level degree in business, accounting or finance in a senior level status at the start of the internship. Master’s Degree preferred.
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Professional appearance and attitude
Experience & Skills : PowerBI, Clickhouse, Tableau, Jupyter, Python, Perl, R, M, Javascript/JSON, SQL
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required

Requisition #: 232796

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Tempe, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
217,"Scientist, Immune CAR Cell Therapy",-1,"Thank you for your interest in a career at Senti Biosciences. We are passionate about developing cell therapies with the ability to outsmart cancer and other complex diseases. We find purpose and meaning in knowing that our efforts will soon improve the lives of patients and their families. With science as our foundation and empathy as our key guiding principle, colleagues become friends, managers become mentors, and with time, cancer becomes history.

Our team is seeking a talented, and driven Scientist to develop and evaluate gene circuits for the generation of regulated cell therapies to address current challenges in solid tumors.
The successful candidate must be comfortable designing and performing immune cell-based assays independently and working collaboratively across various project teams to meet deadline-dependent milestones. Prior experience with NK cells and other immune cell handling, cell co-culture experiments, and functional assays is required.
Most of all, you are curious, bold, detail-orientated, and eager to be part of a positive work environment with other researchers to develop much needed novel cell therapies targeting cancer.
Responsibilities
Design and perform immunology phenotypic and functional assays such as cell proliferation, cytoxicity, Luminex, multi-color flow cytometry, etc.
Stay current with the relevant scientific literature, and participate in ideation and decision-making meetings
Write SOP, maintain detailed electronic lab records, and perform data analysis.
Collaborate with your colleagues at Senti by coordinating with other group members and research teams to troubleshoot problems, develop new assays, and support cross-functional projects
Provide expert support for experiment design and assay development to the broader scientific team
Qualifications
PhD or equivalent with expertise in Cell Biology, immunoncology, or similar.
Minimum of 5 years of independent research experience in a biology laboratory setting; industry experience is a plus.
Excellent understanding of NK cell biology
Hands-on proficiency with NK cell culture, engineering and phenotypic and functional assays, including cell-based assays measuring cell proliferation, cytotoxicity, and cytokine production.
Experience with multicolor flow cytometry and FlowJo-based data analysis.
Ability to quickly adapt to new research areas and implement new techniques with minimal supervision.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and as part of a multi-functional team.
Preferred additional qualifications include experience with chimeric antigen receptors (CARs), lentivirus generation, hematopoietic cell transduction, ELISA/Luminex, Incucyte, and understanding of assays related to the evaluation of integration and construct function.
Salary & Benefits
Competitive compensation package and title commensurate with qualifications and experience in the South San Francisco Biotech market including:
- Generous 401k instant-vesting employer match
- Healthy snacks and daily lunch program
- Medical, Dental, Vision, Life & Disability benefits
- EAP, Concierge Service, Recognition Awards and Career Development Opportunities
Significant career growth opportunity as the company develops
Senti Bio is the next generation therapeutics company that designs gene circuits and programs cells for tremendous therapeutic value. Our mission is to engineer an entirely new class of medicine that will transform people’s lives by curing the most challenging diseases. We are proud to count NEA, 8VC, Amgen Ventures, Pear Ventures, Lux Capital, Menlo Ventures, Allen & Company, Nest.Bio, Omega Funds, Goodman Capital, and LifeForce Capital among our investors. Senti Bio is based in South San Francisco, CA, USA.",5.0,"Senti Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
218,Senior Product Data Analyst,$62k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Senior Product Data Analyst Position

Verndale lives at the intersection of cutting-edge digital marketing technology and award-winning user experience and our goal is to use that knowledge to benefit all of our clients. The Product Data Services team is instrumental in driving this forward with our PIM projects. As we continue to grow, we are looking for a Senior Product Data Analyst to join our team on this exciting journey!

Responsibilities:

In this role, you will be responsible for the oversight and leadership of successful Product Data strategies, solutions and client projects within the PDS practice.
Organize, facilitate, and inform any PIM selection activities including RFI/P's.
Organize, plan and facilitate discovery, design, and implementation activities with PDS clients and members of Verndale PDS team.
Consult, inform and engage internal, external and client resources in understanding and presenting appropriate options, new and complex paradigms and other options needed to inform necessary scope and business decisions.
Provide input and direction to other Verndale/PDS team members to enable their successful contribution aligned to the strategist's experience and solution
Assist Practice Director with practice development
Within client project delivery, the Senior Product Data Analyst is responsible for leading, strategizing and providing team direction for:
Pre-workshop and early engagement preparations and planning
Workshop facilitation and collaboration across PIM projects
Organizing and mapping client PDS solution needs to be captured in project requirements and technical implementation documentation
Data Modeling & Taxonomy
User/Admin Workflow
Print & Additional channel PIM application
Customization(s) necessary to complete client solutions
Team estimations for all project phases of engagement across methodology
Implementation guidance to the larger PDS team as aligned with strategy and vision for optimized solution
Qualifications
5-7 years of demonstrated experience leading and delivering Product Data and Product Information Management solutions/projects
8-10 years of professional services and consultative experience
Strong leadership and consultative delivery skills including:
Enterprise Product Data Strategy and multi-phase roadmaps
Executive and Team-Level client facilitation and communication
Technical and internal delivery-team mentorship and communication
Solution development, scope definition and solution estimation
Strong relationship management skills (team members and clients)
Ability to interact effectively at all levels of an organization
Resource motivation and management
Strong domain knowledge and context to understand client models and solutions
B2C/B2B e-commerce and product data experience
Strategic data-base analysis. problem solving and solution development skills
Proficient with MS Office Suite, Data visualization and other digital tools & presentation tools
Proficient in PDS platforms/tools such as InRiver, Enterworks, Stibo, Syndigo, PDS/Tagglo, TWS and excel
Demonstrated experience documenting ""as is"" and ""to be"" workflows and processes
Proven ability to understand, contribute to and work within a structure project delivery methodology including managing billable hour requirements and internal time-tracking
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Mature work ethic, self starter and collaborative team member
A plus if you have the following:
demonstrated understanding of multi-channel distribution business models
Specific domain knowledge/experience with Global Data Synchronization Network/GDSN, TWorldSync, Syndication, Regulatory Standards (Prol 65, CARB, SCAQMB)
Past Product Taxonomy experience
Ten great reasons to work for Verndale
Rapid growth company of 20 years maintaining start-up company feel
Laser focus on cutting-edge technology and killer service offerings to clients
Internal promotions that are frequent and do not take years to achieve
Collaborative, open, work environment and no formal dress code
Working with teams from our Boston, Minneapolis, LA and Quito offices
Company that values collaboration and communication
Top of the line benefits including health, dental, vision, 401K, LTD, STD, Life Insurance, EAP program, HRA account, Maternity and Birth Related benefits and leave, and much more.
Management and employee trainings offered regularly
Flexible schedule options to support work/life integration
Ten company paid holidays, 5 paid sick days and 3 weeks paid vacation at date of hire
About Verndale

Verndale is a customer experience agency, purpose-built to help marketing and technology leaders connect the dots of the consumer journey. From our offices in Boston, Los Angeles and Quito, we design and build digital experiences, and enable marketing technologies that bring brands and their customers closer together.

We know that in order to do great work, you have to make work great. Verndale is committed to always being a company that celebrates diversity, equality and inclusion. We strive to recruit and retain people who are committed to creating the climate of respect that is essential for individual and company success.

Verndales services are built around a core methodology that encompasses Growth Strategy, Experience Design, Technology Enablement, and Experience Optimization.

Learn more at www.verndale.com

Compensation & Benefits
Verndale is proud of the fun, diverse, and respectful company environment we enjoy on a daily basis. Competitive compensation and comprehensive coverage for medical, dental, life, disability and a 401(k) savings plan with company match are offered to all full-time employees. Ample company paid holidays and personal time off make having a work-life balance possible. For some roles working from home on an as-needed basis is a definite possibility; we believe in hiring the best and keeping our own happy and motivated.

Verndale is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.

Powered by JazzHR",3.2,"Verndale
3.2","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
219,"Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",$128k-$208k (Glassdoor Est.),"12-Oct-2020

Job ID
279466BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""Two companies and one incredible alliance.

Novartis and Microsoft have formed alliance to leverage data & Artificial Intelligence (AI) to develop transformative medicines faster and more cost-effectively for patients worldwide.

We are seeking a thought leader and team builder to join the Novartis Innovation AI Lab to advance the field of Life Science and healthcare analytics.

In this newly formed alliance with Microsoft, you will lead Visualization analysis for Novartis .

In this newly created role, you will:
• Conduct end-to-end Visualization analysis of large scale healthcare data sets
• Take a hands-on role and deliver on highly visible multiple projects
• Serve as an ambassador for Novartis Data Science by presenting and publishing articles at conferences, business meetings and academic institutions
• Facilitate design and creation of knowledge repositories
• Collaborate with the digital and DSAI teams
• Keep ahead of latest development in the field and mentor associates
• Inspire others on culture change

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touch. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

We are Novartis. Join us and help us reimagine medicine.

Posting Title
Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
220,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate In Vivo Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vivo studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.
Responsibilities: *
Dosing (intravenous, subcutaneous), Bleeding and Tissue collection

Development of functional assays to support muscle and CMT1A programs

Tissue processing to support RNA and protein assays (western, qPCR, Immunohistochemistry)

ELISAs to support pharmacokinetics and serum biomarkers

Breeding and Genotyping

Assay development (Target engagement)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation
Requirements: *
BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vivo experiments

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons, muscle

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
221,Finance Data Analyst Internship - Paid,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Finance Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Finance Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Design, develop, implement and maintain various dashboards and tools.
Utilize SQL and VBA to create tools to increase efficiency in financial processes.
Support the finance department with SQL queries (querying data) and ad hoc analytical tasks.
Gain exposure to multiple business units including Corporate Finance, Accounting, Credit Research / Analysis, Tax, Operations and Corporate Audit.
Enhance technical and financial skills through on-the-job experience and training.

Minimum Requirements
Candidates must be pursuing a Bachelor's degree related to Finance, IT, or Analytics.
SQL or relevant programming experience preferred.
Demonstrate strong problem solving, analytical, leadership and communication skills.
Ability to work on tasks independently.
Microsoft Excel skills required, Access skills a plus.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First-class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",3.6,"Uline
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
222,Senior Health Data Analyst I,$74k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
223,Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist (TS/SCI/Poly),$123k-$195k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career.

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce, we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

Northrop Grumman Mission Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist who will be a member of a program's Data Science Team. Our ideal candidate will create data exploitation architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.

This position will be based in Chantilly, VA.

This position may be filled as a level 3 or level 4.

CIMS
NGMSCIMS

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Principal level 3: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 5 years of related experience or a Master's Degree and a minimum of 3 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Senior Principal level 4: Bachelor's Degree and a minimum of 9 years of related experience, a Master's Degree and a minimum of 7 years of related experience, or a PhD and a minimum of 5 years of related experience. An extra 4 years of experience may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph Clearance
Demonstrated experience in performing on data science projects in multiple domains, providing new capabilities to the organization and customers
Experience in two or more of the following: Python, Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing, Neural Networks, Apache Spark, Hadoop, R, C++, SQL Database/Coding, or visualization tools such as Tableau.
Experience with AWS or similar cloud provider
Demonstrated experience in solving problems with structured and unstructured data
Experienced in applying statistical and data visualization skills
Ability to perform complex tasks and participate in determining objectives of assignment. This includes planning schedules and working independently to achieve objectives.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proficient in applying technical standards, principles, theories, concepts and techniques of analyses containing many applications.
Experience developing solutions to address a national security issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization.
Master's degree in mathematics, statistics, data science, data analytics, business analytics or a related field
Additional technical skills developing data science applications using languages/libraries such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, pandas, NumPy, Matlab, Paradigm or DataRobot desired.
Additional technical skills and/or research in areas like text or video processing, computer vision and/or graph analytics desired
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
224,Senior Data Scientist,$82k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"For 20 + years, our mission has been to increase the presence and accessibility of natural and organic products to encourage healthier and more vibrant living. By leveraging SPINS' industry-leading proprietary data and analytics, our technology enables deeper, more engaged relationships between Retailers, Brands and Consumers through our platform, web, and mobile products. At the core of our work lies a passion to create a culture of sustainable health & wellness.

What you will do.

At SPINS we have the world's best natural and organic artificial intelligence data and the challenge to unlock its value. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will work with our Data Science team on any one of a wide-range of interesting projects at SPINS, which span the following areas and more:
Price Optimization and Elasticity Modelling
Assortment Recommendation Systems
Product Lifecycle Modelling and Prediction
Natural Language Classification
Not only will you be working on new and innovative ideas in the world of retail artificial intelligence, you'll have the ability to help potentially millions of people to enjoy a healthy, more vibrant lifestyle.

You'll be responsible for the following:
Developing new ideas into AI/ML driven products using our wealth of natural and organic retailer data
Engaging with domain experts as well as development teams to bring your research to market through productization
Distilling enormous amounts of unstructured data in a distributed setting into bottom-line impact for our partners and clients
What you bring.
Experience with Google Cloud or other Cloud computing design, provisioning, and tuning.
Knowledge of scripting and programming languages and 4+ years of experience using python in a retail analytics context (iterators, pandas, scikit-learn, etc.)
Substantial knowledge / experience with SQL.
Good verbal and written communication skills necessary to effectively collaborate in a team environment and present and explain technical information and provide advice to management.
Experience with Docker or a similar container framework and container orchestration tools such as Kubernetes (preferred).
Direct experience with TensorFlow (preferred), Caffe, Keras, Theano or Torch (preferred).
Why SPINS

When we began working from home in March, we were committed to keeping the healthy and active SPINS culture for our employees. Keeping the culture is high priority to us as we have continued to hire and onboard new employees even while we worked remotely. We listen to employee feedback as we plan when and how we will return to the office in the future. While we can't have some of our favorite in-office perks (plenty of snacks, onsite gym, and bike storage), we've continued to find ways to stay true to SPINS:
Virtual yoga, HIIT, and Kinstretch classes each week
Each employee is allotted 8 hours to use to volunteer with an organization of their choice.
Stay connected with other SPINS employees for a weekly PELOTON ride together
The SPINS Way
Direct – We communicate with clarity, honesty and respect in all situations and embrace opportunities to provide solution-oriented feedback.
Determined – We are committed to overcoming all obstacles to achieve results. We adapt to change, seek opportunities to learn and rapidly translate that learning into action.
Passionate – We go above and beyond to help our partners achieve their goals. We challenge assumptions and are comfortable forging new paths.
Collaborative – We leave our egos at the door, believing that working together we will produce an outcome that's greater than each individual contribution.",3.5,"SPINS, LLC
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
225,"Data Scientist, Operations",-1,"PicnicHealth is a San Francisco-based, venture-backed health tech startup with the mission of structuring the world's medical data to make it useful. Our business is two-sided: We give patients the first truly useful and complete personal health record by doing all the legwork to collect, digitize, and organize medical records from all of their providers. In addition, patients can support new medical breakthroughs if they choose to contribute their anonymized medical histories to studies PicnicHealth sponsors with leading researchers. Patients get the PicnicHealth service free of charge, life sciences researchers get critical data on how diseases look in the real world, and academic researchers get free access to data sets that drive cutting edge medical research.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, data science is at the core of how we cost-effectively retrieve and transform medical records into structured shareable data. Our teams recruit patients to partner's research studies, manage a large workforce of professionals who lend their expertise to the process of extracting clinical information, and build software tools to make these processes efficient. We are looking for a talented data scientist to arm these teams with data-driven insights so they can make informed operational and strategic decisions. This role provides a unique opportunity to work with continuous real-world operations data, to be tightly coupled to the actions taken based on one's analyses, and to drive significant impact within PicnicHealth's core business.

Our ideal team member will have equal parts communication, analytical, and leadership skills. You possess a strong sense of curiosity and a desire to contribute to a business that impacts the daily lives of chronic disease patients, as well as the doctors and scientists helping them. You ask analytical questions and possess the technical know-how to translate models into code, code into numbers, and numbers into operations decisions. You have prior experience analyzing networks, distribution, routing, or other dynamical operations scenarios. You have a strong desire to lead a growing team of data scientists as PicnicHealth scales to meet customer demand. You are a kind, passionate, and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback.

As a Senior Data Scientist at PicnicHealth you will:
Work with a cross-functional team to model continually-evolving operations scenarios, drive analytical decision, and communicate actionable insights
Become an expert in the data we collect, understanding how to extract timely insights via SQL, and helping evolve our instrumentation to boost insight into company operations
Use PicnicHealth's data to optimize and shape the workflow of professionals tackling a hard problem: collecting and structuring medical histories to empower patients
Take a technical leadership role among a diverse, growing team of data scientists, while helping level up the sophistication of our analyses and processes
Help continue to build a world-class Data Science team, by helping attract, interview, and onboard your future team members during this exciting time of growth
You're a strong candidate if:
You hold a Master's degree with 4 years of industry experience or PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as operations research, applied math, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical eye
You are proficient in Python/SQL (or another programming language and are committed to becoming an expert in Python and SQL)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines
You are passionate about our grassroots patient-centric mission to improve healthcare through technology
You are an ideal candidate if you also have experience:
Analyzing efficiency and bottlenecks within real world networks, such as distribution, communications, or transportation networks
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021. Once in-person work is safe for all team members, this role would be based out of our beautiful office in the Mission District of San Francisco.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.6,"PicnicHealth
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
226,Data Scientist,$75k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Data Scientist

Locations US-MA-Boston | CA-QC-Montreal

Category

Data Science

Overview

Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

We are currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our team. The ideal candidate should be passionate about working on cutting edge research and analytical services for Fortune 500 companies, global pharma/biotech firms and leaders in industries such as finance, energy and life sciences. The Data Scientist will be a contributing member to client engagements and have the opportunity to work with our network of world-class experts and thought leaders.

Job Functions and Responsibilities

The candidate Data Scientist will help develop, maintain and teach new tools and methodologies related to data science and high performance computing. This position will also help Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data analytics. The Data Scientist will be responsible for staying abreast of new developments in technology relating to data science, to share more broadly with Analysis Group.

Key responsibilities for this position will include:
Working with project teams to address data science/computing challenges
Identifying opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Acting as a resource and participating in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintaining up-to-date knowledge of computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base, specifically in a Linux environment
Presenting research at selected conferences
Examples of activities for the Data Scientist will include:
Developing data engineering and machine learning production systems for full stack data science projects
Using natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Optimizing procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Creating interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Building and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Developing and reviewing software and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establishing optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications
Significant experience working within a Linux environment required, experience with Docker and front-end development using a Javascript framework (e.g., Vue.js, Angular) is highly preferred.
Strong credentials and experience in database management and/or data visualization is preferred.
Bachelor’s degree required. Advanced degree, ideally PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or other relevant scientific degree with relevant experience, is preferred. Other candidates with at least one year of experience in the field may also be considered.
Demonstrates strong interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills.
Project experience with Python and/or R is preferred.
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g. Azure, AWS) is preferred.
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others.
At Groupe d’analyse we believe that a diverse workforce directly supports our goal to provide the highest quality work for our clients, which drives our commitment to ensure equal opportunities regardless of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, race, color, or religion. We encourage all qualified candidates to apply.

Scientifique des données – Boston - Montréal

*Le masculin est utilisé ici en tant que genre neutre et sert uniquement à alléger le texte.

A propos de Groupe d’analyse :

Groupe d’analyse est l’une des plus grandes sociétés de conseil en économie, avec plus de 1000 professionnels répartis dans 14 bureaux en Amérique du Nord, en Europe et en Asie. Depuis 1981, nous fournissons une expertise en analyse et en stratégie dans les domaines de l’économie, de la finance et de la santé, à des cabinets d’avocats de premier ordre, des entreprises du Fortune Global 500 et des organismes gouvernementaux du monde entier. Nos experts internes, en collaboration avec notre réseau d’experts affiliés issus du monde universitaire, de l’industrie et des entités publiques, offrent à nos clients un éventail de connaissances d’une étendue et d’une profondeur exceptionnelles.

Nous recherchons actuellement pour notre équipe un scientifique des données (« Data Scientist »). Enthousiaste à l’idée de travailler sur des projets à la pointe de la recherche et d’offrir des services analytiques aux sociétés classées au Fortune 500, aux entreprises pharmaceutiques et biotechnologiques d’envergure internationale ainsi qu’à celles de premier plan dans les secteurs de la finance, de l'énergie et des sciences de la vie, le scientifique des données contribuera à l’activité de nos clients tout en ayant la chance de travailler avec notre réseau d'experts et de leaders d'opinion de classe mondiale.

Le poste de scientifique des données :

En tant que scientifique des données, vous contribuerez à développer, alimenter et enseigner de nouveaux outils et méthodologies liés à la science des données et au calcul haute performance (HPC). Ceci permettra notamment à Groupe d'analyse de continuer à être un moteur de progrès aussi bien méthodologiques que dans l'analyse des données. Le titulaire du poste devra en outre se tenir au courant des nouvelles avancées technologiques en science des données, afin de les partager avec toute l’entreprise. Les principales responsabilités et tâches dévolues au scientifique des données peuvent inclure, sans s’y limiter, les éléments suivants :

Collaborer avec les équipes de projet pour relever les défis informatiques et liés à la science des données
Identifier des façons dont la technologie peut améliorer l’offre de services
Contribuer à l’activité et à la recherche du client en tant que spécialiste et membre de l'équipe de projet
Maintenir les connaissances sur les outils informatiques à jour, former le personnel sur des points techniques et aider à développer la base de connaissances interne, en particulier dans un environnement Linux
Présenter les recherches lors de certaines conférences
Développer des systèmes de production en ingénierie des données et apprentissage automatique pour des projets de science des données full-stack
Utiliser des méthodologies de traitement automatique du langage pour travailler avec les données des DME et des médias sociaux et d’autres données non structurées
Optimiser les procédures de gestion et d'accès aux grandes bases de données (déclarations de sinistre, dossiers de santé électroniques, transactions financières, etc.)
Créer des portails d'analyse interactifs et des visualisations de données (en utilisant par exemple R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Construire et alimenter des outils de HPC sur la grille informatique et l’informatique en nuage
Développer et réviser des logiciels codés en R, Python et autres langages orientés objet
Mettre en place des procédures optimisées pour les tâches répétitives ou gourmandes en calcul (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications requises :
Expérience de travail significative dans un environnement Linux exigée ; une expérience du logiciel Docker et en développement frontal en JavaScript (Vue.js, Angular, etc.) est fortement souhaitée.
Solides références et expérience dans la gestion de bases de données et/ou de la visualisation de données souhaitées.
Diplôme de niveau licence exigé. Dans l’idéal, le candidat possède un doctorat en informatique, mathématiques, statistiques, économie ou un autre diplôme scientifique pertinent accompagné d’une expérience professionnelle concordante. La candidature d’autres personnes possédant au moins un an d'expérience dans le domaine sera éventuellement étudiée.
Excellentes aptitudes pour les relations interpersonnelles, la communication orale et écrite.
Expérience de projets utilisant Python et/ou R souhaitée.
Bonne connaissance de l'informatique en ligne/en nuage et du stockage (sur Azure ou AWS par exemple) souhaitée.
Expérience avérée de travail au sein d'équipes de projet et de collaboration avec des tiers.
Chez Groupe d’analyse, nous croyons qu’une main-d’œuvre diversifiée soutient directement notre objectif d’offrir un résultat de la plus haute qualité à nos clients, ce qui motive notre engagement à assurer l’égalité des chances, peu importe le sexe, l’orientation sexuelle, l’identité ou l’expression sexuelle, l’âge, la race, la couleur ou la religion. Nous encourageons tous les candidats qualifiés à postuler.

Groupe d’analyse est une entreprise équitable en matière d’emploi et respectueuse de la loi américaine portant sur la protection des anciens combattants et des personnes handicapées.

Vous pouvez consulter les brochures (en anglais) de l’OFCCP, bureau rattaché au Ministère du Travail des Etats-Unis et relatives à l’égalité des chances professionnelles ici.

L’entreprise s’engage à ne pas licencier ni discriminer, de quelque manière que ce soit, tout employé ou candidat qui se serait renseigné sur, aurait discuté de ou révélé son propre salaire ou celui d’un autre employé ou candidat. Néanmoins, les employés ayant accès, dans le cadre de leurs fonctions, aux informations relatives à la rémunération d’autres employés ou candidats ne sont autorisés à révéler ladite rémunération à des tiers – qui n’auraient, autrement, pas accès à ces informations – que dans les cas suivants : (a) en réponse à une plainte ou accusation en bonne et due forme, (b) dans le cadre d’une enquête, de poursuites judiciaires, d’une audience ou d’une action en justice, dont toute enquête à l’initiative de l’employeur ou (c) conformément aux obligations légales de l’entreprise en matière de transparence (Article 41, paragraphe 60-1.35(c) du Code de la règlementation fédérale des Etats-Unis (CFR)).

­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Analysis Group
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
227,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.6,"Guild Education
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
228,Data Architect/Scientist,$83k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Member of Technical Staff – DATA ARCHITECT / SCIENTIST
US, Home Office

US Citizen or Permanent Resident

Wind River

In a world increasingly driven by software innovation, Wind River is pioneering the technologies to accelerate the digital transformation of our customers with a new generation of Mission Critical AI Systems in an AI-first world with the most exacting standards for safety, security, performance, and reliability. Success will be determined by our ability to innovate with velocity and sell at the solutions level.


ABOUT THE OPPORTUNITY

Wind River Systems is seeking an experienced high-performing senior software engineer for a position developing a hybrid cloud-based data analytics, machine learning and artificial intelligence platform.

The successful candidate will join a highly skilled development team delivering internal and external tools and technologies across a complete analytics driven DevSecOps platform, pioneering many new industry leading capabilities.

This is a data science all-rounder role. The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.


Interface & Collaboration

The successful candidate will collaborate with development and customer facing teams to ensure high levels of intuitive usability and product quality.

Responsibilities
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of development and systems problems
Help devise and layout a high-quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
Deliver cloud analytics solutions across a wide portfolio of class-leading products, in many industry verticals.
Extract data from development tools like Gitlab, Jenkins, JIRA, and many more.
Extracting data from real devices in the labs and the real world – planes, trains and automobiles
Develop new user interfaces and reporting options for these tools
Ensure security of all data
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!


ABOUT YOU

Core Competencies, Demonstrated Success & Qualifications
BSc / MSc degree (Computer Science, Computer/Electrical Engineering) or equivalent work experience
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Real-time analytics experience—receiving and analyzing streaming data from applications and distributed devices (not just processing data)
Experience working for companies engaged with autonomous devices in any vertical market (unmanned vehicles and defense systems, robotics for manufacturing and warehousing, autonomous transportation systems, etc.)
Blend of technical expertise and soft skills including business acumen, decision making, well developed oral and written communication skills
Demonstrable skills in SQL and Python
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets, etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and mathematics
Experience converting data models into products for real customers
Experience with Nifi / Kafka / Postgres / Hadoop / Linux
Familiarity with Real Time Operating Systems (RTOS)
Experience in autonomous systems development is a plus
3+ years of experience of big data analytics
6+ years working in a software development arena",4.1,"Wind River
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
229,Senior Data Scientist / Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$109k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Label Insight - Voted one of Chicago's Top 50 Best Small Places to Work - Join us!

About the Engineering Team:


Our Engineering team is chock-full of smart, dedicated, and creative team members. Each one has a desire to experiment with new and unfamiliar technology to solve their cross-functional (XFN) team's business objectives. We're passionate about best practices and strive to follow standards laid out before us. The team is encouraged to get involved in the tech community by participating in open source projects, speaking at local meetups, and presenting at national and international conferences.

Who You Are:


You’re an innovator; you share our common interest in improving and scaling our existing architecture and systems. Your excellent communication skills are key when collaborating closely with Product, internal customers, other engineers and data scientists to determine the best way to build products that meet their needs. You’re hungry for growth and with our Data Science Ladder you can visualize your career path. We are quality driven and you must be too. We expect that you’ll get involved and stay informed with the latest trends in technology and experiment with how to apply those to help consumers make more educated and healthier decisions.

**Even if you don’t check all the criteria boxes, we encourage you to apply. We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds, exceptional potential and a passion for their craft.

How You’ll Contribute:

A contributing member of an agile team made up of several engineers, data scientists and a product manager working together to design, build, implement and maintain complex machine learning and/or deep learning solutions / systems (image processing, data extraction, data classification, projections and suggestions, data optimization)
Work closely with operations and subject matter experts to optimize internal processes and/or build customer facing solutions
Work in and build solutions for a hybrid cloud environment in Amazon Web Services and Google Cloud Platform, using some of the leading cloud native technologies including serverless computing and containerization
Move rapidly towards strategic goals, our team pushes code over 50 times a day. This tends to come about as a quick minimal viable solution (MVP), and then rapid iteration towards a final solution
Take complex problems and concepts and simplify them for different technical and non technical audiences
Provide documentation and explanation on technical solutions and model architectures in a concise and professional manner
Collaborate with individuals from your team and other teams to provide the best solutions possible
What You’ll Need to Succeed:
Strong and proven background in critical thinking and problem solving
BS or MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, statistical engineering, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering or relevant experience in the industry).
5+ years of data transformation, statistical modeling and/or deep learning as a Data Scientist, Engineer, Machine Learning/Data Engineer, Architect, etc.
Experience with data storage tools and databases (e.g., AWS S3, AWS Redshift, Google Cloud Storage, Google Big Query, MySQL, PostgeSQL, Graph Databases, NoSQL, DyanmoDB).
Experience with machine learning and deep learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, Pandas)
Experience with dataset creation, data cleansing, data augmentation and/or synthetic data generation
Experience working with version control software (Git preferred)
Experience with developing API services (Flask / Sanic preferred)
Strong Python programming experience
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem
Demonstrated effective written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated willingness to teach others and learn new techniques.
Preferred qualifications:


Strong experience designing and maintaining deep learning solutions (e.g., Optical Character Recognition, Computer Vision, Natural Language Processing, Trend Analysis)
Experience with cloud computing, serverless computing and/or containerization (Docker, AWS Lambda, Google Cloud Functions, Google Cloud Platform, Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, Heroku)
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets
Contribution to research communities and/or efforts, including publishing papers at conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ACL, CVPR, etc.
Any experience with nutritional science and the product marketing domain would be highly advantageous
Experience mentoring junior data scientists
Experience working in an agile environment (Kanban, Scrum, Extreme) working closely with other engineers and product management
We Share a Common Purpose:


Label Insight’s purpose is to empower consumers with the knowledge to improve their lives through better product choices. Our purpose keeps our team focused and aligned as we drive growth for our grocery retailer and CPG customers through unparalleled transparency.

We Live Our Values:
Transparency: We share information freely and concisely as a team
Inclusion & Collaboration: We believe working together as our unique-selves better serves our customers and community
Iteration & Innovation: We speak up early, are honest about our limits, and leverage failure as an asset
Intellectual Honesty & Humility: We encourage open debate and favor the best ideas
Accountability: We own the successes and failures of our team
Quality Driven: We hold our work to the highest standards and embrace problems as opportunities
The Benefits & Perks of Joining Us:
Competitive salary and stock options
Flexible work hours
Flexible paid time-off on top of 12 business days for standard holidays (Label Insight is closed for 1 week during the winter holiday season)
Company subsidized health insurance, dental and vision benefits
Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave
401(k) Plan
Employer Paid Basic Life Insurance Policy and STD/LTD
Transportation/Commuter benefits
Employment Referral Bonus
Educational Assistance and Management Training Programs
Casual and collaborative, open-layout work space - dog-friendly office in Chicago
Catered team lunches - every other week
Cold brew and beer on tap
Regularly scheduled team gatherings
*At Label Insight we embrace diversity and are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds and qualifications. We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.4,"Label Insight
4.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
230,Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer,$48k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"KEMET offers our customers the broadest selection of capacitor technologies in the industry, along with an expanding range of electromechanical devices, electromagnetic compatibility solutions and supercapacitors. Our vision is to be the preferred supplier of electronic component solutions demanding the highest standards of quality, delivery and service. Additional information about KEMET can be found at www.kemet.com.

Position Summary:

The Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer conducts anodization research in a laboratory setting, utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes. This position will work with cross functional teams and provide technical direction.

Essential Functions:
Conduct anodization research and development in a laboratory setting
Conduct anodization research utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes
Research and develop new anodization processes and electrolyte formulations
Provide technical direction for existing and new anodization materials and processes regarding material selection, characterization and qualification, with ultimate translation to manufacturing
Utilize advanced chemical and analytical knowledge, data, and statistical tools to solve technical challenges
Work with cross functional teams to support projects by performing laboratory work to improve product performance, troubleshoot and resolve customer issues
Competencies:
Industrial or academic experience in electrochemical processes such as anodization or relevant experience in related electrochemical processes
Experience in electrolyte chemistry including development of new electrolyte formulations for product development, improvement, design, application and production
Industrial or academic experience with anodizing equipment, anodization processes and the related electrical engineering experience to operate anodization equipment
Experience with electrochemical cell design and prototyping
Demonstrated hands-on research and problem-solving with strong analytical skills
Demonstrated skills in major electrochemical and material characterization methods
Knowledge in dielectric development, failure analysis, and manufacturing operations
Knowledge of electrolytic capacitor development and manufacturing is a plus
Education and Experience:
BS/MS/PhD in the area of electrochemistry, electrochemical engineering or alternatively a BS/MS/PhD in Materials Science or Chemistry/Chemical Engineering with strong emphasis in electrochemistry
Physical Requirements:
Up to 25% travel may be required
This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change, or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice.

KEMET does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, ethnicity or national origin, disability, pregnancy, religion, political affiliation, union membership, protected veteran status, protected genetic information, marital status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law, in making employment decisions including but not limited to hiring, wages, promotions, rewards, and access to training. Qualified applicants and workers shall be provided with reasonable accommodation for disability and religious practices.",4.2,"KEMET
4.2","Simpsonville, SC",-1,10000+ Employees,1919,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
231,Fire Safety Specialist/Staff Scientist I – Healthcare,$71k-$85k (Employer Est.),"Fire Safety Specialist/Staff Scientist I – Healthcare


As a representative of EH&E’s Healthcare team, a Fire Safety Specialist / Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who will work with one of our healthcare clients in Boston, MA. This role educates, trains, and provides support to hospital operations in the development and execution of consistent fire and life safety programs. This role will provide the environmental health and safety department depth and knowledge in building code and emergency egress compliance, ILSM program elements, construction safety, fire drills, permitting, investigations, fire and life safety inspections with regulatory agencies, and the capability of leading recurring meetings. This role will participate in other various environmental health and safety programs consisting of but not limited to indoor air quality, environmental investigations and sampling, emergency response, risk assessment, accident investigation, developing and tracking fire and life safety incident trends, and developing and managing programs for improving performance primarily related to fire and life safety. As a member of the environmental health and safety department, this role shares responsibility in ensuring compliance with all safety and environmental programs. This role leads an important safety component within the department, which the client views as critical to its values and mission in providing a safe and compliant work environment enabling the hospital to provide best in class healthcare. This role assists in leading a proactive safety and environmental program and improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Project Manager. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you.

About You:


The ideal candidate must have at least 2-5 years of experience in an EH&S department, preferably in a healthcare environment or closely related field with a strong background in fire and life safety code.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities


Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, and respectful image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Regularly consults with members of the Facilities department and fire and compliance specialist personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance
QA/QC:
Participates in and may lead fire and life safety specific recurring meetings
Conducts and oversees the hospital fire drill program with internal qualified personnel within the department in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Coordinates and implements programs aimed at mitigation and/or control strategies of fire and life safety vulnerabilities
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online EH&S training programs focused primarily in fire and life safety, and may be called upon to deliver training content in other safety-related areas as needed. Updates written materials with code compliance changes as needed
Conducts follow-up with various stakeholders as needed
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a valuable team member
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Has familiarity with TJC, CMS, and NFPA standards, and has desire to expand knowledgebase in each
Performs code compliance risk assessments for work that may alter, buildout or remove portions of healthcare buildings
Conducts environmental monitoring related to leaks and floods to mitigate risk to patient care
Participates as an after-hours emergency responder; has the ability to respond to chemical, biological, and other after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintaining context and understanding the audience
Financial Management:
Be able to work within timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals
Key Skills
NFPA knowledge and experience, preferably in a healthcare of closely related environment
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers)
Education / Training


Bachelor of Science (BS), with fire and life safety experience as a responsibility in past roles.

Experience in a fire and life safety focused role in a healthcare environment; or, at least experience working in a healthcare environment for a facilities or safety department with an understanding and familiarity of the importance of this role. Background working with TJC and NFPA standards, specifically related to building code compliance.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:


HAZWOPER Certification; DOT/RCRA Certification

Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com

EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).

Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Needham Heights, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
232,Senior Software Engineer - Data Engineering,-1,"Meet GetUpside

GetUpside is a digital platform that connects millions of users with tens of thousands of gas stations, restaurants, and grocery stores nationwide. Shoppers know us as the mobile app that offers 2 to 3 times more cash back than anyone else, and brick-and-mortar businesses know us as the platform that's helping them earn more profit than ever before (and proving it). We know ourselves as community-builders. When people and businesses are better off, communities grow stronger.

Meet GetUpside Engineering

Our Engineering Team is a close-knit group of hardworking, fast-learning individuals that believes in our mission to help communities thrive. We believe in a data-driven approach to decision-making and an encouraging culture that emphasizes learning from our mistakes. We debate and deliberate on the best ideas to improve our tech stack, and strive for an inclusive atmosphere that champions the psychological wellness of all of our teammates.

Our technology stack:
AWS to run our microservices in a message-oriented architecture
Java 8 / Dropwizard / 12-factor apps
Python 3 / Serverless AWS Lambdas and Fargate jobs to run data processing tasks
MySQL, DynamoDB, S3 as data stores
Fivetran, Snowflake, dbt, and Looker to manage, transform, and visualize our data
Jenkins / Github / Terraform
About the Job:

Our Data Engineering Team seeks to scale organizational knowledge and increase the amount of factual information the company has available for decision-making. To do that, we operate as an enablement team, using a hub-and-spoke mentality to build a core hub of practitioners making data available and trustworthy, with close links to spokes around the business, including data scientists, software engineers, and analysts in other departments.

You'll be an early member of a small team, scaling our data platform to support the ever-growing analytical needs of the business! We balance between using SaaS and building in-house to thread the needle between time-to-value and operational robustness, and there's room to make outsized impacts on both fronts.

What will you do?
Work within a DataOps framework to build production grade ELT pipelines with an eye towards performance, maintainability, and scalability
Collaborate with analytics engineers, data scientists, and end users to understand data needs, and translate those into processes and pipelines to deliver that data
Extract data into star schemas and tuned data marts using DBT to deliver clean data ready for consumption
Coach analysts and data scientists on software engineering best practices (e.g., building testing suites and data dictionaries)
Identify, design, lead and/or contribute to anything and everything that needs to get done.
What You Bring:
5+ years of professional experience in software development.
Professional experience with Python & SQL required.
A strong attention to detail and quality, especially as it applies to data.
You have a customer-oriented and empathetic mindset to understand how data can be used to empower end-users.
You have strong analytical, organizational, and prioritization skills, and a belief in writing documentation as part of writing code.
You demonstrate the ability to bring code from whiteboard scribbles to running in production.
You are passionate about working in a dynamic and growing startup environment with a tight-knit, supportive engineering team that strives to make work interesting, challenging and fun.
A constant desire for learning and self-improvement, and a desire to keep up with advancements in data engineering practices.
Nice to have: Previous experience with big data architectures, and/or data orchestration tools such as Prefect, Airflow, or Dagster.
The Fine Print:
GetUpside employees are currently working from home during the COVID-19 pandemic. Once it's safe to return to the office, this role will sit full-time at our downtown D.C. headquarters.
Notice to recruiters and placement agencies: This is an in-house search. Please do not submit resumes to any person or email address at GetUpside. GetUpside is not liable for, and will not pay, placement fees for candidates submitted by any party or agency other than its approved recruitment partners.
We're an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",5.0,"GetUpside
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
233,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
234,Data Engineer,-1,"Marathon is seeking a Data Engineer to support the data pipeline for the development and integration of Artificial Intelligence and Big Data/Cloud Solutions.

The candidate will have experience in managing, manipulating, storing and parsing data in a data pipeline for variety of computer vision and other AI applications. The work is performed in a multidisciplinary team environment in an agile project framework. The candidate must be highly motivated and enthusiastic about implementing new technologies in a small team environment where deadlines are important to national security.

Position Responsibilities:
Work closely with data engineers and architects to engineer ETL solutions to prepare for ingest into machine learning development environments
Design, develop and maintain data services and/or pipelines as part of an Agile/Scrum team
Code, test and implement ETL logic
Support continuous process automation for data ingest
Support the development and integration of Client algorithms for testing and operational deployment
Perform data analysis to assist in decision-making
Work with program management and engineers to implement and document complex and evolving requirements
Perform multiple tasks simultaneously and successful perform under changing requirements and deadlines
Help cultivate an environment that promotes customer service excellence, innovation, collaboration, and teamwork
Required Skills:
Must be a US Citizen and Secret Clearance eligible
A Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Math, Finance, Statistics, Information Management, Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent field
2-7+ years of hands-on work experience in one of the related areas: Data Science, Computer Science or Computer Engineering
Proficient parsing / ETL-ing data into a variety of formats for Client applications, Test & Validation, metrics derivation
Proficiency with Python, Linux shell and scripting languages
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets
Excellent communication, and presentation skills with the demonstrated ability to communicate across all levels of the organization and communicate technical terms to non-technical audiences with an impeccable attention to detail
Desired Skills:
Secret Clearance and eligible to obtain Top Secret
Advanced degree (Masters) in a technical discipline
Experience working with cloud technologies (Amazon Web Services, Microsoft Azure, etc.)
Experience working with Department of Defense (DoD) organizations or performers
Experience with PySpark, Pandas
Experience with Palantir Foundry
Experience with NoSQL databases such as MongoDB
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $120,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
python & pyspark: 1 year (Preferred)
hadoop, hive, impala: 1 year (Preferred)
hadoop: 1 year (Preferred)
big data: 1 year (Preferred)
python: 1 year (Preferred)
Application Question:
Do you have a SECRET CLEARANCE?
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.5,"Marathon TS
4.5","Fairfax, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
235,Data Engineer II,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Who we are:

Fidelity Life is a leading provider of financial security for middle market consumers. With a history of innovation, the company is redefining the life insurance industry with patented products and processes. Fidelity Life pioneered the use of predictive analytics to streamline the new business process and revolutionize the speed with which policies can be issued. Established in 1896, Fidelity Life enjoys a long track-record of success and continues to build its reputation of sound fiscal management and customer-focused innovation.

In concert with Fidelity Life, eFinancial is an online and call-center-based insurance agency with a proven direct-to-consumer life insurance model. Using a proprietary and patented sales technology platform, eFinancial operates call centers in Chicago, IL; Seattle, WA; and Tempe, AZ. eFinancial’s licensed agents and representatives reach thousands of consumers each day to help meet their unique life insurance needs – often with just a single phone call. To complement this channel, the company recently expanded to offer an entirely digital purchase experience.

Together, Fidelity Life and eFinancial are revolutionizing the life insurance industry to make life insurance more accessible and affordable for everyday Americans. With an integrated marketing, product manufacturing, and controlled distribution system, the enterprise is uniquely positioned for growth.

Overview:

As a key member of the Big Data Analytics team, you will be responsible for creating and operating the Big Data environment that enables eFinancial and Fidelity Life Association to optimize business processes and grow rapidly. You will move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems, aggregate and organize large sets of data in order to enable lead operations, analytics, and predictive modeling. If you would love being an owner-operator of a fast-growing complex online business with modern technology stacks, building analytical and infrastructure solutions, and driving success via analytics, this role is for you!

Responsibilities


What you will contribute:
Own the creation and maintenance of company data structures and databases in AWS to support predictive model development, analytics, and business intelligence.
Implement, test, document, and deploy integrations and maintain production readiness for cloud-based technology stack including real-time streaming, batch feeds, and predictions models from multiple cloud-based and on-premise sources.
Take on specific ETL projects to assimilate data from multiple new structured and unstructured data sources in batch or real-time, as appropriate.
Assimilate and implement business rules to process raw data. Set up visualization tools to meet the needs of both cloud and on-premise user community.
Serve as data steward for Analytics team and third-party technology partners.
Qualifications


What you should bring to the table:
Bachelor’s degree in any relevant field required.
At least 4 years of data engineer experience.
Hands-on experience with AWS services: Lambda, Athena, Redshift Spectrum, Glue, S3, EKS, EC2, EMR, Kinesis, and RDS.
Git experience required.
Knowledge and experience in Big Data and in building Data Pipelines/ETL processes.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that enable you to explain data infrastructure complexity with clarity and precision to executive management.
Proficiency in SQL; and working knowledge of Python and PySpark.
Ability to think strategically to anticipate and plan for future business needs.
Passion for taking ownership of new opportunities and projects.
Team Player mentality - you thrive in a collaborative environment.
Excellent multi-tasking skills, you are able to shift gears quickly and comfortably.


Nice to have skills and experience:
Experience with DevOps and CI/CD preferred.
EEOC/Other


Fidelity Life Association/eFinancial is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workplace. As a Fidelity Life/eFinancial employee, you will be eligible for Medical and Dental Insurance, Health Savings Accounts, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health, Dependent Care & Transit), Vision Care, 401(K), Short-term and Long-term Disability, Life and AD&D coverages.",3.6,"Efinancial
3.6","Tempe, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
236,Senior Product Data Analyst,$49k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About us:

Kiva (kiva.org) is an international nonprofit with a mission to expand financial access to help underserved communities thrive. We run a global marketplace platform to crowdfund microloans for financially excluded entrepreneurs, farmers and students around the world. Our organization combines the culture and technological passion of an internet start-up with the compassion and empathy of a non-profit to create impact and opportunity at global scale. Since 2005, we have raised more than $1.4 billion in loan capital for 3.6 million borrowers in 95 countries. Our lenders fund over $13 million in loans every month. With offices in San Francisco, Portland, New York, Nairobi, and Bangkok, Kiva's team includes 100+ employees and 400+ volunteers worldwide. Our team is growing as we pursue exciting new opportunities to create a financially inclusive world.

Role overview:

As a Senior Product Data Analyst at Kiva, you'll be responsible for leading analytics initiatives that affect lenders, borrowers and Kiva staff around the world. We are seeking someone who is passionate about the Kiva mission and has a track record of developing actionable product insights, driving data self-service, and providing analytics thought leadership. This role will be responsible for delivering customer-focused data insights that inform the product roadmap and broader Kiva strategy, delivering ongoing trend analysis into drivers of Kiva's key product metrics, and leading Kiva's analytics roadmap.

At this time, we can only consider applicants with authorization to work in the United States on a permanent, full-time basis; unfortunately we cannot provide visa sponsorship.

Key responsibilities include:
Be a senior voice in the organization, discovering customer-focused data insights that inform and lead the direction of Kiva's product
Conduct exploratory analysis to understand the drivers of Kiva's current product performance and to identify new opportunities for product features and experiments (e.g., customer segmentation, pathing analysis)
Design and measure the impact of product experiments, synthesize learnings, and inform and update Kiva's strategic hypotheses
Perform ongoing trend analysis to inform day-to-day decisions by defining metrics, building critical company dashboards, and sharing out ad hoc analysis
Disseminate learnings across the business, to product managers, engineers, marketers, and up through senior and executive leadership
Contribute, alongside data science, to the development of our shared data layer
Provide leadership on a range of analytics work occurring across the company, including mentoring data users in support of self-service
Preferred qualifications:
5+ years experience in data analytics, business analytics, data science, economics, statistics or related field
Consistent record of conducting proactive data analysis, distilling actionable takeaways, making recommendations, and helping the business act on those recommendations
Experience designing and evaluating statistical tests, including multivariate tests with non-binary outcome variables
Well-versed in SQL and facile with Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong presentation and communication skills, with experience working with cross-functional stakeholders and executives
Comfortable extensively using BI tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau)
Experience mentoring others strongly preferred
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and drive change.
Passionate about Kiva and its long term potential.
What we offer:
An opportunity to improve real lives, solve hard problems, and change the world
Friendly, supportive, and adventurous environment with a team of engaged colleagues
A comprehensive, industry-leading benefits package
Opportunities to connect with and learn from colleagues and partners around the world
A diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is an integral part of Kiva's culture. We actively welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer and a great place to work. Join us and help us achieve our mission!

We will only accept applications directly from candidates. Kiva will not be responsible for any recruiting agency fees, absent a formal agreement.

#LI-CY1",4.2,"Kiva.org
4.2","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Nonprofit Organization,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
237,Air Compliance Staff Engineer or Scientist,$43k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"SCS Engineers is an employee-owned environmental consulting and contracting firm that designs and implements sustainable environmental solutions. We just celebrated our 50th anniversary as a company on April 1, 2020! Our core capabilities are: solid and hazardous waste management, landfill gas, environmental due-diligence and assessment, brownfields redevelopment , site remediation, renewable energy, and regulatory compliance for businesses and municipalities responsible for protecting our air, water, and soil. Our employees take pride in their work, and together, we have the singular vision to be the environmental firm of choice for clients and our employee owners. If you thrive in a friendly, collaborative company and desire dynamic and challenging work among a team of innovative individuals, then SCS is the place for you. Are you up for the challenge?

Job Summary

To support our ongoing environmental consulting business efforts, SCS Engineers is looking for an air compliance specialist to become a long-term asset to our growing practice in California. This individual will be required to complete technical work, manage and maintain contact with clients, and manage the schedule and work product performed consistent within SCSs quality control standards. We prefer this person to be based in Long Beach, but are open to them being based in another SCS California office.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Air quality permitting and compliance; greenhouse gas emissions compliance; general regulatory compliance; various permitting for solid waste and industrial facility projects
Technical work may include completing calculations, reviewing compliance issues, preparing permitting documentation, reviewing data, research, and report writing as well as related services.
Work may also include in field activities, such as field meetings on engineering-related issues, oversight of construction activities, collection of samples, site inspections, etc.
Client interaction and preparation of proposals will be required on an as needed basis
Occasional travel may be required.
Qualifications
Bachelors of Science Degree or higher in Environmental, Chemical, or Civil Engineering, or other Science degree required
2 to 5 years of related experience in Air Quality and/or related disciplines required
Engineer-in-Training (EIT) preferred for engineering candidates
Demonstrated knowledge in Air Compliance required
Strong communication skills, oral and written (technical)
Valid drivers license with a driving record in good standing required
MS Office software, with particular demonstrated skills in MS Excel; AutoCAD and/or GIS expertise would be a plus
At SCS, you will have an opportunity to contribute to our strategic direction, help us continue to grow, and provide our clients with responsive, innovative, high quality client service. We offer excellent opportunities for career advancement and a competitive compensation package, including: medical, dental, vision, 401K, ESOP, Student Debt Employer Contribution Program, paid holidays and PTO.

SCS Engineers is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). SCS provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran or disabled status.

If you have questions, difficulty using our online system and/or you need an accommodation due to a disability then please contact us about your interest in employment at recruiting@scsengineers.com.",4.1,"SCS Engineers
4.1","Long Beach, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
238,Senior Scientist in Product Development,$62k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of the Position: *
Plan and analyze the results from scientific experiments leading to the design and development of genomic tests for in vitro diagnostic use based on the DxTerity Diagnostics technologies. Prepare protocols, reports, Work Instructions and other written materials that meet Quality System Requirements. Develop technical solutions to product design and performance issues while meeting ISO and FDA regulatory and design control requirements.
Essential Functions: *
· Work under the direct supervision of R&D management (VP of Product Development or Director, Product Development) to achieve technical objectives within the scope of the overall projects.

· Identify, test and implement solutions to defined technical and project issues based on scientific knowledge, evaluation of the scientific literature, and laboratory research.

· Design, Develop and validate new genomic assays based on DxTerity’s proprietary technologies.

· Oversee laboratory studies to establish the design of multiplex assays according in order to meet project schedules.

· Design protocols, perform experimental studies to evaluate and document the performance of prototype products relative to product performance and customer requirements.

· Analyze data, evaluate results, form conclusions, and provide and/or implement product, process, or documentation improvements.

· Document experimental protocols, results of studies and product design/development history in the form of laboratory notebook entries, written reports and/or company presentations. Documentation must meet ISO standards, FDA QSR requirements and/or protection of company intellectual property.

· Prepare deliverables per DxTerity’s design control policy

· Work closely with cross-functional team members in a collaborative environment.

· Develop project and work plans.

· Adjust work schedule to meet time-sensitive project milestones.
Nature and Scope: *
Participates with team members to design, develop and test molecular diagnostic assays. Coordinates activities with team members and collaborators. Develops an efficient work plan for the achievement of goals and able to develop novel solutions to overcome obstacles. Maintains a high quality notebook and carefully documents and reviews work results.
Measures of Contribution/Impact: *
Contribution is measured through, but not limited to, timely achievement of assignments and project goals, development of solutions to technical problems, clear and effective documentation of work results and effective team participation.
Supervisory Responsibilities: *
None. May provide technical guidance to more junior staff.
Education: *
A Ph.D in Biochemistry, Molecular Biology or a related field and 1-3 years relevant experience, preferably in the clinical diagnostic products industry. Alternatively, a B.S or M.S. Degree in one of these fields and 5+ years of relevant industrial experience will be considered.
Experience: *
· Previous experience working in a commercial IVD setting preferred.

· Demonstrated ability to solve technical problems in an assay development and test validation environment.

· Prior experience working in a QSR-compliant environment preferred.

· Prior experience in all aspects of developing and commercializing new clinical molecular diagnostic products a plus.

· Experience in developing and using new laboratory automation, and molecular biology methods desirable.
Key knowledge includes: *
· Broad knowledge of molecular biology and genomic analysis methods.

· In depth knowledge of RNA analysis methods.

· Advanced technical writing skills to produce reports and documents.
Key skills/abilities include: *
· Must have excellent technical and communication skills with experience in successful execution of scientific experiments and completion of projects.

· Excellent organizational skills, including the ability to efficiently evaluate, prioritize and handle multiple and changing projects and priorities.

· Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interpret and summarize scientific results in a clear, concise, accurate manner.

· Demonstrated ability to identify, evaluate, and solve problems.
Physical Demands: *
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Work entails regularly performing tasks while working at a computer, desk, laboratory bench or automated machine. Work may involve occasional climbing or balance. Work entails occasional lifting and/or moving up to 25 pounds.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Everyone in the office wears a mask. Hand sanitizer is everywhere. The company provides twice-weekly COVID-19 testing for free.

Experience:
Product Development: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.dxterity.com
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"DxTerity
4.0","Rancho Dominguez, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
239,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Intermediate level, St. Louis, MO

**No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee**

Required Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, or another highly quantitative discipline; or Masters degree plus two years of post-graduate experience.
Demonstrated ability to apply advanced statistical methodology and data science solutions to real-world problems
Strong proficiency in Python
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability, with demonstrated ability to build, test, and iterate on a variety of model forms
Demonstrated ability to work in cross-functional environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Applied experience with agricultural science and/or agricultural datasets
At least 1 year of work experience applying statistics and data science to real-world problems
Machine learning experience
Experience in SQL, PySpark, or SparklyR/Spark
Ability to translate complex technical concepts to collaborations, decision makers, and non-technical audiences
Strong drive to learn new topics and skills and to develop innovative products for our customers
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
240,Data Engineer,$76k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
241,Fire Safety Specialist / Staff Scientist I - Healthcare,$71k-$85k (Employer Est.),"EH&E, the Company:
EH&E is an employee owned company that provides businesses, agencies and institutions with innovative and cost saving solutions for their health and safety, environmental and engineering needs. We protect hospitals, higher education institutions, biotech/ pharmaceutical companies and governmental agencies against pollutants/contaminants such as mold, ensuring safety in the workplace. Headquartered in our aesthetically beautiful, remodeled office in Newton, Massachusetts; EH&E is a trusted, recognized partner engaged with international governmental agencies, large scale enterprises, and leading education and healthcare facilities. www.eheinc.com

Job Description:
As a representative of EH&E's Healthcare team, a Fire Safety Specialist /Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who will work with one of our healthcare clients in Boston, MA. This role educates, trains, and provides support to hospital operations in the development and execution of consistent fire and life safety programs. This role will provide the environmental health and safety department depth and knowledge in building code and emergency egress compliance, ILSM program elements, construction safety, fire drills, permitting, investigations, fire and life safety inspections with regulatory agencies, and the capability of leading recurring meetings. This role will participate in other various environmental health and safety programs consisting of but not limited to indoor air quality, environmental investigations and sampling, emergency response, risk assessment, accident investigation, developing and tracking fire and life safety incident trends, and developing and managing programs for improving performance primarily related to fire and life safety. As a member of the environmental health and safety department, this role shares responsibility in ensuring compliance with all safety and environmental programs. This role leads an important safety component within the department, which the client views as critical to its values and mission in providing a safe and compliant work environment enabling the hospital to provide best in class healthcare. This role assists in leading a proactive safety and environmental program and improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Project Manager. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, and respectful image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Regularly consults with members of the Facilities department and fire and compliance specialist personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance.
QA/QC:
Participates in and may lead fire and life safety specific recurring meetings
Conducts and oversees the hospital fire drill program with internal qualified personnel within the department in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies;
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Coordinates and implements programs aimed at mitigation and/or control strategies of fire and life safety vulnerabilities.
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online EH&S training programs focused primarily in fire and life safety, and may be called upon to deliver training content in other safety-related areas as needed.. Updates written materials with code compliance changes as needed
Conducts follow-up with various stakeholders as needed.
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a valuable team member.
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Has familiarity with TJC, CMS, and NFPA standards, and has desire to expand knowledgebase in each
Performs code compliance risk assessments for work that may alter, buildout or remove portions of healthcare buildings
Conducts environmental monitoring related to leaks and floods to mitigate risk to patient care
Participates as an after-hours emergency responder; has the ability to respond to chemical, biological, and other after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information.
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintaining context and understanding the audience.
Financial Management:
Be able to work within timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals.
Key Skills:
NFPA knowledge and experience, preferably in a healthcare of closely related environment
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers).
Education / Training:
Bachelor of Science (BS), with fire and life safety experience as a responsibility in past roles. Experience in a fire and life safety focused role in a healthcare environment; or, at least experience working in a healthcare environment for a facilities or safety department with an understanding and familiarity of the importance of this role. Background working with TJC and NFPA standards, specifically related to building code compliance.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:
HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification
Experience / Background / Knowledge:
Must have at least 2-5 years of experience in an EH&S department, preferably in a healthcare environment or closely related field with a strong background in fire and life safety code.
EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).
Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.
Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
242,Data Engineer,$70k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Engineer will work with the data Analyst and project managers to determine logical and physical database designs for new analytics models. The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The Data Engineer will support database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout analytics ongoing projects.

Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet business requirements
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into operational efficiency, financial reports and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders including the Engineering and Analytic teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools to support business informational technology process
Work with the data analytics team to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
Perform other related duties as required and assigned
Demonstrate behaviors which are aligned with the organization’s desired culture and values

Moderate experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Moderate knowledge of AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++
Experience building and optimizing AWS data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Moderate skill in business intelligence tools such as Tableau or Qlik
Moderate skills with MS Office, including Excel & PowerPoint
Must be a team player with strong attention to detail and able to work independently
Proven track record at delivering timely and accurate information in a fast-paced environment
Excellent critical thinking, problem solving, and mathematical skills, and sound judgment
Strong business acumen and ability to interface with executive management",4.1,"PennyMac
4.1","Agoura Hills, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
243,"Senior Research Scientist [Sr Manager, Consulting]",-1,"_*Experienced candidates (10+ years) only please.*_
_Summary: _*_The __Senior Research Scientist manages a friendly team of social scientists to design and analyze public health and education research. Help us make a positive impact in the world at our growing statistical research firm in downtown Austin. _
Position Description*
Far Harbor designs and evaluates diverse research initiatives that aim to improve public health and education in the US and the developing world. We seek an experienced applied social science researcher with extensive knowledge of research methods along with excellent project management and consulting skills.

The _*Senior Research Scientist *_coordinates directly with the Principal and manages team members on long-term sponsored research projects. This person mentors scientific staff, consults with clients, produces client deliverables and presentations, oversees project plans and quality checking, contributes to analytic work, edits research products, and participates in authoring of peer-reviewed journal publications.
Experience Required*
PhD (preferred) in sociology, economics, psychology, public health, or related social science (or Masters with strong experience)
*At least* 10+ years of _professional experience_ as an applied researcher (or in a position with significant technical consulting management duties)
Proven track record managing teams and projects
Broad experience in scientific consulting to clients and partners
History of excellent written materials and expertise with the scientific publication process
Experience estimating, developing and managing project plans for research teams
Skills Needed*
Superior project and team management skills
Consulting, communication, and presentation skills
Critical thinking and logical organization of ideas
Strong ability to present to non-technical audiences
Familiarity with various scientific research designs for causal inference
Knowledge of various data analytic and statistical concepts
Understanding of the importance of sampling methods
Expertise in methods of program evaluations and observational studies
Deep knowledge of threats to research designs such as non-random samples, non-equivalent groups, and selection bias
Other desirable skills: survey measurement and survey development
Compensation*
$110k-140k/year (based on experience) with bonuses based on company performance. Vacation, holidays, flex work benefits and company-paid access to the on-site gym.
About the Company*
Far Harbor, LLC (http://farharbor.com) is a statistical consultancy established in 2000 and based in Austin, TX. The firm offers expert research and analysis consulting to a number of federal, state, and international clients. We serve public agencies and philanthropic organizations by assisting in the design and analysis of field research and population studies.
Work Location*
This is a local position in downtown Austin TX; during the pandemic all team members are safely teleworking. Our modern offices include a fitness center with showers for walking/running/biking to work. Flex-hours and Friday telecommuting are available with demonstrated proficiency on client projects. Occasional travel might be required (2-3 trips per year for client meetings). We enjoy a collegial work environment and are motivated to provide excellent scientific work for our clients.
Application requirements*
_Please respond to this posting with the following items: _
a *_well-written cover letter_* referencing this position and your primary qualifications and goals, -and-
a _*detailed CV or resume*_ containing education, experience, and any specialized or technical skills relevant to the position.
Candidates who do not provide the above items or fail to meet the minimum skills/experience requirements will not be contacted. Qualified applicants will receive confirmation of receipt by email, and top candidates will be notified personally.

_EEO Statement: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. _

_Please no recruiters or contract agencies. Thank you for your interest._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We work in public health and strictly follow CDC guidelines. During the pandemic we safely telework and use a reservation system for our downtown suites (one-person-per-office) as needed.

Experience:
Research and Consulting: 10 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Austin, TX 78701 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
farharbor.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Far Harbor, LLC","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
244,Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II),$34k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Looking to join a growing organization? Ocean State Job Lot is currently seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II)! To apply, visit our website at oceanstatejoblot.com/careers
POSITION SUMMARY:
The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II) is responsible for developing and managing Business Intelligence solutions for the organization. This role is a contributing member of the Business Intelligence & Analytics team and works closely with, and has full exposure to, all areas and levels of the business. The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer performs a variety of duties, without limitation, to identify the most impactful way for data and analytics to drive decision making and accelerate profitable growth.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop and manage Business Intelligence solutions utilized throughout all corporate offices, the distribution center, and retail stores
Collaborate and effectively communicate directly with internal stakeholders on a daily basis
Solve problems and independently develop high quality solutions by combining knowledge of programming, data modeling and statistics with skillful communication, analytical thinking, presentation and relationship building
Actively participate in the Business Intelligence workstream planning process including inception, technical design, development, testing, and delivery of solutions
Perform analysis for a wide range of requests using data in different formats and from various platforms
Create and maintain documentation including requirements, design, and user manuals
Develop policies and procedures for data collection and analysis
Participate in the deployment of data to the data warehouse
Follow IT processes and best practices for successful implementation and maintenance of Business Intelligence solutions
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related field required
3-5 years of Business Intelligence or related technical experience required
1-3 years of professional experience in retail or related industry preferred
Experience with Business Intelligence solutions (Qlik, MicroStrategy, PowerBI, Tableau, etc.) required
Experience with Data Warehouse and ETL solutions (Cloud-Based a plus) required
Experience with programming / scripting (SQL, Python, R, etc.) required
Experience with full Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC) methodologies preferred
Experience with Google Cloud Platform (BigQuery, Storage, Dataprep, Dataflow, etc.) preferred
Proficient in Google platform (i.e. sites, slides, drive, docs, sheets)",3.7,"Ocean State Job Lot
3.7","North Kingstown, RI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,General Merchandise & Superstores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
245,Senior Data Scientist,$118k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary

Establish data science as a value-add capability for the firm. Explore and exploit data sources through the use and creation of statistical models and artificial intelligence / machine learning to uncover and communicate business insights. Work on unusually complex problems and provide highly innovative solutions. Translate business problems into scalable models. Mentor colleagues in both analytical and technical competencies. Be passionate about data and analytics, thrive in an evolving environment, and bring an enthusiastic and collaborative attitude.

Job Skills and Abilities
Thorough command of data science and data analytics, including structured, unstructured, or relational data, data mining, and machine learning techniques
Ability and drive to develop and train Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) algorithms as well as Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience using Python to perform rapid prototyping for data cleaning, EDA, and data visualization including numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, etc.
Experience with data manipulation, quality assurance, data curation, data cleaning, normalization, analysis, or modeling
Experience with data visualizations tools such as Tableau, MicroStrategy or Power BI
Must be able to interact with all areas of business
Communication skills that can influence across organizations and at all levels including non-technical colleagues
Highly motivated, with a strong interest in finance and solving complex problems
Experience using R or SQL is preferred
Financial background is preferred
Responsibilities

Analysis: 85%
Establish data science as a capability within the firm
Engage with internal business partners to understand their questions and needs
Develop and maintain a process for identifying and prioritizing the questions with the highest business value
Create advanced analytics/models to facilitate and encourage data-driven decision making
Present findings to senior leaders in a manner comprehensible to their background
Generate financial insights and long-term trends that can be shared with clients
Attend conferences and seminars to sharpen skills with latest technologies and maintain knowledge of best practices
Mentor: 15%
Cultivate data science skills in junior colleagues
Support and contribute to the Analytics Center of Excellence
Further the data-driven culture of the firm by demonstrating the art of the possible
Education

Master of Science (M.S)

Work Experience

5+ years of experience as a Data Scientist",4.0,"Harbourvest
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
246,Senior Data Scientist,$107k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to join us and apply machine learning to tackle difficult problems in biotechnology drug development? As an AI Scientist, you can play a pivotal role in a rapidly growing team analyzing and manipulating various types of biomedical datasets and generating the insights from our complex data that brings innovative medicines to patients.

About AstraZeneca in Gaithersburg, MD:

Our Gaithersburg, Maryland facility creates life-changing medicines for people around the world. This campus employs more than 3,500 experts in our field and is only a short drive from Washington, DC. This modern and vibrant scientific campus is the home of R&D and Oncology in the US. Here, we play host to some of the most cutting-edge technology and lab spaces, all designed to inspire collaboration and cross-functional science. We believe employees benefit from being challenged and inspired at work. We are dedicated to creating a culture of inclusion and collaboration.

The Gaithersburg site offers a variety of amenities to help boost productivity and help keep our employees happy and healthy. This includes a fitness center, employee healthcare clinic, electric vehicle charging stations, dry cleaning, full-service cafeteria and copy center. This is where youll find newly-designed, activity-based work spaces to suit a range of working styles while increasing collaboration between teams.

Summary of the group:

The Data Science and Modeling team within AstraZenecas Biopharmaceutical Development (BPD) group applies sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve some of the hardest problems in the development of biological medicinal products. The team uses a blend of scientific, problem solving, and quantitative skills to develop and deliver ground breaking methods addressing critical problems in bioproduct development.

Our team of data scientists work right next to biotechnology scientists and operational teams, allowing them direct influence on the questions, the design of the corresponding studies and real time access to the resulting data. Biopharmaceutical Development has more than 20 years of experience with biotherapeutics, has brought more than 100 molecules to the clinic and has launched 6 new therapies. Together we seek to:
Improve our understanding of disease and uncovering new targets
Transform R&D processes
Speed the design and delivery of new medicines for patients
Main Duties & Responsibilities:
Develop, implement and support modelling solutions for the AI ecosystem for bioprocess optimization including integrating data from multiple different sources and modalities, as well as the application of classification, regression, clustering, image analysis, or graph theory and other specialist techniques
Researching and developing predictive models and computational methods to guide decision-making within project parameters and established approaches
Translate unstructured, business problems into the appropriate data problem, model and analytical solutions
Perform AI research, including establishment of hypotheses that can be approached using computational methods and tools. May present or publish findings for conferences and in peer reviewed journals
Build effective relationships with established range of stakeholders to ensure utilization and value of information resources and services. Clearly and objectively communicate results, as well as their associated uncertainties and limitations within agreed frameworks
Develop, maintain and apply ongoing knowledge and awareness in trends, standard methodology and new developments in analytics and data science
Education & Experience Requirements:

Graduate Degree in mathematics, computer science, physics, statistics, engineering, or a related quantitative discipline.

Required Skills:
Knowledge of modern data science approaches, including unsupervised and supervised classification and regression algorithms. May also have expertise in advanced statistical modelling, or broader aspects of applied mathematics such as dynamical systems or optimization.
Algorithm design, development, optimization, scaling and applications
Data modeling experience with sequential data such as signals, sequences, and time series.
Predictive modeling: Classification and Regression
R, Python/Julia Programming experience, SQL Querying
Stakeholder management and effective communication of the results and models
Desired Skills:
Understanding and familiarity with deep learning algorithms for RNN, CNN, or reinforcement learning for sequential data modeling
Recommendation systems
CNN for Image analysis and processing
AWS storage and services
Excellent problem solving, written and verbal communication, business analysis, and consultancy skills
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognising their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organisation to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

So, whats next!

Are you ready to bring new ideas and fresh thinking to the table? Brilliant! We have one seat available and we hope its yours.

Where can I find out more?

Check out our landing page for more information on our BPD group https://careers.astrazeneca.com/bpd

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
247,Distinguished Machine Learning Engineer,$166k-$280k (Glassdoor Est.),"About ForgeRock:

In today's highly connected digital world, understanding, managing and securing the identity of individuals and things is essential to safety and success of both businesses and their customers. Billions of people connect from anywhere, use a wide variety of devices and expect a seamless yet secure experience.

The ForgeRock mission is to provide the most simple and comprehensive Identity and Access Management Platform to help our customers deepen their relationships with their consumers and improve the productivity and connectivity of their employees and partners. Our identity solution enables great digital experiences and is embedded with a rich set of security, privacy and consent features. We deliver our platform through both cloud services and on-premises software.

Our customers are some of the biggest companies, organizations, and even countries in the world. On any given day, it's likely that the ForgeRock Identity Platform helped keep your data safe, gave you access to stuff, and supported trusted relationships between you, companies and the devices you were using.

ForgeRock is headquartered in San Francisco, but we are a global company with offices in the following cities: Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore and Sydney, Australia. Please read more about us at forgerock.com or follow ForgeRock on Twitter at http://www.twitter.com/forgerock.

The Role:

We are looking for a highly motivated,Principal Machine Learning Engineer to build out the next generation Identity platform. This role requires someone to develop the technology and platform for data processing, feature engineering and analysis to propel company transformation into a data insight driven organization. Work with peers in cloud engineering, SRE to drive data driven insight through the enterprise. Work on complex, high scale machine learning models in production and develop cutting edge algorithms that are deployed directly to customers in real-time. If you are self-driven, passionate about learning, work well in a collaborative environment and have effective communication skills, then we'd love to hear from you!

Responsibilities:
Provide architectural leadership; conduct regular reviews of project work and peer review.
Help in development and scaling of data pipelines, feature pipelines and data lakes to support large scale processing of millions of data events.
Develop an industry view of analytics and design-driven problem solving. Use academic and competitor research to understand recent advances and best practices and inform our approach to developing solutions.
Required Skills and Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, or related quantitative field
Ten years of progressive experience in a data engineering or quantitative role.
Business acumen to work with business partners and understand their domains, processes, and issues to identify strategies to optimize and innovate
Ability to leverage data visualizations to highlight insights to business partners and make a business case for a recommended action or innovation opportunity
Proficient in the language of statistics with an advanced understanding of mathematical statistics, including combinatorics, probability, common discrete and continuous distributions, univariate and multivariate distributions, conditional probability, random variables, expectation, variance, convergence, estimation (bias, MSE, consistency, sufficiency, maximum likelihood, moments, etc.), hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.
Ability to collaborate effectively with Data Scientists, product management, engineering, UI/UX
Theoretical and practical understanding of a range of machine learning techniques including unsupervised learning (e.g. clustering, outlier detection, PCA, ICA, NNMF, SVD, etc.), supervised learning (e.g., regression techniques, naive bayes, support vector machines, LDA, decision trees, neural networks, etc.), reinforcement learning (e.g., Q-learning, neural networks, etc.), and meta-methods (e.g., boosting, bagging)
Written communication skills to engage partners, document methodology and results, and publish research
Organizational and project management skills for overall project planning and task management
Solid understanding of (1) data structures, (2) sequential algorithms, (3) distributed algorithms, (4) runtime and space complexity
Knowledge of information technology integration and deployment patterns to design and implement solutions
Advanced proficiency in one of the programming languages like Java, Scala or Python.
Advanced proficiency in data processing frameworks like Pandas.
Advanced proficiency in TensorFlow, Keras, Cloud based ML frameworks, external ML libraries and NLP libraries.
Nice to haves:
Project and/or program management experience.
Experience in representing company in International ML conferences.
Proficiency in cloud and ML deployment strategies.
Docker, Kubernetes and VM experience
Life at ForgeRock:

We believe in and facilitate a flexible, collaborative work environment. We've grown enormously, but remain true to the innovative, can-do startup values that got us here. Most important of all, we keep hiring talented, smart, fun, and genuinely nice people because that's who we want to succeed with every day. Below are just a few of the great things we have to offer at ForgeRock:
A great team of smart, fun and genuinely nice individuals.
Awesome company culture focused around providing a flexible and collaborative work environment
Regular office bonding events, from lunches and happy hours to group offsites and hack-days
Well-stocked fridges, whether you're hungry or thirsty
Competitive benefits and perks
We're Mac-friendly!
Generous employee referral bonus program
Amazing offices across the globe San Francisco HQ; Vancouver, WA; Austin, TX; Munich, Germany; London & Bristol, UK; Grenoble & Paris, FR; Oslo, NO; Singapore, Australia & counting!
ForgeRock is the collective sum of all our individual experiences, backgrounds and influences and we pride ourselves in growing and learning together. We are committed to building an inclusive and diverse environment where everyone's individuality is respected and everyone has an Identity. In recruiting for new colleagues, we welcome the unique contributions you can bring and encourage you to be your best self.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.2,"ForgeRock
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
248,Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"17809 Data Scientist (Open)

Position Type:

Full time

Location(s):

US.CO.Greenwood Village.Office

Position Details:

Collaborate with internal and external customers to identify trends and opportunities and develop clear business and measurement objectives.
Create a high-level of business awareness that guides the development of impactful data insights.
Provide and implement actionable insights for service and product solutions that can increase customer utilization, reduce churn, streamline operations, and improve overall field support.
Analyze, automate, and evolve program metrics that feed into key review mechanisms such as MBRs and QBRs.
Lead the evaluation and integration of disparate, detailed-level data sets into a unified view, and leverage these data sets for the development of models of prospect, and revelations in business terms that tells the customer how to solve business problems with customer dashboards and visualization reports Responsible for jobs that span three domains: statistical/mathematical reasoning, business communication/leadership, and programming.
Apply various quantitative methods, including regression, multivariate, and graphical methods to analyze and interpret information from complex data sources.
Perform exploratory data analysis and provide broad business conclusions based on initial appraisal. Determine which conclusions warrant a data science project.
Implement associated big data tools and frameworks required to provide the requested capabilities.
Analyze data to develop predictive models, Identify data patterns and trends.
Implement ETL processes while integrating data form different sources.
Monitor performance and advise on necessary infrastructure changes.
Define data retention policies.
Enhance data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems and models.
Process, cleanse, and verify the integrity of data used for analysis.
Education
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, and/or a related field, or the equivalent work experience in data management.
Experience

A minimum of 3 years experience applying advanced analytics to complex business problems that involve a wide array of data sets and then making recommendations conveying those results, challenges, direction and overall project direction to clients.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Strong technical background with experience building customer and forecasting models with proficiency in SQL
Highly organized with great attention to detail.
Strong cross-functional collaboration, collaboration, negotiation, and leadership skills.
Strong executive and customer presence who can deliver actionable insights and drive results in a complex and changing business model.
Experience understanding ecosystems, user behavior, and long-term trends within our industry.
Proficient understanding of distributed computing principles.
Experienced in or eagerness to learn Domo, AWS, Python and REDShift",4.0,"CSG
4.0","Denver, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
249,Data Scientist,$60k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description *
We're looking for an advanced mathematician who has the ability to think in entirely new ways. This person should be excited to solve complex problems by applying the combination of a deep mathematics background with intuition and the feedback of experts in the field.

The successful mathematician at Event Dynamic will utilize strong problem-solving skills, significant programming experience, and business analytics to solve real-world dynamic pricing problems at scale. This role will be highly involved in the development of the core AI-driven pricing product and will be expected to make key business decisions on complex real-world problems. This position will interface with the subject matter experts and machine learning team to communicate business impacts of technical decisions.
Job Responsibilities*
Automation of the ML pipeline and development of models to scale. Generalization of pricing models for new use cases. Collects, creates, ingests, analyzes, evaluates, and iterates through datasets to explore key features, develop training data sets, and create new models.
Performs Feature Engineering on the ML pricing models. Works within a team of data science professionals and digs into complex technical problems. Reports back on findings and technical decisions to subject matter experts.
Will show drive and initiative to push the core product and technology forward. Collaborates with cross-cutting team of executives, product managers, clients, software engineers, and data scientists.
Requirements*
A bachelor or master’s, or PhD degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering etc.) or equivalent experience.
Minimum of two years’ experience utilizing advanced mathematics and/or machine learning techniques to solve real-world problems. Experience writing code to build complex data pipelines.
Experience using Python and ML libraries, pandas preferred
Minimum of four years’ experience in software development and data analysis.
Excellent verbal and written communication. Ability to present complex technical findings to a team of subject matter experts.
Company Description*
Event Dynamic’s technology is the most sophisticated ticket pricing system in the world. We employ artificial intelligence and advanced mathematics to automate ticket pricing, delivering smart and adaptive prices that puts lost revenue back in the hands of primary rights holders of live events.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
software development: 4 years (Required)
Machine Learning: 2 years (Required)
data analysis: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",3.1,"Event Dynamic
3.1","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
250,Data Analyst,-1,"Company*
Juniper is a fast-growing luxury Architectural lighting brand with locations in New York and Connecticut. We serve the high-end Architectural lighting industry; providing innovative, custom solutions to luxury office and hospitality spaces globally.
Job Description: *
The Data Analyst will work under the general direction of the ERP & Inventory Control Manager, responsible for collecting, analyzing, and reporting data to monitor business performance and quality plans to identify improvements; and to ensure the quality and accuracy of that data is used in ways to assist the business make better decisions.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities: *
Collect, interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques.
Provide reports and ongoing results back to the relevant members of the business.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain ERP.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Providing technical support across the company.
Identify areas of improvement in business processes and apply support changes to the organization.
Effectively communicate with outside vendors.
Manage and assist with special projects.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Information Management, Computer Science, Business or a related field.
At least two years experience as a Jr. Data Analyst or in a similar role.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Able to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
Strong verbal and written communications skills.
Excellent computer skills.
Able to work independently with minimal supervision.
Able to work in a support team environment.
Benefits: *
Full Health, Dental, and Vision
Paid time off
401K matching plan
Generous bonus plan
Excellent advancement opportunities

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Information Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Juniper
3.8","Southington, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
251,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist*
The Clock Foundation seeks a highly motivated individual to join our dynamic team developing epigenetic aging clocks applying them to our mission of speeding the availability of treatments that prolong health and life expectancy.
Essential*
A PhD (or equivalent experience) in a relevant scientific subject including but not limited to bioinformatics, biostatistics, or computational biology, with research experience in academia or industry
Proficiency with R for statistical programming
Proven ability to deliver high quality novel research in bioinformatics, biostatistics, or computational biology, for example through journal publications
Interest in the biology of aging
Desirable*
Experience working alongside experimental personnel to gather appropriate data, validate methodologies and test hypotheses
Experience analyzing clinical or survey data using statistical approaches such as longitudinal analysis, mixed effect modeling, logistic regression analyses, and model building techniques
Experience with array or sequencing technologies for epigenetic data (such as targeted bisulfite sequencing and whole genome bisulfite sequencing)
Experience with machine learning techniques
Experience with Python and full-stack development efforts
Familiarity with DNA methylation and epigenetic aging clocks
This position has competitive compensation and benefits. If this position is of interest, please send your resume/CV and any supporting materials to us for immediate consideration.
About the Clock Foundation*
The Epigenetic Clock Development Foundation (“Clock Foundation”) is a California non-profit that is dedicated to speeding the availability of treatments that prolong health and life expectancy. Epigenetic aging clocks based on DNA methylation are strong indicators of biological age, the reversal of which promises to lower the risk of multiple chronic diseases and to preserve the immune system. For more information, please see our website: www.clockfoundation.org.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $83,000.00 - $117,883.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,Clock Foundation,"Torrance, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
252,Data Analyst I,$35k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst I

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Ontario - Washington, DC, DC
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
4 Year Degree
Salary Range
$50,000.00 Salary/year
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Health Care
Description
Mary's Center is committed to promoting diversity, equity and inclusion (DEI) within our organization and the communities we serve. We embrace diversity of experiences, ideas, and individuals, and seek to bring diverse candidates to the table.

The Data Analyst I with work with other Data Management and Health Analytics (DMHA) team members to run and prepare reports for all Mary’s Center Initiatives to include other departmental requests, grant applications and standard reporting and ad hoc reporting. The Data Analyst I is responsible for running routine quality and outcomes reports, responding to requests for data as well as grant reporting. This position requires proficient command of SQL coding and advanced Microsoft Excel skills, including creating and using complex formulas and manipulating large datasets.

Reportability

This position will report directly to the Director of Quality & Outcomes.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
Build complex queries in SQL Server
Build Tableau Dashboards
Analyze large datasets and be able to strategize methods of data collection
Assist other team members with their duties
Run routine quality and outcomes reports by scheduled due dates, validates and analyzes data, sends data to staff responsible for programs.
Prepare patient panels for chronic disease management and group care
Manage health maintenance reminder messages
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience – Undergraduate degree in social science research and evaluation field and/or two to three years’ experience working in a research/evaluation setting. Extensive experience with Microsoft Excel, including creating and using complex formulas and large datasets. Knowledge of Word, and PowerPoint is essential, knowledge of SQL, SPSS, preferred, as well as a thorough understanding and working knowledge of patient/client confidentiality issues and HIPAA compliance/regulations. Knowledge of SQL and integration of SQL queries in Tableau. Understanding of data flow. Individual must be detail-oriented and able to coordinate multiple tasks at once.

Physical Demands – Regularly required to sit; frequently required to reach with hands and arms, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, talk or hear; must be able to lift objects up to twenty-five (25) pounds.

Work Environment – Mostly in a typical office and/or home setting with a quiet to moderate noise level. May be exposed to extreme cold, heat, and humidity due to outside weather conditions.",3.3,"Marys Center For Maternal and Child Care
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
253,Data Scientist,$100k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to help us drive decision-making, find bigger opportunities, and improve our product. As a consumer internet company, we produce huge amounts of data, and in this role, you will have outsize opportunities to develop the insights to make it actionable. You will have broad impact and exposure across Grammarly, working with team members from our Product, Research, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance teams.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


As a Data Scientist at Grammarly, you will help our team make better decisions by advocating for data-driven approaches across the organization. Your analysis will contribute to our strategy across the business in areas such as user acquisition, engagement, retention, and more.
Within your first month, you will start developing a good understanding of the overall data-processing pipeline, understand a subset of Grammarly's key metrics, and complete at least two small data reports to present to relevant business owners.
By month three, you will become an expert user of our analytical tools, start contributing to the Data Science team's projects, understand all of Grammarly's key metrics, and independently work on small-to-medium-complexity data projects (including A/B tests, channel analysis, and user engagement).
By month six, you will start working independently on complex data projects, such as user segmentation, short- and long-term user-engagement analysis, and lifetime value projections.
By year one, you will become the go-to person and subject-matter expert for a few of Grammarly's key metrics, own and drive projects independently with minimal supervision, and along with our other Data Scientists, ensure ""data science excellence"" at Grammarly (dashboards, high-quality reports, empowered teams, etc.).
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Holds a PhD in a quantitative field or a masters in a quantitative field and has at least 3 years of experience working as a data scientist.
Has experience in data analysis, A/B testing, retention tracking, etc. (consumer product experience is preferred).
Is proficient in data mining and statistics.
Has experience with SQL as well as experience programming in Python, R, Scala, or an equivalent language.
Has strong analytical and critical thinking skills as well as a strong bias toward actionable insights; loves finding insights and getting others to act on them.
Is a self-starter with superior organizational and prioritization skills.
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",4.9,"Grammarly
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
254,R & D Scientist,$83k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"R&D Scientists apply the scientific method in one or more disciplines (e.g., Photogrammetry, Geodesy, Computer Science, Mathematics, Image Science, Human Terrain Analysis) to advance Geospatial Science and enhance Agency tradecraft. They conduct and develop novel scientific research projects and facilitate interdisciplinary collaboration to further scientific inquiry and application. They provide technical guidance and oversight, report results, and advise management on new and evolving technology. They address a variety of complex data-related analytical problems by applying quantitative and qualitative analytic methods.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Selected candidate will execute innovative research on automated exploitation of airborne, commercial, civil and other sources of radar data including but not limited to synthetic aperture radar (SAR) complex data related to NGA future radar processing and exploitation acquisition efforts. This position calls for extensive R&D experience in automation/machine learning using SAR data, RF Systems, Moving Target Indicator (MTI), and cross-sensor integration, which is key to the Agency achieving its strategic goals and mission imperatives. Duties also include a wide variety of cross-agency collaborations and Community leadership in radar R&D. Other duties may include: \* Lead a Radar research team in completing multiple projects \* Determine and define project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility. Manage execution of program/project cost/schedule/budget. \* Conceive of new start R&D activities and/or seedling concepts and seek internal/external funding sources. \* Maintain awareness of the state-of-the-art in radar technologies and communicate to leadership. \* Support requirements development, system verification, and concept of operations (CONOPS) development as well as working with system and mission analysts to ensure capabilities meet mission requirements \* Develop briefings and/or written reports that present complex issues and/or relevant analytic findings in an easily understandable way to a wide variety of audiences. \* Build and maintain professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective GEOINT capabilities. \* Disseminate research findings to the broader DoD/IC communities. \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically and operate in a dynamic, fast-paced environment. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated experience as a subject matter expert in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and or Machine Learning (ML) (such as in Automatic Target Recognition (ATR) for radar applications, RF systems, RF in contested environments, and/or Moving Target Indictor (AMTI or GMTI) 2. Demonstrated experience in seedling new start R&D efforts (including idea conception, authoring and/or pitching proposals, and/or proposal execution utilizing the Heilmeier criteria) 3. Demonstrated experience in program management and execution (such as planning, resource allocation, risk identification & mitigation, and/or identifying transition partners) 4. Demonstrated experience in building and fostering strategic relationships between the IC, DOD, civil agencies, and academia (such as to coordinate integration of research technologies) EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Mathematics, Physical Science, Computer Science, or a related discipline that includes 24 semester (36 quarter) hours in Mathematics, Science and/or a related Engineering Science such as Dynamics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Properties of Materials. Such coursework includes, but is not limited to, Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Programming, Data Mining, Cybersecurity, Geographic Information Systems, Remote Sensing, or Statistics. Although not mandatory, coursework in differential and integral calculus is preferred. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework as listed in option A, plus experience that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals to 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Doctoral degree in STEM 2. 15+ years' experience in the mandatory requirements 3. 10+ years' experience in a fast-paced R&D environment supporting contracts and programs of size, scope, and complexity similar to those at NGA Research 4. Experience in High Performance/Cloud Computing

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $142,701 - $170,800 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $142,701.00 - $170,800.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
255,Sr or Principal Data Scientist,$104k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are hiring Data Scientists at these levels:
Senior
Lead (Staff or Sr. Staff)
Principal

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart/$ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2000 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart/$ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

The Sr. or Principal Data Scientist will be heavily involved in executing data analysis and modeling tasks for Freedom Financial Asset Management, the lending division of the Freedom Financial Network. The overarching mandate for the Sr. or Principal Data Scientist is to execute on analytic delivery and to develop new analytic capabilities for the company’s mortgage initiative. The position will essentially be to partner with the mortgage division to execute a new analytic vision. Additionally, he/she may collaborate with other team members to assess and develop new analytic opportunities. This role will provide the candidate exposure and visibility into a strategic initiative for the company, and as such, will be a high impact role within the organization.

THE ROLE:

Some of the key responsibilities for the Analytic Scientist will include:

Drive better understanding of FFN customers and prospects. Optimize customer experience and FFN value proposition by leveraging of GLM, supervised and unsupervised ML modeling solutions.
Utilize your technical and analytical skills, while also gaining in-depth exposure to business strategy.
Act as consultant to cross functional teams, advise how to best leverage predictive modeling and data in general.
Responsibility:
Design, build, optimize and maintain customer LTV / lifecycle modeling platforms.
Identify opportunities to apply data science solutions to improve customer experience and FFN value proposition.
Consult with business partners to develop data science strategy to address and influence customer LTV.
Analyze data, build models and assess their quality
Design experiments and evaluate the results
Monitor model performance and make recommendations
Ad-hoc Statistical requests
Communicating results and recommendations to senior management
Identify and apply best practices and innovative solutions for optimization of customer life cycle.
Skillset and Requirements:
Expert knowledge of logistic regression, decision trees, survival analysis, design of experiment and other statistical techniques
Expert knowledge of supervised and unsupervised ML modeling techniques
Communicating clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Influencing others in both verbal and written mediums
Leverage data and advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to develop comprehensive customer experience strategy
Qualifications and Experience
Masters or PhD in Statistics or similar quantitative field of study (Math, Economics, Financial Engineering, Physics, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Operations Research, etc.)
Hands on expertise in statistical modeling and analysis
Experience with use of credit bureau data for statistical modeling
Experience working with relational databases
Expert SAS/R/Python knowledge
Experience with cloud-based modeling (AI) platforms
0 - 7+ years of total experience. Financial services or mortgage experience, is not required, but is preferred.
Demonstrated experience in statistical modeling and analysis. Expert level skills in Python or R.
Proficiency in qualitative and quantitative data analysis and reporting.
Aptitude working with relational databases and manipulating data from databases for statistical modeling.
Familiarity with UNIX/LINUX environments and BASH/shell scripting is desired.
Very strong analytical skills, combined with an ability to tie analytic results to business implications.
A can do attitude for problem solving.
A keen eye to spot opportunities to automate and streamline analytic processes.
High level of comfort working within the financial services industry, as well as working within a rapidly growing environment in which change is a constant.
An ability to work independently with limited direction but with the judgment to do so within appropriate limits of authority.
Initiative to constructively, but passionately, challenge existing analytic processes.

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting to you, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader. Thank you for your consideration.",3.3,"Freedom Financial Network
3.3","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
256,Research Scientist/Senior Research Scientist Data Collection Peri- and Post Approval Studies (PPAS),$132k-$244k (Glassdoor Est.),"Research Scientist - Data Collection– Peri- and Post Approval Studies
The Team
Evidera has been providing epidemiology, data analytics, and outcomes research services to clients in the biopharmaceutical industry for over 19 years. The Peri- and Post Approval Studies team supports pharmaceutical/ biotechnology/ medical device companies in the design and conduct of real-world observational studies throughout the product lifecycle, from early pre-launch planning to launch and post-marketing management. Our focus is on helping our clients identify evidence gaps and rapidly build epidemiologic and economic evidence to demonstrate the effectiveness, safety and value of their products. For this role, the focus is on de novo (field) data collection studies such as single and multi-country retrospective chart reviews, surveys, prospective studies, registries and post-market safety studies which are undertaken when existing health databases cannot be used. Increasingly, hybrid studies that invoke the use of both secondary data sources with bespoke data collection methods are deployed to address our clients’ needs.

Data collected in these studies is then used to address key research questions such as:
Burden of disease and identification of unmet needs
Treatment patterns, drug utilization, adherence
Resource utilization
The identification and impact of risk factors on disease outcomes
Comparative effectiveness
Safety outcomes
We use epidemiologic methods to build knowledge of the relationships between patient, drug, clinical and disease factors that significantly aids our clients and the patients they serve in understanding health conditions and navigating potential drug-event causal relationships as well as in building stronger evidence-based value messages.
Position Overview
The Research Scientist will take the role of independent principal investigator/consultant of projects and be responsible for overseeing all aspects of project delivery including delegating project management tasks to junior staff. This role will also take scientific responsibility for project completion, strategic consultation, and for use of best methods to address research needs.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities (Essential Functions**):
The Research Scientist in Data Collection will bear scientific responsibility for the design and implementation of de novo data collection studies (retrospective, prospective, and/or cross-sectional).

In particular, the Research Scientist will:
Be scientifically responsible person for design and implementation of selected Non-interventional studies; conceptualize advanced study designs and develop/oversee the development of study protocols, statistical analysis plans and study reports. Responsible for project completion and quality delivery? Delegate coordination tasks to mid-level and junior staff.
Lead interactions with clients in the pharmaceutical and medical device industries.
Review and finalize project deliverables and ensure study findings are valid and reliable.
Have final budget, deliverable and project timeline responsibility; identify scope expansion and need for amendments
Contributes to abstracts and manuscripts as co-author and when possible, first author.
Serve as consultant to other principal investigators or staff on other projects.
Act as a guide and mentor to the staff across Evidera locations.
Lead the growth in your area of responsibility. Direct other ""non-billable"" activities, e.g. participates to proposals, design conceptual approaches for proposals, supervise junior staff, contribute to business development, identify and pursue business opportunities within Evidera and bring in new projects.
Travel (national and international) is expected.

Consulting Expectations:
Participates in client calls and is expected to be able to address questions posed directly to him/her about his/her work
Responsible for scientific consultation and for use of best methods to address research needs.
Contributes to strategic thinking and innovation
Managerial Duties: Possible
Education, Professional Skills & Experience
PhD (epidemiology or closely related field) or MSc with at least 5-7 years relevant experience
Knowledge of drug development process and familiarity with international regulatory requirements.
Broad experience in quantitative methods in health services research, with the focus on design of non-interventional studies and data analysis using observational retrospective and prospective data
Very good understanding of relevant methodology and statistics
Deep understanding of healthcare research principles, knowledge of practical research implementation
Working knowledge of MS Office software; ability to read and understand SAS/STATA output; working knowledge of data analysis software (e.g., SAS, Stata, R) a plus
Demonstrated ability to communicate and document information effectively in written English, including the ability to produce scientific reports, presentations, emails and other written deliverables that are well-organized, free from errors, and are appropriately adjusted to the characteristics and needs of the audience.
Strong organizational, time-management, prioritization and decision-making skills necessary to evaluate, plan and accomplish multiple work goals in a timely fashion.
Able to quickly learn and apply new information, skills and procedures.
Proactive and positive approach to tasks and projects, as well as resilience when encountering process, project, budget or client changes that are inherent in the consulting environment.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills including the ability to quickly develop and sustain positive rapport with internal and external contacts in person, over the phone and by email.
Experience presenting ideas to individuals and groups in a formal presentation setting
Delivers a positive internal/external client experience; listens and understand the client's needs, and recommends solutions
Demonstrates sound professional judgment in analyzing, responding to, and resolving enquiries, issues and escalations.
Leverages working relationships with customers and colleagues to quickly develop and sustain positive rapport, build strong connections, cooperation and collaboration in person, over the phone and by email.
Tailors and delivers high-level presentations to diverse audiences using a variety of communication delivery methods (e.g., written, electronic, oral, interpersonal).
Makes independent, critical decisions based on relevant information. Applies solutions based on decisions in a timely manner.
Helps others distinguish relevant from irrelevant information and resolves discrepancies.
Analyzes complex issues and evidence, identify cause-effect relationships, and generate effective solutions.
Receives and learns from feedback.
Desire and ability to guide and coach junior-to mid-to levels of scientific staff.
Experience with design of peri- or post-approval late phase interventional studies is not required but would be considered a plus.

About Evidera:
Evidera is a business within in Pharmaceutical Product Development, LLC (PPD) a leading global contract research organization (CRO), and a is a preeminent provider of evidence-based solutions. We provide integrated scientific expertise and global operational capabilities to help clients generate the evidence needed to optimize the market access and commercial potential of products.

Perks:
We offer a competitive salary and benefits package, with clear opportunities for growth and career progression. You will have the opportunity to work on multiple projects with some of the industry’s leading researchers. Our offices boast a fun and collaborative working environment, frequent social events and a robust support system. We are committed to providing training and professional development, with ample opportunity to advance, for all our staff.

Evidera’s Core Competencies:
Customer Focus
Initiative
Teamwork
Problem Solving/Judgment
Accountability
If you resonate with our core competencies and want to contribute to research and consulting services driven by world-class science and thought leadership, then please submit your application – we’d love to hear from you.
Evidera, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, genetics, sexual orientation, gender preference,disability, or status as a qualified individual with a disability or protected veteran.",3.9,"Evidera
3.9","Waltham, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
257,Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist),$62k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Battelles founding mission to translate scientific discovery and technology advances into societal benefit is as relevant today as when we opened our doors over 90 years ago. Our science and technology enhance society's well-being and create critical innovations that drive scientific advances for the future. We conduct groundbreaking research and development, design and manufacture leading-edge products, and deliver critical services for commercial and government customers. Our work meets the needs of the nation when it matters most, and Battelle is committed to driving innovation today and for generations to come.
JOB SUMMARY
Battelle’s National Security Business Unit is currently seeking candidates for a full time, permanent position as an Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist) to provide support to government and commercial programs focused on the development, testing, evaluation, and implementation of materials, devices, and techniques designed to detect, provide protection against, and mitigate the effects of explosives.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Execution, data analysis, documentation, and client communication assistance on various projects involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assistance in the resolution/troubleshooting of technical difficulties and safety hazards involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assist in the design and planning of projects, potentially including technical leadership of small teams of multidisciplinary scientists and technical support staff in the performance of selected tasks/projects within time and budget constraints.
Drafting of documentation of laboratory findings and results, including progress reports, final reports, and presentations.
Assistance with posters, articles, and presentations for technical conferences.
Assist with business development efforts, including cost estimation and preparation of white papers and proposals.
Oversee, mentor and train lower-level staff.
Domestic travel of approximately 10% of the time, with some travel events lasting 1-2 weeks.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s degree in chemistry, chemical engineering, mechanical engineering, or a related discipline.
Approximately 5 years of experience with munitions/explosives research, development, and/or test and evaluation
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Sole US citizenship, with the ability to obtain and maintain required government security clearances as a condition of employment.
Sufficient medical fitness to work in the laboratory and in the field to perform assigned duties, including working in test chambers, test ranges, munitions bunkers, and field environments.
The ability to work in a team environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience with modeling and simulation of explosive/energetic events
Safe handling practices for munitions and ordnance
Small arms handling, modification, armoring, gunsmithing
Experience with instrumentation for characterizing properties of energetic materials (e.g., DSC/TGA, bomb calorimetry, etc.)
Experience with flash X-ray and high-rate data capture (video, audio, pressure, electrical)
Experience with leading DOD contracted efforts including DFARS, IDIQ, and OTA contracted research
Explosives formulation, synthesis, handling, and passivation, including military, commercial, and improvised explosives
Experience with aerosol generation/measurement, sampling, characterization, air pollution analysis, and/or spray systems.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members. No statement herein is intended to imply any authorities to commit Battelle unless special written permission is granted by Battelle’s Legal Department.

BENEFITS

Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.

Battelle provides employment and opportunities for advancement, compensation, training, and growth according to individual merit, without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, age, genetic information, disability, veteran-status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable Federal, state, or local law. Our goal is for each staff member to have the opportunity to grow to the limits of their abilities and to achieve personal and organizational objectives. We will support positive programs for equal treatment of all staff and full utilization of all qualified employees at all levels within Battelle.

For more information about our other openings, please visit www.battelle.org/careers",3.4,"Battelle
3.4","West Jefferson, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1929,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
258,Senior Data Scientist,$76k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Mars Agency is a global marketing practice, specializing in marketing to shoppers, consumers and retailers across the ever-expanding omni-commerce environment. Mars uniquely refers to this environment as the A-to-V Commerce SM space, which incorporates everything from Autonomous to Voice commerce.

Mars, proud of its independence and growth-for-clients focus, operates internationally across the Americas, Europe and Asia through its network of 13 offices.

We are currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist to work out of our Bentonville or Detroit office.

The Senior Data Scientist serves as a key member of the team building out the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling and advanced analytics offering, evolving statistical modeling and analytics with technology to develop a best-in-class platform for measurement, evaluation and marketing ROI.
What You’ll Do:
Assist in the development and implementation of the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling platform.
Lead the continued development of the Analytics capability for the agency, helping to define the role of Analytics in all aspects of a program from planning to measurement.
Work to enhance the agency’s overall Business Intelligence offering and analytics strategy.
Define and develop compelling analytic opportunities that complement the agency’s business and result in incremental category growth opportunities for our clients.
Synthesize data from a variety of sources including IRI, Nielsen, media, customer specific POS, shopper loyalty databases, consumer research and category management tools to identify and prioritize business-building opportunities.
Consult on data strategy for the agency, in collaboration with data strategy lead. Identify potential data sources and key data points to be captured, outlining and thinking about potential future uses.
Interface with clients and internal team members to explain complex analytic concepts in an easy to understand way.
Promote advanced analytic and data science capabilities during new business pitches and within the agency’s existing clients.
Provide recommendations for cloud analytics technology and be part of the team implementing.
Work with Python and its libraries, SQL, Spark, and R, all via a Cloud-based platform.

What You Bring to Us:
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a related field, such as statistics, mathematics, econometrics, data science, computer science, or marketing.
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience in consumer marketing or shopper marketing insights and analytics, particularly in the CPG and retail industries.
Dynamic personality able to effectively engage and influence a variety of audiences.
Proficient on querying and reducing data from large database repositories and/or flat files.
At lease 2 years of experience in/with: building efficient data processing pipelines for analytical systems using cloud based technology.
Knowledge of the digital marketing ecosystem and fluency with common web technologies, as well as knowledge of media platforms (Google DFP, Google DFA, Facebook) and 3rd Party Tools (Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google AdWords) as well as experience with CRM Data Analysis.
Hands-on experience with experimental design, offer testing methodology,
descriptive statistics, hypothesis testing, econometric modeling, and regression analysis.
Passion about business and dissatisfaction with the status quo – always thinking of ways to improve/grow the function.
Proficiency in IRI and Nielsen systems, data management and analytics tools, and data visualization software (Tableau preferred).
Leadership and organizational skills.
Capable of handling multiple projects simultaneously.
High level of energy and enthusiasm.
Comfortable with high pressure, fluid and ambiguous situations.
Ability to travel on an as-needed basis.

The Mars Agency is an Equal Opportunity Employer and will recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job classifications without regard to race, ancestry, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability or handicap, HIV, veteran, marital or family status, or any other status or condition protected by applicable state and/or federal laws, except where a bonafide occupational qualification applies.

The Mars Agency has developed a wide variety of inclusive benefit plans and policies that address and promote the needs of all employees and their family members, including comprehensive group health plans, a parental leave program that includes paid maternity and paternity benefits for pregnancy, adoption and surrogacy, flexible paid time off, a broad and confidential employee assistance program, ongoing wellness support initiatives, trusted financial health advice and guidance, promotion of education through tuition support and assistance, and a flexible and supportive work environment and culture.",3.2,"The Mars Agency
3.2","Rogers, AR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
259,Data Engineer,$91k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you believe that creators should have the ability to get paid for the value they give to their fans?


We do, which is why we're building Patreon, a platform that powers membership services for creators with established followings. Patreon strives to provide creators with insight, education, and tools that make it possible to retain creative control while running their creative business, so creators can focus on creating and energizing their fanbases.

Our user base has doubled in the last year alone, and we have paid over $500 million directly to creators on our platform. In order to support this level of growth, Patreon is looking for a Data Engineer.

What you will do:
Maintain and improve our data warehouse
Organize and optimize raw data
Develop new data pipelines and maintain existing pipelines
Collaborate with data scientists on data analysis and query creation/optimization
Skills and experience you possess:


3+ years experience in a Data Engineer role
2+ years experience writing Python or some other object oriented programming language
Experience building and maintaining data warehouses
Experience building, maintaining and optimizing data pipelines
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools such as Airflow, Luigi
Advanced SQL knowledge
Basic knowledge of Infrastructure as Code and configuration management systems (Chef, Puppet, or Ansible)
Experience with AWS big data tools such as Redshift (Redshift Spectrum, Athena, Kinesis, EMR) a plus
Experience with big data technologies such as Kafka, Spark a plus
Knowledge of MySQL a plus
Projects you may work on:


A new Machine Learning Pipeline for serving Data Science and the Product
Migrating our data warehouse from Redshift to Snowflake
Creating a new Sparking Streaming Pipeline for Creator Insights
Any other data needs from the product or our data scientists.
What you will have the chance to learn:
Data Warehouse and Pipelining best practices
On a team of 2-3 determining the long-term data architecture of Patreon.
AWS Infrastructure, Data science or Machine Learning if you so choose.
Who you'll work with:


At Patreon, you'll join a high-performing and highly-empathetic team of people who proudly work on fulfilling our mission of funding the creative class. Our culture of creator-first, thoughtful teammates keeps work creative, stretching, and rewarding.

Our Core Behaviors:
Put Creators First. Patreon is nothing without our creators.
Achieve Ambitious Outcomes. Set, measure, and accomplish goals that deliver massive value to our creators and patrons.
Cultivate Inclusion. We want an environment that retains and engages the diverse teams we build.
Bias Towards Action. When in doubt, we take the next best step, then course correct when needed. We go out of our way to fix problems when we see them. We take ownership seriously.
Be Candid and Kind. Be extremely caring and extremely direct in all you do at Patreon, especially when it comes to giving positive and constructive feedback.
Be Curious. You don't know it all, and that's the fun part. Everything gets better when you're curious. Things get more interesting, more clear, and more approachable. When you bring curiosity into the workplace, you're growing yourself, your teammates, and Patreon as a whole.
Want to learn more about Patreon?
Check out our reviews on Glassdoor
Check to see if you know a Patreon teammate on LinkedIn
#LI-KM2",3.2,"Patreon
3.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
260,Marketing Strategy and Analytics Manager,$36k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Pushpay exists to bring people together by strengthening community, connection, and belonging. As the leading provider of mobile apps and giving technology to churches, schools, and nonprofits, Pushpay helps organizations and their communities stay connected anytime, anywhere.

We recently announced the exciting news of Pushpay and Church Community Builder merging together to deliver a best-in-class fully integrated church management system (ChMS), custom community app, and giving solutions for organizations in the faith sector. The combination of our two companies gives us complementary world class solutions for our customers and aligns strongly with Pushpay's core strategy of providing innovative, market-leading solutions for customers.

Job Summary:

The Marketing Strategy and Analytics Manager is part of the Business Insights Team, directly supporting the Online Marketing Team. This person is responsible for translating data to stories. What is happening in the pipeline? Why did it happen, and how can we improve our strategy? Use your excellent communication skills to give business insights to the leadership teams on a regular basis (emphasis on funnel conversion and ROI).

Duties/Responsibilities:
Provide actionable insights to the Online Marketing team
Build standardized and consistent reporting to closely monitor the most important business metrics on a regular basis including analysis of the full marketing funnel and conversions on a daily, weekly, and monthly basis
Develop in-depth analysis tools to work with the Director of Online Marketing and other Marketing stakeholders. This will bring understanding of trends and surface strategic opportunities to improve engagement and market development across the team
Identify newly tracked metrics in order to build, evolve, manage, and support end-to-end analytics pipelines
Support the marketing automation function through the centralization of all email marketing list pulls
Understand how lead and prospect data is structured in core systems, and segments the database on various criteria (region, church size, life cycle stage, persona, etc.) to best target a specific market or user type
Collaborate with BI Analysts and Data Science team to further understand how Marketing insights impact the data and processes across the organization
Required Qualifications:
4+ years of marketing analytics, marketing operations, or digital marketing experience, preferably in a related industry
2-3 years of experience using SQL and visualization tools (Tableau preferred)
2+ years of experience in a Salesforce environment (or comparable enterprise CRM)
5+ years of experience with Advanced Excel (applicants will complete a skills assessment)
3+ years of experience building Powerpoint (or comparable) slide decks
Prior experience using Marketo, Bizible, and other enterprise Marketing tools
Prior experience with email marketing and demand generation analytics
Experience building business cases and interfacing regularly with senior leaders
Structured thinker with strong organizational and communication skills
Willingness to adapt to a fast-paced work environment
Analytical, ambitious, and curious people, with a desire to learn and grow rapidly",3.7,"Pushpay
3.7","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
261,SAP Data Analyst,$75k-$100k (Employer Est.),"POSITION PURPOSE:

The Data Analyst will be part of the OWI Analytic team, working closely with our business partners, proactively developing and delivering analytic solutions. The primary deliverables include creating data visualization such as Dashboards, Charts, Histograms and Projective Analysis. This will be accomplished by utilizing OWI data architecture, data workflows from local data sources.

OWI is a fast-paced and dynamic organization. Individuals will be handling multiple activities in a team as well as individual contributor environment.

DUTIES, TASKS AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Experience and expertise creating visualizations that provide business insights for our global customers. Examples: Pie Charts, Dashboards, Cash-flow projections with Histograms– Projections analysis– Financial Analysis – KPI’s Service level Agreements
Expertise in SQL, independently mine data to translate Business data needs into creative visualizations.
Performance tuning specific to Tableau data sets– requires in depth understanding of data.
Assist the Enterprise Data Warehouse team create, design data models that will be published to our Tableau environment.
Assess data quality, design data quality management procedures, clean and correct data quality defects, establish data governance.
Experienced utilizing HANA studio including calculations and analytical views, data base schemas, creating attribute user/role creation.
Assist setting up security, Analytic privileges, user integration services, SQL script, SLT, SDA, SDI and HANA Live solution models.
Demonstrate critical thinking, analytical skills, and employ judgment to offer thoughtful, concise input toward resolutions of problems.
Assist team building the BW4HANA modeler including standard and custom development and deployment of EWD design building BW objects e.g. Composite Providers, Advanced DSO’s, ODS Views, Data Sources, Data Loading using SLT.
Requires the skill set to work with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams and data analysts/scientists to develop data visualizations that provide business insights
Finance/Operations/Sales/Marketing/IT functional leads PTP/PTM/RTR etc.
Projects management capabilities - include requirements gathering, design, deployment, and change request, future enhancements management
Capabilities to build/design prototypes to demo to stakeholders - peer groups, Business partners, and senior leaders.
Training and support peers and stakeholders e.g. Subject Matter Expert (SME) throughout the report creations and support - troubleshooting, analysis of results.
Leadership skills needed to successfully promote ideas, coordinate work activities, and plan deliverables within a project team.


SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITIES:


Advanced expert database handling languages (SQL and variants)
Experience with data analytics, diagrams, data dictionary, data mapping, normalize de-normalize, agile data modeling
Practical skill sets in BI and Data visualization tools
Working knowledge of ETL
Working knowledge of SAP
Basic Project Management and Business Process modeling
Minimum Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering Technology, Computer Science, or closely related field.
A minimum of 3 years’ experience in Tableau, SAP Data Governance, SAP Data Services (Data Extract, Data Profiling, de-duplication)
Advanced competency in Tableau and Alteryx
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with a strong focus on the ability to clearly articulate and discuss technical issues with both technical and business personnel.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Math or a related IT field or equivalent work experience in an IT field required
Strong analytical skills, able to effectively solve problems in a timely manner",3.1,"Old World Industries
3.1","Northbrook, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
262,"Assistant Director, Data Stewardship",$34k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Requisition Number 20-0025
Post Date 9/22/2020
Title Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
City Washington
State DC
Description Title: Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
Position Type: Full-Time (Two-Year Term)
Location: Washington, DC

What we do and offer our team

AGU is a global community of 118,000 Earth and space scientists, advocates and experts. As the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship, you will be part of a dynamic association that publishes peer-reviewed journals and scientific books and convenes the largest Earth and space science meeting in the world. Through our initiatives, such as mentoring, professional development and awards, AGU upholds and fosters an inclusive and diverse scientific community.

AGU offers our employees great benefits, including flexible work schedules, retirement savings options, as well as health, dental, life and disability insurance. AGU also provides exciting opportunities for professional development and tuition support.

AGU’s Workplace Values

We believe in accountability and ownership of work, by taking responsibility for decisions and results. We believe in member and customer service, and that they come first through providing high quality service.

We believe in excellence and giving it our all, through striving to be outstanding. We believe in integrity by doing the right thing, we achieve this by being honest and fair.

Our teams believe that with teamwork together we achieve more, we achieve this through collaboration. We believe in respect, that you earn it and give it, by open communication and collaboration.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship does

AGU’s data and software policies associated with publications have evolved over the last few years to now require that data and software supporting the research in the paper are preserved in an appropriate repository, described in the availability statement and cited in the references. AGU’s editors and publication team are implementing the new policy with good results.

The Assistant Director, Data Stewardship position is part of the AGU’s Data Leadership program supporting AGU publications, editors, reviewers, authors, and the broader Earth and space science community with support to ensure that data and software supporting AGU publications, specifically those funded by the National Science Foundation EAR grants are preserved in an appropriate repository, included in the availability statement, and cited in the references of the papers.

The incumbent in this role will help to further develop best practices and to serve as a resource to the editors, reviewers, authors, and AGU publications team to support the full implementation of AGU’s data and software publication policies and the broader culture change around data and software sharing.
This is a two-year term position.

• Supports AGU authors in identifying repositories that are aligned with the FAIR guiding principles for data and software before, or at the time of, manuscript submission and ideally identified in the Data Management Plan for the research.
• Ensures that researchers include an availability statement and cite their data and software properly, in references for AGU journals.
• Ensures that AGU Journals tag the data and software citations properly and sends these to Crossref, CHORUS, and other downstream services.
• Develops best practices for the broad journal community, shares those practices, conducts outreach through AGU Data FAIR, Data Help Desk, AGU’s communication channels, and our partners.
• Supports AGU data and software sharing efforts for the purpose of making data and software open and FAIR as a common practice.
• Works with researchers to improve their awareness and understanding of research data management skills that better prepare them to make their data open and FAIR.
• Works with AGU publications staff, providing training and support to those working with editors, reviewers, and authors across all the journals.
• Reviews submitted papers (with priority to NSF-EAR funded research), assesses the viability of the author’s data and software products, determines if any data or software has been used but not included in the availability statements, and recommends improvements to data and software availability statements and citations.
• Supports authors by facilitating their understanding of what is required for their data and software to prepared for publication.
• Supports AGU’s Data FAIR and the Data Help Desk.
• Coordinates with the COPDESS community (https://COPDESS.org) and partners such as ESIP (https://esipfed.org), CHORUS (https://www.chorusaccess.org), Dryad (https://datadryad.org), and others.
• Develops and shares leading practices with the broad community around open and FAIR data and software.
• Supports content management on AGU and partner websites to make information easily available.
• Keeps abreast of new trends and needs through interaction with industry professionals; travels for outreach activities as needed.
• Other duties as assigned.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship brings to the team
• Post-graduate study in the natural sciences or related field; Ph.D. is strongly preferred.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scientific data best practices to include: creation, analysis, management, curation, and preservation.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scholarly publishing process, knowledge of and experience with Earth, space, or environmental science related journals preferred.
• Broad awareness of data practices in the sciences and leading efforts to improve them.
• Breadth of knowledge in industry best practices and related data management technologies.
• Excellent oral and written communication skills.
• Ability to present content in webinars, videos, and other channels using tools such as PowerPoint.
• Ability to coordinate and manage video meetings, webinars, and other online and in person outreach activities.
• Must be capable of dealing calmly and professionally with numerous different personalities from diverse cultures at various levels within and outside of the organization.
• Excellent analytical skills, mathematical and organizational skills required.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Ability to execute responsibilities with minimal supervision required.
• Must be able to perform responsibilities with composure under the stress of deadlines; requirements for accuracy and quality and/or fast pace required.
• Ability to understand the complexity of the factors needed to produce successful meeting programs.
• Ability to travel.

To Apply:

For consideration, please submit your cover letter and resume to
https://rew12.ultipro.com/AME1056/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=407

The successful candidate for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

AGU proudly offers a casual work environment, excellent compensation, generous work-life opportunities, and an outstanding benefits package.

AGU is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP
here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.6,"American Geophysical Union
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1919,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
263,Data Analyst,-1,"Who We Are

Strata.ai is a consulting and venture building firm focused on the exponential potential of Decision Science, Artificial Intelligence, and Extended Reality. We partner with the world’s largest organizations to solve, develop, and scale robust solutions through meaningful innovation and a hyper-focus on measurable impact.

We believe that to build successful relationships, technologies, or companies - we need to invest in people. We aim to attract like-minded individuals who see problems as challenges, are obsessed with solving them, who can think creatively and drive their ideas with data, can be depended on to deliver results, and is always willing to help those around them succeed. We believe in integrity, transparency, accountability, and trust.

If it seems that we are describing you, then we would love for you to apply.

Overview

We’re looking for aspiring Data & Decision Scientists, Data Architects, and Machine Learning Engineers to be part of Strata.ai’s Consulting Base. You’ll be working in either team or individual capacities to design, develop, and deliver objective focused business projects for our clients and partners.

Your quality communication, documentation, and organization skills will be instrumental in your success for this role. You’re hungry, constantly researching the latest methods, techniques, and technologies and have an affinity for details and accuracy. When a business decision is made, you're confident that the data behind that decision is correct and complete.

Requirements

Responsibilities
Research, Gather, Organize, and Analyze information from multiple sources and mediums.
Ensures completeness and integrity of data as well as their sources.
Coordinates requests for more or complete information as needed.
Keeps track of information sources, purpose, time of consumption, and destinations.
Research information ownership and privacy concerns, ensures security compliance.
Filter, sort, sanitize, and “clean” data to be programmatically utilized.
Prepare operational datasets with only necessary or relevant data points.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Collaborate with management to prioritize and information needs.
Provides reporting, project summaries, ongoing status updates, and maintains all records of processing activities.
Become a source and advocate within and outside the organization(s) for data science, decision science, and artificial intelligence.
Supports ad hoc needs and performs other duties as assigned.
Requirements
High School Diploma or GED, Undergraduate degree preferred.
Strong Organization and Prioritization Skills
Experience with G-Suite Tooling (Gmail, Docs, Sheets, Slides)
Excellent communication skills in both oral and written.
Attention to detail, ability to execute on directions accurately and timely.
Ability to work in a team environment and maintain a professional disposition.
Commitment and competence to provide excellent customer service; positive, flexible, and empathetically.
Must have your own computer and a fast and stable internet connection.
Benefits

Pay and benefits are competitive and based on industry standards and individual experience and skill sets. We offer salary and contract engagements. Salaries includes Healthcare and 401(k) as well as Unlimited PTO after 90 days.

]]>",-1,Strata.ai,"Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
264,Data Scientist,-1,"Company Introduction

Alto Neuroscience is a private company headquartered in the San Francisco Bay Area. Alto is developing a new generation of neural biomarker-based diagnostic tests and personalized treatments for use in mental health, based on a platform built from data aggregated at scale and cutting-edge artificial intelligence analysis tools. The team combines world-leading neuroscientists and business executives with experience commercializing products for the brain.

Job Description

We are looking for a motivated Data scientist who is passionate about mental health. This person will work closely with a growing inter-disciplinary team of Physicians, Research scientists and Software developers to challenge the status quo and transform mental health via intelligent use of Artificial intelligence techniques. This position will oversee and perform analysis of large-scale multi-dimensional, multi-variate healthcare data. Specifically, this work will include the design and analysis of data to generate actionable patient insights that will aid in personalized treatment for mental health disorders.

Roles and Responsibilities

· Prepare Data and Data pipelines for model development

· Develop novel approaches for exploration, analysis and feature selection from large-scale multidimensional data that include genetics, neurophysiological data, clinical/patient data

· Build, train, test and deploy machine learning models

· Develop visualization tools to interpret and communicate results

· Work closely with software developers to integrate models into software products

· Document code, results and details of the approaches in a thorough and systematic way in order to promote knowledge sharing and code re-use

· Collaborate with other data scientists, SMEs to ideate and solve complex issues pertinent to data ingestion/curation, model performance, model generalization.
Skills and Qualifications

· Master or PhD degree in Engineering, Neuroscience, Bioinformatics, or other quantitative fields with strong analysis and programming experience.

· Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms

· Experience with common data science toolkits and libraries, such as scikit-learn, Pandas, NumPy, SciPy, Matlab, etc.

· Programming languages: Python

· Working knowledge of Linux OS, SQL

· 2+ years of Python programming and product development experience

· 2+ years of machine learning experience using real-world data

· Great verbal and written skills

· Be a team player while being able to work independently

· Knowledge of genomic data science is a plus

· Knowledge of application of deep learning to real-world data is a plus

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
Fully Remote
Company's website:
https://www.altoneuroscience.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible",-1,"Alto Neuroscience, Inc","San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
265,Senior Data Scientist,$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
266,Senior Clinical Laboratory Scientist,$46-$77 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Clinical Laboratory Scientist*
As a Senior Clinical Laboratory Scientist (Senior CLS) at Invivoscribe you are responsible for receiving samples, performing data entry for specimens received, and clinical laboratory patient testing. The Senior CLS is expected to be responsible for all aspects of analytical testing without supervision. More specifically:
Ensures orders are entered correctly and specimens collected are appropriate for the test ordered.
Examines preventative maintenance logs of instruments/equipment.
Verifies reagents and supplies are met and responsible for inventory maintenance.
Performs tests by prioritizing testing based on assignment or established priorities.
Performs post-analytic workflow to ensure accurate results are reported.
Performs required Quality System responsibilities including initiating Quality Occurrence Reports.
Skills and Experience Required: *
Bachelor of Science in Clinical Laboratory Science or equivalent.
5+ years of Clinical Laboratory Scientist experience or a minimum of 3 years of NGS or molecular experience.
Licensed in California as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist.
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Outlook, Excel and PowerPoint).
Job Type: Full-time",3.3,"INVIVOSCRIBE INC
3.3","San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
267,"Principal Scientist, Viral Vector Technology Development - Gene Therapy",$102k-$215k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
Job Description:


As part of our continued growth and expansion, the newly created Principal Scientist, Viral Vector Technology Development (VVTD) Gene Therapy leads, and actively contributes to, the exploration and development of innovative technologies for gene therapy viral vector production. This includes, but may not be limited to, cell and virus culture as well as small-scale process DOE design and execution.

This individual leads the evaluation and development of new technologies that enhance the production of AAV vector beyond current industry-observed levels. She/he leads the design and execution of proof-of-concept studies and tech transfer to upstream process development for further evaluation and scaleup/manufacturability assessment in bioreactors. She/he provides Subject Matter Expertise (SME) for internally executed processes, as well as external, Contract Development Manufacturing Organizations (CDMOs)-executed processes, to ensure their proper execution. She/he interacts extensively with Research, Plasmid Development, Upstream and Downstream Process Development and Analytical Development personnel to deliver high-quality and robust processes in a regulated environment.

S/he may manage direct reports.

The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments and external resources as appropriate on upstream process development-related issues.

The Principal Scientist, Viral Vector Technology Development Gene Therapy supports adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate.

Primary duties/responsibilities:
Generates technology development plans with of the goal of establishing highly productive upstream processes and obtaining buy-in from peers and leadership.
Provides leadership and actively contributes to viral vector process development activities for both internal and external projects.
Functions as the PIP at CDMOs to monitor, and assist with, on-going upstream process development and execution activities.
Leads, designs and executes small-scale shake flask, 2-D multilayer flask and small-scale bioreactor studies to support the development of cell, virus and plasmid DNA-based gene therapy upstream manufacturing processes.
Applies experience with transfection- and infection-based viral vector gene therapy process development and assists his/her direct reports (as appropriate) to develop/further develop their experience in these skills.
Works closely with Process Development to transfer processes from bench-scale to manufacturing-scale
Collaborates with Analytical Development to build the scientific knowledge, capabilities, and strategies in gene therapy product characterization that enable fast to clinic/fast to market product development and commercialization.
Leads and assures the effective execution of, science-driven, phase appropriate, and risk-based process development strategies to support development projects from candidate nomination to clinical development and commercial manufacture.
Leads and actively contributes to writing and/or QC review of relevant sections of global regulatory filings. These include, but may not be limited to, INDs, BLAs and ex-US filings
Manages, mentors, coaches, and cross-trains junior scientists to build a highly functional team focused on developing next-generation vector manufacturing technologies. This includes providing scientific and technical support to troubleshoot and solve scientific challenges.
* Minimum level of education and years of relevant work experience.
A PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biochemistry or other relevant discipline and a minimum of 5 years of progressively responsible experience in biologics and/or gene therapy process development roles OR a Masters degree in these same disciplines and a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in a pharmaceutical, biotechnology or related environment.
* Special knowledge or skills needed and/or licenses or certificates required.
Expert level knowledge of mammalian cell culture, cell cloning, virology, and upstream processes is required. Experience with insect cell culture is a plus.
Demonstrated experience designing and executing experiments evaluating new technologies including but not limited to: new bioprocessing equipment, novel transfection or electroporation technologies, cell cloning, cell intensification and, and media development.
Demonstrated, expert level understanding with virology concepts, viral manipulation, and viral characterization.
Ability to identify higher-risk opportunities, establish proof-of-concept data, and present cost/benefit analyses to management/leadership.
Demonstrated, hands-on experience overseeing and conducting technology transfer-in and transfer-out of upstream biologics, vaccine, or gene therapy manufacturing processes in early phases of development.
Significant experience in laboratory operations, including budgeting, capex procurement, safety, and status reporting to Senior Management is preferred.
Demonstrated understanding of, and applied experience with, cell-based assays, qPCR, HPLC, ELISA, SDS-PAGE, mass spectrometry, nucleic acid and protein sequencing.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively, as required, in a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office.
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines.
Excellent planning, organization and time management skills including the ability to support and prioritize multiple projects.
*Special knowledge or skills and/or licenses or certificates preferred.
Experience with relevant molecular biology techniques preferred, such as DNA plasmid cloning, transformation, microbial cultures, and plasmid purification.
Experience with HEK293, BHK, Hela, and/or Sf9 culture preferred. Experience with herpesvirus- or adenovirus-based AAV production methods preferred.
Experience in GMP upstream, downstream clinical manufacturing and small-scale product filling is preferred.
Demonstrated ability to lead upstream process development activities conducted by Contract Research Organizations (CROs)/Contract Development and Manufacturing Organizations (CDMOs).
Knowledge of GLP and GMP requirements as they pertain to upstream process development and clinical manufacturing for gene therapy products
* Travel requirements

10-25%

EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","Pennington, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
268,Bioinformatics Scientist/Sr Bioinformatics Scientist,-1,"Position Summary
The Bioinformatics Scientist/Sr Bioinformatics Scientist will catalyze computational analysis of large volumes of genomic and clinical data with the aim of developing precision medicine approaches for the rescue of drugs that have failed late stage clinical trials. This individual will play a key scientific role leveraging innovative computational analysis strategies and a wide range of data sources to discover novel clinical biomarkers to improve therapeutic outcomes in complex diseases of unmet medical need with specific focus on the identification of genetic biomarkers that relate to disease subgroups and therapeutic response. Areas of particular focus include systems-level analysis of genetic association studies to discover novel biomarkers for oncology and CNS diseases. Successful candidates include individuals looking to bridge the gap between academic and industrial research environments to impact delivery of truly innovative and life-changing therapies.

ESSENTIAL fUNCTIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Coordinated application of novel computational analysis and biological interpretation approaches to leverage internal, public and partner datasets to empower pharmacogenomics biomarker research.
Data integration across various genomic platforms.
Participation in and oversight of scientific report writing. Presentation of methods, results and conclusions to a publishable standard.
Contribution to planning and execution of collaborative projects with leading academic and commercial research groups.
Participate in brainstorming sessions, maintain a highly productive and motivating work environment.
JOB QUALIFICATIONS
Education, Certifications, Experience
Ph.D. in computational biology, bioinformatics, or related field.
5+ years post-doctoral experience of inter-disciplinary computational and drug discovery research in a university, hospital or biotechnology environment.
2+ years’ experience in pharma/biotech research environment is preferable.
Experience working with data from clinical trials and health care data.
Track record of peer-reviewed publication in relevant scientific journals.
Expertise in genetic association studies and the analysis and interpretation of next-generation sequencing data are prerequisites.
Previous experience in the field of precision medicine is preferred.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Strong knowledge required of genetic association analysis and interpretation, and applied computational research of large multivariate datasets.
Expertise in algorithmic implementation, statistical programming, and data manipulation, using R/Bioconductor, Matlab, Python, and a wide range of contemporary open-source bioinformatics tools and databases.
Strong proficiency and understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Fluent verbal and written English language skills are prerequisite.
A strong interest in the inter-disciplinary application of computational analysis to life sciences data is imperative, as is a rich background and experience in bioinformatics and computational biology research.",-1,Denovo Biopharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
269,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
270,Product Development Scientist,$11k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Avery Dennison (NYSE: AVY) is a global materials science company specializing in the design and manufacture of a wide variety of labeling and functional materials. The company’s products, which are used in nearly every major industry, include pressure-sensitive materials for labels and graphic applications; tapes and other bonding solutions for industrial, medical, and retail applications; tags, labels and embellishments for apparel; and radio frequency identification (RFID) solutions serving retail apparel and other markets. Headquartered in Glendale, California, the company employs more than 30,000 employees in over 50 countries. Reported sales in 2019 were $7.1 billion. Learn more at www.averydennison.com.

Job Description

Avery Dennison is seeking an adhesives and coatings product development scientist to join the Labels and Graphics Materials Group - North American Research and Development team in Mill Hall, PA. In this role, you will bring a solid understanding of acrylic polymer design, synthesis, formulation to product development and innovation. As a product development scientist, you will participate as the technical leader on multi-functional project teams, driving innovation and new product development (NPD) from concept to commercialization, as well as cost reduction and business continuity efforts. This role will work closely with other business leaders in marketing, supply chain, operations and quality teams to ensure business success in an environment where individual and team success are recognized and rewarded.

Representative Activities:
Provide hands-on polymer synthesis and formulating competence for the development and promotion of adhesives and coatings for targeted end-user applications.
Working closely with other departments, lead the scale-up of new adhesives and coatings product technology from laboratory through pilot and to full scale production. Lead LGM-NA advocate role for Mill Hall site product development activities
Understand and scope experimental design objectives, gather and analyze data, develop findings, prepare technical reports to be shared both inter-organizationally and with external customers
Setup and conduct experiments, perform relevant application and analytical testing in the laboratory, following established procedures. Work is typically peer reviewed for soundness of technical judgment, overall accuracy and adequacy
Collaborate with project team members and key partners of other departments, including marketing, quality, process engineering, operations and supply chain to ensure favorable R&D project outcomes and product launches.
Together with other technology teams, identify appropriate technology platforms to modify and deploy to meet specific applications in support of LGM-NA goals and initiatives
Translate end-product requirements into actionable adhesives and coatings design strategies and tactics to assist greater technology organization with assessing and commercializing new technology
Apply a hands-on approach and scientific principles of adhesion, synthesis and formulating design to solve a variety of issues, challenges, unmet needs of moderate scope and complexity
Conduct targeted travel (20%) in support of LGM requirements and projects to gather information, conduct experiments and gather feedback
Follow LGM NPD and Stage Gate process, and lead adhesive and coatings related development activities through design, scale-up and launch processes.
Qualifications
BS degree in Chemistry, Polymer Science, Materials or Natural Sciences or equivalent
2+ years related experience in pressure sensitive adhesives, coatings or polymers field, commercial product development, technical project management
Experience with emulsion and solution acrylic polymers including synthesis, design and manufacture
Solid understanding of coating, drying, converting and end-user applications is advantageous
Established proficiency to assess the customer’s objectives, and translate into actionable adhesives and coatings design strategies
Familiarity with analytical instrumentation and materials characterization tools, NPD tools, and DOE methodology
Ability to interface effectively cross-functionally to define, coordinate and execute overall requirements.
Knowledge of Lean concepts, Six Sigma and Design for Six Sigma also beneficial
Proven effectiveness to execute with a high sense of urgency
IND123

#GD123

Additional Information

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, protected veteran status or other protected status. EEOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled. All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Avery Dennison
3.8","Mill Hall, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1935,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
271,Director of Data Science & Analytics,-1,"Credit Sesame is a fast growing FinTech company, a pioneer and the leader in personal credit management with a disruptive vision for personal finance through its recent acquisition and entry into digital banking. Headquartered in the Bay Area with presence across the US and Canada and growing globally, Credit Sesame is helping consumers' cash work for their credit and their credit work for their cash by applying advanced data science, AI and machine learning for better financial wellness. Our purpose is to be the “go to” brand for financial wellness.

Credit Sesame is looking for a hands-on, highly technical and mission-driven Director of Data Science & Analytics to lead and scale our fast growing Data Science, Machine Learning & Analytics team. Reporting to our Chief Technology Officer, you’ll lead a team transforming, analyzing, and interpreting data and leading experimentation across all levels of the company to drive key business decisions.
You'll...
scale, lead, and run a premier data science and analytics team that creates tangible impact through meaningful insights;
establish the goals, strategy, and priorities for your team and optimize team operational procedures;
use predictive modeling techniques to improve our product recommendation engine;
partner and collaborate with diverse teams in product, engineering, marketing, finance, and operations to help build and define roadmaps and strategies;
establish best practices for model life-cycle, EDA processes and quality management;
play a critical role in building the corporate insight repository and data-informed culture at Credit Sesame;
participate with Credit Sesame’s executive team, helping to set business strategy, discussing key strategic topics, and driving bold high-impact decisions.
You're a great fit for our team because...
you have grown and led a data science team, and have served as an expert to other data scientists, in a cross-functional organization where your team needs to collaborate with other teams across multiple business units;
you have experience with consumer facing products;
you have strong experience with statistical models, feature engineering, and algorithmic modeling;
you've built models for products and have a live model currently in production;
you’re experienced with SQL, Python, and related statistical analysis tools;
you’re hands-on and excited about dedicating a large percentage of your time to both building models and mentoring others who are doing so;
you have experience in model lifecycle management;
you have a strong business acumen, and are comfortable driving process change and continuous improvement.
You'll love it here because...
you‘ll have huge potential to grow with a company that’s a category leader;
you’ll have equity in a pre-IPO company backed by top VCs;
we offer comprehensive medical, dental, and vision insurance with many plan options;
we have lunch catered daily;
you can stay on top of your fitness goals with our onsite fitness centers;
we offer monthly fitness, phone and internet reimbursement;
you can fuel up at our stocked kitchens with endless snacks and drinks;
we prize EQ and empathy, and have a culture that emphasizes total wellness, including work-life harmony.

Office Location

We are open to hiring remotely for this role. You could also work out of our Toronto, San Francisco or our Mountain View office—you decide!

We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,"Credit Sesame
3.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
272,Machine Learning Engineer,$54k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer
10835
Phoenix, AZ
7/13/2020 11:11:00 AM

IT
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Job Description – Python/ML – Senior Engineer/ Architect

Site Reliability engineering portfolio consists of several mission critical americanexpress.com applications. Web engineering enterprise applications are highly available applications, maintains high (~99.999%) availability in an extremely high throughput transactional system with strict performance requirements. Primary focus of the Site Reliability Engineering team is to conceptualize, design, develop and implement observability related frameworks/common components, instrumenting observability tools for enterprise that will ensure high application reliability, scalability, availability and performance of the Web applications. Site reliability team is embarking on a transformation journey to implement “Automation first” approach in Service Delivery and Site Reliability Engineering space.

What you will be doing:
Conceptualize and implement Machine Learning driven Site Reliability Engineering Framework/Components to improve predictive monitoring and driving SRE team’s journey towards “Automation First” approach
Research latest technology, concepts, conceptualize solution and develop proof of concept that will improve resiliency and performance of the production infrastructure. Design and implement innovative solution/framework that will improve software engineering velocity, infrastructure resiliency and security, and data availability
Develop observability related common framework components (to be leveraged by enterprise applications), define standards for configuration, monitoring, reliability and performance engineering


Qualifications:
A BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, other Technical discipline, or equivalent work experience
5 + years of experience in Python with emphasis on machine learning
Hands on experience with – Spark, Splunk, Pandas, Numpy, and Scikit-learn
Experience in designing mission critical highly available enterprise applications
Strong knowledge of Linux internals and experience managing Linux systems in high traffic environments
Strong knowledge of machine learning, mathematical modeling, R, and statistics
Strong interpersonal communication skills and the ability to work well in a diverse team-focused environment
5+ years of experience with building Rest APIs, API Integration, and Web Services is preferred
Knowledge of server-side technologies such as WebSphere, JBose, NodeJS is preferred

Job Requirements
Job Description – Python/ML – Senior Engineer/ Architect

Site Reliability engineering portfolio consists of several mission critical americanexpress.com applications. Web engineering enterprise applications are highly available applications, maintains high (~99.999%) availability in an extremely high throughput transactional system with strict performance requirements. Primary focus of the Site Reliability Engineering team is to conceptualize, design, develop and implement observability related frameworks/common components, instrumenting observability tools for enterprise that will ensure high application reliability, scalability, availability and performance of the Web applications. Site reliability team is embarking on a transformation journey to implement “Automation first” approach in Service Delivery and Site Reliability Engineering space.

What you will be doing:
Conceptualize and implement Machine Learning driven Site Reliability Engineering Framework/Components to improve predictive monitoring and driving SRE team’s journey towards “Automation First” approach
Research latest technology, concepts, conceptualize solution and develop proof of concept that will improve resiliency and performance of the production infrastructure. Design and implement innovative solution/framework that will improve software engineering velocity, infrastructure resiliency and security, and data availability
Develop observability related common framework components (to be leveraged by enterprise applications), define standards for configuration, monitoring, reliability and performance engineering


Qualifications:
A BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, other Technical discipline, or equivalent work experience
5 + years of experience in Python with emphasis on machine learning
Hands on experience with – Spark, Splunk, Pandas, Numpy, and Scikit-learn
Experience in designing mission critical highly available enterprise applications
Strong knowledge of Linux internals and experience managing Linux systems in high traffic environments
Strong knowledge of machine learning, mathematical modeling, R, and statistics
Strong interpersonal communication skills and the ability to work well in a diverse team-focused environment
5+ years of experience with building Rest APIs, API Integration, and Web Services is preferred
Knowledge of server-side technologies such as WebSphere, JBose, NodeJS is preferred",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
273,"Principal Scientist, Discovery",$121k-$234k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Description:
We are looking for a highly motivated principal scientist to join the Discovery Immuno-Oncology group at Jounce Therapeutics. The successful candidate for this position will play a leading role within a team of scientists engaged in the discovery and testing of novel cancer immunotherapeutic biologics. Direct program leadership of one or more early discovery programs including managing timelines, driving key go/no-go decision making, communication of program strategy and progress, contributing to regulatory filings, and management of multiple reports are key elements of this position. The candidate must be capable of working across functional groups and possess superb oral and written communication skills. The ideal candidate should be a highly motivated self-starter capable of working independently and as part of a team.
Responsibilities:
Lead development and execution of one or more early discovery programs.
Provide both immuno-oncology guidance and technical expertise to a cross-functional team.
Present program strategy and progress to research leadership and senior management teams.
Assist in management of program budget and deliverables.
Play a leading role in the Discovery IO group by sharing ideas, data, and working closely with colleagues to ensure success of entire early portfolio.
Drafting documents in support of regulatory filings.
Management of multiple direct and/or indirect reports.

Requirements:
Doctoral degree (Ph.D., M.D., M.D./Ph.D.) or equivalent in Immunology or Cancer Immunology, postdoctoral experience of 1-4 year, with 5+ years industry experience a plus.
S/he will have a strong background in Immunology, with a track record of successfully advancing early target programs in an industry setting.
S/he should have managed multiple direct reports and/or managed project teams.
Publications in top tier journals, and/or patents.
Excellent organizational, communication and presentation skills.
Strong time management skills and focus to drive toward key decision points on target programs.
Able to thrive in a highly collaborative, fast-paced, team-oriented environment with colleagues from diverse disciplines but with the capacity to work independently.
Ability to think creatively and critically to make a measurable impact on projects is an important aspect of this role.
A passion for bringing novel therapeutics to cancer patients.
Experience with technical report writing and IND filings

Equal Opportunity Employer
Jounce Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, religion, creed, sex, or political beliefs. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. All applicants should be legally entitled to work for any employer in the U.S.
To apply, please visit https://careers-jouncetx.icims.com/.

Company Overview
Jounce Therapeutics, Inc. is a clinical-stage immunotherapy company dedicated to transforming the treatment of cancer by developing therapies that enable the immune system to attack tumors and provide long lasting benefits to patients through a biomarker-driven approach. Through the use of its Translational Science Platform, Jounce first focuses on specific cell types within the human tumor microenvironment to prioritize targets, and then identifies related biomarkers designed to match the right immunotherapy to the right patient. Jounce currently has four development-stage programs, two of which are clinical-stage: vopratelimab, a monoclonal antibody that binds to and activates ICOS, and JTX-4014, a PD-1 inhibitor intended for combination use with Jounce’s broader pipeline. Vopratelimab is currently being assessed in a Phase 2 clinical trial, EMERGE, and Jounce plans to initiate an additional Phase 2 biomarker trial using TISvopra for patient selection, SELECT, to assess vopratelimab in combination with JTX-4014. Jounce’s IND-enabling preclinical programs include JTX-8064, a LILRB2 receptor antagonist and JTX-1811, a monoclonal antibody designed to selectively deplete T regulatory cells in the tumor microenvironment. For more information, please visit www.jouncetx.com.",4.4,"Jounce Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
274,Digital Transformation and Data Analyst (Claims),$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are You Driven?® We Are.

We are a company of driven, enthusiastic and determined people. We celebrate achievement and success. We foster innovation, determination and recognition. Because of that, our employees feel recognized and rewarded for the contributions they make on a daily basis. At GAINSCO, It is our people that set us apart.

If you are looking for a place where you can make a difference, perceive how your work impacts the company, and be recognized for your efforts and passion, then GAINSCO is the company for you.

Why Join GAINSCO?

By joining GAINSCO, you become part of a dynamic and growing organization that has been recognized as a Top Workplace in both our Dallas and Miami offices.

GAINSCO’s work environment rewards engaged individuals who have a desire to contribute and succeed. That’s because our culture encourages individuals to grow their skills as they build their careers. Come join us and become a champion with GAINSCO.

What does a DIGITAL TRANSFORMATION& DATA ANALYST (CLAIMS) do?
Uncover and communicate performance trends and actionable insights to the business.
Leverage data insights and incorporate these findings to accelerate the digital transformation efforts of the Claims Department.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and offer recommendations based on your findings.
Proactively collaborate with all levels of the Claims organization and offer data-focused support to any relevant business challenges.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop, implement and maintain business monitoring reports
Perform data validation and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality/accuracy
Work with IT to maintain accessibility to databases/data systems
Additional projects as requested
What is required?

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Risk Management, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics or Actuarial.
Experience:
1-2 years of working experience as a data analyst preferred
Ability to identify potentially hidden trends and communicate actionable insights based on your findings.
Experience working within an Auto Insurance Claims department is preferred.
Advanced skills in performing mathematical calculations
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Advanced computer skills, specifically in databases and spreadsheets (Excel, SAS, MSSQL preferred, Python, R)
Experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence is preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Excellent organization skills
Other skills and abilities:
A strong desire to be a part of the conversations that result in improving business processes and results.
Ability to communicate and simplify the complex with a wide variety of stakeholders.
Ability to manage own time while prioritizing multiple tasks
Required behaviors for all positions:
Communicate with co-workers, management, customers, vendors, and others in a courteous and professional manner
Conform with and abide by all Company codes, regulations, policies, values, work procedures and instructions
Regular attendance
What else do you need to know?
Competitive Salary based on experience.
Excellent benefits package: medical& dental (Basic plan FREE), vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance.
Parental Leave Policy.
401K + Company Match.
Paid Vacation + Sick days + Floating Holidays + Company determined Holidays.
All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO.",3.8,"GAINSCO
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
275,Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$98k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Oct-2020

Job ID
305061BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""#1! That’s the ranking that Fast Company gave Novartis in their 2018 list of ‘The World’s Most Innovative Companies’. The Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is the innovation engine of Novartis. We collaborate across scientific and organizational boundaries, focusing on powerful new technologies that have the potential to help produce therapeutic breakthroughs for patients.

We seek a creative and collaborative data scientist to develop, evaluate, and apply novel methods of data integration of profiling data to enable translational research for drug discovery and development. In this role you will work at the cutting edge of science to tackle important challenges in biomedical research, assessing, integrating, curating, and mining complex data to drive biological/clinical insights.

Your responsibilities will include:

•Playing a key role in an interdisciplinary team of translational research/medical scientists, biologists and computational scientists
•Developing and employing novel approaches to derive and evaluate inferences across diverse data types to identify novel drug targets, biomarkers and therapeutic mechanisms in hepatology, nephrology and other areas of unmet medical need
•Interrogation of large molecular profiling datasets, including aptamer-based multiplex proteomics, to enable precision medicine
•Combining an understanding of biological sciences with computational techniques in statistics and mathematics
•Participating in alliances with external partners at top healthcare institutions, with the opportunity to publish your work

Posting Title
Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
276,Lead Software Engineer - Data Platform,$86k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the intersection of technology, science, business, and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn, and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real-time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon, and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

At Strivr, our engineering teams develop immersive experience software and a cloud-based software platform that powers the creation, management, and experience of immersive learning with a unique level of insights and predictive analytics. The platform is scalable, secure, and compliant which is critical to making our customers and users successful on our platform. The engineering team is distributed and supports a culture of remote work. In addition to the five company values of teamwork, grit, transparency, impact, and passion, we index on strong communication skills, a growth mindset, responsibility and ownership, and a collaborative and respectful work culture.

We capture and analyze device, usage, sentiment, and assessment data, attention, and engagement data based on spatial (gaze, hand) and voice data over tens of millions of in-headset immersive learning and training sessions. We are developing a streaming analytics platform that will allow us to process, join, aggregate, reform, and query data across these very large structured and unstructured datasets to produce immersive analytics with deep insights on learning sessions. Consumers include customers and external users for insights on their learning and training performance, and internal users like Data Scientists and Analysts who need access to raw and processed data from pipelines using notebooks and machine learning frameworks to develop, experiment with, and train learning models.

We are hiring software engineers who are passionate about data engineering, analytics, and developing secure, scalable, and reliable data pipelines and platforms. As an engineer working on Strivr’s data platform, you will have the opportunity to own the full cycle development of distributed services, data pipelines, and infrastructure that needs to scale to process petabytes of data and deliver insights and immersive analytics to hundreds of thousands of users and devices, all in real-time access. You will be expected to prioritize scalability, reliability, and security in your designs and implementation. You will work cross-functionally with other engineering teams, Product Managers, and Data Scientists to deliver end-to-end user-facing functionality and experience.

Your responsibilities:
Systems architecture, design, implementation, and support of the following platform areas and capabilities:
Real-time and batch processing pipelines to process data into logical data sets in data lakes and analytical databases
Business and semantic layer services to transform data into reports, insights, and immersive analytics
APIs for querying raw and processed data for consumption by user-facing visualizations and dashboards in web applications
Tooling and infrastructure for machine learning frameworks, notebooks, and pipelines for querying raw and processed data for training and experimentation
Tooling and infrastructure for data validation in the different phases of the pipeline and in the data stores
Tooling and infrastructure to implement and enforce security and compliance policies for data protection and governance
Write secure, reliable, and performant code and add monitoring for everything you develop
Be data-driven, use instrumentation and monitoring to make improvements to the platform, functional or for-performance, or otherwise
Be a visible technical leader in the organization. Influence engineers by advocating for and practicing a culture of engineering excellence. Mentor and coach lesser experienced engineers to make a positive impact on their career development
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of software engineering experience, specifically with development of data pipelines and platforms, and a solid background in software development with one or more of C#, Java, Go
Experience with development and operationalization of large-scale data pipelines and distributed services for structured and unstructured data using streaming frameworks and systems like Kafka, Beam, Spark
Strong database fundamentals including SQL and operational experience with relational (like Postgres) and non-relational databases (like Druid, BigQuery, Elastic)
Experience with development of a data platform with tools and infrastructure for machine learning, training models, and experimentation
Strong written and verbal communication skills, both technical and non-technical
Ability to apply concepts from computer science, data-structures, and algorithms in order to solve problems in a pragmatic and efficient way
Passion for writing secure, readable, modular, and maintainable code and a drive for shipping high quality software with an emphasis on testing, data validation, monitoring, and SLOs to ensure data accuracy with high availability
Bachelors in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent experience
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience developing secure and scalable API services based on GraphQL or REST for web applications
Experience developing on public cloud platforms (Google Cloud, AWS, or Azure) including experience with orchestration using Kubernetes and Docker
Experience with one or more of the following: Natural Language Processing, text understanding, classification, pattern recognition, or similar
This position may be based anywhere in the United States.",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
277,Principal Scientist,$134k-$245k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for an experienced and highly motivated scientist to join the Reverse Translational department at Jounce Therapeutics. The successful candidate will serve as the scientific lead and manage a team of scientists (direct and matrix) supporting the translational and reverse translational research efforts in support of our lead clinical asset. The primary responsibilities of the candidate will include leading the development and execution of cell-based, mechanistic assays to support clinical and reverse translational research. The candidate will be responsible for the experimental strategy, design, and execution of experiments, data analysis and interpretation, thorough documentation of work, and clear communication of results both in group settings and in written reports. The candidate must be capable of working across functional groups and communicating results with scientists from diverse backgrounds. Lastly, the candidate must be a highly motivated self-starter capable of working independently and as part of a team.
Responsibilities:
Leading the development and implementation of immunological assays to support development of novel therapies currently in clinical development.
Manage and lead a small team of scientists.
Provide scientific guidance and technical expertise to a cross-functional team.
Active management of experimental activities and delivery of data in accordance with program and corporate timelines.
Serve as scientific lead on program team and clinical study teams.
Will lead the scientific sub team and contribute to the curation, review, and interpretation of clinical exploratory data.
Thorough documentation of experiments and communication of results across functional teams.
Drafting documents in support of regulatory filings.

PhD in immunology or related field with 5+ years of relevant industry experience. Experience in clinical stage programs is required.
Demonstrated ability to lead small teams (direct reporting and matrix) to provide high quality biological data in support of clinical development activities.
Demonstration of scientific acumen through publications in high-quality journals.
Extensive hands-on experience with immunological techniques including multi-parameter flow cytometry. Familiarity with scRNAseq is a plus.
Proficient at independently managing scientific projects involving designing and executing experiments, analyzing data, and reporting conclusions to team members.
Excellent organizational and time management skills.
Able to thrive in a highly collaborative, fast-paced, team-oriented environment with colleagues from diverse disciplines.
Familiarity working in GxP environments.

Jounce Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, religion, creed, sex, or political beliefs. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. All applicants should be legally entitled to work for any employer in the U.S.
To apply, please visit https://careers-jouncetx.icims.com/.

Jounce Therapeutics, Inc. is a clinical-stage immunotherapy company dedicated to transforming the treatment of cancer by developing therapies that enable the immune system to attack tumors and provide long lasting benefits to patients through a biomarker-driven approach. Through the use of its Translational Science Platform, Jounce first focuses on specific cell types within the human tumor microenvironment to prioritize targets, and then identifies related biomarkers designed to match the right immunotherapy to the right patient. Jounce currently has four development-stage programs, two of which are clinical-stage: vopratelimab, a monoclonal antibody that binds to and activates ICOS, and JTX-4014, a PD-1 inhibitor intended for combination use with Jounce’s broader pipeline. Vopratelimab is currently being assessed in a Phase 2 clinical trial, EMERGE, and Jounce plans to initiate an additional Phase 2 biomarker trial using TISvopra for patient selection, SELECT, to assess vopratelimab in combination with JTX-4014. Jounce’s IND-enabling preclinical programs include JTX-8064, a LILRB2 receptor antagonist and JTX-1811, a monoclonal antibody designed to selectively deplete T regulatory cells in the tumor microenvironment. For more information, please visit www.jouncetx.com.",4.4,"Jounce Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
278,Azure Data Engineer,$58k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Azure Data Engineer will help design, build, and support our data and insights enablement solutions in the cloud. As part of an Agile solutions team, they will work with business analysts, product owners and database developers to implement purpose-built data solutions for our internal and external stakeholders. They will also work closely with our ITGRC (IT Governance, Risk, Compliance), Privacy and Security Operations teams to ensure our data solution platforms meet the highest security requirements.

What Youll Do
Collaborate on the strategy of new cloud data stores and migration of existing data
Coach, cross-train, and mentor project team members in developing data solutions in Azure.
Work collaboratively to design, document and ensure continuous improvement of SDLC best practices for data in the cloud.
Be an advocate for quality and security through data quality and accuracy validation and auditing of security best practices.
Focus on understanding business problems and determine what aspects require optimization; articulate those aspects in a clear and concise manner
Work collaboratively with our data teams and product owners to understand requirements; to propose and develop solutions that enable effective decision-making through analytics and support insights that will drive our business growth.
Support our cloud platforms as part of an agile team.
About You
Candidates will have experience with database systems, Azure cloud storage, and significant exposure to or experience with modern data and BI platforms (such as Databricks, MSSQL Data Warehouse (Synapse), Snowflake and Tableau).
You have previous experience with data migration to cloud based environment
You have an interest and passion in designing and implementing data management, querying, and storage, with a particular focus on purpose-built data stores.
You possess functional knowledge of data visualization tools such as Domo and Tableau.
You also have an understanding of standard ETL tools and techniques, sourcing, maintaining, and updating data, data warehousing, data cleansing, and other analytical techniques required for data usage.
You also possess database fluency, including an optimal understanding of SQL and a deep understanding of multiple database concepts.
You have a solid understanding of cost and performance considerations and tradeoffs of different data products within Azure
2-5 years experience working in a cloud computing with Azure experience required
Bachelor's degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field, or equivalent experience
About Us

CoverMyMeds, part of McKessons Prescription Technology Solutions, is a fast-growing healthcare technology company. Our mission: Help patients get the medications they need to live healthy lives. Our solutions seamlessly connect the health care network to improve medication access, increasing speed to therapy and reducing prescription abandonment for patients like you and me.

We hire ambitious people and make it a priority to invest in them by providing opportunities to grow their careers and connections within the community. On-site culinary team, flexible hours and paid benefits? Yeah, we have those too. But dont take our word for it. Weve been recognized as a Best Place to Work by Glassdoor, a Best Company to Work For by FORTUNE, and our employees have great things to say, too.

CoverMyMeds is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We embrace diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",4.7,"CoverMyMeds
4.7","Columbus, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
279,Data Engineer,-1,"Why VillageMD?

VillageMD is changing the trajectory of healthcare by empowering primary care physicians to make informed decisions and engage patients in meaningful ways. We work with thousands of clinicians and healthcare disruptors across the country to build and contribute to our platform to improve patient health while driving down the cost to deliver it.

We are a mission-oriented organization and are thrilled about the work that we do every day. We're transparent, collaborative, and relentless in pursuit of our mission, all while doing so with humility and a low ego. We believe that diverse backgrounds and experiences create the best opportunity for innovation and the community that we are creating is greater than any individual.

We've built our technology using the best of cloud and open-source technologies to create an open, data-first platform that is enriched with analytical models and modernly connected to internal and external apps. These apps drive clinical decision support, patient engagement, and other facilitators of innovative, information-enriched health experiences.

Data Engineers at VillageMD build distributed components, pipelines, and tools that enable our organization to make analytical, data-driven decisions. We're in a unique position to impact everyone in primary care from independent, family-owned practices to world-class health systems. We aggregate, process, and deliver rich datasets to improve the effectiveness of primary care for our doctors and patients.

What are examples of work that Data Engineers have done at VillageMD?
Built and implemented a data profiling tool to reverse engineer data schemas from new data sources facilitating normalization of the data into our data model
Created a summary data platform supporting our presentation layer that allows clinicians and operators in our practices to pinpoint interventions on-demand to patients most in need
Analyzed and designed the best ways to expand our data model to incorporate more data that's mission critical
What will make you successful here?
Strong analytical and technical skills
A real passion for problem solving and learning new technology
Vision to balance speed and maintainability in solution design
The ability to handle multiple, concurrent projects
Crafting and implementing requirements, keeping projects on track, and engaging partners
Challenging the status quo to improve our processes and tools
Communicating complex technical details in meaningful business context
A low ego and humility; an ability to gain trust by doing what you say you will do
What you might do in your first year:
Own ten projects to design and implement best-in-class data processing enabling clean data flow directly to our data model and on to our presentation layer
Work with analytics, engineering and operations to design and implement a new analytics product that supports improving patient health
Design a new concept within our data model to meet a new operational or analytical need
The following experience is relevant to us:
5+ years of full-time experience including extensive experience with healthcare data
Ability to understand and design relational data structures required
Very strong capabilities manipulating data using SQL
Knowledge of, and/or willingness to learn, non-relational data structures and other technologies (e.g. Postgres, Redshift, Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4j, S3, etc.)
Experience or willingness to learn building information pipelines utilizing Python or Java a plus
BS/MS in computer science, math, engineering, or other related fields is required.
Track record of successfully executing projects with multiple partners
What can we offer you?
Competitive salary, bonus, and health benefits
Paid gym membership
Fun, fast-paced, startup environment (with snacks)
Pre-tax savings on commute expenses
Remote flexibility
A highly-collaborative, conscientious, forward-thinking environment that welcomes the impact you can make from Day 1.
A clear link between our daily work on products and services and the improved quality of healthcare that this work facilitates for patients.
At VillageMD, we see diversity and inclusion as a source of strength in transforming healthcare. We believe building trust and innovation are best achieved through diverse perspectives. To us, acceptance and respect are rooted in an understanding that people do not experience things in the same way, including our healthcare system. Individuals seeking employment at VillageMD are considered without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.8,"VillageMD
3.8",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
280,Data Scientist,-1,"About O'Reilly Media

OReillys mission is changing the world by sharing the knowledge of innovators. For the last 40 years, weve been helping people learn new skills, track significant new technologies, and build careers in technology and business. This extends to our employees: we have a long and proud history of encouraging and enabling the people who work here to take advantage of OReillys resources and network to keep learning, take on new challenges, and build careers. OReilly Media has two main offices, in Boston and Sebastopol (San Francisco Bay Area), with a large portion of our employees working remotely.

About your team

Data drives much of what we at OReilly Media do, making the Data Science Team central to how the company operates and continues to grow its influence. We provide business analysis and reporting, build machine learning models, develop prototypes for data-intensive components to the platform, and maintain data systems. We are a distributed team working remotely from home offices, but we place a strong emphasis on teamwork and collaboration: an ideal candidate is one that is both self-motivated and enjoys working with others. Team members are encouraged to learn new skills and technologies as they relate to our mission. We believe work should be fun and friendly, and we hold dear our core belief in maintaining a healthy work-life balance.

About the Job

We have an opening for a Data Scientist who will perform a variety of analyses and data tasks to support core business capabilities such as marketing, sales and product improvements.

Both quantitative and qualitative aspects of analysis are important to this role. The Data Scientists primary responsibilities include pulling, cleaning, transforming and analyzing both internal and external data, as well as performing more advanced modeling and machine learning tasks. Some of our projects are based on requests from other departments, others are driven by larger data science team goals. Often we are asked to look into fairly open-ended problems, which requires a degree of creativity, curiosity and research skill.

Crucial to this role is seeing the bigger picture: not just following the instructions of a JIRA ticket or request, but realizing the implications and actionable potential of an analysis. The Data Scientist must understand what data we have or need to obtain in order to provide significant insights and value to our learning customers and internal organization. This demands creativity and drive to figure out how to get the data, and how to use the data to keep OReilly at the forefront of learning.

The Data Scientist works on problems that are core to the companys mission. Our team is at the forefront of some of the businesss major challenges, for example, understanding and modeling how users progress through content and developing metrics that describe their learning experience. This role has a significant opportunity to positively impact the company through data-driven means.

Most of our analysis is performed in Python and SQL. Our primary data storage systems are based on Postgres, Redshift, MySQL, BigQuery and Google Cloud Storage. The Data Scientist will:
Extract, transform and analyze platform and customer data based on requests from product, sales, marketing and executive teams
Write code to automate processes for routine data reporting requirements
Undertake research to explore more open-ended data problems
Effectively present and communicate research results with coherent visualization and actionable recommendations
Work with product teams on platform features such as user-facing dashboards, personalization, topic organization, search and content discovery
Maintain our backend data ETL processes and automated reporting services
Drive the Data Science Teams impact in the company by taking the initiative with data-driven solutions for company problems
About You

You should have a strong foundation in Python programming for data-related tasks, including experience with data science packages such as numpy and scikit-learn, and strong SQL skills. The level of coding required will go beyond simple scripts and queries: we are always trying to automate the boring stuff with well-designed and efficiently engineered packages of code. Some knowledge of git, unix commands and big data / distributing computing solutions is highly valued.

Key skills and Experience
2+ years in data science / analytics, or equivalent
Excellent Python skills
Strong SQL skills
Personable and able to work with with others in a team
Significant experience combining and transforming data
Experience with wrangling dirty data
Excellent critical thinking skills and the ability to develop creative solutions to challenging problems
Ability to create effective data visualizations
Excellent written, verbal, and presentation skills
Experience with scientific computing and machine learning, especially numpy, scipy and scikit-learn
Experience working with unstructured text data and performing NLP tasks
Comfortable working on a Linux server
Self-motivated and ability to work independently when necessary",3.5,"O'Reilly Media
3.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
281,Data Analyst,-1,"FiberTel, LLC. locally grown in Utah’s Art City.*
As an advocate for economic growth in the state of Utah, we understand the business of conveying information. With all that is happening in our state and nationwide, we are seeing different ways of life, work, and school. Internet providers and their customers rely heavily on us to continue the construction and installation of fiber optics to ensure that internet service goes uninterrupted for the people of our communities.

We are a utility construction company, with a specialization in the installation of fiber optics. We offer a full turnkey experience for our clients. We provide services to some of the top telecommunications companies in the western states. This is a fast-paced, growing industry.
Position Description: *
The Data Analyst position will help manage and support client accounts. She/he will manage and maintain multiple systems. This position will be responsible for mapping multiple systems to one platform. This individual will need to be an expert with QuickBase, Microsoft Excel, Google sheets and other data base systems. The Data Analyst will possess strong analytical capabilities. Data Analyst will work with multiple organizations within FiberTel – Finance, Engineering, Operations, Safety and Fleet.
Duties: *
Process and interpret data from clients
Solve problems
Create databases and spreadsheets
Manage and maintain systems
Assist with managing and supporting client accounts
Mapping of multiple systems to one platform
Ability to analyze existing tools and database and provide software solutions & recommendations
Qualifications: *
Strong analytical skills
High level of experience with QuickBase
3-5 years’ experience with data analysis or related field
Excellent communication skills both written and verbal
Degree in MIS or related field (preferred)
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Data analysis: 3 years (Required)
QuickBase: 2 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"Fibertel, LLC.
3.4","Springville, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
282,Data Scientist - Manufacturing Technology,$89k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Climb to new heights on your journey when you start Defining Possible with Northrop Grumman. Enjoy a purposeful career in aeronautics that is crucial to the way we connect and protect our world across land, sea, and air. Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today. Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.

Our Aeronautics Systems sector is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team of qualified, diverse individuals. This position will support our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation development team and will be located in Palmdale, CA.

Our organization is currently working to build a revolutionary kind of production factory, an IIoT Smart Factory, and we need your help to shape the foundation! As a member of the Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation team, you will identify, develop and implement data analytics, and machine learning technologies for production within our Advanced Manufacturing Technology & Innovation organization. The role will define, develop, and design manufacturing concepts and processes for production applications of manufacturing technologies with a focus on digital manufacturing technologies and applications including, but not limited to, point of use work instructions, industrial internet of things (IIoT), and data analytics solutions for manufacturing processes.

The position requires a strong understanding of computer and database systems as well as data analytics workflows. You will need to be familiar with data ETL processes and standard machine learning techniques. The position requires strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. Strong written and oral communication skills are required as the position involves extensive interfacing with internal and external customers, program offices, engineering disciplines, and industry suppliers. You must have a proven ability to drive business results with your data-based insights. The role will require the individual to be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The desired candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Essential Job Functions:
Develop analytical models to support manufacturing operations
Perform in-depth data analysis and report findings
Build and support dashboards / visuals
Support ETL Pipelines as needed
Assess new technologies and software platforms to assist in development of IIoT capability
Support project management and planning as required
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency. Continuous interface with stakeholders and customers is required.
Support and enforce the Agile methodology and framework used by the project team
Keeps current on advances in the field of IIoT with demonstrating strategic big picture thinking.

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math) with 2 years of experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming; OR Master's Degree in STEM
Bachelor's Degree (non-STEM) with 4 years of experience, or Master's Degree (non-STEM) with 2 years of experience with information systems, data analytics and/or computer programming
Experience with one or more: Python, R, C, C++, Java, JavaScript
Experience with querying databases and defining schemas (MS SQL)
Experience with high volume production ETL pipelines
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on production environments
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience manipulating data using pandas, NumPy, or similar
Experience building analytical models using scikit, SciPy, or similar
Experience with version control software such as Git
Experience with data visualization tools using Tableau or similar
Experience with Command Line / Terminal scripting
Ability to perform data analysis and report findings
Proven ability to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Extensive knowledge of MS Office Products
Self-starter who is able to work with minimal direction
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a DOD Secret or Top Secret Clearance as well as Program Special access within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the company to meet its business needs
Ability to travel 10-15% of the time
Preferred Qualifications:
STEM Degree (Science, Technical, Engineering, or Mathematical)
Experience in a fabrication and/or assembly manufacturing environment
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience using Kepware and/or Thingworx to develop IIoT technologies
Experience with Javascript, HTML / CSS to support IIoT dashboards and visuals
Experience with machine communication protocols such as MQTT, MTConnect, OPC
Experience with modern ETL / Big Data tools such as Kafka, Nifi, and Spark
Experience building system architectures using visual tools such as Visio
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in the development, capture, and/or execution of R&D technology initiatives and experience in Digital Manufacturing technology applications
Familiarity with DFARS-NIST-800-171 specification for cyber security
Current active Secret or Top Secret clearance preferred
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.9,"Northrop Grumman
3.9","Palmdale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
283,Quantitative Researcher,-1,"What happens when accomplished scientists and engineers come together to tackle financial markets using complex models, custom technology, and huge amounts of computational horsepower? What if you mix these things together in an environment that values quality of life and rewards contribution? In our experience, you're able to build a team of talented professionals working together to solve interesting problems and produce real-world results.

If joining a collaborative and high-performance team sounds appealing and you have a history of exceptional performance in a quantitative discipline, we’d love for you to share your resume and give us the chance to explore a potential fit. Financial experience isn’t a prerequisite. Programming skills and an PhD in Statistics, Math, Physics, Engineering or comparable scientific discipline strongly preferred.

Position

We are looking for highly talented candidates to support development of quantitative trading systems. Our quantitative researchers engage in both the development of trading strategies and the implementation of software that tests and executes these strategies.

We seek quantitative researchers with strong analytical and mathematical skills as well as the ability to conduct creative research at the highest level. Strong software coding experience is highly desired, as the position involves the development, testing, and maintenance of software on a daily basis.

About Us

For over three decades, the TGS team has built quantitative trading systems that have produced exceptional results across a range of financial markets. We use scientific methods and engineering discipline to solve challenging problems and develop technology solutions. Our Irvine office is as unique as our Southern California location, combining elements of high tech, finance, and applied research in a collegial atmosphere and beautiful workspace.

As an employer, we are small, discreet, and highly selective. We look for exceptional people with proven track records of performance and achievement, and are far more interested in aptitude and potential than expertise in any particular technology, tool set, or professional domain. If you're inspired by the idea of working on interesting problems with talented colleagues, we invite you to share your resume and explore the possibility of joining our team.

Applicants residing in California may find our CCPA notice to California residents HERE.",5.0,"TGS Management Company
5.0","Irvine, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
284,Scientist,$75k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Lundbeck, we are tirelessly dedicated to restoring brain health so every person can be their best. Headquartered in Copenhagen with sites worldwide including in La Jolla, California, Lundbeck is the only global biopharmaceutical company focused solely on brain diseases. Our legacy in neuroscience goes back seven decades and we have a long heritage of innovation. Lundbeck has developed and commercialized some of the world’s most widely prescribed therapies for psychiatric and neurological disorders. Today, we remain uncompromisingly committed to improving the quality of life for people impacted by brain disorders. Lundbeck is unique from other biopharmaceutical companies in that we are 70 percent owned by a research-focused foundation. We have a deep and productive pipeline, and we continue to bring forward symptomatic therapies to help people live better lives, while simultaneously pursuing disease-modifying treatments. SUMMARY Lundbeck La Jolla Research Center, Inc. (LLJRC) is a discovery research arm of H. Lundbeck A/S. Our mission is to develop innovative medicines that address significant unmet needs in the treatment of psychiatric and neurological disorders. LLJRC is seeking a highly motivated scientist to support preclinical stage programs in the portfolio through advancing our mass spectrometry-based proteomics capabilities. The successful candidate will join a multi-disciplinary team within the chemical biology group and lead efforts to expand our state-of-the-art proteomic platform using advanced quantitative proteomic techniques. The La Jolla-based chemical biology group provides core proteomics expertise to global Lundbeck and collaborates with leading academic labs, including the Cravatt lab at Scripps Research, and, as such, the group has the opportunity to explore the application of proteomics to a wide variety of CNS drug discovery programs and basic neuroscience research. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS You will be a key contributor to multi-disciplinary project teams supporting early discovery programs through establishing MS-based assays to enable the discovery and development of high-quality small molecule therapeutics. A majority of your work will be lab-based, focused on the exploration, development and implementation of innovative MS techniques to characterize small molecule-protein interactions in living systems and to address other novel scientific questions. The job will entail establishing robust sample preparation protocols and developing targeted and untargeted MS acquisition methods suited for quantitative analysis of peptide analytes within complex peptide mixtures derived from biological matrices. We offer the opportunity to join a dynamic and energetic team of qualified colleagues working in a leading CNS specialized drug discovery organization. The group is well-supported with multiple Orbitrap mass spectrometers, including an Orbitrap Fusion Lumos, and a high-performance cluster for data analysis. A dedicated computational biologist will support proteomics data analysis, curation and management through automated pipelines and through maintenance of a proprietary chemoproteomic database facilitating tracking and mining of all internal proteomics data. The group is actively engaged in both drug discovery and basic research at the frontiers of neuroscience and you will have the opportunity to collaborate and publish with world-class academic labs as highlighted in Cell reports, 31(12), 107805. REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE and SKILLS Ph.D. OR an accredited Master’s degree with 9+ years’ experience in mass spectrometry-based proteomics, chemical biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related life sciences field OR an accredited bachelor’s degree with 12+ years’ experience in mass spectrometry-based proteomics, chemical biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related life sciences field Demonstrated broad knowledge of principles of mass spectrometry-based protein identification and quantification Extensive hands-on experience with sample preparation (e.g. immuno- or chemical-affinity enrichment, protein- and peptide-level fractionation, stable isotope labeling, etc.) from a variety of biological matrices (tissues, cells and biofluids) Experience with multiple MS acquisition methods (e.g. DDA, DIA, PRM) and quantitation strategies (e.g. isobaric tagging, isotopic labeling, label-free) Familiarity with MS-based proteomics data processing tools Hands-on experience in operation of Orbitrap mass spectrometers and nanoLC systems Excellent skills in experimental design, implementation, troubleshooting, and data analysis Excellent collaboration, communication, and presentation skills Both effective team player and strong individual contributor, flexible, and able to handle multiple tasks and deliver high quality results under tight timelines PREFERRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE and SKILLS Experience with MS-based PTM analysis techniques Basic programing skills relevant to proteomics data analysis (e.g. Python, R, Perl) is desirable but not necessary Experience developing and performing biochemical and cellular assays also desirable, especially models relevant to CNS biology Lundbeck is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by law, rule, or regulation. Lundbeck participates in E-Verify.",3.8,"Lundbeck
3.8","San Diego, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1915,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
285,Scientist II - Clinical Pharmacology,-1,"Assist in developing & applying clinical pharmacology & translational medicine strategies for candidate drug products from human through -late stage.
Bullet Points
Scientist - Pharmacology
drug development
Regulatory, FDA, DMPK, NDA/BLA
Large Molecule experience preferred
Full Job Description*
Our direct client is looking for a Scientist II, Clinical Pharmacology to join their Clinical Pharmacology & Quantitative Sciences Team.
This position will assist in developing and applying clinical pharmacology and translational medicine strategies for candidate drug products from first in human through late stage development (Phase 3 and NDA/BLA filings) using pharmacokinetic, pharmacodynamic, DMPK, and drug therapeutic principles, and knowledge of drug development processes and regulatory guidance.

Requirements:
Represent clinical pharmacology on cross-functional project teams involved in the clinical development of candidate drug products.
Collaborate with biostatisticians, clinicians and clinical operation managers for the optimal design of Phase I-IV studies; contribute to the clinical study protocols and reports.
Work closely with sample management and bioanalytical for the proper collection, processing, and testing of pharmacokinetic and biomarker samples.
Assist in integrating and interpreting nonclinical and clinical pharmacology, DMPK, and translational medicine knowledge; in the preparation of clinical pharmacology write-ups and regulatory documents (IND, IMPD, IB, NDA CTD, etc).
Create and manage of datasets and perform data analysis such as non-compartmental and compartmental PK/PD analysis.
Collaborate with pharmacometricians in the modeling of emerging PK and PK/PD data.
Participate in writing publications and making scientific presentations consistent with development strategies.
Maintain knowledge of relevant scientific and regulatory practices and trends, and ensure that clinical pharmacology aspects of development programs are contemporary. Other duties as assigned.
A Pharm. D. or PhD in a scientific discipline is preferred, but equivalent experience may be accepted.
A minimum of 4 years work experience in an industry research and/or development environment is required.
Post-doctoral work may serve as experience.
Must be able to demonstrate significant success in technical proficiency, scientific creativity, collaboration with others and independent thought.
Must be able to clearly communicate scientific and technical information both written and oral.
Must be able to demonstrate sound judgment and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong organizational skills are required.
Experience working in an FDA regulated environment and experience and understanding of ICH, and GCP is highly desired.
Must have hands-on experience with data analysis, non-compartmental and compartmental PK/PD analysis
Using data processing software such as Phoenix WinNonlin, R, NONMEM, and/or MONOLIX.
Good working knowledge of graphing software such as SigmaPlot, Prism, JMP, or R is required.
Looking for a high energy, focused, collaborative, people person!! We are friendly, we want out-going and sociable team members!
\*if antibiotics have been your focus, this won't be a good fit for you.

USE THIS LINK TO APPLY THROUGH OUR INTERNAL APPLICANT SYSTEM - VIDEO COVER LETTERS WILL GET PRIORITY - https://adr.to/7czhq

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Remote through 2020 with evaluation in 2021 with possible on-site rotations.

Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)",-1,Client of Wicresoft North America,"San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
286,"Field Application Scientist-Midwest-AR, KS, MO, OK",-1,"Company Description*
Personalized immunotherapies are the future of the fight against cancer, and IsoPlexis (www.isoplexis.com) is Making the Difference in enabling the lofty goal of employing immunotherapies to combat our toughest diseases. Our integrated systems, named #1 Innovation by Scientist Magazine & World-Leading Design by Red Dot, are changing cancer research by connecting biological readouts to what is actually happening in patients. Our game changing hardware technologies, originally from Cal Tech and Yale, combined with our next generation software and data visualizations, are powered by our amazing R&D team and used throughout the world. We work with a growing list of leading researchers who are publishing findings that connect our readouts to what is truly happening in patients, and that excites & drives all of us to do more! If you like working at the intersection of biological sciences and healthcare, and you enjoy intellectually challenging yet fulfilling projects, give us a call. Our fast growing, 140+ person team has a sense of integrity, energy, and urgency to ‘make things happen’ in our collective careers and in the broader world, and we look forward to talking.

IsoPlexis is welcoming self-motivated, high energy biologists who are looking for career growth working with cutting edge technology, to apply today!
Responsibilities*
Support customers, vendors, and business partners on education and training of IsoPlexis instruments and technology
Partner with customers to ensure they are optimally using our protocols and products.
Pitch IsoPlexis to our customer base our new and exciting products and publications that have been released.
Collect data and assist Isoplexis Marketing/Communication team with the development of marketing materials.
Communicate all relevant customer information including product and/or customer experience or opportunities to Field Sales, Marketing, Internal Consulting Group and Technical Support. Including keeping CRM up to date with customer information and interactions
Actively pursues tasks/projects, and ways to enhance their team and the business beyond their day to day responsibilities
Travel 50% of the time
Desire to thrive in a light-speed start-up environment
Skills/Experience*
· No FAS experience required

· Bachelor’s degree biology, or related field

· 2 yrs biological lab experience in a small lab is preferred, including experience with most basic laboratory techniques

· Biomedical or biotechnology industry background is preferred but not required

· Immunology/ flow cytometry a plus

· Ability to handle multiple tasks and meeting short-notice deadlines, with daily reprioritization of work
Traits*
· Coachable

· Collaborative / Team Player

· Commitment to quality

· Self-motivated

· High energy

· Sense of humor

ISOPLEXIS is only considering applicants who have valid authorization to work in the U.S., in this position, for the Company. ISOPLEXIS does not sponsor employment-based visas for this position.

Job Type: Full-time

Required education:

· Bachelors

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Experience:
lab research: 3 years (Required)
wet lab environment: 3 years (Required)
immunology: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
On the road
Work Remotely:
Yes",4.0,"IsoPlexis
4.0","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
287,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,$46k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
288,Data Analyst / Engineering,-1,"Job Title – Data Analyst / Engineering*
Location – East Rutherford, NJ; NYC area

Position Type – Full Time

Reporting To: VP of Engineering

Founded in 2003 and headquartered in New Jersey, GENLED Brands is a global manufacturer of LED lighting and controls solutions with offices and distribution centers strategically located throughout the world. Our brand portfolio includes Acolyte architectural lighting solutions, AgiLight signage lighting solutions, and GENLED commercial lighting products.

GENLED assembles world-class expertise and the most exciting innovations in LED lighting and controls and infuses them with access to a global infrastructure of manufacturing, distribution and supply chain channels. This results in us creating high-quality, cutting-edge solutions that are introduced into the global market with unparalleled efficiency and speed. We serve a diverse range of end markets and our customers include some of the most recognizable retail and corporate brands in the world.

GENLED seeks to hire a full time *Data Analyst* to support our global Engineering organization. This analyst will be a part of an innovative and dedicated engineering group, which is responsible for developing world-class products in high-value niche segments of the lighting industry. The position has a strong focus on design and innovation for products with short to mid-length lifecycles.
Responsibilities: *
Maintain database of product information and collaborate with Operations on new product launches
Manage part number and product specs with ERP software
Facilitate new product certifications with a variety of testing laboratories including UL and maintain product certifications on an ongoing basis
Assist engineering with data management and modeling
Coordinate product label and packaging information with a variety of global contract manufacturers
Experience & Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative discipline (computer science, engineering, mathematics, econometrics, operations research, statistics, information systems)
3-5 years’ experience in a related field
Basic knowledge and concept of business applications such as Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) and enterprise data flows
Knowledge of UL and UL testing processes a plus
Strong organizational skills
Excellent teamwork, communications and interpersonal skills
Ability and interest in rolling up sleeves, and working collaboratively while taking ownership of individual projects
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
COVID-19 considerations:
All those who enter our building must wear a mask, sign in and have their temperature taken.

Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,GenLed Brands,"East Rutherford, NJ",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
289,Scientist - Analytical Development - Pharmaceutics,-1,"Analytical Development Scientist (Pharmaceutics)

UPM Pharmaceuticals, Inc., (www.upm-inc.com), a contract drug development and manufacturing company for the pharmaceutical industry, located in Bristol, Tennessee, is seeking an Analytical Development Scientist.

Under the direction of analytical development management, performs analytical method transfer, optimization, development and validation. Develops protocols and conducts experiments using wet chemistry and appropriate laboratory equipment; conducts testing on drug substance, drug products and stability samples in support of drug development and manufacturing. Collects and interprets analytical data and writes reports in accordance with laboratory SOPs. Performs the role of lead chemist on multiple projects. Assists in training and mentoring of other analysts.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Performs analytical method transfer, optimization, and development/validation design and analytical methods development/validation of drug substances, drug product and residual testing, using guidelines from USP and ICH.
Performs method development/validation using HPLC, UPLC, GC (direct inject/headspace) and ICP-MS as well as other analytical equipment.
Develops protocols under which the methods transfer, optimization, and development are conducted and executes such protocols.
Evaluates statistically the validation data and writes the method validation report for submission.
Writes test methods into company SOPs; reviews, writes, or assists in writing SOPs for analytical development.
Performs USP Compendial testing and other Compendial testing as required.
Investigates analytical methods failures by performing root cause analysis techniques.
Works with and consults quality control, raw materials, release and stability labs to resolve analytical method issues.
Consults with scientific professionals and scientific literature for problem solving assistance.
Provides analytical testing support for manufacturing process validation.
Documents laboratory activity and files all data using appropriate log books, records, files, and equipment calibration logs.
Observes safety rules and assists in keeping the laboratory a safe environment.
Operates laboratory equipment such as balances, pH-meters, hardness testers, Karl Fischer titrators and dissolution baths in the performance of required and scheduled test procedures and in accordance with laboratory SOPs.
Performs routine sample processing and dosage form analysis using HPLC and UV-Vis analysis equipment.
Collates test results and prepares certificates of analysis and stability reports.
May assist in conducting peer reviews of other analytical chemists and scientists work prior to submission to quality assurance.
Trains other analysts within the department.
Performs the role of lead chemist on project teams for multiple projects.
Performs other duties as required.
Competency:

To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:

Problem Solving:

Ability to troubleshoot technical issues and provide satisfactory resolution in a timely manner.

Technical Skills:

Ability to operate analytical balance, computer, HPLC, GC, UV/VIS Spectrophotometer, ICP-MS, ph meter, FTIR, Karl Fischer Titrator, Automatic Titrator, Polarimeter, Specific Gravity Meter, and Melting

Point Apparatus, and other modern analytical equipment.

Oral Communication:

Effectively communicate with clients and other staff members from multiple departments, in a clear and concise manner.

Written Communication:

Completes documents/logs clearly and accurately. Writes clear and accurate technical documents.

Qualifications:

The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or abilities required of the position. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education/Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry or related scientific field with at least 5 years of analytical chemistry method development / method validation experience. Advanced degree preferred. Pharmaceutical laboratory experience required. Equivalent combination of education and experience or training is acceptable.

Language Ability:

Ability to read, analyze, and interpret USP/NF methods, SOPs, technical procedures manuals, and batch records. Ability to write reports and effectively present information, and respond to inquiries from laboratory management.

Math Ability:

Ability to apply advanced mathematical concepts in the laboratory environment.

Reasoning Ability:

Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions; interpret an extensive variety of technical instruction in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract and concrete variables.

Computer Skills:

To perform this job successfully, an individual should have basic computer skills with knowledge of Word, Excel, Access, Outlook and ability to use internet tools.",2.5,"UPM Pharmaceutical Inc
2.5",Bristol,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
290,"Director, Data Science",$122k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

Data is CAQH’s most critical asset. You will change how we understand and work with it. CAQH is seeking a hands-on leader for our Health Data Science team. The Data Science Lead will take the prime role in analyzing and delivering results based on large health care databases– from CAQH, from health plans and third parties. They will preferably have experience in health plan performance and quality measurement and comparative effectiveness analysis. As a senior member of the Product and Technology team, the selected individual will contribute to business development activities and will mentor the research staff. The successful candidate can understand content area, determine what the data means, define analysis plans, select appropriate statistical methods and tools, conduct quantitative analysis, program solutions in statistical or other programming languages, ensure an effective quality analysis plan, and communicate with clients. This is a highly technical and applied leadership position requiring experience with data science, algorithms, software development and large-scale databases.

This role is full-time exempt position and reports to the Senior Vice President, Product, Technology and Operations.

Specific Responsibilities:
Set the direction and development of CAQH’s data science and machine learning algorithms, structure, tools, and processes to obtain significant improvements in data accuracy levels based on the goals of the executive management team and CAQH Board of Directors.
Direct a Data Science team to support the breadth of CAQH data needs. Work within the team and across our products on the science, design, execution, and reporting of projects associated with data and data science. Engage the data team to enhance their intellectual curiosity and technical skills.
Serve as a member of the CAQH Leadership Council providing thought leadership and direction towards CAQH’s mission, strategy, objectives, and tactical projects.
Study our data from multiple angles, determine what the data means and recommends the best possible way to analyze it. Identify trends and patterns determining what is noise and what is good data and convey that understanding to others.
Develop analytical plans for research and analytics including: algorithm selection (data mining, machine learning etc.), advanced probability& statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, relational database design, program design, selection of statistical methods and development of formats.
Conduct programming tasks and statistical analyses including preparation and cleaning of data, implementation and refinement of statistical methods, preparation of results, creation of databases and other outputs, and verification of the accuracy of results. Participate in quality assurance processes.
Lead, design, plan, and execute programming approaches to support various development projects. Code at an expert level in applications such as SAS, R, Python. Drive relational database design as well as the use of MongoDB and Hadoop/HDF.
Present analytic results to customers, CAQH staff and other researchers incorporating descriptions of methods, relevant literature, and other background material to provide context for the results.
Represent CAQH to technical and business audiences. Advance the company’s reputation as a leading provider of quality assured provider data. Enhance CAQH reputation for scientific leadership in performance measurement through publications, conference talks, etc.
Lead technical (econometric modeling/statistics) reviews of health-related proposals and deliverables
Supervisory Responsibility:

Manage a small but growing data science team, ensuring they deliver against current commitments and can grow into our future needs.

Skills:
Strong quantitative skills, including random assignment evaluation, quasi-experimental design, and mixed method evaluation strategies. Skilled at developing and applying univariate and multivariate modeling techniques, hypothesis testing.
Proficiency in statistical software packages strong programming skills in other languages such as Python, C# or Java required. Certifications a plus.
Excellent ability to communicate complex technical material, both orally and in writing with the ability to explain complex models and analysis in layman terms.
Preferably an extensive knowledge of one or more of the following areas: Medicare, Medicaid, comparative effectiveness, provider data.
A track record of publications is a plus.
Experience:
Ten or more years of experience delivering algorithm innovation into commercial software-based products.
Five or more years in health care in a data science or data related role.
Five or more years of experience analyzing large datasets.
Five or more years as a lead with experience in managing a team.
Education:

Master’s degree (PhD preferred) in Mathematics or Computer Science with experience in health services research, applied statistics or a combination of education and experience which demonstrates the necessary skills and abilities.

WHO WE ARE

Named one of the“Best Places to Work” by Modern Healthcare for five consecutive years, CAQH has helped nearly 1,000 health plans, 1.6 million providers, government entities and vendors connect, exchange information and operate more efficiently. CAQH technology-enabled solutions and its Committee on Operating Rules for Information Exchange (CORE) bring the healthcare industry together to make sharing business information more automated, predictable and consistent. CAQH Explorations researches opportunities to reduce the burden of manual processes in healthcare administration.

WHAT YOU GET

CAQH recognizes that its most important asset is its growing team of smart, creative, collaborative, forward-thinking and passionate professionals– and that a comprehensive employee benefits package is an important factor for them in choosing where to work. CAQH offers competitive compensation along with an extensive benefits package for all full-time employees, including medical, dental and vision coverage, tuition assistance and a 401k. Our location in downtown Washington, DC is metro-accessible, has an onsite fitness center and is centrally located to allow our team to take advantage of professional networking opportunities, cultural offerings and a thriving social scene.

CAQH is an equal opportunity employer (Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans). We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote without regard to race, national origin or ancestry, color, religion, creed, sex, age, marital status, presence of children, pregnancy, sexual orientation, genetic status, gender identity, mental or physical handicap, status as a covered veteran, status as a qualified disabled individual, except where sex is a bona fide occupational requirement, or where disability status is a bona fide occupational disqualification or any other legally protected status.

Applicants have rights under Federal Laws undertheFamily Medical Leave Act (FMLA),Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO),Equal Employment Opportunity Supplement, and theEmployee Polygraph Protection Act (EPPA).

If you are interested in applying for employment with CAQH and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department at 202-517-0400.",4.2,"CAQH
4.2","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
291,Staff Data Engineer,$103k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff Data Engineer


More than 7 billion people depend on farms for healthy and affordable food. By 2050, the global population will reach 9.4 billion and farmers will need new ways to deliver on this demand. They'll be seeking options that are economically viable and that will help them remain environmentally sustainable. Granular's software meets this need, making farmers more efficient.

We're looking for a Staff Data Engineer. This role is integral to Granular's success and is a unique opportunity to join a mission focused, fast-paced, smart and fun team.

What You'll Get To Do:
Design, develop and deploy data pipelines and machine learning models at broad geographic scale, including crop yield models covering millions of acres of agricultural land in the United States.
Be a mentor within the data science team, especially when it comes to systems design and architecture.
Contribute to Granular's success by building machine learning systems for yield prediction, disease identification and other powerful data science features that help farmers run better businesses.
In addition to building new pipelines and features, you will be a mentor for the rest of the team, particularly regarding data pipeline architecture, code quality, maintainability, and automation. You will drive data pipeline design decisions, and help us build systems that are well-tested, scalable, and automatable.
Who You Will Do It With:


We are a team of over a dozen data scientists with backgrounds ranging across ecology, economics, history, earth systems, and engineering. What we have in common is a passion for data, for solving real-world problems, and for building tools that amaze our customers. We're a team that loves to learn.

Who You Are:
You are an experienced Python programmer with 3+ years of professional data engineering experience.
You are an experienced data engineer. In previous roles you have designed and developed data pipelines for ML, and have deployed and maintained them at scale. (Experience with either deep learning or gradient boosting is desireable but not required: you have either developed ML models yourself, or have worked alongside data scientists in your previous roles.)
Experience with spatial data (GIS) is a big plus but is not required.
Experience with AWS and/or Google Cloud is preferred. Experience with terraform, AWS Lambda, and Postgres/PostGIS are all a huge plus.
You are a phenomenal teammate! You have real-world experience with code review and mentoring other team members, and have worked closely with data scientists, data engineers and product managers in past roles.
You design and write maintainable code and data pipelines. You have experience with automation and testing, as well as with monitoring ML models that have been deployed to production.
Perks and Benefits:


Upward mobility. We are growing and need talent who can take on increasingly ambitious and rewarding roles
Generous Vacation
401k Matching Program
Employer sponsored Medical, Dental, and Vision
Vision, Dental and Dependent Care FSA
Family, Maternity and Paternity Leave
Learning Programs and Individual Development Support
Open floor plan and dog-friendly offices
Who We Are:


Granular is Farm Management Software (FMS) that is helping thousands of farmers to build stronger farms today and steward their lands for generations to come. Granular uniquely combines an industry-leading support team with the most recommended suite of easy-to-use powerful software to help farmers and their teams run all aspects of their farm business. From financials to agronomy to operations, farmers are now able to make decisions with greater confidence in an increasingly challenging environment.

Granular was founded in 2014 with the mission of helping farmers run more profitable and efficient business instead of maximizing bushels. Built as a collaboration between several of the most advanced family farms and top technology investors including Google Ventures, Granular is widely credited for launching the first modern, built in the cloud and mobile-centric FMS in 2014. In 2017, Corteva Agriscience acquired Granular to bring together the best technologists, scientists, and entrepreneurs from across the world with its global presence and deep resources to serve the needs of farmers through the transformative effects of digital technologies.

Today, our over 400 passionate employees are on a mission helping our customers solve their problems today and for food demands in the future by shaping agriculture through continuous innovations in farm productivity, profitability, and environmental sustainability.

Granular is San Francisco-based, with offices worldwide. Granular is an independent, wholly-owned subsidiary of Corteva Agriscience (NYSE:CTVA), a spin off of DowDuPont™. Learn more about our company and people at http://granular.ag/, Twitter, @GranularAg, and Instagram, @Granular_Ag, or facebook.com/GranularAgriculture/

We are an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request an accommodation.",4.4,"Granular
4.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
292,Associate Data Scientist – Network Analysis and Control,$71k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center is looking for a motivated and passionate early career data scientist to join our Network Analytics department. As part of a collaborative team of scientists and engineers, you will have an opportunity to apply machine learning and data-centric approaches to complex networks. Our multidisciplinary team thrives on the opportunity to tackle new challenges in the public interest, looking for solutions that no one else has considered. We approach problems with an entrepreneurial mindset, a willingness to take risks, and a desire to advance the state of the art for intelligent networks, all while contributing to MITRE’s mission of Solving Problems for a Safer World.

Responsibilities include:
Develop prototypes of intelligent network capabilities in MITRE advanced labs
Work on collaborative research teams to develop innovative solutions using commercial and MITRE developed technologies
Conduct performance assessments of current and emerging technologies
Execute data science research beginning at data wrangling and cleaning all the way through to reporting and visualization
Scale solutions to work across large enterprises and large data sets
Analyze data from network sensor systems and integrate additional data sources for improved outcomes
Communicate technical approach and findings to internal and external stakeholders
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in related fields outlined below, or equivalent knowledge and skills.
Computer Science
Software Engineering
Electrical Engineering
Mathematics
Information Systems, Information Technology, SW Engineering
Operations Research
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
A passion for technology and a desire to learn
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems
Knowledge of various machine learning paradigms (deep learning, reinforcement learning, neural networks, etc.) with an understanding of mathematical underpinnings of various models
Hands-on software development skills in a modern programming language (e.g. Python, R, Scala, Java)
Working knowledge of data science workflow from data acquisition to reporting findings
Strong understanding of streaming and batch data workflows, including message queues, processing directed acyclic graphs (DAGs) and data stores
Obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar field
Experience working with Big Data tools (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, Kafka)
Experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, Elasticsearch)
Familiarity with cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations leveraging a modern programming language
Familiarity with basic networking and security concepts/capabilities such as TCP/IP stack, routing, and firewalls
Exposure to network programmability concepts such as software define networking and programmable data planes
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
293,DATA ENGINEER,$59k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"DATA ENGINEER

Job Details
Job Location
Keet Health - Austin, TX
Description
Are you looking for a fast-paced company where our people are our competitive advantage? A company that fosters your entrepreneurial spirit by encouraging you to act like an owner? Do you have the passion and drive to push beyond the adequate to exceptional? Are you passionate about fixing the healthcare system? If so, you may be perfect for our open position.

Keet is a team of passionate, fun-having, taco-loving people on a mission to make healthcare experiences feel better.

At Keet, we help put humanity back into healthcare. It feels good to know that what we do ultimately contributes to a patient’s well-being. We know our clients, and our client’s patient’s want to get back to doing more of what they love, so that is the core of our culture—merging talented people doing what they love, to create products that help others do the same.

DATA ENGINEER

ROLE SUMMARY

The position of Data Engineer will help to create new reporting solutions for Keet Health’s platform, and improve current solutions. The Data Engineer position will be working with a variety of databases (MySQL, Postgres, MongoDB, etc) to be deployed in a cloud infrastructure (AWS) and made available in AWS Quicksight.
Qualifications
ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop and maintain reporting processes and ETL solutions for moving data
Develop reporting solutions for internal and external customers
Develop and maintain ETL solutions for moving data into reporting schemas
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelors degree or computer science, engineering, data analytics or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience with SQL (MySQL, Postgres, etc) and NoSQL (Mongo, etc) databases.
Experience with scripting languages (python, scala, ruby)
Comfortable working using the command line (Bash, etc)
Experience with cloud server architectures (AWS, Azure)
Experience with Linux.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Must have 5+ years using SQL, and NoSQL database
Must have 3+ years experience working as a data engineer
Must have skills in linux, Bash, cloud infrastructure, docker, mobile development, analytics,
Must have experience using git, and worked in an agile development environment
Must have familiarity with AWS data technologies such as Glue, Redshift, S3, and other big da-ta technologies
Nice to have medical industry experience.
Nice to have Java experience.
Nice to have experience with AWS Glue, Athena, and QuickSight.
OUR CORE VALUES
• Collaboration: We're continuously learning how to work together, better.
• Heart: We've got it, and we're not afraid to show it.
• Innovation: We are lifelong learners.
• Service: We’re here to serve.
• Humility: We're humans, and we come from dirt.

PERKS

(We’ve got them).

Keet offers a competitive benefits package with fully-paid medical benefits, unlimited PTO, company hosted lunches, happy hours, and special events.

We have a flexible work from home policy dependent upon productivity and ability to communicate effectively. Oh, and we have snacks. Our office is located in the hip south river district of Austin, TX in the heart of Austin weirdness.

Keet is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",2.9,"Clinicient
2.9","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
294,Senior Big Data Engineer - *Sr. Java Developer,$69k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Ad Science (IAS) is a global technology and data company that builds verification, optimization, and analytics solutions for the advertising industry and we're looking for a Sr. Big Data Engineer to join our Core Data Engineering team. If you are excited by technology that has the power to handle hundreds of thousands of transactions per second; collect tens of billions of events each day; and evaluate thousands of data-points in real-time all while responding in just a few milliseconds, then IAS is the place for you!

What you'll get to do:
Work on Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, MapReduce, Kafka, Spark and MPP columnar databases
Design, code and maintain components aggregating tens of billions of daily transactions
Lead the entire software lifecycle including hands-on development, code reviews, testing, deployment, and documentation for streaming, batch ETL and RESTful API's
Mentor junior team members
*You should apply if you have most of this:
*5+ years of recent hands-on Java experience
Regular use of collections, multi-threading, JVM memory model, etc.
Great understanding of designing for performance, scalability, and reliability
In-depth understanding of algorithms, scalability and various tradeoffs in a Big Data setting
Proficiency with object oriented programming concepts
Experience with Hadoop MapReduce, Spark, Pig
Experience with AWS big data technologies (s3, emr, glue, etc)
Understanding of full software development life cycle, agile development and continuous integration
Good knowledge of Linux command line tools
Solid understanding of database fundamentals, good knowledge of SQL
Interpersonal and communication skills
Bonus points:
Exposure to messaging frameworks like Kafka or RabbitMQ
Experience with Spark streaming or Flink
*Special Note: If you are a solid backend Java developer looking to leap into and learn Big Data, we will consider you!
About Integral Ad Science

Integral Ad Science (IAS) is the global market leader in digital ad verification, offering technologies that drive high-quality advertising media. IAS equips advertisers and publishers with both the insight and technology to protect their advertising investments from fraud and unsafe environments as well as to capture consumer attention, and drive business outcomes. Founded in 2009, IAS is headquartered in New York with global operations in 18 offices across 13 countries. IAS is part of the Vista Equity Partners portfolio of software companies. For more on how IAS is powering great impressions for top publishers and advertisers around the world, visit integralads.com.

Equal Opportunity Employer:

IAS is an equal opportunity employer, committed to our diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. We strongly encourage women, people of color, members of the LGBTQIA community, people with disabilities and veterans to apply.

California Applicant Pre-Collection Notice:

We collect personal information (PI) from you in connection with your application for employment or engagement with IAS, including the following categories of PI: identifiers, personal records, commercial information, professional or employment or engagement information, non-public education records, and inferences drawn from your PI. We collect your PI for our purposes, including performing services and operations related to your potential employment or engagement. For additional details or if you have questions, contact us at compliance@integralads.com.

To learn more about us, please visit http://integralads.com/ and https://muse.cm/2t8eGlN

Attention agency/3rd party recruiters: IAS does not accept any unsolicited resumes or candidate profiles. If you are interested in becoming an IAS recruiting partner, please send an email introducing your company to recruitingagencies@integralads.com. We will get back to you if there's interest in a partnership.",3.5,"Integral Ad Science
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
295,Senior Data Analyst,$73k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

The Data Analyst will apply expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and data presentation to comprehend and identify trends and will provide technical solutions to a wide range of difficult problems.

The selected candidate will have the unique opportunity to support the customer through the application of programmatic and quantitative methods to identify patterns and relationships in large data sets using mathematical, statistical, and other data-driven analysis to address intelligence questions. The Data Analyst will apply and enhance their skills with developing, running, and analyzing results of complex queries against massive scale data stores/data processing environments.

Basic Qualifications:
The Data Analyst will provide imaginative, thorough, practicable, and consistent solutions with organizational objectives, work under general direction, and determine and develop approaches to solutions independently.
Present findings to both technical and non-technical collaborators and stakeholders.
Gather and analyze data across sources and systems to identify trends and derive recommendations or make predictions.
Generate and compile reports to provide a holistic comprehension of important performance metrics for more informed decision-making.
Position requires a Bachelor's degree.
Position requires five (5) years of related experience.
Experience with All-Source data analysis to perform technical targeting analytic support in the Intelligence Community.
Developing and using computer languages (e.g. Python, R, Pig, Java, C, SQL, ECL) to perform large scale parallel processing of data, and to develop, validate, and use methodologies to support analytic requirements in clustered computing environments.
Knowledge of SQL and databases
Experience using analytic techniques and tools to conduct technical targeting analytic support to the customer.
Ability to collaborate with technical teams to provide solutions.
Experience developing custom algorithms to support analytic requirements against massive data stores.
Desired Skills:
Experience in the Intelligence Community.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI Poly security clearance required.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
296,ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEER/SCIENTIST,Employer Provided Salary:$25-$28 Per Hour,"McPhail Associates, LLC is a geotechnical and geoenvironmental engineering consulting firm located in Cambridge, Massachusetts within walking distance of Davis Square. We are currently seeking an entry to mid-level environmental engineer/scientist. The successful candidate will work with a dedicated team of geotechnical and geoenvironmental engineers, geologists and scientists on projects involving environmental due diligence, environmental regulatory compliance, subsurface explorations, and the assessment and remediation of soil and groundwater impacted by oil and hazardous materials. McPhail Associates offers a robust benefits package and opportunity for advancement.
Responsibilities:
Preparation of ASTM Phase I and II Environmental Site Assessments.
Preparation of dewatering permit applications.
Preparation of state and federal regulatory compliance reports.
Preparation of chemical testing data tables.
Preparation of soil disposal pre-characterization reports and soil disposal facility profiles.
Planning and executing subsurface explorations.
Sampling of soil, groundwater, soil gas, and indoor air.
Occasional field monitoring of subsurface explorations, storage tank removals, and environmental remediation.
Interact and communicate with staff, clients and subcontractors.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Environmental Science, Civil Engineering or related field.
3-5 years experience preparing ASTM Phase I and II Environmental Site Assessments and MCP submittals.
Strong technical writing and excellent verbal communication skills.
Current 10-hour OSHA Construction Industry Training or 40-hour HAZWOPER training is preferred.
Knowledge of the Massachusetts Contingency Plan (MCP) is preferred.
Computer Skills - Microsoft Office and Bluebeam Revu
Please send resume to McPhail Associates, LLC c/o careers@mcphailgeo.com",3.3,"Mcphail Associates
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1976,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
297,"Computer Scientist – Machine Learning, Assoc",$87k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking an early career Computer Scientist to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision and cognitive science to solve some of the world’s most challenging problems. Our Data Engineering and Biometrics team provide MITRE-unique solutions across multiple sponsors. We are a driving force investigating, developing and defining multiple research initiatives in collaboration with academia, industry and our sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Work in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Advance the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and produce quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Cybersecurity, or related field
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a Secret DoD clearance and DHS fitness
Required Qualifications:
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Demonstrated proficiency using tools such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government Secret clearance are preferred
2+ years’ work experience should include: machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science
Documented success working in the fields of: cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
298,"Computer Scientist / Machine Learning, Staff",$74k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking an early career Computer Scientist to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision and cognitive science to solve some of the world’s most challenging problems. Our Data Engineering and Biometrics team provide MITRE-unique solutions across multiple sponsors. We are a driving force investigating, developing and defining multiple research initiatives in collaboration with academia, industry and our sponsors.

Responsibilities include:

Work in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Advance the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and produce quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Cybersecurity, or related field
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a Secret DoD clearance and DHS fitness
2+ years’ work experience should include: machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science

Required Qualifications:

Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Demonstrated proficiency using tools such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL

Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government Secret clearance are preferred
Documented success working in the fields of: cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"Mitre Corporation
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
299,Customer Success Scientist/Engineer,-1,"Scismic is supporting the growth of our life sciences software company. We are looking for a scientist with a strong background in Computational Biology and Bioinformatics to join our team. You should be an effective communicator, an organized individual, and strong at problem-solving.
Responsibilities: *
Collaborate with clients to plan/map their workflow requirements, process, data . This work may include but is not limited to:
Client consultations to ensure best practice translation of their workflows into our proprietary science platform
Apply the platform data architecture strategies to structure workflow information
Customize our platform to reflect our clients' workflows and reporting
Verify and perform testing on platform workflow configurations
Support client testing
You will support and troubleshoot client workflow execution issues
You will scope and author consulting services SOW documents
You will translate client needs into new core product software requirements
Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.scismic.com
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,Scismic,"Austin, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
300,Data Scientist / Quantitative Research,-1,"Overview

PicnicHealth is all about making medical records easy to access and using data to power the next frontier of medical research. We work directly with patients to give them the only tool anywhere that truly provides all of their medical records from any doctor or healthcare system in the USin an easy-to-use, secure online dashboard. Not only that, but patients can choose to contribute their incredibly important data to scientific research, which helps researchers accelerate breakthroughs in care. To date we've helped tens of thousands of patients, partnered with some of the world's largest biopharma companies, and raised more than $35M from Felicis Ventures, Amplify Partners, Foresite Capital, Refactor Capital, and Y Combinator.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, Data Scientists on the Quantitative Research team are responsible for translating, assessing, and augmenting our Real World Data (RWD) to develop actionable insights and evidence for our life science partners. We're seeking an experienced data scientist to join the team to deliver bespoke analytics, create internal and customer tools, and develop predictive models to improve our research data product.

As a Data Scientist on the Quantitative Science team you will:
Use PicnicHealth's large, multi-disease multi-modal real-world dataset to answer critical clinical questions;
Become a subject matter expert on our data and its capabilities. Lead technical initiatives that further our understanding of RWD and methods to generate real-world evidence;
Transform real-world clinical data into actionable insights using data analytics, robust statistical methods, and compelling data visualizations accessible to a wide range of end-users;
Work with a cross-functional team to define and clarify analytic requirements, develop analysis plans, ensure data quality standards, and create publication-ready methods and results;
Conduct research to assess our data quality, identifying gaps and proposing solutions.
Develop and manage relationships with external partners (including life science companies, regulatory agencies, academic institutions, and health technology assessment bodies) to advance the integration of our analytic products, including through peer reviewed scientific publications.
Must haves:
At least 4 years of industry experience in a quantitative/statistical position in the life sciences industry
You hold a degree in a quantitative discipline, such as biostatistics, epidemiology, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
Advanced experience with R (tidyverse) and preferably have built an R package before
You have some training in statistics
You are familiar with command line tools
You have experience working with medical data, longitudinal EMR data, and/or data ontologies (OMOP, etc.)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
Ability to work independently, and experience leading the development of analytical features
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical and thoughtful eye
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and professional
You enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines. You are passionate about our patient-centric mission to improve healthcare for all
You'd be an amazing candidate if you had some/any of the following:
You've built an interactive data visualization app using the shiny package
You have advanced experience with with SQL
You have strong experience in statistics or biostatistical methods
You have a track record of producing scientific publications
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.6,"PicnicHealth
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
301,Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations,$139k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Guild is hiring a Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations. As the Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations you will partner with our leaders across the business and lead a team of data scientists to improve our students' Guild experience.

As Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations, you will:
Partner with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities to use data science solutions to drive improved outcomes.
Manage large-scale projects and prioritize the team's workload to ensure effective delivery and implementation of solutions which drive our strategies forward.
Work closely with Operations leadership to translate business needs and problems into analyses. This could include uncovering a problem, identifying data sources to quantify the problem, synthesizing findings and solutions, analyzing the business case and tradeoffs, and managing the implementation of recommendations.
Develop frameworks, approaches, solutions and recommendations that effectively and efficiently address the most impactful opportunities and challenges for Guild's Operations teams.
Lead a world-class team of analysts who are responsive to our business partners' needs, and are capable of working with data, performing complex analyses, and developing recommendations and strategies which drive our business forward.
Use data to tell a story, effectively explaining analytical findings and technical solutions to business partners.
Act as a thought partner to data scientists, helping to formulate analytical plans, prioritize initiatives, and operationalize the results of learnings from complex analyses, including A/B testing, NLP, segmentation, and other predictive models.
In this role you will report to Beth Hegland and collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Kevin Chan-A-Shing, Mae Podesta, Josh Hadden-Leggett, and Terrence Cummings.

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
8+ years of experience in an analytics/data science environment
5+ years managing high-performing technical and analytical teams
Strong technical and analytical skills, with high attention to detail and accuracy.
Strong experience with SQL, as well as Excel/Google Sheets, BI Tools (Looker a plus)
Ability to work cross-functionally to advocate for data science solutions, develop roadmaps, and ensure effective prioritization of analytical resources.
Extreme comfort presenting to and interacting with senior leaders, with the ability to win over strong personalities and reconcile competing points of view through data-driven storytelling
Preferred Competencies:
Familiarity with Operations teams in a sales or CRM environment
Proven business experience with a scripting language like Python or R
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.6,"Guild Education
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
302,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Octane is a Fintech company whose mission is to connect people with their passions. The $21B powersports market is fast and fun, but the purchasing process is slow and frustrating. Octane is changing that through automated underwriting, innovative credit products, and financing through our in-house lender Roadrunner Financial. Octane reaches millions of riders through editorial brands like CycleWorld.com and helps consumers buy their favorite vehicles with instant, frictionless financing on Octane.co.

Octane is gaining traction quickly with customers, as evidenced by growth in originations through our platform of more than 3X year-over-year. Octane works with more than 3,500 dealers in the USA, provides financing coverage for most major powersports makes, and offers promotional financing with low rates for 40 OEM brands. Because we're the platform and the lender, we have both high growth and positive unit economics - rare for a fintech. We have raised more than $139M in venture capital from leading investors such as IA Ventures, Valar Ventures, and Contour Venture Partners.

We are seeking a talented data scientist to lead projects related to credit risk analytics and model development. You will be working with a versatile team of data scientists and financial professionals to design and implement models underlying the core functions of Octane's lending business and loan portfolios.

Responsibilities:
Lead and manage the development of machine learning powered predictive models for Octane's real-time credit and technology systems
Continuously drive improvements in Octane's modeling approach and architecture
Design and implement customer-facing experiments that improve our user experience and grow loan originations
Manage and mine large data sets of proprietary and third-party data to draw insights and recommendations for policy and strategy decisions
Implement statistical methods to solve specific business problems utilizing code (Python)
Champion data analytics and help advance our culture of data-driven decision-making
Requirements:
Knowledge of various data science disciplines including descriptive analytics, optimization, probability, hypothesis testing, regression, forecasting and machine learning
Understanding of end-to-end development of machine learning systems, especially feature engineering and feature selection
Experience with both model development and systems integration
Excellent Python and SQL skills and familiarity with AWS
A track record of taking initiative and driving results, and a passion to build, design and transform a young organization
Strong communication skills and experience working across teams
MS in a quantitative field, followed by 3+ years experience or BS in a quantitative field, followed by 5+ years experience
Industry experience within Consumer Credit, FinTech, Financial Services, or similar preferred
Benefits
Robust Health Care Plans (Medical, Dental & Vision)
Up to 5 weeks PTO (self-managed)
Generous Parental Leave
Retirement Plan (401k) with Company contribution
Educational Assistance/Tuition Reimbursement up to $3K/year
Powersports Safety Benefit: reimbursement of up to $500/year for the purchase of any powersports safety equipment
Life Insurance (Basic, Voluntary & AD&D)
Short Term / Long Term Disability & Life insurance
Team Activities (remotely)
Monthly company gift
Octane Lending is an equal opportunity employer committed to providing equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or any other protected status with respect to recruitment, hiring, promotion and other terms and conditions of employment.",4.1,"Octane
4.1","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
303,Bioinformatics Scientist,-1,"About Us: *
Spatial Genomics is a Caltech startup pioneering new frontiers in genomics. We are passionate about our mission and committed to developing technologies to make spatial, single cell gene expression profiling broadly accessible. Join us as we enable new discoveries in basic research and medicine.
Description: *
We are seeking an exceptional candidate to spearhead analysis of spatial data sets. The individual will develop pipelines for data extraction and analysis from biological images. He/she will also aid in data interpretation to draw novel biological conclusions.
Major Responsibilities: *
Assist with data extraction from spatial images
Construct image analysis pipelines
Collaborate on the development of new tools/algorithms for analysis of genomics data
Develop methods for data visualization and interpretation
Review and test methods reported in the literature
Document code and processes well
Assist others in the use of software packages and pipelines
Other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Bioinformatics, Bioengineering, Computer Science or a related field
Experience working in software development or in genomics research
Working knowledge of Python, Java, and C++
Working knowledge of statistics and linear algebra
Interest in the life sciences and enthusiasm for collaborating with life science researchers
Working knowledge of modern version control packages
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Preferred Qualifications: *
MS or PhD in Bioinformatics, Bioengineering, Computer Science or a related field
Three or more years of experience working in bioinformatics or as a software developer
Experience with genomics and RNAseq analysis
Familiarity with machine learning methods
Experience in cloud computing
Experience with GUI development
Experience with web development
Spatial Genomics, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation or any other characteristic protected by law.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
bioinformatics or related: 1 year (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)",-1,Spatial Genomics,"Pasadena, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
304,"Scientist II / Sr. Scientist I, In Vivo Pharmacology",$78k-$158k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are

Since 2006, 23andMe's mission has been to help people access, understand, and benefit from the human genome. We are a group of passionate individuals pushing the boundaries of what's possible to help turn genetic insight into better health and personal understanding.

23andMe's Therapeutics team is committed to discovering and developing new therapies that can offer significant benefits for patients. This dedicated research and development group in South San Francisco identifies novel targets using 23andMe's genetic database and performs preclinical research to advance programs for disease areas with high unmet need.

We are seeking an exceptional Scientist to join a collaborative, cross-functional team responsible for the biological characterization of drug targets and the preclinical development of drug compounds. Successful candidates will bring hands-on experience in rodent disease models and PK, PD, and toxicology studies.

More information about our Therapeutics team is available at https://therapeutics.23andme.com/.

What you'll do
Design and conduct in vivo studies to support therapeutic drug development in disease models as well as in PK, PD, and toxicology studies
Develop and validate new in vivo models as required
Interpret, record, and present complex biological data
Serve as the in vivo lead on project teams
Mentor and manage Associate Scientists
Communicate and collaborate effectively with colleagues, and maintain compliance with all company policies and procedures
What you'll bring
Master's degree in biological sciences. PhD preferred
5-10 years of post-graduate work experience in in vivo pharmacology research or drug discovery, preferably in immunology or immuno-oncology
Extensive experience with drug delivery procedures (IV, IP, SC, PO) and blood and tissue collection
Strong organizational skills; Ability to work collaboratively on multiple projects, concurrently
Excellent teamwork skills and ability to build effective relationships with cross-functional teams
Experience in managing, mentoring and developing others
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and influencing skills
Strongly Preferred
Scientific training in immunology or oncology
Drug discovery experience in the field of immuno-oncology or oncology
Experience managing external collaboration partners or CROs
Proven track record via high quality publications and/or patent applications
Note: Job title will be commensurate with experience and academic credentials.

About Us

23andMe, Inc. is the leading consumer genetics and research company. Founded in 2006, the mission of the company is to help people access, understand, and benefit from the human genome. The company was named by Glassdoor as one of the Best Places to Work in 2019, MIT Technology Review to its ""50 Smartest Companies, 2017"" list, and named one of Fast Company's ""25 Brands That Matter Now, 2017"". 23andMe has millions of customers worldwide, with more than 80 percent of customers consented to participate in research. More information is available at www.23andMe.com.

At 23andMe, we value a diverse, inclusive workforce and we provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. All qualified applicants for employment will be considered without regard to an individual's race, color, sex, gender identity, gender expression, religion, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, marital status, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, military or veteran status, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local laws. If you are unable to submit your application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at accomodations-ext@23andme.com. 23andMe will reasonably accommodate qualified individuals with disabilities to the extent required by applicable law.

Please note: 23andMe does not accept agency resumes and we are not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Thank you.",4.2,"23andMe
4.2","South San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
305,Intern - Data Scientist - Marketing and Product Management - Summer,$68k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Marketing and Product Management organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. This division is responsible for the strategy, management, and development of one of Lumen’s flagship product portfolios of the business. This role will assist in evolving the business intelligence and analytics function of the Global Wavelength Product group. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up, to make an impact.

• UX is super important to us. You need to understand how to make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building state-of-the-art advanced analytics models while utilizing massive structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Pursing a Bachelor's or Masters degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Economics, Business Analytics, Mathematics or related fields of study.
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or Masters/PhD; as a junior, senior or master’s level education status at the start of the internship (graduating after August 2021).
Interest and knowledge in the technology sector would be ideal.
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher preferred.
Must have transportation to/from work daily.
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe.
Skills
In depth knowledge of Microsoft Power BI and Structured Query Language (SQL).
Strong understanding of programming languages extensively used in Data Science applications (e.g., R, Python, Scala, Java, etc.)
Experience in data mining, big data analytics, application data preparation and other analytics techniques.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression analysis, cluster analysis, etc.)
In depth knowledge of Excel.
Possess strong problem-solving, writing, storytelling and presentation skills.
In depth knowledge of Excel, PowerPoint and Microsoft Office Suite Applications
Launch your Finance career at Lumen!

Our Financial Leadership Program (“FLP”) further develops emerging leaders who embrace the “digital mindset” regarding technology transformation and can thrive in a complex and rapidly changing global economy. This position will allow YOU to have exposure to the FLP program; ; cross functional exposure, supplemental learning opportunities and networking with our finance leadership. This finance internship position has the potential for future career path opportunities within the FLP program after graduation.

Requisition #: 234812

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
306,"Risk Specialist, Data Science - Suptech",$121k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Financial Institution Supervision and Credit (FISC) at the Federal Reserve
Bank of San Francisco supervises financial institutions, and service providers
to financial institutions, in the 12th Federal Reserve District. Our mission is
to ensure a safe, sound, and accessible financial system. The Suptech (ST) Team
within the Risk, Policy, and Analysis Group directly supports FISC’s strategic
objective of deepening our knowledge of, and thought leadership in, the
utilization of new and evolving technologies in our supervisory programs and
examination processes. This cross-disciplinary team of developers and/or data
scientists collaborates with colleagues throughout FISC to identify product
development opportunities, design solutions, and facilitate their implementation.
ST additionally has education, outreach
and advocacy responsibilities on the use of technology in supervision.

Job Summary

The Risk Specialist, Data Science for Suptech plays an essential role in
supporting FISC’s supervision objectives and functions. We are looking for a
subject matter expert with data science expertise to support assessment and
monitoring of risk at supervised institutions.
You will lead or provide critical input to the identification,
prioritization, and development of applied data science opportunities across
FISC, with a focus on the Regional, Community and Foreign Examinations Group.
Additionally, you will work closely with multiple stakeholders throughout the
Bank to support the overall Mission, and to deliver on FISC’s vision for
developing and implementing innovative solutions, powered by data and machine
learning and integral to the risk assessment, supervisory program, and
examination processes.

Key
responsibilities include:
Develop or build
upon already existing expertise around machine learning applications, as well
as supervisory examination, risk assessment, and risk monitoring processes, to
help lead developing methods for applying data mining, NLP, and machine
learning to improve the Division’s analytical and supervisory capabilities.
Collect and
direct, perform, or support analysis of data to generate and test working hypotheses,
conduct thorough assessments, and draw actionable recommendations to be used by
examination team(s) and a broader Reserve Bank audience.
Direct and/or build
data ingestion processes to prepare, extract, and enrich a variety of both
structured and unstructured data sources such as news, internal/external
documents, external financial information, and confidential supervisory
information.
Develop, document
& maintain statistical, financial and/or econometric models to analyze
capital, asset quality, earnings, liquidity risk exposure, or other
sophisticated concepts, including non-financial risk, at banking institutions.
Direct, or provide
analytical support to, the development of innovative solutions leveraging
emerging technologies to address evolving needs of supervision and examination
management and staff, with a particular focus on identifying, measuring,
monitoring, and mitigating existing risk and emerging risk concerns, or improving
efficiencies in supervisory program or examination processes.
Collaborate with
business partners across FRBSF and FISC to prioritize requirements in the risk,
supervision and data science domains.
Position Requirements
Bachelor's
and Master's Degree preferably in Business/Finance or an analytical field such
as Economics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science with a minimum of 3+
years of related experience to include:
3+ years of
experience in a data science/modeler role specifically focused on risk, banking
supervision, and/or financial regulation.
2+ years of
experience in working at financial regulatory institutions with large datasets
to build models and algorithms with open source technologies as part
supervisory and/or risk assessment processes.
Established
ability to work with large structured and unstructured financial data sets and
have the required statistical skills to analyze and prepare them for modeling
and algorithm development.
Knowledge of
the banking industry and related supervision and regulation framework
Proficiency
and applied experience in quantitative risk modeling, including the use of
modeling software.
Ability to
analyze and interpret quantitative financial information, including but not
limited to balance sheet data and market data.
Strong
statistical modelling and programming skills in R or Python
Proficiency
in SQL – able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets.
Comfortable
working in a loosely structured organization on a tight schedule.
Strong
written and verbal communication and presentation skills including ability to
effectively share results with both technical and non-technical audiences
Experience
with data visualization packages (e.g. ggplot2, plotly); experience building
interactive dashboards and apps (e.g. Shiny) is a plus but not required.
Familiarity
with model development lifecycle, and in particular model validation processes
(e.g. SR 11-7).
We are looking for candidates
that exhibit these behavioral competencies: analytical thinking, innovation,
communication for results, flexibility, initiative, collaboration, and risk
management.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco believes in the diversity of our people, ideas, and experiences
and are committed to building an inclusive culture that is representative of
the communities we serve.

We will ensure that
individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to
participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential
job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1913,Government,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
307,Data Engineer - Python,$77k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: TX - Plano, United States of America, Plano, Texas

Data Engineer - Python

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Software Engineers who are passionate about marrying data with emerging technologies to join our team. As a Capital One Software Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about #lifeatcapitalone and our commitment to diversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Work with cloud native stack, build on AWS, use technologies like Kubernetes and Serverless

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 4 years of experience in software engineering

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

2+ years of experience in Agile practices

1+ years of experience with AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, or another public cloud service

4+ years of experience in at least one of the following: Java, Scala, Python, Go, Javascript/TypeScript, Angular/React.js, or Node.js

2+ years of experience working with big data technologies (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Presto)

2+ years of experience working on streaming data applications (e.g. Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, or Spark Streaming)

4+ years of experience in open source frameworks

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
308,Assoc Scientist/Operator,$78k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY

Operate Canberra Gamma systems and NDA systems. Review data and prepare reports.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES:

Operate Gamma spectroscopy systems.
Operate NDA waste assay systems.
Analyze data and prepare NDA results reports for final review by scientist or senior scientist, as applicable.
Perform measurement control activities.
Perform Independent Technical Review (ITR) of data.
ADDITIONAL DUTIES:
Assist in performing field measurements and field assessments.
Assist in NDA system maintenance.
ESSENTIAL REQUIREMENTS:
Understanding of waste system theory and operation.
Understanding of operation of NDA systems.
Proficient in communication and drafting of reports for customer use.
Proficient in use of computers.
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Able to work in extreme temperatures for extended periods of time - As Required.
Capable of successfully completing contractor/customer required training - As Required.
Capable of maintaining work site access requirements - As Required.
EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS
Six months to one year of nuclear related experience.
High School or equivalent technical training, OR two years nuclear related experience.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractors legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.4,"Mirion
3.4","Los Alamos, NM",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
309,Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
310,"Principal Scientist, Immunology",$105k-$221k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary:
The Principal Scientist, Immunology is responsible for planning and performing scientific experiments that contribute to PTCs research and drug discovery activities. The Principal Scientist is also responsible for communicating experimental results to his/her supervisor and the project team.

The incumbent works cross-functionally with internal departments, and external resources as appropriate, as part of PTCs discovery science project teams.

S/he also supports adherence to relevant regulatory requirements and company Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) as appropriate.
Job Description:


Primary duties/responsibilities:
Independently plans, initiates, directs and executes scientific research and experiments and interprets and communicates results as part of multi-disciplinary team(s). This includes performing analyses of primary research literature.
Maintains broad knowledge of state-of-the-art principles and theories related to human disease and/or drug discovery.
Contributes to the strategy and direction of successful drug discovery programs.
Presents findings internally and externally to cross-functional teams.
Participates in the development and writing of patent applications and identifies patentable inventions.
Abides by all safety and regulatory guidelines.
Maintains a detailed laboratory notebook.
Performs other tasks as assigned.
Contributes to general lab needs such as:
Equipment maintenance.
Capital equipment purchases.
Troubleshoot
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS/ABILITIES REQUIRED
Extensive experience in immunology research, familiar with both innate and adoptive immunity
Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of autoimmune and inflammatory disease pathophysiology
Extensive experience in developing and applying disease-relevant cellular models to evaluate compound effect and its therapeutic potential for the treatment autoimmune diseases, inflammatory diseases, and fibrosis
Data driven assessment of compound translatability from preclinic to clinic
Track record of consistent and successful drug discovery accomplishments (e.g., patent inventorship, conference presentations, and peer-reviewed publications)
* Minimum level of education and years of relevant work experience.
Ph.D. in a Immunology with postdoctoral training, plus 8-10 years relevant Academia/ Industry work experience
* Special knowledge or skills needed and/or licenses or certificates required.
Works on unusually complex technical problem and provides solutions which are highly innovative.
Works under consultative direction toward predetermined long-range goals and objectives. Assignments are often self-initiated.
Exercises independent judgment within defined procedures and practices.
Develops advanced technological ideas and guides their development into a final product.
Demonstrates technical proficiency, scientific creativity, collaboration with others and independent thought within a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members
Manage and mentor a team of scientists in fast paced matrix environment.
May oversee academic collaboration and/or be designated as a subcontractor or co-PI on research grants
Interviews and contributes to the evaluation of candidates.
Possesses detailed and expert knowledge of scientific principles and concepts.
Demonstrated ability to work effectively in a multi-disciplinary team environment.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office preferably MS Excel and MS PowerPoint or similar
Excellent verbal and written communication and skills.
Analytical thinker with excellent problem-solving skills.
Demonstrates an understanding of the strategic alignment of his/her work with corporate goal(s) and demonstrates the ability to adapt to changing priorities and deadlines.
Excellent planning, organization and time management skills including the ability to support and prioritize multiple projects.
* Travel requirements

Upto10%

*Physical requirements (only note if the job requires physical capacity beyond general office work)

Office/Laboratory based position

EEO Statement:

PTC Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome applications from all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, gender, age, physical characteristics, social origin, disability, religion, family status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, veteran status or any unlawful criterion under applicable law. We are committed to treating all applicants fairly and avoiding discrimination.

Click here to return to the careers page",3.0,"PTC Therapeutics, Inc.
3.0","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
311,Marketing Data Scientist,-1,"We’re a top finance company looking for a Marketing Data Scientist!*
WHY WORK WITH US?
This is the next step your career needs to keep growing. We’re a leading finance company in California that specializes in providing capital to property owners for renewable energy, and more than 100 types of improvements.

Be the key component in the creation of new market strategies and get the chance to enter other industries in the US by taking charge of projects, and collaborating alongside different departments.

Make your way to the top and increase your value with one of the most competitive offers in the market.

WHAT CAN YOU DO FOR US?
Your contribution to our team will focus on market research by implementing marketing automation technology through various platforms to enable data-driven outcomes. This includes capturing, storing, managing, and analyzing said data to create effective strategies that will help in marketing and sales decisions.

In this role, you will make a big impact on our company by combining the importance of marketing automation and data science in order to maximize the effectiveness of campaigns, improving customers’ digital experience, and measuring the overall business outcome. You will be helping the sales team with potential prospects and the marketing team by enhancing key areas of digital marketing such as SEO, content marketing, customer engagement, and more.

Plus, this is your chance to play with intricate data and analytical experiments that will help us gather customer insights such as preferences, demographics, buying habits, competitors offers, and details that could influence product demand.
Take charge of projects from start to finish, and give your career the push it needs to grow internationally in this industry.
Skills required for this position include: *
- Knowledge in Python, HTML, APIs*
- Knowledge of Granular Targeting processes – to manage large amounts of customer data through the integration of CRM and other transactional systems.*
- Knowledge of omnichannel Touchpoints – To gauge the value of the leads generated through different digital channels (Website, Social Media, Email Campaigns, Mobile, Search, and so on.).*
- Experience in analyzing leads generated in the past to predict future behaviors/purchases.*
- Running different experiments (A/B multivariate testing)*
- Understanding audience real-time behavior.*
WHAT CAN WE DO FOR YOU?

Our reach is growing faster this year and we’re expanding into new markets with the creation of multiple financing programs. This is where you step in and why the Marketing Data Scientist position is of high importance to our company.
This role will be in charge of decision-making along with Sales and Marketing department leaders. The knowledge and the skills this experience will provide for you will increase your areas of expertise.

Apply now to one of the best offers in the industry that combines Data Science and Marketing. Complete your application with us here!

Job Type: Contract

Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,ABA Finance,"Laguna Beach, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
312,Data Modeler,$64k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"BICP, a market leader in BI&A and Cloud Transformation, is looking to hire a Sr. Data Modeler / Data Architect to support a multi-year enterprise modernization effort at our longstanding Fortune 500 Consumer Products client in Long Island City, NY. We currently have a team on-site supporting multiple groups with their drive to deploy NextGen platforms and applications capable of powering real time analytics. The Data Modeler/Architect will be part of a new squad focused primarily on delivering new functionality associated with Finance analytics. Ideal consultant will have at least 5 years Data Modeling experience and, in general, be familiar with a variety of techniques to consume and process large data volumes/datasets.

Ideal candidate will have experience with name based architecture, domain definitions and deep data warehouse expertise (Teradata, SQL Server, DB2 etc). The mapping effort will involve numerous data sources touching a variety of data including Finance, Supply Chain, Procurement and HR. Ideal consultant will have prior experience supporting cloud based, analytics driven transformation efforts from legacy to NextGen platforms (Azure). The key areas of responsibility include the following:
Responsibilities: *
Help define and develop architecture for integration into client's analytics ecosystem Assist in defining the client's architecture from Logical to Physical layers.
Provide solution expertise to cross functional delivery teams and domain Product Owners.
Work with Product Owners to scope projects and conceptualize project plan.
Provide architecture thought leadership and actively participate in the design, implementation, and roll-out efforts.
Nice to Have: *
Experience developing solutions in Snowflake Experience with workload automation tools
Knowledge of data visualization and reporting tools
About BICP*
BICP is a leading-edge consulting firm focused on delivering innovative and transformative BI&A, Advanced Analytics and Big Data solutions to our customers. With deep experience across a diverse ecosystem of NextGen platforms, Analytics and Data Science applications we have the required product ambiguity and expertise to deliver truly best in breed solutions customized to our client’s specific business needs.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Azure: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SAP: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Long Island City, NY 11101 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"BICP
5.0","Long Island City, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
313,Principal Data Scientist,$113k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
314,Product Data Analyst,$55k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"OVERVIEW:

As the Company expands its product offerings, there are rapidly growing needs to use both external and internal data sources to ensure optimal financial and operational performance. The Product Data Analyst is a highly skilled and proficient in their discipline which adds value to the organization. The role will focus on internal data sources, ensuring we have access to the required data and are using effective reports to monitor and interpret this data.

TEAM OVERVIEW:

The Product Strategy Group works to ensure the Company offers competitive products that provide growth and profitability. The group performs a wide range of analytics and uses both internal and external data sources to achieve these ends. We interact and provide guidance primarily to Product, Marketing & Finance.

COMPANY PERKS:

Competitive pay, 401k with company match, Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Employee Stock Purchase Plan, Educational Reimbursement, Commuter benefits, Discount programs, Inventor patent bonuses

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Stamps.com (NASDAQ: STMP) is the leading provider of postage online and shipping software solutions to customers including consumers, small businesses, e-commerce shippers, enterprises, and high volume shippers. Stamps.com offers solutions that help businesses run their shipping operations more smoothly and function more successfully under the brand names Stamps.com, Endicia®, ShipStation®, ShipEngine®, ShippingEasy®, ShipWorks®, GlobalPost and MetaPack™. Stamps.com’s family of brands provides seamless access to mailing and shipping services through integrations with more than 500 unique partner applications.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Primary Objectives:
Ensure Product, Operations and Product Strategy groups have timely access to reliable data to make critical, real-time business decisions
Develop a strong working relationship with the Company’s Business Intelligence group; serve as the primarily liaison between the above-mentioned groups and BI
Drive the data reporting strategy for these groups; develop reports to the specifications of these teams; and evaluate appropriate software tools to most efficiently meet team needs
Essential Position Duties:
Acquire, clean, and structure data from multiple sources; analyze data to discover and interpret trends, patterns, and relationships. Working across departments, help us ensure data quality and present data in a way that makes it easy to communicate among different groups.
Master large data sets with SQL and Tableau
Build dashboards and reports, presenting key insights and ensuring data driven actions to improve the business
Seek out improvements in current internal reporting and performance monitoring to drive more accuracy, better insights, and more streamlined processes
Perform other duties as assigned
Additional Job Duties:
Sit for prolonged periods of time
Utilize wrist and hands for a prolonged period of time
Walk short distances
Stand for short periods
Speaking and conversing with others
Lift up to 25 lbs without assistance up to chest height
QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor degree, preferably in a quantitative/analytical field.
Four or more (4+) years of relevant experience.
Skills and Knowledge:
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, including ability to analyze large amounts of data and be able to make recommendations based on identification of trend and gaps along with creating forecasts based on historical data.
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, with strong attention to detail.
Must be a self-starter and ready to work in an intense but fun environment with our existing team of marketing professionals.
Strong communication and relationship-building skills.
Self-motivated individual who is able to prioritize and multi-task.
Works well under pressure and able to meet tight deadlines.
Ability to conduct complex work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgement.
Computer/Software/Application Proficiency:
Advanced Excel user, with strong SQL knowledge
Experience with visualization software such as Tableau required
Travel Requirements:
None anticipated
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

If you are based in California, we encourage you to read this important information about the Stamps.com Privacy Policy for California residents linked here.

#LI-KD1",3.9,"Stamps.com
3.9","El Segundo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
315,"Business Intelligence III Business Intelligence Analyst (Thornton, CO, Farmington Hills, MI or San Jose, CA)",-1,"Company Description

Astreya is the leading IT solutions provider to deliver technology-enabled services and fuel digital transformation to some of the most exciting companies on the planet. We are at the cusp of a new way of working with our delivery model that helps our clients be positively productive by matching exceptional people to on-site teams delivering world-class IT service. With engineers in over 30 countries and 70 cities around the world, we are a global company working with the world's most recognizable and innovative organizations.
Job Description

What this Job Entails:

Responsible for supporting organizational decision-making through complex analysis, reporting, research, and effective use of data generated from our information systems. Identifies and interprets trends and patterns in datasets. This role requires a strong, analytical thinker.

Scope:
Resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways
Seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of their speciality
Works on problems of a diverse scope
Receives little instruction on day to day work, general instruction on new assignments
Your Roles and Responsibilities:
Conduct quantitative/ qualitative data analysis using tools and functions such as SQL, Dashboards, and Google spreadsheets
Collaborate with individuals throughout the organization to understand data visualizations needs for customer feedback
Constructs forecasts, recommendations and strategic/tactical plans based on business data and market knowledge
Present reports monthly, quarterly and as requested with issues, observations or outcomes specified
Work with client stakeholders to improve, automate and align data with current client processes
Creates specifications for reports and analysis based on business needs and required or available data elements.
Produces datasets and reports for analysis using system reporting tools.
Provides consultation to users and lead cross-functional teams to address business issues
Utilizes a variety of software applications and data sources to develop methodologies for the Business Intelligence team
Actively develops new tools and system enhancements, troubleshoots and solves data issues
Seeks out, identifies, documents, and initiates resolutions to data quality issues that are discovered during report and analysis development
Stay connected to industry trends, research and recommend best practices and KPIs
Other duties as required. This list is not meant to be a comprehensive inventory of all responsibilities assigned to this position
Required Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor’s degree (B.S/B.A) from four-college or university and 5 to 8 years’ related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience
Networks with senior internal and external personnel in own area of expertise
Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions
Proven track record of analyzing data and using analysis to drive key insights and recommendations
Ability to work with large data sets across multiple systems
Strong presentation skills - able to crisply visualize and present data and insights to the organization
Strong development skills in SQL, PL-SQL, and TSQL
Strong report writing skills
Strong Query skills
Experience with Tableau, Hadoop, BigQuerry system management, SSIS, SSRS, or PowerBI Experience
Python knowledge
Advanced Microsoft Office/G-suite knowledge
Able to read and create technical documentation
Ability to independently diagnose complex situation into manageable parts
Analyzes and/or organizes complex information with broad direction. Identifies trends.
Participates as a specialized knowledge resource in established processes
Performs more complex general activities
Ability to be a team player with a professional attitude
Ability to multitask in a fast paced, constantly changing environment
Preferred Qualifications:

Physical Demand & Work Environment:
Must have the ability to perform office-related tasks which may include prolonged sitting or standing
Must have the ability to move from place to place within an office environment
Must be able to use a computer
Must have the ability to communicate effectively
Some positions may require occasional repetitive motion or movements of the wrists, hands, and/or fingers
What can Astreya offer you?
Employment in the fast-growing IT space providing you with a variety of career options
Opportunity to work with some of the biggest firms in the world as part of the Astreya delivery network
Introduction to new ways of working and awesome technologies
Career paths to help you establish where you want to go
Focus on internal promotion and internal mobility - we love to build teams from within
Free 24/7 accessible Professional Development through LinkedIn Learning and other online courses to give you opportunities to upskill at your own pace
Education Assistance
Dedicated management to provide you with on point leadership and care
Numerous on the job perks
Market competitive compensation and insurance, health and wellness benefits",3.4,"Astreya
3.4","Thornton, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
316,Applied Research Scientist,$87k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

To achieve our ambitious goals, we're looking for an Applied Research Scientist to join our Engineering team. In this role, you'll be able to bring state-of-the-art research into Grammarly and advance the state of the art by finding new solutions for problems that have never been solved before. Our team is thinking big-picture about the state of NLP and opportunities to help people communicate more effectively. This requires writing production code to bring machine learning models, including deep learning models, efficiently into production.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


An Applied Research Scientist will need to stay up-to-date on the quickly evolving field of NLP while also focusing on building production systems. The majority of the problems we're tackling haven't already been solved elsewhere, which provides the opportunity for creativity and innovative problem-solving.

In this role, you will:
Develop state-of-the-art tools for correcting, improving, and enhancing written English by using a variety of NLP, machine learning, and deep learning technologies.
Raise the depth and quality of research across the team.
Stay up to date with the latest research trends that could improve our product.
Produce sound experimental results to enable decision-making as we iterate on a project.
Be results oriented in the face of ambiguous problems and uncertain outcomes.
Have the option to produce research papers for top conferences in machine learning, computational linguistics, and related areas.
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Is able to solve large, complex problems with multiple stakeholders and no obvious solution.
Takes initiative and drives results.
Applies creativity to solve problems that haven't been solved before.
Ruthlessly follows the data, looking for evidence to disconfirm hypotheses and changing perspectives when that's what the data indicates.
Writes efficient, production-quality code.
Is comfortable applying the latest research to Grammarly use cases, as well as pushing the state of the art forward.
Understands traditional machine learning algorithms and how to use them effectively in practice.
Has a strong working knowledge of statistics as it relates to sampling methodologies and designing experiments.
Has worked with text data in a research context or in industry-building intelligence systems.
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",4.9,"Grammarly
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
317,LEAD BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE ANALYST,$59k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Lumen
Lumen is guided by our belief that humanity is at its best when technology advances the way we live and work. With 450,000 route fiber miles serving customers in more than 60 countries, we deliver the fastest, most secure global platform for applications and data to help businesses, government and communities deliver amazing experiences. Learn more about Lumen’s network, edge cloud, security and communication and collaboration solutions and our purpose to further human progress through technology at news.lumen.com, LinkedIn: /lumentechnologies, Twitter: @lumentechco, Facebook: /lumentechnologies, Instagram: @lumentechnologies and YouTube: /lumentechnologies.

The Role

Partners in a team effort or initially be accountable to identify, document, analyze, and communicate requirements for reporting analytics and decision support tools. This position will also be responsible for the development and maintenance of reporting tools and Salesforce.com.

The Main Responsibilities
Work with Sales operations and process teams to translate business needs into requirements and build reporting solutions
Develop reporting applications in Salesforce.com as well as third party tools including Power BI, Tableau
Create configuration changes in Salesforce.com to support reporting – including Workflows, Process builder and Flows. User must have experience with Salesforce.com configuration
Data management in Oracle and SQL server databases
What We Look For in a Candidate
Bachelor's degree or equivalent education and relevant experience required; 8+ years of related experience
5+ experience of Salesforce.com reporting and dashboards
Admin experience with Salesforce.com; Certification or 5+ years configuring process builders, flows preferred
Master's degree preferred; 8+ years of related experience
8+ years of experience with PLSQL and/or TSQL, ETL, Database Management Systems experience such as Oracle, Microsoft SQL Server, Teradata, Netezza or MySQL
Ability to develop complex automated Business Intelligence solutions using software such as SAS, Information Builders, Cognos, Business Objects, MicroStrategy or Qlikview
Excellent communication skills written, verbal, and presentation skills
Ability to multitask by working in a face paced, constantly changing environment
Ability to establish and maintain working relationships with individuals at all levels
Ability to efficiently utilize MS Office Suite of Applications specially Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Proven track record of achieving professional goals successfully
What to Expect Next

Requisition #: 232511

When applying for a position, you may be subject to a background screen (criminal records check, motor vehicle report, and/or drug screen), depending on the requirements for the position. Job-related concerns noted in the background screen may disqualify you from the new position or your current role. Background results will be evaluated on a case-by-case basis.

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Denver, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
318,MSAT Scientist Purification,$76k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

The successful candidate is part of a team of highly skilled Scientists and Engineers responsible for technical and scientific support to manufacturing of all Seattle Genetics products, whether manufactured internally or at contract manufacturing organizations (CMO’s). You will provide technical and scientific leadership as subject matter expert (SME) relating to downstream manufacturing processes for internally or externally manufactured projects. You will be responsible for designing and executing purification scale down studies to support process performance troubleshooting and continuous improvement. In addition, there will be opportunities to explore new downstream manufacturing technologies/materials to further improve efficiency and robustness. You will also interface with other high-performing teams within Technical Operations.

Responsibilities:
Responsible for purification manufacturing support for clinical and commercial biologics including routine monitoring/trending. Providing guidance for root cause investigations of process related deviations in a timely, comprehensive and conclusive manner
Design and execute experiments in support of process transfer, troubleshooting, continuous improvement
Identify and drive technical innovations that will contribute to future business developments and improvements
Leads the data analysis of process data statistics, identifies process deviations, assesses product impact, prepares technical reports and proposes process solutions and improvements
Acting as person-in-plant during tech transfer, validation studies and manufacturing
Occasionally acts as Tech Transfer lead for transfer of processes into manufacturing facilities
Interfacing with Development and manufacturing sites for know-how transfers and process data analysis & mapping in order to anticipate potential risks and opportunities for improvements supporting next generation manufacturing processes. Identifies and initiates process and procedural changes to improve process performance, robustness, productivity, safety, efficiency and compliance
Partnering with other functions to apply modeling tools ensuring that scale-down/up and characterization of manufacturing processes is robust and scientifically sound leading to a predictable and highly consistent performance and a well characterized process
Providing guidance for comprehensive facility fit assessments and gap analysis for GMP manufacturing
Support authorship of CMC regulatory submissions and responses. May function as a process SME during inspections and interactions with regulatory agencies.
Interact with cross-functional groups (e.g. Process Sciences, Manufacturing, Quality, and Regulatory)
Qualifications:
Outstanding record of accomplishment in areas of purification bioprocess development, improvement and validation
Knowledge of purification techniques (depth filtration, column chromatography, virus retentive filtration, tangential flow filtration, etc.)
Hands-on experience with operation and maintenance of bench through pilot scale chromatography systems and TFF equipment
Knowledge of protein chemistry and analytical techniques (HPLC, SDS-PAGE, Western blotting, etc.)
Strong scientific and technical experience within purification development and/or manufacturing technologies and unit operations. Preferably experience with equipment utilized in commercial cGMP manufacturing facilities
Good knowledge of structured methodologies for process design, scale-up/down models, process modeling, process control strategies, process validation and continuous process verification
The ability to work effectively in small matrix teams in a fast-paced environment with changing priorities and a high level of urgency. Highly motivated with the ability to work independently as well as on cross-functional and cross-site teams
The candidate must demonstrate high levels of integrity. Key competencies are management of complexity, driving for results, problem-solving and collaborating cross-functionally
Demonstrated skills of independent thought and creativity in science and engineering
Strong communication skills and computer literacy are essential
A good understanding of statistical analysis and continuous process verification is desirable
Demonstrated late-stage regulatory submission experience
Experience with innovation and operational excellence is desirable
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in chemical engineering, biology or another relevant life-science discipline with a minimum of 8 years of relevant industrial experience
Alternatively, a Masters’ degree with a minimum of 6 years relevant industrial experience or a PhD degree with minimum 4 years relevant industrial experience
As the leading employer in our industry in the Pacific Northwest, Seattle Genetics is proud to offer a competitive total compensation package as well as a comprehensive benefits program designed to support the whole lives of our employees and their families. Benefits include medical, vision and dental coverage, group and supplemental life insurance, 401(k) with company match, tuition reimbursement, relocation assistance and much more. To learn more about Seattle Genetics, please visit www.seattlegenetics.com.

Seattle Genetics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, gender identity, sexual orientation, color, religion, sex, marital status, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, or any other status protected by federal, state, or local law.

#LI-DD1",4.1,"Seagen
4.1","Bothell, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
319,Analytical Development Scientist,$42k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"North suburban Chicago contract pharmaceutical manufacturing company is searching for an Analytical Development Scientist. Regis is a contract manufacturer of small molecule APIs for small, mid-size and large pharmaceutical companies.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop analytical testing strategies based on provided customer technical package and/or process development synthetic routes
Develop new analytical methods
Assess customer methods for validation readiness
Execute method validation protocols for the cGMP release of drug substance batches
Author reports and review data
Collaborate with customers and other functional areas to advance projects through development
Provide analytical technical assistance to Quality Control and Process Chemistry areas
Assure compliance with Regis Technologies safety, quality, and regulatory policies and government regulations
Selected candidate will report to the Director of Analytical Method Development
PRIMARY ACTIVITIES:
Independently generate precise, reliable and reproducible data in a timely manner as part of the development, validation, and transfer of drug substance analytical methods
Make fact based decisions utilizing literature and analytical data as available
Execute analytical development against project timelines
Transfer analytical methods to the Quality Control Group
Ensure the development of strategies that improve the future capabilities and productivity of the greater organization
REQUIREMENTS:
Required laboratory skills include strong working knowledge of HPLC, GC, MS, and titration techniques, troubleshooting ability, working independently, and attention to detail
Ability to read, analyze and interpret professional journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations; ability to write reports, business correspondence and procedure manuals; ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from colleagues or managers, customers and the general public
Ability to perform complex method development and suggest appropriate method modifications
Ability to effectively analyze data and/or problems, and ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions; ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical data and deal with several abstract and concrete variables
Basic computer knowledge is desired
Experience with ICP-MS, Chromeleon Chromatography Data Software, solid state or polymorph characterization a plus
Education/Experience: BS, Chemistry with a minimum of 5 years experience in Analytical Development; or MS, Chemistry with a minimum of 3 years experience in Analytical Development; or PhD, Chemistry with a minimum of 2 years experience in Analytical Development
The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

We offer an exceptional package to the right candidate. EOE

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.3,"Regis Technologies, Inc.
3.3","Morton Grove, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1956,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
320,Technical Data Engineer,-1,"Technical Data Engineer*
Mission Support is an AS9100 & ISO 9001:2008 Certified Manufacturer and Overhaul Facility providing new manufacture and depot-level overhaul services to the US Air Force Material Command, Army Aviation, the FAA, and Naval Aviation. In general, we produce airframe structural components, flight controls and the associated actuation systems, aerial refueling, and landing gear.

We are currently seeking a technical data engineer to join our team in Clearfield, Utah. The tech data engineer will be responsible for technical document review for new contracts, as well as developing drawings and manufacturing instructions.

Required Skills:

· BA or BS in STEM-related field and 3+ years of experience.

· Ability to read/interpret 2D technical drawings and convert them to 3D CAD models.

· Solidworks experience.

· Self-motivated, accountable and detail oriented.

· Strong communication skills, both oral and written.

Preferred Skills:

· CAD experience (Solidworks, NX, Catia, Mastercam/Verisurf).

· Aircraft sheet metal/structures manufacturing experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $37.00 - $45.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift",-1,Mission Support,"Clearfield, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
321,"Scientist, Translational Science",$68k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Forma Therapeutics

Forma Therapeutics (Nasdaq: FMTX) is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the research, development and commercialization of novel therapeutics to transform the lives of patients with rare hematologic diseases and cancers. Our R&D engine combines deep biology insight, chemistry expertise and clinical development capabilities to create drug candidates with differentiated mechanisms of action focused on indications with high unmet need. Our work has generated a broad proprietary portfolio of programs with the potential to provide profound patient benefit.

The Translational Science team at Forma Therapeutics seeks an experienced scientist eager to play a key role in developing and deploying the translational strategy for discovery and development stage oncology projects as well as hemoglobinopathies. The ideal candidate will be a highly motivated individual with a strong scientific and technical background in hematology and oncology. The candidate must also have experience managing externally delivered studies and data interpretation to enable decisions on biomarkers. He or she will work cross-functionally with both clinical and discovery teams.

About the Role:
Independently design, execute and interpret biomarker studies to investigate and prioritize biomarkers to meet the timelines of the projects. This includes both internal research and work with CROs.
Drive assay validation and technology transfer to support biomarker evaluation in clinical trials.
Assist in the management of external biomarker studies andin vivo pharmacology studies by providing tactical solutions to scientific challenges, communicating with external providers and internal stakeholders.
Evaluate new technologies for use in exploratory research.
Coordinate with vendors and CROs for outsourced activities.
About You:
Degree pharmacology or biology with 2+ years of postdoctoral experience.
2+ years industry experience in drug discovery and/or translational science is highly desired.
Hands-on translational scientist with expertise in gene expression analysis and protein-based biomarker assays (ELISA, immunohistochemistry, quantitative westerns).
Experience in biomarker analysis usingin vivo studies to develop PK/PD relationships.
Experience in sequencing and genomic analysis is desired.
Proven ability to independently perform high quality research and work effectively on multifunctional teams.
About Us:

Headquartered in Watertown, MA, we have all the perks you can find in Cambridge (walkable to lunch, shopping, etc.) and more perks that you can’t (ample free parking!) Our diverse portfolio and our commitment to patients sets us apart. Our patients are our true north; our pipeline is our road map.

For more information, please visitwww.FormaTherapeutics.com or follow us on Twitter @FORMAInc and LinkedIn. Everyone at Forma is a part of the journey. #formafuturewithforma

No phone calls please. Resumes from third party vendors will not be accepted.",4.0,"FORMA THERAPEUTICS
4.0","Watertown, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
322,Contract Associate Scientist - Discovery/Translational Immunology,-1,"The Company*
Cue Biopharma, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, is engineering a novel class of injectable biologics to selectively engage and modulate targeted T cells within the body to transform the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. Cue Biopharma is a high growth company and is listed on NASDAQ (CUE). The company is located in Cambridge, Massachusetts in the heart of the life sciences corridor.

Cue Biopharma is building a world-class team of highly motivated, dedicated scientists to help us advance our research and development programs. The company culture is fast-paced and committed to scientific excellence, innovation, and teamwork.
Candidate Profile*
We are looking for a motivated Contract Associate Scientist to join our Discovery and Translational Immunology group to contribute to early discovery and pipeline programs of Cue Biopharma’s growing portfolio. Working closely with members of the group, the Contract Associate Scientist will also support, the efforts to investigate novel targets and Immuno-STAT™ _(Selective Targeting and Activation of T cells) _designs_._ This is a temporary, 6-month contract position with the opportunity for extension or conversion to a full-time position.
Key Responsibilities *
Isolation of human PBMCs from whole blood or leukopaks
Isolation of immune cell subsets from PBMCs
PBMC Immunophenotyping using multicolor flow cytometry staining
Screening donor PBMCs for reactivity against relevant epitopes for Cue’s programs using different methods including ELISPOT and p/MHC tetramer-staining by flow cytometry
Conduct experiments, accurately document in the notebook and inventory system daily
Effectively communicate data with project team, colleagues, and manager.
Contribute collaboratively to team efforts to achieve experimental and organizational goals.
Requirements*
B.S. in a relevant field with 2-4 years of related laboratory experience, or M.S. in a relevant field with 0-2 years of related laboratory experience.
Hands-on industry experience executing and documenting in vitro biology studies is preferred. Preference for experience with working with primary human immune cells.
Experience with multicolor flow cytometry / FACS-based immunophenotyping and/or ELISPOT; cellular immunology in vitro assays is highly desirable.
Scientifically rigorous, highly organized, and displays significant attention to details.
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Team and goal-oriented scientist with excellent oral and written communication skills who enjoys working in a fast-paced, small-company environment.
Job Type: Contract

Benefits:
Flexible Schedule
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
industry: 2 years (Preferred)
post-bachelor's degree: 3 years (Preferred)
post-master's degree: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.cuebiopharma.com/
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Cue Biopharma
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
323,Healthcare Data Terminologist – Veeva Data Cloud,$31k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Veeva, we build enterprise cloud technology that powers the biggest names in the pharmaceutical, biotech, consumer goods, chemical & cosmetics industries. Our customers make vaccines, life-saving medicines, and life-enhancing products that make a difference in everyday lives. Our technology has transformed these industries; enabling them to get critical products and services to market faster. Our core values, Do the Right Thing, Customer Success, Employee Success, and Speed, guide us as we make our customers more efficient and effective in everything they do.

As the Healthcare Data Terminologist on Veeva Data Cloud, you will help drive the design, build and execution of terminology libraries from the ground up for our new suite of Health Data Products. You’ll focus on understanding and improving existing sources, curating new assets, and identifying gaps in our data to drive continuous improvement.

You are passionate about healthcare data and terminologies, have a master’s degree or equivalent work experience in healthcare informatics, public health, and/or hands-on experience with organizing, curating, and managing health data ontologies and mappings. Ideally, you also have experience working with medication data, ontology management systems, and working in a corporate setting.

You are incredibly detail-oriented, sometimes called a perfectionist even, and care deeply about the quality of your work. You like to investigate, dig in, and find solutions to problems.

This is a great opportunity for someone who is passionate about health care data and excited to bring that knowledge to a scalable set of data products.


What You'll Do
Serve as a subject matter expert, support, and manage use of standard clinical terminologies (ex. ICD, CPT, HCPCS, NDC, NUCC Taxonomy codes, etc.)
Map between and across standard and proprietary terminologies
Own and operate an ontology/terminology management system
Work closely with Data Scientists, Developers, and Product Managers to design and build a systematic and scalable approach to managing reference data and mappings.
Stay up-to-date on current and emerging terminology
Understand the business needs and end users, and communicate changes and improvements to your “customers”
Design approach to quantify quality of terminology/reference data sources
Work in the details for ongoing clean-up and enrichment to drive continuous improvement
What You've Done
3+ years of experience working with healthcare terminologies
Knowledge of Industry Standard code sets such as ICD, CPT/HCPCS, NDC, RXNORM, and LOINC
Experience in managing medication terminologies
Experience with terminology management systems such as Wolters Kluwer HLI, Clinical Architecture’s Symedical, Apelon’s DTS, or similar
Experience with terminology browsers and authoring tools
Experience in (proprietary) concept creation based on accepted healthcare informatics and ontology practices
Proficient in SQL and Excel
Understand how relational databases work, and experience in designing transformations, mappings and working with reference tables
Energized by working through complex problems and bringing innovation to products
Detail oriented
Organized
Able to prioritize and self-discipline

Nice to Have
Hands-on experience working with raw healthcare data (ex. Medical or prescription claims data, EMR data)
Understanding of ETL processes
Experience working with an agile-based team
PharmD (or other clinical background)
Masters degree in a health informatics, health information management, or equivalent work experience
Perks & Benefits
Flexible PTO
Allocations for continuous learning & development
Health & wellness programs
Veeva’s headquarters is located in the San Francisco Bay Area with offices in more than 15 countries around the world.

Veeva is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, national origin or ancestry, age, disability, marital status, pregnancy, protected veteran status, protected genetic information, political affiliation, or any other characteristics protected by local laws, regulations, or ordinances.",3.3,"Crossix Solutions
3.3","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
324,Machine Learning Engineer,$118k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,"Kensho
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
325,Data Science Instructor,$121k-$196k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a skilled Data Science Instructor to support a fast paced, innovative project supporting our client in the field of data science and AI/Machine Learning.

Basic Qualifications:
SME skill level
15+ years of experience in data science or a related field
Ability to become familiar with current client priorities, programs and issues in order to adapt training programs to reflect changes in client mission, structure, regulations, or processes.
Excellent oral, written, and interpersonal communication skills
Outstanding facilitation skills to manage group processes and elicit student participation
Analytic and problem-solving skills
Demonstrated ability to apply structured analysis methods to various types of data to establish trends, determine variability, and diagnose the effect on training curricula.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Security Clearance:
An active TS/SCI w/Poly clearance

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,"Novetta
4.6","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
326,Data Scientist Associate Part time,$67k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualifications
Required:
• Currently pursuing a Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Analytics, or any other Quantitative discipline.
• Strong knowledge of and experience with databases (SQL, etc.) and strong programming knowledge in Python

Preferred:

• An interest in, and some exposure to, one or more of the following tools & techniques: SQL, Tableau, Alteryx, Natural Language Processing (NLP), Data processing and basic statistical methods
• Previous experience working with cloud-based data and analytics platforms, standard business intelligence dashboards, and data enrichment techniques
• Previous experience in developing and maintaining complex big data analytical solutions
• Proficiency in Machine Learning and Statistics algorithms and concepts (Mixed Models, Random Forest, Deep Learning, SVM, etc.)",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Whippany, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
327,Intern - Data Scientist- Summer,$68k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the North American Operations organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Scientist interns will have the potential to assist with transformational analytics projects to estimate expected benefits and/or design/execute a test plan to assess those benefits. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Conduct exploratory data analysis on relevant data sets
Assist with hypothesis testing
Develop to implement Objective deliverables
Field testing of proposed solutions
Present on final data analysis, conclusions and next steps
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in data science or related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
Analytical thinking – spot trends and anomalies within statistical data, to include using reporting and statistics tools
Mathematics skills – good understanding of basic accounting/financial practices, statistical analysis techniques, capacity planning strategies, forecasting algorithms, and other similar math skills
Experience with statistical and analytical tools (e.g., Microsoft Power BI, Excel, Access, SQL)
Experience with reporting and publishing tools (e.g., Microsoft Power Point, Visio, SharePoint, Teams)
Preferred Qualifications:
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Experience with machine learning and artificial intelligence
Computer skills – work with various software packages, from reporting tools to statistical applications. Strong job candidates will need to be able to quickly pick up new computer programs and use them efficiently
Report writing skills – have experience with preparing reports for multiple levels of the organization
Organization skills – ability to stay organized while working in dynamic environment where numerous projects occur at the same time is a must
Team collaboration – strong communication and interpersonal skills are needed to work as part of a team, coordinating closely with other departments within a company
Requisition #: 235239

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
328,Laboratory Scientist II,-1,"CanMedLabs brings a clinical culture that fosters a personal commitment to sound science and service excellence to the cannabis industry. Founded in 2018, CanMedLabs was the first Licensed Cannabis Testing Laboratory in Irvine, CA. While providing services throughout California, CanMedLabs is currently experiencing rapid expansion and growth.
Validation of analytical methods for high throughput testing
Assist Laboratory Director in method development and additional R&D activities
Perform calibrations and routine maintenance of analytical instrumentation as needed
Perform data review and data analysis utilizing validated analytical methods
Demonstrate proficiency in software from Shimadzu
Assist in workflow assessment and efficiency
Assist in training programs relating to analytical instrumentation and data analysis
Demonstrate ability to multitask and prioritize projects efficiently in a high throughput environment
Maintain a safe, clean, well-organized, and efficient laboratory work environment
Assist in maintaining SOPs and documentation required for compliance as needed
Assist in maintaining the laboratory for ISO accreditation standards, GLP and future audits
Requirements*:
Must be at least 21 years of age and possess either:
A doctoral degree in biological, chemical, agricultural, environmental, or related sciences from an accredited college or university,
A master’s degree in biological, chemical, agricultural, environmental, or related sciences from an accredited college or university, plus at least 2 years of full-time practical experience,
A bachelor’s degree in biological, chemical, agricultural, environmental, or related sciences from an accredited college or university, plus at least 4 years of full-time practical experience
Exceptional wet laboratory technique and ability to perform documentation for ISO standards.
At least 3 years of experience in a regulated or high throughput laboratory environment
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Method Development: 5 years (Preferred)
Chemist: 5 years (Required)
Wet Laboratory: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,CanMedLabs,"Sacramento, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
329,Data Engineer,-1,"Paige is a software company helping pathologists and clinicians make faster, more informed diagnostic and treatment decisions by mining decades of data from the world's experts in cancer care. We are leading a digital transformation in pathology by leveraging advanced Artificial Intelligence (AI) technology to create value for the oncology clinical team.

Paige is the first company to develop clinical grade AI tools for the pathologist, which resulted in our receiving FDA breakthrough designation for our first product.

We're seeking a Data Engineer who will be working the development and support of software applications, tools and data management pipelines for research and clinical purposes. Following modern product development practices, you will also assist in the design, implementation and maintenance of tools that extract and manipulate data from various sources, including in-house and external databases. This is an extraordinary opportunity to be part of a high-performing team and to pursue a life-changing mission with unique technical challenges!

This position can be fully remote for U.S. based applicants.

Responsibilities
Work on Data Warehouse, Data Lake and BI projects and architectures at Paige.
Create and implement ETL pipelines that enables the extraction, transformation and transfer of large amounts of structured and unstructured data from various filesystems and databases, that are destined for the development of computation pathology algorithms.
Handle the challenges that come with managing terabytes of data.
Build tools to manage, automate and monitor our data and data processing infrastructure.
Design and develop software tools into existing resources. Be responsible for design, coding, testing, packaging, debugging, documentation and deployment of software systems.
Work independently to produce required functional, technical, and user documentation (e.g., business requirements, functional and technical specifications, system architecture, data flows, end-users training requirements) on assigned projects.
Work and collaborate with data engineers, scientists, engineers, IT operations and medical doctors to build tools manipulating data in order to build a new generation of artificial intelligence applications for cancer detection and treatment.
Requirements
Experience in architecting, implementing and testing data processing pipelines (e.g. Spark, Beam, ...) and data mining / data science algorithms either on-premise or on a cloud environment.
Experience in administrating and ingesting data into standard data warehouses (e.g. Amazon Redshift, Microsoft SQL Server, Google BigQuery or Snowflake).
Experience architecting data warehouses and/or data lakes for large amounts of structured and unstructured data.
Experience with data lakes and expertise with designing and maintaining a BI solution.
Experience with workflow management tools and platforms, such as Airflow.
Extensive experience in Python programming, or related language.
Experience with RDBMS and NoSQL databases (e.g. MongoDB).
Experience in packaging and deploying applications on-premise and in the cloud (e.g. AWS).
Familiarity with modern development practices and DevOps.
Interest in building non-standard medical software applications, in collaboration with medical partners. Cross-disciplinary and strong analytic skills.
Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field, or equivalent years of experience.
3+ years of industry experience as a data engineer.",5.0,"Paige
5.0",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
330,"Computational Biologist / Data Scientist, Oncology",$98k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"15-Sep-2020

Job ID
302852BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""1 purpose...to reimagine medicine! Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research, Inc. (NIBR) is seeking a computational biologist / bioinformatics analyst to join the Novartis Oncology Data Science Team. Oncology Data Science provides computational biology expertise to NIBR Oncology, from target ID through clinical development, for both targeted and immune therapies. We apply cutting edge technologies and analytical approaches to elucidate the molecular basis for therapeutic response in individual cancer patients. Using sequencing data generated from thousands of Novartis oncology clinical trial samples, we bring hypotheses from biomarker discovery to bear on drug discovery and development.

We are seeking a highly motivated bioinformatics scientist to perform analysis of next-generation sequencing data (e.g bulk and single cell RNA-sequencing, tumor and cell-free DNA-sequencing) from clinical trial samples. The successful candidate will work collaboratively with computational biologists and clinical trial teams and will contribute to the interpretation of candidate biomarkers. Specific job responsibilities include:

•Supporting genomic biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Designing and performing analyses of genomic data (gene expression and genetic variation) and clinical variables to test and discover biomarkers for response and resistance to therapy
•Implementing and developing innovative analytical approaches with translational impact for clinical genomic data
•Providing biological interpretation of biomarkers
•Performing assessment of quality control metrics
•Communicating key findings and biological context to clinical trial teams

Posting Title
Computational Biologist / Data Scientist, Oncology",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
331,Principal Scientist,$104k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Johnson Matthey (‘JM’) is a global leader in science that enables a cleaner and healthier world. With over 200 years of sustained commitment to innovation and technological breakthroughs, we improve the function, performance and safety of our customers’ products. Our science has a global impact in areas such as low emission transport, pharmaceuticals, chemical processing and making the most efficient use of the planet’s natural resources. Today more than 14,000 Johnson Matthey professionals collaborate with our network of customers and partners to make a real difference to the world around us.

A manager and project leader position within the process research and development team. The Principal Scientist position requires an expert understanding of process development and scale up to enable the manufacturing of Active Pharmaceutical Ingredients (APIs) under cGMPs on larger scales in a safe and reliable manner through creating an understanding of how chemical processes work and how those chemical processes will translate from a laboratory to a manufacturing environment. Additionally, the Principal Scientist position is expected to oversee, grow, develop and performance manage more junior staff as well as serve as the lead scientist and mentor for multiple projects running in parallel.

Key Responsibilities

Expertise in designing appropriate plans to meet project goals within the required timeline and budget based on the clinical phase of development and intended scale of manufacture.
Mentors, leads, and advises team members in areas of scientific, regulatory, project management, client, and safety issues. Helps define appropriate performance and career objectives for direct reports and/or reports of direct reports.
Manages performance of team through coaching, feedback, career conversations and goal setting.
Routinely analyzes and defines problems, thoroughly examines relevant data, recognizes patterns, and draws valid conclusions.
Recommends potential courses of action to senior management by providing solid results, findings, and technical solutions to project issues / day to day problems.
Expert in independently synthesizing, purifying and analyzing intermediates and active pharmaceutical ingredients using a broad range of synthetic and analytical techniques.
Keeps accurate, legible and complete records of all experiments and observations.
Generates or edits written progress reports and clearly presents scientific results to clients and management.
Exhibits a full understanding of safety concepts and needs and conducts lab operations in a safe manner. Always holds others accountable for safe behavior in the work environment regardless of function or organizational level.
Multi-tasks responsibilities including: laboratory work, preparing scientific reports and documents, presenting scientific findings to clients and management, using scientific literature to solve advanced technical problems, interacting with other functional areas and performance managing team members.
Performs additional scientific tasks independently such as:
Continuous learning and growth in new scientific fields and/or cutting-edge technologies in major field of expertise.
Evaluates potential new projects or changes in scope from clients, creates project plans and delineates budget and timings to support business development team.
Shares special skills and expertise with other team members and departments such as Analytical Development, Quality Control, Quality Assurance, and Production groups.
Learns and follows all Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs).
Other duties as assigned.

Quality/Regulatory Responsibilities

Manages staff in full compliance with cGMP requirements.
Responsible for departmental audit readiness and for participating in quality audits with FDA and customers.
Ensures staff acts in accordance with Johnson Matthey quality policies and practices with respect to cGMP and other related requirements.
Manages compliance with state and federal regulations, including but not limited to GMP, DEA, and FDA.
Implements and applies cGMP concepts in association with department specific responsibilities.
Demonstrates technical expertise and self-assuredness in applying cGMP standards.

Environmental, Health, & Safety Responsibilities

Manages staff in full compliance with all appropriate EH&S policies and procedures.
Responsible for departmental audit readiness and for participating in audits with internal Company groups, regulatory agencies, and customers.
Ensures staff acts in accordance with EH&S policies, practices and procedures.
Addresses staff issues accordingly if there are EH&S violations.
Actively participates in root cause investigations on near misses and all incidents. Once identified, ensures corrective actions take place and compliance with Company policies and procedures, and all state and federal regulations occurs within the responsible department.
Manages compliance with state and federal regulations, including but not limited to EPA, DEP, and OSHA, etc.
Implements, applies and places emphasis on EH&S concepts with department specific responsibilities.
Demonstrated technical and procedural expertise and self-assuredness in applying EH&S policies and procedures.
Support the Company’s commitment for environmental health & safety by applying ISO 14001 and Sustainability 2025 principals into daily activities.

Physical Demands & Work Environment

While performing the duties of this job it is required to stand, walk, and use hands to operate objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands or arms; climb, balance, stoop, kneel, or crouch when necessary for job activity.
Specific vision abilities include: near, distance, peripheral, color perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
Regularly works with moving mechanical parts and may work with toxic or caustic chemicals. The work may be performed in humid areas with low or high temperatures.

Are you the ideal candidate?

PhD in Organic Chemistry or equivalent with 10-16 years of process development related experience in a pharmaceutical industry.
MS in Organic Chemistry or equivalent with 14-20 years of process development related experience in a pharmaceutical industry.
BS in Organic Chemistry or equivalent with 18-24 years of process development related experience in a pharmaceutical industry.
Ability to lead projects and provide direction to various levels of laboratory personnel
Ability to manage and develop direct reports to further their careers as well as manage through supervisors to develop the reports of direct reports
Ability to plan, organize, and oversee multiple independent development or production programs.
Ability to successfully work with interdepartmental teams.
Experienced in developing and optimizing synthetic routes and producing and/or scaling up intermediates and API processes.
Understanding of process safety concepts and how to incorporate them into process development plans to ensure processes are safe upon scale up.
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret English-language chemical periodicals, scientific journals, and regulatory documents.
Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Office.
Ability to define problems, collect relevant data, recognize patterns, and draw conclusions from disparate information streams.
Knowledge of analytical techniques (HPLC, GC, NMR, XRPD, DSC, KF, UV, LC-MS, PH meter).
Experienced in communicating to all levels of management.
Ability to write clear and concise technical reports and business correspondence.
Strong verbal and presentation skills.
Ability to work independently and in a team environment.
Demonstrated ability to exercise good judgment and make decisions in a timely manner.

Valued

Knowledge of MS Project. Experience in establishing integrated plans within resource and task constraints.
Experience reading and interpreting intellectual property.
Experience with Design of Experiments (DoE)",3.4,"Johnson Matthey
3.4","Devens, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1817,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
332,Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:

About us, but well be brief

We are thrilled to share that FORTUNE has named Experian one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For. In addition, for the last five years weve been name in the top 100 Worlds Most Innovative Companies by Forbes Magazine.

Experian DataLabs is a R&D unit at Experian formed with the desire to work in collaboration with Experians business units to enhance relationships with clients and acquire strategic datasets. Experian® is a global leader in providing information, analytical tools and marketing services to organizations and consumers to help manage the risk and reward of commercial and financial decisions. Using our comprehensive understanding of individuals, markets and economies, we help organizations find, develop and manage customer relationships to make their businesses more profitable.

What youll be doing
Leading research and development projects on machine learning and data analytics.
Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets
Identify/develop appropriate machine learning/deep learning/natural language understanding/natural language processing techniques to uncover the value of the data
Designing data structure and data storage schemes for efficient data manipulation and information retrieval
Developing tools for data processing and information retrieval
Developing data driven models to quantify the value of a given data set
Applying, developing and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems
Validating score performance and conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting model process and model performance
Qualification:

What your background looks like
Advanced degree in Machine Learning, Data Science, AI, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math or other quantitative fields
2-5 years of working experience in data science, and/or predictive modeling
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish
Ability to independently support existing products
Proven track record in modifying and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems
Experience in deep learning (CNN, RNN, LSTM, attention models, etc.), machine learning (SVM, GLM, boosting, random forest, etc.), graph models, and/or, reinforcement learning.
Experience with open source tools for deep learning and machine learning technology such as Keras, tensorflow, pytorch, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.
Proven ability to work independently on development of complex models with extremely large and complex data structures
Proficient in more than one of Python, R, Java, C++, or C
Experience in large data analysis using Spark (pySpark preferred)
Robust knowledge and experience with statistical methods
Plusses\:
Extensive knowledge of MATLAB and SQL
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as Map Reduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, mongoDB, Cassandra, etc.
Experience with online, mobile marketing analytics
Experience with GPU programming
Experience with Natural Language Processing, Natural Language Understanding, and the relevant open-source tools
Solid knowledge of Bayesian statistical inference and related machine learning methods.
Experience with Agile methods for software development
Perks
Three weeks of vacation to start, five sick days and two volunteer days (plus eleven paid holidays)
Competitive pay and comprehensive benefits package, with a bonus target of 20%
Flexible work schedule and relaxed dress code
EOE including Disability/Veteran",4.1,"Experian Information Solutions, Inc.
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
333,QC Scientist III FM BSD,-1,"QC Scientist III FM BSD

The Swiss based Bachem Group is a public, innovation-driven company specializing in the development and manufacturing of pepTides and oligonucleoTides. As a full service provider Bachem offers products for clinical development and commercial applications as well as a comprehensive catalog and exclusive custom synthesis. With 50 years of experience and subsidiaries in Switzerland, the United States, the United Kingdom and Japan, Bachem is the partner of choice for the biotech and pharma industry worldwide.
Bachem. Leading Partner in Tides

In order to continue our organic growth, we are constantly looking for talent.

Your Responsibilities

The Quality Control Scientist III function is to perform laboratory day-today operations, guide and

i interact with QC and department personnel to accomplish goals and objectives as directed by the

Director of Quality Control. Other duties include performing in-process testing, GC method validation,

raw material testing, and final product testing, QC documentation and related GMP activities.

Your Tasks
Maintain and perform daily operations of the QC department on a daily basis in coordination with the QC Director to include testing of in-process, raw material/peptide samples and prioritizing projects
Implement and maintain GMP procedures such as following SOP’s, Standard Testing Procedures (STP’s), written procedure and maintaining proper documentation as necessary for Quality Control
Maintain a cGMP quality level of work for the QC operations to include training, documentation and procedural work
Test and release in-process, and raw materials used in the manufacturing facility for GMP. Performing analytical testing and reviewing data for completeness and accuracy. Support method validation activities for in-process samples.
Receive, test and release final product peptide manufactured at Bachem
Write/revise specifications as necessary, performing analytical testing and reviewing data for completeness and accuracy
Write standard operating procedures, standard test procedures and other related GMP documentation
Perform QC analysis to include: GC, HPLC, Water, Mass Spec, UV, melting point, Optical Rotation, TLC and misc. wet chemistry lab work and other related
analytical equipment used for control quality of the GMP facility. This work may include calibration and validation of these methods
Control raw material used in the manufacturing facility for GMP to include receiving, quarantine, testing and QC release
Investigate any deviation or out of specification as necessary related to QC work performed as instructed by supervisor
Execute validations as necessary to include QC Analytical methods performed, other validations to support the quality of the manufacturing facility
Follow safety guidelines for handling, disposal and use for a peptide manufacturing company using toxic and/or large volumes of chemicals
Support validation, and stability testing activities as needed, documentation and quality GMP procedures


Your Profile
BS Degree in Chemistry or related field
Minimum of 8 years’ experience in the GMP industry
Experience with the use of analytical techniques/ instruments, such as, Gas Chromatography (GC), High Performance Liquid Chromatography (HPLC), Karl Fischer (KF), etc.
May work with hazardous materials and chemicals
Ability to train others in analytical methodology
Ability to take the technical lead working with other scientists
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Basic computer knowledge, including Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Ability to effectively organize, multitask, and work in a fast-paced, deadline driven work environment
Ability to communicate in a proactive and solution-focused manner, including keeping management aware of potential issues
Detail oriented with the ability to troubleshoot and resolve problems
Ability to work independently and manage one’s time
Communicate effectively and ability to function well in a team environment
May involve second shift testing activities
Flexibility of working hours based on business needs, may include some nights and occasional weekends
Preferred:
Experience with Peptides
Master’s degree in Chemistry or related field
Experience with use of Master Control


We Offer

You will be part of a motivated team overseeing the entire development cycle of respective APIs. If you are

looking for a new challenge and want to join a motivated team in an internationally renowned company,

you should seize this opportunity.

Nearest Major Market: San Diego",2.9,"Bachem
2.9","Vista, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
334,Geodetic Orbit Scientist,$56k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Geodetic Orbit Scientists monitor Global Navigation Satellite Systems, acquire and analyze satellite data, and produce accurate products for the National System for Geospatial-Intelligence (NSG). They develop, evaluate, and use algorithms and tools to provide integrity monitoring and determine precise ephemerides and other information. They analyze satellite ranging and timing information in order to identify anomalies in both real time and post-fit scenarios. These analysts handle technical and logistical details pertinent to remote command and control of a worldwide network of satellite tracking stations. They provide in-depth technical expertise on satellite issues to customers, and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS) Division is seeking a Geodetic Orbit Scientist. The GNSS Division has responsibility for a wide range of functions and tasks which require an understanding of satellites and their characteristics (hardware and software), orbital analysis, and geodetic sciences. Current functions include producing daily precise, rapid and predicted ephemerides for GPS satellites using data from NGA and United States Air Force (USAF) ground monitoring stations, as well as daily generation of Earth Orientation Prediction Parameters (EOPP), Defense Meteorological Satellite Program (DMSP) ephemeris, and GPS precise ephemeris data for Satellite Tracking (SATRAK) as needed. The Monitor Station Network Control Center (MSNCC) has responsibility for operating a worldwide GPS monitor station network, which is controlled via the MSNCC in St. Louis, MO and Springfield, VA. Data from our monitor stations is provided near realtime to the USAF for integrity monitoring and used in updating time and position information broadcast by GPS satellites. Daily GPS data in Receiver Independent Exchange (RINEX) format is also supplied to the International GNSS (Global Navigation Satellite System) Service (IGS). GNSS also generates a daily GPS precise ephemeris in batch production mode using Estimation and Prediction of Orbits and Clocks to High Accuracy (EPOCHA) software and is currently testing and evaluating a version of EPOCHA designed to provide near realtime 5-minute GPS precise ephemeris on a 24x7 basis. Band 3 Geodetic Orbit Scientists perform moderately difficult or complex assignments to monitor Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS), acquire and analyze satellite data, and produce accurate products for the GEOINT Enterprise. They develop, evaluate, and apply algorithms and tools to provide integrity monitoring and determine precise ephemerides and other information. They select and apply techniques and methods to analyze satellite ranging and timing information to identify anomalies in real-time and post-fit scenarios. They handle moderately complex technical and logistical details pertinent to remote command and control of a worldwide network of satellite tracking stations. These Geodetic Orbit Scientists also provide technical expertise on satellite issues to internal and external customers, and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy. OTHER REQUIREMENTS: The MSNCC is monitored 24x7 and shift work/rotations, within this position, may be required. Shift rotations may be required. Weekend and Holiday shifts may be required. Occasional travel may be required. Once employed with GNSS, the employee will be deemed Emergency Essential and will not be subject to facility closures or reporting delays; employee must report for duty on time due to shift and mission requirements. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Proven ability to communicate ongoing work to peer and leadership through written, visual, spoken reports, or briefings. 2. Demonstrated knowledge in computer and operating systems, computer networking and/ or database management. 3. Demonstrated ability of working in a team environment. 4. Demonstrated experience in scientific or statistical analysis. 5. Demonstrated ability to apply critical thinking to problem identification, analysis and resolution on challenging issues. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Astronomy, Computer Science, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geology, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Orbital Mechanics, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Surveying. Coursework must include differential and integral calculus. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in conducting work related to satellite operations, GPS surveying, Geodesy, Geophysics, Wide Area Network analysis, or a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENT: Distinguish principal colors and shades/hues of principal colors; Near visual acuity of 20/20 or better with or without corrective lenses; Far visual acuity of 20/60 or better binocular with or without corrective lenses

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Demonstrated knowledge with one or more of the following computer systems: MS Windows office applications, UNIX, UNIX scripting, FORTRAN, C, C++, STK, UML, MATLAB or MATHEMATICA. 2. Personal flexibility, and adaptability for shifts/ changes in crisis situations enabling the success enabling the successful handling of unforeseen challenges inherent to working in a high-visibility environment. 3. Demonstrated knowledge managing complex acquisition and/ or integration programs. 4. Demonstrated knowledge monitoring and /or analyzing satellite characteristics (hardware & software).

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $72,030 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $72,030.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
335,Intern - Data Analyst - Summer,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the North American Operations organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Analyst interns will have the potential to assist with business analytics for the field technician support and Consumer Delivery Support centers. The internship will take place in Monroe, LA or work from home from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Structure ambiguous problems
Design analytics to evaluate large data sets
Outline critical information
Create tailored models and dashboards
Perform ad-hoc analysis
Cross training across the team
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in computer science or related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
Experience with statistical and analytical tools (e.g., Athena/Presto, R, SAS, Python, Microsoft, Power BI, Tableau, Excel, Access, general database querying - SQL / MYSQL / ORACLE)
Experience with Data visualization and presentation tools (e.g., Microsoft Power Point, Visio, SharePoint)
Understanding of advanced mathematics and statistical concepts
Preferred Qualifications:
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Background in capacity planning or forecasting
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Experience with business Intelligence or machine learning techniques and tools (e.g., Netezza, OBIEE, Watson Explorer)
Experience with programming tools (e.g., XML, JavaScript, ETL frameworks)
Requisition #: 234983

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
336,Data Scientist - BI Developer,$56k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist - Business Intelligence Developer (DSBID) is responsible for planning, developing, implementing, and maintaining HFB’s data warehouse and business intelligence platform. The DSBID will plan solutions for existing problems. The DSBID is also responsible for building and maintaining connections to both on premise and online data sources, coding, testing, designing, and debugging. They will work with the Data team and users to identify and consume all data in the HFB environment.

Education/Experience

Bachelor’s degree or an equivalent combination of education, training, and experience. Experience with MS SQL BI Development and Administration. Experience with JavaScript and application engineering. Experience with R, Python, T-SQL, or other ETL scripting languages. Experience using Git for source control and CI/CD.

Skills/Abilities

Expert on Microsoft SQL Server and Business Intelligence Stack (SSRS, SSIS, SSAS and Power BI). Proficient designing and developing Relational and Dimensional data models. Proficient using T-SQL and DAX. Expert writing and troubleshooting store procedures and triggers. Strong interpersonal and communications skills. Capable of writing proposals or papers, acting as a vendor liaison and making presentations to professional peers",3.6,"Houston Food Bank
3.6","Houston, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
337,Scientist/Research Associate-Metabolic Engineering,-1,"*Our company:
*Conagen Inc. is a leader in cutting-edge bio-manufacturing. We engineer organisms to produce high-value molecules that are essential to our well-being. Our focus is on food, nutrition, pharmaceuticals, and renewable materials. We employ the latest synthetic biology tools to design metabolic pathways and produce safe and high-quality products. Science and innovation are the driving forces of our mission. We believe in a green future.
Location: Bedford, MA
Job Type: Full-time
Compensation: Commensurate with skills and experience
Job Description Overview:
We are currently seeking a scientist/research associate to support projects related to the identification and functional characterization of metabolic enzymes for metabolic pathway engineering projects. The candidate is expected to have a strong background in molecular biology, biochemistry, microbiology, metabolic engineering, and other related disciplines. Strong technical, organizational, and communication skills, as well as the ability to develop creative solutions to challenging problems, are essential.
Responsibility:
Routinely perform molecular biology techniques such as primer design, PCR, DNA and RNA extraction, DNA mutagenesis, DNA cloning, plasmid mini-prep, DNA and protein sequence analysis, cell transformation, cell culture, and other more advanced molecular biology techniques in support of metabolic engineering research projects.
Utilize sequence analysis software such as Geneious Primer and other basic bioinformatics tools.
Perform experiments for enzymatic activity testing including express proteins in E. coli and yeast, recombinant proteins purification; analyze expressed proteins by SDS-PAGE and/or Western Blot and in vitro/in vivo enzymatic assays.
Operate laboratory and experimental equipment such as spectrophotometers, centrifuges, HPLC, FPLC, LC/MS, and GC/MS.
Strain engineering to optimize the production of desired compounds and protein.
Optimize the cultivation condition and assays for strains screening
Work collaboratively with other team members to accomplish project goals and milestones.
Routinely track and document results in laboratory notebooks and databases.
Analyze, summarize, and present experimental results to team leader and other team members.
Qualification:
A Master's degree or a Ph.D. degree in metabolic engineering, chemical engineering, molecular biology, microbiology, biochemistry, or other related fields.
Strong background in metabolic engineering, molecular biology, genetics, protein engineering, and synthetic biology with experience in recombinant DNA technologies, protein analysis, enzymatic assays, and cell transformation.
Experience in the engineering of metabolic pathways in microbial hosts is highly preferred.
Familiarity with analytical techniques for metabolite detection such as spectrophotometers, HPLC, LC/MS, and GC/MS.
Familiarity with diverse software packages for data processing and statistical analysis, primer design and sequence blasting and alignment.
Must be highly motivated and able to work independently while also possessing exceptional communication and teamwork skills.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – and celebrate our employees’ differences, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.
*How to apply:
Cover letters and resumes will be accepted ONLY via email or Indeed.com.
Please do not contact the Company by phone until notified.
This position is not eligible for any type of visa sponsorship.
Job Type: Full-time
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Relocation assistance",3.5,"Conagen
3.5","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
338,Customer Service Analytics Manager,$17-$30 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Customer Service Analytics Manager
Milwaukee Branch
12355 Uline Way, Kenosha, WI 53144

Customer Service is the heartbeat of our company. We depend on our Call Center employees to serve our customers and fulfill our promise of reliability.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Manage the Customer Service analytics team, listening to recommendations and taking measures to maximize team effectiveness.
Provide leadership, training and coaching.
Evaluate business processes, developing and implementing solutions for improvements.
Create performance and success reports.
Build and maintain relationships with branch leadership to drive performance.
Act as a liaison between business and IT groups.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s degree.
5+ years experience in business analysis.
Experience leading and developing top-performing teams.
Experience in call center, warehouse, or supply chain environment.
Knowledge of data design, ETL process, data warehousing and SQL.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café and outdoor patio.
First-class fitness center.
Beautifully maintained walking trails.
Free chair massages.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Opportunities for community involvement.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-JF1
#CORP",3.6,"Uline
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
339,Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position is expected to interact with various functions within the company, including data analytics, science, engineering, and product. Attention to detail, intellectual curiosity, and clear technical communication are key for the success of this role.

Required Skills / Experience:
BA/BS in Computer Science, Physics, Applied Math, Agronomy, Engineering or a related quantitative discipline with at least a year of data analytics or data science experience.
Intermediate skill using Python (eg pandas, numpy, matplotlib / seaborn, etc.)
Intermediate skill using SQL or PySpark dataframe manipulations
Knowledgeable of version control, e.g. git
Detail oriented and capable of performing deep dives into datasets
Strong communication skills to solicit information from domain experts and present results back to a technical audience
Self starter as well as able to work as part of a team
Basic knowledge of predictive analytic techniques and statistics.

Desired Skills / Experience:
M.Sc. in an analytics field
Experience with exploratory Big Data discovery through the use of technologies such as PySpark
Experience with complex data formats and data of varying quality
Experience building data pipelines and interacting with APIs
Data storytelling with meaningful, interpretable visualizations
Knowledge of agricultural technology especially with regard to row crops
Curiosity and an open-mind towards unfamiliar data sources and unfamiliar quantitative domains",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
340,"Environmental - Geologist, Scientist or Engineer (CAMPUS)",-1,"Antea USA, Inc. (Antea®Group) is seeking motivated, detail-orientedgraduates for entry level Environmental Scientist, Geologist or Engineer roles forSpring 2021 opportunities in various office locations throughout the United States.

Qualified individuals must have strong organizational and communication skills (both verbal and written), and a desire to work in a fast-paced environment with a strong technical support team. This safety-sensitive position reports to a project manager and will support project teams on a variety of assignments including site remediation activities, technical and safety oversight of subcontractors, permitting, Phase I and Phase II Environmental Site Assessments, and health and safety audit support. Tasks will include preparing work and health and safety plans; conducting soil and groundwater investigations and sampling; remediation system operation and maintenance; data entry, management and analysis; and the preparation of reports in a variety of formats.

This is a full-time position with 70% - 80% of travel anticipated. This may require working alone in remote locations and/or out of state work supporting other company offices.

Antea®Group focuses strongly upon safety in all aspects of our operations, in the field, the office, and while traveling. The successful candidate must likewise consider safety as paramount and demonstrate an awareness of safe operations, and be willing to accommodate long or non-standard work hours on a project by project basis.

QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and Training
BS in Geology / Hydrogeology / Engineering / Environmental Sciences / Health and Safety or related major
Proficiency in Microsoft Word and Excel
Minimum 0– 3 years of applicable environmental experience
This position requires a 40-hour HAZWOPER OSHA certification. While current certification is desirable, it is not required to apply. HAZWOPER training will be provided upon employment if the successful candidate(s) is/are not already certified
Experience& Fundamental Skill Set
Strong mechanical, organizational and communication skills
Strong time, project task management, and decision-making skills
Able to work independently, troubleshoot mechanical issues and produce results with attention to details
Ability to multi-task with multiple project managers
Interest and motivation to diversify skill set
Familiarity with state and federal environmental regulatory framework
Potential employees must pass a company-paid physical examination, drug-screen and have a valid driver's license
Physical Requirements / Work Environment - Maintain physical condition appropriate to the performance of assigned duties and responsibilities, which may include the following:

Sedentary to light work (typical office or administrative work)
Frequently required to stand, sit and walk for extended periods of time
Occasional lifting and carrying of low (under 25lbs) to moderate (25-49lbs) weight objects
Repetitive motions: substantial movements (motions) of the wrists, hands, and/or fingers (including reaching)
Subject to inside environmental conditions (protection from weather conditions but not necessarily from temperature change)
Operation of a motor vehicle
Additionally, if you are assigned work in the field at client project sites you will need to complete a medical surveillance/fitness-for-duty examination and maintain physical condition appropriate to the performance of assigned duties and responsibilities which may include the following:

Medium to heavy work
Subject to outside environmental conditions: heat/cold, wind, wet and/or humid, etc.
Occasional stooping (bending body downward and forward), kneeling (bending legs at knee), crouching (bending body downward and forward) and climbing
Frequent lifting (including push/pull, hold/carry) of light, moderate and possibly heavy weight objects
Subject to hazards, including a variety of physical conditions, including but not limited to proximity to moving vehicles, parts or equipment; exposure to chemicals; pressure (including noise); electrical hazards; biological hazards; excavation/trenching; confined spaces; elevated work; materials handling
May be required to wear an air purifying respirator
Antea®Group offers competitive benefits including paid vacation, paid holidays and paid sick leave.

Antea USA, Inc. (Antea®Group) is an EEO/AA Employer

Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity and other protected categories

NO RECRUITERS PLEASE/NO VISA SPONSORSHIP AT THIS TIME",4.1,"Antea Group
4.1",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
341,Aviation Data Scientist,$81k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE performs leading-edge research and development toward transformational solutions to our world’s most challenging problems. Our Center for Advanced Aviation Systems Development is a Federally-Funded Research and Development Center (FFRDC) established to serve as strategic partners to the federal government and various aviation groups around the world. Our engineers, analysts, technical and operational experts team to solve problems in the public interest that improve the safety and efficiency of the airspace system in the U.S. and abroad. The Aviation Operations, Procedures & Safety division is seeking a highly qualified engineer to work in one of the following areas: Airspace and Procedure Design and Analysis; Airport and Airspace Analysis, Modeling and Design; Performance-Based Navigation Standards and Tools; and Aviation Safety Analysis. The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging the largest repository of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. Come join a globally recognized partner and resource for data driven solutions that impact public good. The candidate will be responsible for: - Contributing to various projects applying innovative analysis techniques across multiple challenging problems in the field of aviation. - Working closely with other engineers and scientists in the design of exploratory analyses or simulations pertaining to aviation issues. - Drawing conclusions from a wide range of aviation system data and articulating key findings in both written and verbal form. Developing data visualization products that simplify presentation of big data calculations. Qualifications: - Knowledge of programming/scripting languages (eg. Python, MATLAB, R, Perl) - Familiarity with statistical analysis packages (eg. SAS, JMP) - Familiarity with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Excellent written and verbal communication skills. In-person presentation and writing sample may be requested. - Experience with data visualization software (eg. Tableau, D3) - Knowledge of data processing capabilities (eg. Hadoop, Pig, Spark, SQL). Skill is desired, but not required - Experience working in the aviation domain: airport operation, air traffic control, airlines. Skill is desired, but not required BS or MS in Operations Research, Applied Mathematics/Statistics Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or other physical science/engineering

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
342,Data Scientist,$93k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"AIS has a workshare opportunity for a Data Scientist (TS/FSPOLY required) on a large, newly awarded contract. In this role you will develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of datasets; prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Produce data visualizations that provide insight into dataset structure and meaning
Work with subject matters experts (SMEs) to identify important information in raw data and
develop scripts that extract this information from a variety of data formats (e.g., SQL tables, structured metadata, network logs)
Incorporate SME input into feature vectors suitable for analytic development and testing
Translate customer qualitative analysis process and goals into quantitative formulations that are coded into software prototypes
Develop and implement statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive,
predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Develop experiments to collect data or models to simulate data when required data are unavailable
Develop feature vectors for input into machine learning algorithms
Identify the most appropriate algorithm for a given dataset and tune input and model parameters
Evaluate and validate the performance of analytics using standard techniques and metrics (e.g.cross-validation, ROC curves, confusion matrices)
Required Education, Experience and Skills
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline(e.g., statistics, mathematics, operations research, engineering, or computer science).
A Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline can be substituted for three years of experience
Five years of experience analyzing datasets and developing analytics.
Five years of experience programming with data analysis software such as R, Python, SAS, or MATLAB.
An additional two years of experience in software development, cloud development, analyzing datasets or developing descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics can be substituted for a Master's degree.
U.S. Citizenship Required
Must possess a TS/FSPOLY clearance
EOE/AA Disability/Veteran",4.3,"Assured Information Security, Inc. (AIS)
4.3","Fort Meade, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
343,Cloud Data Engineer,$53k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are!

At Maven Wave, we are relentless in hiring the industrys top talent. Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise. We are looking for this rare combination of talent that sets us apart in the industry.

Maven Wave helps leading companies make the shift to digital and shorten the fuse to innovation. We combine the expertise of top-tier consulting with the agility of a cutting-edge technology firm. This multidisciplinary blend of skills allows us to create unique digital advantages for our clients. Maven Waves digital solutions are agile, mobile, rooted in analytics, and built in the cloud.


Maven Wave, Google, and YOU: Help us build data driven cloud solutions.

We are looking for a skilled Cloud Data Engineer to design, build, and test data ingestion and ETL programs with a strong focus on performance and data quality management.

Your Life As a Maven:
Build and implement complex data solutions in the cloud (AWS, GCP and/or Microsoft).
Uncover and recommend remediations for data quality anomalies.
Investigate, recommend and implement data ingestion and ETL performance improvements.
Document data ingestion and ETL program designs, present findings, conduct peer code reviews.
Develop and execute test plans to validate code.
Your Expertise:
4+ years experience building complex ETL programs with Informatica, DataStage, Spark, Dataflow, etc.
3+ years experience in Python and/or Java, developing complex SQL queries, and working with relational database technologies.
Experience configuring big data solutions in a cloud environment (AWS, Azure or GCP).
Experience using cloud storage and computing technologies such as BigQuery, RedShift, or Snowflake.
Experience developing complex technical and ETL programs within a Hadoop ecosystem.
Must have a bachelors degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical thinker with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE, 2018
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work, 2017 & 2018
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Life as a Maven
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories",4.4,"Maven Wave Partners
4.4","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
344,Applied Research Scientist,$68k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for a stimulating company atmosphere where your efforts will have a significant impact on redefining the supply chain analytics market to fuel our company's success? Were driven by people who have a passion for technology and innovation; we are a fun, results-driven company that thrives on delivering value to customers and making a difference in the world leveraging our solutions. If this sounds like you, come join our herd!

At LLamasoft, our mission is to elevate lives and organizations through the science of smarter decision-making. Powered by AI and advanced analytics, our enterprise decision platform enables business leaders to solve problems in new ways and make smarter decisions faster as their business and operating models change. We are pioneering the use of a true digital twin of the extended supply chain combined with our powerful algorithms and deep supply chain, data engineering, AI and operational expertise. LLamasoft deploys decision solutions through enterprise ready apps, custom apps, and an extensible no-code App Studio.

The Role:

This is your chance to bring your passion for solving difficult problems to a fast-growing, dynamic, entrepreneurial team that is pushing the boundaries of Supply Chain logistics and optimization.

Job Description:
Design, develop, and test algorithms to solve supply chain transportation problems.
Take ownership of projects and drive them through to completion thoroughly and efficiently.
Work effectively with small teams in order to complete projects on time.
Understand key performance indices for solution quality and seek solutions to improve these metrics.
Support existing business applications for internal and external stakeholders.
Support development of LLamasoft commercial products to include components of LLamasofts flagship software product, Supply Chain Guru.
The Qualifications:
Graduate degree in Operations Research or Industrial Engineering (Ph.D. or significant experience required).
Solid background in mathematical optimization, inventory planning methods, transportation scheduling, and statistical demand forecasting / demand analysis methodologies will give preference.
Knowledge and experience with mathematical optimization methods in transportation planning and vehicle routing (required).
Experience with complex algorithmic development (Experience with optimization methods and algorithms highly desired).
A broad knowledge of the C# programming language or deep coding experience in other languages (C# preferred, coding skills required).
Experience with mathematical modeling systems and algebraic modeling languages (desirable)
About LLamasoft

Over 750 of the worlds most innovative companies rely on LLamasoft to design operational strategies to achieve profitability and growth goals. In addition to helping our customers identify billions of dollars in value, LLamasoft partners with humanitarian organizations, government entities and the World Economic Forum, using our solutions to design and optimize health supply chains around the globe in order to reach our goal of positively impacting 100 million lives by 2022.

LLamasoft is an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

If you require reasonable accommodation in completing this application, interviewing, or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please direct your inquiries to accommodation@llamasoft.com.

Powered by JazzHR",4.3,"LLamasoft
4.3","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
345,Data Engineer,-1,"At YETI, we believe that time spent outdoors matters more than ever and our gear can make that time extraordinary. When you work here, you'll have the opportunity to create exceptional, meaningful work and problem solve with innovative team members by your side. Together, you'll help our customers get the high-quality gear they need to make the most of their adventures. We are BUILT FOR THE WILD™.

The Data Engineer will be part of a team that designs and develops YETI's enterprise Data Warehouse and Analytic systems. This position offers an extremely rare and unique opportunity to join a highly profitable, fast-growing business.

Our needs are diverse and its certain that we will build and deploy software on various platforms including but not limited to Google Big Query and Tableau. While this position specifically seeks a Senior Developer, who will focus on implementing solutions in Google Cloud Environment, Google Dataflow, and Composer (Airflow), we strongly prefer candidates with a diversity of experience capable of working across more than one area.

This role requires a blend of skills typically found in the specialized roles of Business Analyst, Data Modeler, Data Analyst, and Cloud Administration. Additionally, an understanding of dynamic environments, agile development, and how to balance the need to maintain operations versus the need to build things the right way is an absolute must.

Responsibilities:
Work with business customers and data analysts to define detailed requirements from broader business challenges.
Translate those requirements to logical and physical models that satisfy analytical needs.
Perform data profiling and analysis to assess data quality patterns, recommend data cleansing rules, conforming data standard rules and matching algorithms.
Own the system architecture and infrastructure of our Google Could Data warehouse and other related GCP services.
Assist ETL and BI developers with complex query tuning and schema refinement.


Qualifications and Attributes:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related discipline
4+ years experience in the development of data warehouse, decision support, or executive information systems.
Expert in writing, analyzing and tuning complex SQL queries
Extensive experience with Python programming
Hands-on experience in any Cloud environment preferably GCP
Good understanding of Object-Oriented programming
Must have a good understanding of Dimensional Modeling and ER-Modeling.
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Airflow, Dataflow, etc.
Willing to work with new tools and learn new programming languages
Strong problem-solving ability and a positive attitude.
YETI is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

#LI-CL1",4.0,"YETI Coolers
4.0",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
346,Data Scientist,-1,"Company information*
Coverent is a specialized consulting services firm focused on developing innovative solutions to the most challenging problems facing our nation. We are growing quickly, but focused on maintaining our commitment to fantastic results and a fair, flexible, and fun culture:
Are you interested in working for a boutique firm who sees its employees as more than just a number?
Are you intrigued by the notion of joining a small team of talented, passionate consultants with a clear vision to help our clients achieve their missions better, smarter, faster?
Does a company culture that emphasizes outcomes, fairness, and flexibility sound appealing?
Would you like to be rewarded for your contributions, via programs like annual bonuses and company profit sharing?
Would you appreciate having a choice of options from top-notch benefit providers for medical and retirement plans?
Are you interested in a learning culture that is forward-leaning regarding training, education, and professional development?
If you answer YES to these questions, Coverent could be the employer of choice for you. Description of role

Coverent is seeking a Senior Data Science Consultant to lead program evaluation activities for a client in the US Intelligence Community. On this project, the Consultant will have the opportunity to demonstrate intellectual agility by leading data collection and data analysis activities to produce key performance insights. Furthermore, they will lead the implementation of recommendations when they are adopted by the customer. This project features the opportunity to interact with a wide range of key stakeholders, including those at senior levels. This is an exciting opportunity for an intellectually curious, energetic consultant to work on a project with real impact helping our client develop ways to understand and improve performance of activities that support delivery of the mission.
Responsibilities*
Consult with clients on the development, prioritization and implementation of process improvement and impact evaluations tasks.
Develop recommendations for changes to policy, processes, communications and training to enable achievement of vision. Develop and implement research designs with practical strategies for measuring performance of organizational units and/or unit activities to include development of performance measures and design of actionable methods for collecting and analyzing data, and implement strategies and refine as needed.
Perform a variety of research activities to include document reviews, structured interviews, and gap analyses, and involves stakeholder identification and logistical coordination for data collection activities and documentation of discussions.
Analyze both qualitative and quantitative information to provide customer with comprehensive insights into organizational strengths and challenge areas.
Prepare visual presentations of data and analysis.
Prepare reports and presentations for senior leadership based on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Brief senior level customers on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Requirements *
U.S. Citizenship
Active TS/SCI clearance w/ Poly
Must have a Bachelors degree ; Masters degree in business, social science, or behavioral science preferred
3+ years of experience in a consulting role in the IC
Experience extracting insights from social media data using data analysis techniques
Experience developing and implementing change management strategies
Demonstrated experience designing and implementing organizational or programmatic performance measurement strategies
Proven ability to analyze data and translate analysis into meaningful insights
General understanding of data coding, data integrity, and statistical sampling and analysis concepts
Experience developing presentations and providing briefings to middle and senior management
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including visual representation of data using charts and graphs
Advanced proficiency with MS Excel and PowerPoint
Ability to perform in an individual contributor role while also excelling in a team environment
Ability to analyze information and identify implications for policy, processes, communications and training
Demonstrated experience leading qualitative research and program evaluation activities to include experience leading structured interviews
Familiarity with industry-standard data science and visualization tools
Familiarity with advanced statistical concepts
Some knowledge of Python scripting
_Indeed Hire and Coverent are working together to find the best candidate for this job. _*
_*_
_*_*
_By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $140,000.00 - $185,000.00 per year

Experience:
extracting insights from social media data: 1 year (Required)
developing and implementing change management strategies: 1 year (Required)
analyze data and translate analysis into meaningful insights: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
TS/SCI clearance w/ Full Polygraph (Required)
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Other",4.3,"Coverent
4.3","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
347,"VP, Data Science",$180k-$286k (Glassdoor Est.),"Oversee a team of Data Scientists with overall responsibilities to analyze vast amounts of raw data to find patterns and build models that will help improve profitability, our customers’ experience, improve processes, and mitigate risks. Utilize your skills as an experienced Data Scientist to extract valuable business insights, and make real-time predictions to improve the profitability of our business or how our business operates.

Collaborate with business domain subject matter experts in various departments to understand the problem and the objectives.
Identify valuable data sources, and work with our IT team to collect such data.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Research and devise innovative statistical models for data analysis
Build predictive models, neural networks, and machine-learning algorithms
Combined models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Propose data science solutions and strategies to business problems
Ensure solutions are feasible to implement and achieve the objectives.
Manage a team of more junior data scientists working on various potentially unrelated problems.

BS in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Math or related discipline; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is desirable
Proven experience as a Data Scientist
Minimum 5 years of experience in data mining, machine learning, neural networks or other data science technique
Strong proficiency with R, SQL, and Python including the Tensorflow, Keras, and XGBoost libraries.
Experience with Excel and PowerPoint
Strong quantitative, math, and problem solving skills
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Strong business acumen and ability to interface effectively with executive management
Curious and creative mind that seeks continuous improvement
#LI-SB1",4.1,"PennyMac
4.1","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
348,Staff or Senior Machine Learning Scientist,$154k-$253k (Glassdoor Est.),"About iRhythm

iRhythm is a leading digital healthcare company focused on the way cardiac arrhythmias are clinically diagnosed by combining our wearable bio sensing technology with powerful cloud-based data analytics and machine- learning capabilities. Our goal is to be the leading provider of first-line ambulatory ECG monitoring for patients at risk for arrhythmias. iRhythm's continuous ambulatory monitoring has already put over 2 million patients and their doctors on a shorter path to what they both need – answers.

About this role

iRhythm is looking for a (Sr./Staff) Machine Learning Scientist to advance the company's during wear arrhythmia detection and cardiac insights algorithms. In this position you will play a key role in leveraging the vast iRhythm labeled ECG data set (2M+ records) to develop novel machine-learned algorithms. Furthermore, you will be contributing to the development of algorithms for the analysis of signals obtained from wearables and IoT devices.

Responsibilities
Design, build and test machine learning algorithms for the analysis of biosignal data from a variety of data sources, including wearables (e.g. ECG, PPG, accelerometry) and simulation of efficient signal transmissions over IoT devices.
Identify and apply advanced machine learning and statistical methods in both exploratory and confirmatory data analysis of multivariate clinical data sets, electronic health and claims records.
Participate in the design, development and maintenance of the Deep Learning infrastructure that fuels iRhythm's insights generation engine
Work closely with our software/firmware engineering teams and clinical experts to transition algorithms developed into production.
Present research findings to internal stakeholders, iRhythm leadership, as well as at industry conferences.


About You
Excellent understanding of Machine Learning/Deep Learning, statistical modeling and time-series analysis.
Strong understanding of signal processing concepts (Filtering, Fourier, and Wavelet transforms).
Experience with deep neural network architectures and software frameworks like TensorFlow.
Strong programming skills in Python and familiarity with python libraries like numpy, scikit-learn, pandas etc.
Experience working with large data sets and excellent knowledge of database languages (such as SQL)
Passion for materializing ideas that impact the lives of patients.
Effective presentation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to motivate others and provide focus on large collaborative and challenging goals and deadlines.
Demonstrated ability to interact with, and exert significant influence on internal/external collaborators on research/development objectives, methods, and results' interpretation
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics or a related quantitative field.
Additional desired/preferred qualifications include:
Previous research experience with biomedical data
Experience developing software in a Unix/Linux programming environment
Familiarity with cloud computing and big data technologies
What's in it for you:

This is a full-time position with competitive compensation package, excellent benefits including medical, dental and vision insurance (all of which start on your first day), paid holidays, and PTO!

iRhythm also provides additional benefits including 401K (with company match), an Employee Stock Purchase Plan, paid parental leave, pet insurance discount, Cultural Committee/Charity events, and so much more!

FLSA Status: Exempt

As a part of our core values, we ensure a diverse and inclusive workforce. We welcome and celebrate people of all backgrounds, experiences, skills and perspectives. iRhythm Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer (M/F/V/D). Pursuant to San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment all qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Make iRhythm your path forward.",3.2,"iRhythm
3.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
349,Pharmaceutical Data Analyst,-1,"Our Pharmaceutical client has engaged us to provide a Data Analyst contractor to support operational data analysis and support.

The ideal candidate:
Provides support to the organization in regards to the processing and validation of various Pharmaceutical data sources like IMS/iQVIA Prescription data (DDD, Xponent) utilized by field and home office personnel.
Responsible for the accurate integration of supplemental data sources, validation, and system monitoring. Provides integration support as it relates to the company's data warehouse, including product performance metrics, managed care information, customer profile information for use in incentive payouts, targeting, segmentation, and field reporting. Follows Standard Operation Procedures (SOP's) to assure quality assurance and timely delivery of information.
Responsible to initiate ad-hoc analysis to verify the accuracy of sales results when necessary. Partners with IT to develop necessary data integration processes that assure consistent and accurate tracking and reporting of sales metrics. Provides sales data and any relative insights to internal partners.
Partners closely with Information Technology and various vendors to ensure flawless implementation and execution of various business rules, processing procedures, and validation processes.
Work with Data Providers to capture and integrate sales data for use in internal deliverables such as Field Reporting, Incentive Compensation, Analysis, and Targeting.
Investigates and resolves data questions/inquiries from the field and internal partners. Creates solutions to data issues in a timely manner.
Monitor and execute needed weekly quality control checks for accurate and timely processing of data warehouse updates. Validates information to ensure it conforms to specification and within defined thresholds.
Communicates with sales management on data status, creation, and distribution of sales reports to field sales and in-house partners. Work with data suppliers to assure compliance in the timing, accuracy, and format of data received.
Requirements
Must have extensive experience with IMS Sales data packages and the pharmaceutical sales process
Project Management is a key factor; the candidate must feel comfortable working with people.
Must be organized and have the ability to present themselves to others
Competent in MS Excel, PowerPoint and Access and familiar with data warehouse environments.
Knowledge of data training methodologies preferred.
Candidates must have the ability to manage multiple priorities successfully and work independently while demonstrating initiative and strong analytical skills.
Experience with SAS and SQL and adept at manipulating and analyzing data through Access and Excel
Individual must work well in a dynamic environment and be able to recommend and implement process improvements and handle multiple projects simultaneously.
Excellent written and communication skills and demonstrated leadership experience is required.
Experience with system integrations/change management

Benefits

Company Description:

Keen360 is a Management Consulting firm that specializes in advising organizations to design Business strategies, develop operational efficiencies and deliver innovative solutions to achieve measurable results. Our projects range from pure design and development topics to more transverse transformation involving multiple business lines or regions.

]]>",5.0,"Keen360, Inc.
5.0","Horsham, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
350,Data Scientist,$102k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist The Data Science team works closely with our product, customer success, and sales teams; we work to make sure teams are asking the right questions and then find those answers. Our data informs us of the impact we are having on the world, and our team is crucial to architecting and building our data infrastructure. We also design and use data analysis tools that increase our data's scalability, accuracy, and accessibility. We understand our company's goals and proactively inform their direction with data so that our product can help more teams do great things. As a Data Scientist at Asana, you'll help us ask the right questions and answer them rigorously. You'll work closely with our Product and Business teams to understand their goals and proactively inform their direction with data. You'll keep taking on new responsibilities as you grow—from defining core metrics to building machine learning models and keeping the data flowing in our pipelines. What you'll achieve Designing and analyzing experiments to measure the impact of new product features Investigating high-level questions like ""What are the collaborative patterns of the most successful teams using Asana?"" Adding new metrics and aggregations to our data warehouse to make new classes of questions answerable Building models to predict the growth trajectory of different customer segments About you Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Engineering, a related quantitative field, or equivalent experience. 3+ years of experience in applying data science techniques to drive technical product development and decision-making Strong technical background in computer science, statistics, math, information science, or another quantitative field Fluency in at least one modern language useful for data processing (e.g. Python, Scala) Proficiency with relational data modeling and SQL Expertise in statistical methods and experimental design and analysis Experience with measurement techniques for search ranking/relevance/quality Experience with distributed data processing systems (e.g. Spark, Redshift) Background in advanced statistical modeling (e.g. GLM, mixed effects) and/or machine learning About us At Asana, we're building a better way to work, fueled by transparency, inclusion, and technology that is a force for positive change. Asana is a work management platform that helps teams orchestrate their work, from daily tasks to strategic initiatives, so they can move faster and accomplish more with less. For the past 5 years, we've been named a top workplace, including top 10 Great Place to Work Best Small & Medium Workplaces, #1 Fortune Best Workplaces in the Bay Area, #8 Fortune Best Workplaces for Women, and one of Ireland's Best Workplaces. With offices all over the world, we are always looking for curious, collaborative, and mission-driven people to help us enable the world's teams to work together effortlessly. We believe in supporting people to do their best work and thrive, and building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive company is core to our mission. Our goal is to ensure that Asana upholds an inclusive environment where all people feel that they are equally respected and valued, whether they are applying for an open position or working at the company. We welcome applicants of any educational background, gender identity and expression, sexual orientation, religion, ethnicity, age, citizenship, socioeconomic status, disability, and veteran status.",4.9,"Asana
4.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
351,Senior Data Engineer,$102k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Engineer

New York, NY

Who we are

DoubleVerify is the leading independent provider of marketing measurement software, data and analytics that authenticates the quality and effectiveness of digital media for the world's largest brands and media platforms. DV provides media transparency and accountability to deliver the highest level of impression quality for maximum advertising performance. Since 2008, DV has helped hundreds of Fortune 500 companies gain the most from their media spend by delivering best in class solutions across the digital ecosystem, helping to build a better industry. Learn more at www.doubleverify.com.



The Role

As a Senior Data Engineer, you own new initiatives, designs and build world-class platforms in order to measure and optimize ad performance. You ensure industry-leading scalability and reliability of mission-critical systems processing billions of real-time transactions a day. You apply state of the art technologies, frameworks, and strategies to address complex challenges with Big-Data processing and analytics.

What you'll do
Architect, design and build big data processing platforms handling tens of TBs/Day, serves thousands of clients and supports advanced analytic workloads
Explore the technological landscape for new ways of producing, processing, and analyzing data in order to gain insights into both our users and our product features
Design, develop, and test data-driven products, features, and APIs that scale
Continuously improve the quality of deliverables and SDLC processes
Operate production environments, investigate issues, assess their impact, and come up with feasible solutions.
Understand business needs and work with product owners to establish priorities
Bridge the gap between Business / Product requirements and technical details
Work in multi-functional agile teams with end-to-end responsibility for product development and delivery
Who you are
Lead by example - design, develop and deliver quality solutions.
Love what you do and are passionate about crafting clean code
Steady foundation with 5+ years of programming experience in coding, object-oriented design and/or functional programming
Deep understanding of distributed system technologies, standards, protocols
2+ years of experience working in distributed systems like Hadoop, Big Query, Spark, Kafka Eco System ( Kafka Connect, Kafka Streams), and building data pipelines at scale.
Hands-on experience building low latency, high-throughput APIs, and are comfortable using external APIs from platforms.
Excellent SQL query writing abilities and data understanding
Care about agile software processes, data-driven development, reliability, and responsible experimentation
Genuine desire to automate decision making, processes, and workflows
Experience working with dependency management tools such as Luigi/Airflow
Experience with DevOps domain - working with build servers, docker and containers clusters (kubernetes)
Experience in Mentoring and growing a diverse team of talented data engineers
B.S./M.S. in Computer Science or a related field
Excellent communication skills and a team player
Vertica or other columnar data stores
Google BigQuery
Spark Streaming or other live stream processing technology
Cloud environment, Google Cloud Platform
Container technologies - Docker / Kubernetes
Ad serving technologies and standards
Experience with Avro, Parquet, or ORC
Akka",3.6,"DoubleVerify
3.6","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
352,"Scientist, Pulmonary Biology Pharmacology - Lexington, MA, US",-1,"Company Overview

We are a leading mRNA therapeutics company developing a new class of potentially transformative medicines to treat diseases caused by protein or gene dysfunction. Using our proprietary mRNA therapeutic platform (MRT), we create mRNA that encodes functional proteins. Our mRNA is delivered to the target cell where the cell’s own machinery recognizes it and translates it, restoring or augmenting protein function to treat or prevent disease.

At Translate Bio, we’re also passionate about our five core values: Put People First, Be Approachable, Act as One, Be Tenacious, and Be Bold. These values embody our culture and underscore our mission to bring mRNA therapeutics to all.

Job Summary

Translate Bio is seeking an experienced Scientist to join our Pharmacology team. The individual in this role will contribute to drug development efforts at TBio, particularly focused on lung diseases with high unmet need, such as idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis, pulmonary arterial hypertension, primary ciliary dyskinesia, cystic fibrosis, asthma, COPD and acute lung injury. He/She will oversee early drug discovery and development in vivo pharmacology studies by contributing expertise in disease animal models.

Job Responsibilities

Provide technical expertise in generating genetic or chemically-induced pulmonary models with a clear understanding of model development
Design and oversee the execution of pharmacological studies in lung disease models by applying our proprietary platform
Manage externalized pharmacological studies at CROs by site evaluations, protocol establishment, execution of pharmacology studies
Conduct downstream analyses of samples with relevant assays at the bench pertaining to the disease model
Analyze data from in vivo pharmacology studies to inform decisions in a timely manner
Lead pharmacology and translational development roles on multi-disciplinary teams
Prepare reports and presentations of results from studies across the organization
Assume additional responsibilities as assigned

Required Skills & Qualifications

Ph.D. in molecular, cell/developmental, pharmacological sciences or similar with experience in lung physiology and pulmonary disease, plus 0-6 years post degree experience in academic or industry setting
Experience performing in vivo pharmacology studies in animal models of pulmonary diseases such as idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis, pulmonary arterial hypertension, primary ciliary dyskinesia, cystic fibrosis, asthma, COPD, and acute lung injury
Experienced in innate immunity of the lung strongly preferred
Expertise in different routes of lung administration preferred
Experience with precision cut lung slices (PCLS) a plus
Knowledge of downstream analytics for the relevant pulmonary disease indications
Demonstrated ability to define pharmacological requirements for selection of development candidates
Ability to work in cross-functional team environment to advance programs to and through translational development
Work collaboratively within a group as well as within interdisciplinary teams
Demonstrated successful experience in working with outside CROs
Manages time effectively demonstrating ability to perform multiple projects at one time
Desire to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent organizational and communication skills
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Translate Bio is committed to equal employment opportunity. All applicants must have authorization to work in the U.S.",5.0,"Translate Bio
5.0","Lexington, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
353,SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS,$67k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The Intelligent Systems Division develops automated solutions for commercial and government clients in multiple domains including transportation (traffic management, connected automated vehicle), manufacturing robotics, medical prognostics and communication standards.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as a software developer and researcher on a team developing software solutions in technology areas such as Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), Integrated Corridor Management Systems (ICMS), and Decision Support Systems (DSS)
Initiate advanced research and development programs

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Utilize advanced data analytics techniques and enterprise data infrastructure skills in state-of-the-art software development environments
Perform in all phases of the development lifecycle, including requirements definition, software/systems design, implementation, testing, and integration
Interact with clients and conduct technical presentations.

Requirements:


Requires a Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering or Computer Science or related
7 years of experience with an emphasis on software development and systems engineering and exposure to object-oriented programming (programming languages such as, but not limited to, C++, C#, Java)
Education and/or experience involving one or multiple of the following: .NET, C#, Java, JavaScript, C++, Python, WPF, Git, Microsoft SQL Server, Windows, Linux, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Elastic Stack, TypeScript, HTML, CSS, Angular, Kafka, AWS, Azure, GCP
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to work well individually and as a member of a project team are required
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
354,Big Data Engineer II,$91k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position:
Big Data Engineer II

Job Description:

Arrow Electronics is currently seeking a Big Data Engineer II to work in our Arrow Digital division at our global headquarters in Centennial, CO!

What You'll Be Doing

Understand business requirements and provide suitable design.
Design, implement and maintain production level data pipeline across various data sources.
Ability to quickly prototype a solution to prove out the technical feasibility and business value.
Scale up prototypes (ETL/ML model/services) from end-to-end using relevant technologies.
Test and monitor to ensure product quality to live up to the business SLA.
Diagnose, debug and fix existing workflows and applications.
Research and learn new tools and frameworks.
Technical documentation.

What We're Looking For

Greater than 8 years of working experience and more than 4 years in relevant field.
Minimum of 2-5 years of experience working with Big Data: Hadoop, Cloudera (CDH), Spark Hive, Impala, HBase, etc.
Strong programming experience in any of the following language Python/Java.
Must have a strong command of SQL.
Must have good working knowledge of Unix file system and shell scripting.
Strong communication verbal and written skill.
Greater than 2 years working experience with CDH.
Hands-on experience working with popular big data frameworks listed below, like Hadoop/Spark/Hive/Impala/HBase and others.
Experience operating under an agile work environment.
Experience in designing and implementing scalable RESTful APIs.

Even Better if You Have

Experience with production level machine learning applications (training/inferencing/deployment).
Basic understanding of machine learning techniques and models.

What We Offer at Arrow

At Arrow, we are driving innovation and choice by offering employees a variety of benefits designed to keep you and your family physically and financially healthy.

Not only do we offer a competitive salary and work-life balance, we offer benefits to match your needs:

Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance
401k, With Matching Contributions
Paid Time Off
Health Savings Account (HSA)/Health Reimbursement Account (HRA) Options
Growth Opportunities
Short-Term/Long-Term Disability Insurance
Discounted RTD Passes, with convenient office location off RTD Light Rail (Dry Creek Exit)
On-site Café with Catering Option for Busy Lifestyles (availability subject to COVID-19 office guidelines)
24/7/365 On-site Gym and Lockers, Free for Use to All Employees! (availability subject to COVID-19 office guidelines)
Free covered parking, included bicycle and motorcycle parking
And more!

Arrow is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status. (Arrow EEO/AAP policy)

Location:
US-CO-Denver, Colorado (Panorama Arrow Building)

Time Type:
Full time

Job Category:
Information Technology",2.9,"Arrow Electronics
2.9","Centennial, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1935,Company - Public,Wholesale,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
355,Data Scientist,-1,"Phreesia is looking for an experienced and hands-on Data Scientist to join our growing Data Science Team; someone with extraordinary analytical and technical skills who is familiar with the entire lifecycle of a data science project, from data exploration, modeling and analysis, to model selection, validation, evaluation, and deployment.

You will be joining a team of especially smart, humorous, quick-witted, and dedicated coworkers, all passionate about data and improving patient access to healthcare. You will be responsible for building data products for internal consumption, near real-time business intelligence tools, and predictive models. We are looking for someone experienced in partnering with business stakeholders, translating their needs into technical solutions and answers, and then building and delivering those solutions. This role will report directly to the Associate Director of Data Science.

What You'll Do:
Leverage Phreesia's massive and ever-growing dataset to build data products that provide actionable business insights
Optimize targeted engagement strategies through modeling, forecasting, and evaluation
Develop methods to efficiently classify and characterize patient populations
Navigate and use diverse machine learning stacks in Python and R
Use NLP techniques to parse, process, and structure textual data
Quickly prototype ideas and solve complex problems by adapting creative approaches
Build customized dashboards for internal and external clients
Take ownership of data products and ensure they are properly tracked throughout their lifecycle
Write clean, well-tested, code that will stand the test of time
Be an expert communicator: you could summarize your daily progress in a tweet
What You'll Bring:
2+ years of experience in an operational Data Science role.
Professional command of Data Science and Machine Learning toolsets such as Python (Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Scikit-learn), R (dplyr, tidyverse, ggplot).
MS/MA in a quantitative field such as data science, computer science, engineering, mathematics, statistics, computational linguistics, physics, or relevant equivalent professional experience
Experience in using statistical principles to inform decision making (experimental design, significance tests, a/b testing)
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both written and verbal
Ability to organize, visualize, and present complex data in a way that tells a compelling story and drives decision making
Strong SQL skills
Experience contributing professional-level code using version control
Nice to Have:
Experience using web frameworks such as Python flask or R shiny
Experience in collaborating with Data Scientists and Data Engineers to propose, test, validate, evaluate, and deploy Machine Learning models
Experience using Apache Spark
Experience using Graph and/or search Databases (e.g. neo4j, elasticsearch)
Healthcare experience and a basic understanding of clinical terms
Who We Are:

At Phreesia, we're committed to helping healthcare organizations succeed in a fast-changing landscape—and we need smart, passionate people to help us do it. Our innovative SaaS platform offers our clients a suite of applications to manage the intake process, giving them the tools to engage patients, improve efficiency, optimize staffing and enhance clinical care.

Basically, what you do here matters, and hard work does not go unnoticed. Not only does Phreesia care about our clients, we also care about our employees. In fact, we're a three-time winner of Modern Healthcare magazine's Best Places to Work in Healthcare award. If you're interested in consistent feedback and recognition, defined career paths, and the opportunity to work with driven and engaged colleagues in a dynamic industry, this may be the right opportunity for you.

Benefits and Perks:
Variety of health plan options, dental/ vision coverage, and short/long-term and life insurance plans
401(k) savings plan
Flexible working hours
Unlimited vacation
Home office set up
Mobile phone stipends and internet reimbursement
Fitness reimbursement
100% paid maternity leave to our U.S. employees, as well as a generous maternity benefit to our employees in Canada.
Tuition and certification reimbursement, as well as other professional development opportunities
We strive to provide a diverse and inclusive environment and are an equal opportunity employer.",3.7,"Phreesia
3.7",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
356,"Research Associate/Scientist, Protein Kinase Assays",-1,"AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc., has an exciting Life Science opportunity to join our rapidly growing team developing novel *Protein Kinase* activity assays and offering Custom Testing Services that enable our clients. Our innovative fluorescence-based sensor technology is exclusively licensed from MIT.
Minimum Requirements*
Bachelor's or advanced degree in biology, chemistry, biochemistry, etc.
Highly motivated and self driven - Thrive in a fast-paced and interdependent working environment
3+ years hands-on experience developing or using quantitative microtiter plate-based assay formats.
Excellent technique including small volume dispensing and attention to detail.
Ability to master new techniques, find solutions and effectively multitask to achieve goals efficiently.
Strong computer skills including Microsoft Office/Access and scientific/data analysis software.
Demonstrated organizational, documentation and oral communication skills with ability to work independently and as a team.
Preferred Skills & Experience - The ideal candidate should have mastered one or more: *
Practical knowledge of fluorescence-based activity assays to assess enzyme kinetics and drug potency.
Familiarity with modern automation instrumentation and software for drug discovery assays.
About Us: *
AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc. (www.assayquant.com; full web site being finalized) is located in Marlborough, MA near I90 & I495 in MetroWest. We are a rapidly growing USA-based provider of innovative Life Science products and services to enable biomedical discovery and drug development. AssayQuant® is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) and strongly supports diversity in the workplace.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
10 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We have been operational during the pandemic. We follow CDC/WHO guidelines and are able to physically distance at work and wear masks when in close proximity to others. We have not experienced any interruptions in delivering our products and services.

Experience:
running microtiter plate assays: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
What are 3 key reasons why you think we should hire you?
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.assayquant.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,AssayQuant Technologies,"Marlboro, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
357,Formulation Scientist,-1,"*Vici Health Sciences is a Pharmaceutical R&D company focused on developing products to serve unmet patient and doctor needs. We develop innovative formulations, analytical test methods and manufacturing processes for oral, sterile injectable and ophthalmic dosage forms. As a growing company, work is fast-paced, challenging, and exciting. The ideal candidate will have a degree in Pharmaceutics, Chemical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Chemistry or a related field and at least 6-months experience in industry or research experience in academic labs. * *Working under more senior scientists, the selected candidate would: * *- Be trained under various formulation techniques to manufacture pharmaceutical tablets, capsules, injections, and ophthalmic products.* *- Once trained, independently manufacture small-scale R&D formulations per written protocols.* *- Author batch manufacturing protocols and records.* *- Tabulate or plot test data, help interpret data, and design subsequent experiments with senior scientists.* *- Maintain all data associated with projects including reports, spreadsheets, and presentations.* *- Maintain a clean and orderly working environment.* *- Care for and maintain multiple formulation development related equipment such as tablet presses, tablet coaters, blenders, granulators, fluid bed coaters, and isolators.* *- Participate in the overall maintenance and enhancement of company systems.* *Job Type: Full-time* Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * Dental insurance * Health insurance * Paid time off Schedule: * Monday to Friday COVID-19 considerations: We are an essential business and remain open during the COVID-19 pandemic. We have PPE available for use by our employees and travel requirements, if any, are very limited. Education: * Bachelor's (Preferred) Experience: * Laboratory Experience: 1 year (Preferred) This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is: * Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous This Company Describes Its Culture as: * Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused * Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented * Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative Company's website: * https://www.vicihealthsciences.com/ Benefit Conditions: * Only full-time employees eligible Work Remotely: * No",4.0,"Vici Health Sciences LLC
4.0","Elkridge, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
358,Data Scientist,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist


Boston MA,

Houston TX

2021 vacancies open now. We are looking for the best science, mathematics and engineering graduates and postgraduates to join us and help solve the complex, real-world challenges faced by industry-leading companies at the forefront of science and technology.

You will have the opportunity to apply the knowledge you have gained during your studies and use a range of skills to create, develop and deliver solutions that truly make a difference in the world.

The Role


You will help our clients solve a variety of science and engineering problems. Projects can span a range of activities and your responsibilities will include:
Combining domain knowledge and technical skills to understand and solve the complex challenges facing our clients.
Using data science, analytics and a variety of analytical, statistical or machine learning techniques to interpret client data, helping them to make better-informed business decisions.
Designing and developing custom software solutions or tools (e.g. visualization).
Building strong relationships, communicating and collaborating with clients and colleagues.
Our projects are exciting and rewarding and provide plenty of opportunities to learn and develop. You will be assigned to projects based on your existing skills and experience, but you will also learn new domains and technologies and apply innovative thinking and transferable skills to solve new challenges.

Requirements
Bachelors, Masters or PhD in science, engineering or math.
The ability to interpret complex data using a variety of analytical, statistical or machine learning techniques.
Software underpins many of the solutions we provide, so you need to have some programming skills. We do not expect you to be an expert, but a good grounding in one of our core languages is required: Java, Python, C, C#, C++, R, Matlab.
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to explain complex concepts to clients and colleagues from all backgrounds.
The eagerness and capacity to quickly learn new domains and technologies.
Career Development and Training


We offer excellent future prospects. While we do offer traditional career paths, most staff end up shaping their own based on their aspirations, the skills they have developed and the projects they have worked on. As your career progresses, you will be able to contribute to projects in a variety of roles, from Data Scientist and Software Developer to Business Analyst and Project Manager, or any combination of these. We take personal development seriously and all staff receive an annual training allowance of 150 hours, which can be used to learn new technical and soft skills, often leading to recognized professional qualifications.

Apply Now

About Tessella


Tessella is one of the world’s leading data science and AI consultancies. We have developed a reputation for helping clients solve their most complex technical challenges by unlocking the power of their data, enabling better-informed business decisions.

Our work is at the cutting-edge of high-tech R&D and our projects are varied and rewarding. For example, in pharmaceutical companies we solve computational problems for chemists at the early stages of drug discovery and development, ultimately getting drugs to market faster. We help consumer goods companies model and simulate new product ideas and perform data analysis to improve their processes. We also support oil and gas engineers with the computational challenges of exploration and production, from reservoir modelling to writing control systems. In space and defense, we have written algorithms and solved complex mathematical problems to control satellites and radar systems.",3.6,"Tessella
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1980,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
359,Data Scientist,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist
Mountain ViewR&D - Machine learningExperienced
Responsibilities
Are you ready to take your career to the next level with a move to a fast-paced, audacious company and massive impact to the business productivity and collaboration space using the latest technologies? If yes, this is an opportunity of a lifetime!

What you'll do:
Team up with engineers to design learning solutions.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Create custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Partner with international stakeholders in different time zones
Qualifications
- BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with 2+ years of work experience
2+ years of industry experience in predictive analytics and/or statistical modeling role
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and analytical tools (e.g. Hive, Spark)
Proficiency in scripting languages (SQL, Python, R, etc.)
Experience working with international partners in different time zones
Apply
Share to",3.9,"ByteDance
3.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
360,EUV Staff Controls Systems Scientist,$98k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction ASML US brings together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, the Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler Arizona, San Jose and San Diego California, Wilton Connecticut, and Hillsboro Oregon. This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with applicants who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology. Job Mission We are presenting you with a unique and exciting opportunity to join a dynamic and innovative Technology Development team, focused on conceiving and demonstrating the technologies required for next generations of high-power extreme ultraviolet (EUV) light sources. Based on a laser produced plasma (LPP), our light source relies on a wide range of unique and challenging technologies, ranging from laser light amplification and high-power optical systems to laser produced plasma for EUV generation, electro-optical signal detection and algorithm-based actuation for process control. You are invited to bring your passion, knowledge and expertise in areas of applied physics, plasmas, metrology, optics, controls, lasers, and experiment design to push the boundaries of these technologies forward. In this role, you will advance the EUV control system architecture for next generation products. You will be invited to join the research team responsible for increasing Power and Dose of the next generation EUV product. You will interface with software teams, laser teams and plasma scientists working together to scale EUV power and stability. The team executes full scale architecture performance demonstrations, where the controls system is the heart of the EUV source. We are looking for someone who has the capability and drive to understand and push the existing technology forward into the future. Job Description Responsibilities A controls scientist who can conduct research experiments designed to provide recommendations to product team that guide development of EUV source controls architecture. Provide metrology, actuation, and stabilization design guidelines, performance requirements and procedures to product teams More specifically, development laser to target control systems that allow for specific techniques for actuation, stabilization (both passive and active), and control in order to improve the EUV generation process Identification of key scientific learning objectives and corresponding experimental design which will further the technological progress of the EUV generation process Demonstration of system-wide performance targets to meet the future technology roadmap Plan, develop and execute system and subsystem performance tests, analyze test results and extract actionable knowledge from sub-module to full-system levels Document learning and communicate knowledge to engineering and product development teams to guide product improvement and release of new product nodes Work independently and in teams to deliver on a stated objective, whether it be the pursuit of new knowledge, the demonstration of a new capability, or the characterization of existing performance Education PhD or MS degree with a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in controls, software, plasma science engineering, photonics or equivalent fields. Experience Hands-on experience with complex system design and build, characterization, and troubleshooting Deep understanding of control theory with educational experience Deep understanding of scientific research methods and strong curiosity Must be proficient to read/write software codes, C++, Python or Matlab, although writing software will not be a major part of this job. It may be necessary to dive into a related problem or to understand or test aspects of the controls system. Ability to clearly and logically communicate ideas and knowledge to various audiences Extensive experience with experimental data analysis and development of data analysis tools with, for instance, Matlab or Python and data acquisition systems such as NI Labview The successful candidate will not only have excelled in their technical field, but will have demonstrated inter-personal and communications strengths Practical experience with breadth of metrology techniques and system design, including laser produced plasma systems High-precision optical metrology development, including associated high-speed data acquisition and integration with control system functionality Demonstrated ability to manage and lead a research project involving multiple stakeholders and constraints Demonstrated ability to work effectively as a part of a team and lead investigation and research efforts Other information PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. The employee is occasionally required to move around the campus. The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. May require travel dependent on business needs. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. Can work under deadlines. The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level. Must be able to read and interpret data, information, and documents. Can observe and respond to people and situations and interact with others encountered in the course of work. Can learn and apply new information or skills. Responsibilities include periodic travel to regional and overseas sites for product technical support and special support projects. Work may include onsite technical support involving heavy lifting of equipment & modules. Position will require technical work activity in a clean-room production environment and/or laboratory setting. The environment generally is moderate in temperature and noise level. Occasionally may be exposed to loud noise bursts and may be exposed to toxic gases (fluorine). Must be able to work in small, confined spaces. EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability",3.9,"ASML
3.9","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
361,"Senior Product Manager, Data & Analytics Platform",-1,"The Senior Product Manager, Data & Analytics Platform position presents an opportunity for a talented scientist with business acumen to leverage his or her scientific expertise while leading our P&L-focused Product Management function for the pharma discovery research segment across the globe.

Built over twenty years on one of the worlds largest collection of human genomes, Genuity Sciences data & analytics platform powers the most innovative precision medicine efforts to redefine the early discovery process to identify genetically validated targets. The customers we serve cover a broad spectrum, including clinicians, data scientists, bioinformaticians and geneticists across the biotech and pharmaceutical industries.

This person will drive the vision for our portfolio of research software and advanced analytics product offerings using large scale cohorts of genomic data for target and biomarker discovery. The Product Manager must develop a comprehensive understanding of the product´s technology and capabilities, as well as deep insights into the market for the product. This person must be the voice of the user, design the product to maximize business value, be responsible for energizing the company to support the product vision, and build and execute against actionable plans to realize that vision. The main goal of this role is to drive adoption of the data & analytics platform.

Essential Functions:
Develop the vision for a product and build actionable strategic plans and detailed roadmaps for development, delivery and continuous improvement of the product. Inspire all other stakeholders in the company to support and drive towards the product vision.
Lead with influence and coordinate cross-functional teams to implement strategic action plans and detailed roadmaps and work closely with team leads to set goals and timelines, assign actions, track budgets and undertake project planning.
Collaborate with marketing and business development teams to analyse the market for potential products and provide ongoing market monitoring including competitor landscape, market dynamics and customer segments.
Define pricing strategy, product messaging, positioning and configuration in collaboration with finance, commercial, marketing, IT and product development teams to ensure business goals, regulatory compliance and other considerations that may constrain or impact the maximization of the product´s business value are taken into account.
Passionate about outside-in, market-driven, and user-driven decision-making, this individual will focus on collaboration with customers, product, application science and key opinion leaders to develop proof-of-concept data and penetrating key application areas
Collaborate closely with the product development teams (software, research and application science as relevant) to assess product feasibility and execute the product development.
Brief and engage senior management on the product vision, investment priorities and road map status.
Act as the chief evangelist for the product portfolio
Required Education and Experience:
Bachelors degree in Informatics, Bioinformatics, Genetics, or related life science.
Minimum 5 years of experience working within the healthcare industry in the field of bioinformatics, bio-statistics, or genetic sciences.
Minimum 2 years of experience in product management for NGS data, analytics or data analysis software platform.
Customer focused with a deep understanding and command of oncology and other disease areas. Intimate knowledge of customer requirements and competitive offerings.
Ability to effectively communicate value proposition and technical information to a range of customer and internal audiences required.
A strategic thinker with excellent analytical and organizational skills who can drive the translation of strategy into execution with direct and cross functional teams.
Demonstrated ability to collaborate and lead effectively with sales and marketing professionals, technology leaders, product development leaders, and other key stakeholders.
Preferred Education and Experience:
Masters or doctorates degree in Informatics, Bioinformatics, Genetics, or related life science.
Experience working within the research & development organizations in the pharmaceutical industry, in particular translational research functions, strongly preferred.
Experience in working with international customers and stakeholders is a plus.
Additional Eligibility Qualifications:
Ability to get things done by influencing and inspiring others.
Commercial awareness, interpersonal and negotiating skills.
Excellent communication, planning and organizational skills.
Ability to effectively communicate value proposition and technical information to a range of customer and internal audiences required.
Ability to work independently.
Ability to negotiate and liaise with stakeholders across the organization.
The willingness to take risks and fail fast.",4.0,"Genuity Science
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
362,Data Scientist,$88k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:

The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual who likes to work in a multi-disciplinary team. The Data Scientist will be instrumental in the analysis and interpretation of high-throughput molecular data. Additionally, the individual in this role should have solid Data Science background and be strongly goal-oriented with a focus on real-world impact.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Statistical and bioinformatics analyses of high-throughput molecular data
Interaction with internal and external collaborators to understand, design, and develop the requested solutions
Development and execution of data analysis protocols to support the company's discovery pipeline
Presentation of scientific results internally and externally
Preparation and submission of scientific manuscripts for review and publication
Other duties as assigned
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Sciences or related field with 0-3 years of experience; or an MS with 5-7 years of industry experience
Proficiency in R is required. Experience in Bioconductor is preferred
Experience in Linux and Big Data technologies
Experience in Scala, C, Python and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with Graph Neural Networks (GNNs) is a plus
Proven ability to find creative and practical solutions to complex problems
Proven experience in applying Data Science methodologies to extract, process, and transform data from multiple sources
Proven ability to deliver outputs in a comprehensive format that highlights major trends, avoid miss-interpretations and value the conclusions
Proven ability to demonstrate attention to detail and record-keeping
Quick learner, extremely flexible and adaptable to the needs of internal collaborators in a dynamic environment
Ability to efficiently work in multiple projects
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team-oriented environment",4.2,"Berg Health
4.2","Framingham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
363,Sr Data Scientist,$106k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Neustar is an information services and technology company and a leader in identity resolution providing the data and technology that enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most. More information is available at https://www.home.neustar.
Job Requisition:
R-3226 Sr Data Scientist (Open)
Primary Location:
LOS ANGELES
Job Description:
Job Description
Who are we?
As a company built on the foundation of Privacy by Design, for more than 20 years Neustar’s unique capabilities have made us the leader in the field of responsible identity resolution. Neustar enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most, with world-class and industry leading solutions in Marketing, Identity, Risk, Communications, Security and Registry services.
Job Requisition:
Senior Data Scientist
Primary Location:
Los Angeles, New York or another major Neustar office in the US (Virtual OK for experienced candidates with record of successful telecommuting)

Job Description:
The senior data scientist will work on challenging problems extracting actionable information out of the many data sources available to Neustar. She/he/they will focus on marketing analytics and privacy-preserving big data analytics, and will be involved in projects from end-to-end, including data ingestion and curation, hypothesis development, feature engineering, and model development and evaluation.
At Neustar senior data scientists create prototypes of new algorithms and support engineering teams in productizing these capabilities. They work closely with various teams including data acquisition, data products, other data science teams within various business units including Risk, Security, and OneID to ensure implementation of capabilities that enable the organization’s vision.
Responsibilities:
·         Algorithm Development: Develop a deep understanding of all the data relevant to the problem to be addressed. Establish deterministic and probabilistic linkages between data sources and develop ways to extract and summarize the sought information in the data using a wide variety of statistical, data mining and machine learning techniques.
·         Prototyping: Create prototypes of productizable ways to perform the analysis at scale, provide documentation and help educate your colleagues in different function about the solution.
·         Support Implementation: Closely work with product, engineering and client teams to incorporate Data Science capabilities into Neustar’s products and services.
Experience and Qualifications:
·         A PhD in an analytical field such as computer science, machine learning, data science, statistics, physics and/or engineering, or a Master’s degree in a related field with 3 to 5 years of experience is a minimum requirement.
·         Minimum 5 years of experience with Python and SQL, and one or more enterprise level programming languages such as Java or Scala.
·         Minimum 2 years of hands-on experience with Linux-based cloud systems such as AWS and GCP.
·         Minimum 2 years of experience with wrangling large (terabytes) event level datasets.
·         Academic or industrial experience in privacy-preserving analytics on large datasets preferred.
·         Some experience writing code for highly distributed systems such as Apache Spark, Dask and Hive.
·         Several years of experience engineering features for machine learning models from raw data.
·         Background in applying optimization theory to real-world problems.
·         Ability to modify cost functions in machine learning algorithms based on business problems.
·         Some experience with TensorFlow or PyTorch.
·         Excellent oral and communication skills.
·         Ability and experience working in a cross-functional environment.
At Neustar, we are committed to the growth and development of our employees whose individual skills, curiosity and passion for their work, contribute to the overall success of our business. Our core values (Accountability, Collaboration, Transparency, Resilience, and Respect) are the driving force of our culture across our locations around the globe. We offer our employees a comprehensive benefits package including perks such as tuition & certification reimbursement, awesome company discounts, community service events, pet swag and much more!  We are all learning and creating together; and having some major fun along the way.
JOIN US!  We can’t wait to meet you!
Neustar does not accept unsolicited resumes from external firms or agencies. Neustar will not be responsible for placement fees associated with unsolicited resumes.
DIVERSITY
Diversity, inclusion and teamwork are second nature to Neustar; and these values permeate our entire business structure. Neustar is committed to creating an environment where a wide spectrum of opinions and beliefs are actively sought, listened to and respected. Further, our talented workforce draws from the many geographic areas and markets in which Neustar operates worldwide, which represents a distinct competitive advantage. The rich and varied personal and professional backgrounds of our employees make Neustar a dynamic and rewarding company at which to build a career. We invite you to join us.

EOE of Minorities/Females/Vets/Disability
Neustar, Inc. considers all applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran in accordance with federal law and other state and local requirements. Neustar, Inc., complies with applicable state and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment and provides reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities in accordance with the American with Disabilities Act (ADA) and applicable state and local laws.",3.6,"Neustar
3.6","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
364,Data Scientist,$67k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY
Responsible for scoping, developing, modeling, implementing, and delivering robust data analytics by using Teradata Aster and/or other analytic tools.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience

Understand customer business use cases and be able to translate them to technical specifications and vision on how to implement a solution

Clearly communicate the benefits of the analytic solutions to both a business as well as a technical audience

Leverage knowledge in analytic and statistical algorithms to help customers explore methods to improve their business

Lead large-scale analytical research projects through all stages including concept formulation, determination of appropriate statistical methodology, data manipulation, research evaluation, and final research report

Design, build, and extract large and complex data sets while thinking strategically about uses of data and how data use interacts with data design

Lead large-scale data studies and data discovery for new data sources or new uses for existing data sources

Lead design and implementation of statistical data quality procedures for existing and new data sources

Visualize and report data findings creatively in a variety of visual formats that appropriately provide insight to the stakeholders

Establish links across existing data sources and find new, interesting data correlations

Work closely with the sales team to come up with analytical solutions for prospects

Work closely with the operations team to define the implementation of these solutions

Achieve business value of analytics through deployment of the nCluster database

Achieve defined project goals within customer deadlines; proactively communicate status and escalate issues as needed

Willing to learn: Develop expertise in areas outside of core comfort zone

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Excellent team player
Must be self-motivated, results-driven, and able to work with minimum supervision
Intellectually curious
Outstanding interpersonal, communication and customer relationship skills able to work effectively with customers from developers and Ops personnel through senior management
Extensive experience with analytical and statistical software
Extensive experience with design and implementation of data warehousing, relational databases, and associated infrastructures
Passionate about data maintenance, data quality control and all other important data analysis techniques
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills with attention to detail and data accuracy
Strong interpersonal communication, verbal and written, relationship management, and customer service skills with a focus on working effectively in a team environment
Ability to use MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, PP, Access, Visio)
Ability to work cross-functionally to solve complex problems and improve quality and service
Ability to perform involved and independent research and analysis
Ability to maintain confidentiality and appropriately handle sensitive information

Related Work Experience Number of Years
Data manipulation and statistical modeling as a Scientist, Consultant,
Architect, DBA, or Engineer 5+
Programming experience 5+

Education
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Math, Statistics, Economics, Quantitative Analysis or equivalent experience

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Extensive experience with data programming languages such as SQL
Extensive experience with large data sets or Big Data
Experience with distributed computing tools such as Hadoop or Map/Reduce

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office Environment
Travel as required",3.0,"Spectrum
3.0","Stamford, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,2016,Subsidiary or Business Segment,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
365,LEAD COMPUTER SCIENTIST - LEAD ENGINEER - PRINCIPAL ENGINEER - SPACE AVIONICS,$77k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


As a recognized leader in space systems, SwRI develops avionics, data storage, and on-orbit processing electronics enabling next generation missions throughout the solar system.


Objectives of this Role:

As part of SwRI’s Space Avionics Flight Software Team, you’re work will benefit humankind through enabling scientific discoveries, improved weather forecasting, in-orbit satellite servicing, and revolutionizing on-orbit processing.

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Lead, design, develop, and verify mission, spacecraft and instrument flight software for a variety of space applications applying sound software engineering disciplines and practices.
Perform and direct all phases of the system lifecycle including proposal development, applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation.
Perform software project management functions including project planning, cost and schedule development, progress tracking against plans, programmatic and technical reviews, etc.
Support related systems engineering activities and maintain relationships with other technical disciplines and project functional areas.
Interact and interface with clients including developing technical presentations. Travel to client and team organization facilities is required and varies by project.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Software Development, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related
At least 8 years of direct experience designing software for high reliability embedded systems. Experience in working with hardware preferred
Must be able to work independently and in project team environments
Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail
Must be an embedded systems software designer/developer, have experience with real time operating systems, and be familiar with the design of real-time systems. Proficiency in C/C++ for embedded systems, including algorithm and data structure design required
Experience with networking/socket programming and Python, as well as, familiarity with VxWorks, embedded Linux, RTEMS OS for embedded systems
Interest and/or experience in working with hardware and direct space flight design experience a plus
Excellent Communication Skills and the ability to thrive in a collaborative team environment
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas | Austin, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.0,"Southwest Research Institute
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
366,Staff Data Engineer,$93k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff Data Engineer


Who we are

DoubleVerify is the leading independent provider of marketing measurement software, data and analytics that authenticates the quality and effectiveness of digital media for the world's largest brands and media platforms. DV provides media transparency and accountability to deliver the highest level of impression quality for maximum advertising performance. Since 2008, DV has helped hundreds of Fortune 500 companies gain the most from their media spend by delivering best in class solutions across the digital ecosystem, helping to build a better industry. Learn more at www.doubleverify.com.

Role Description


In this role, you are going to build an online analytic platform providing insights and data for Doubleverify's clients and internal users. The platform ingests billions of events per day and makes them available for consumption through an intuitive and highly performant UI. Additionally, it allows programmatically access data while applying a tight Data Governance strategy. To achieve this goal you will create, test and roll out robust and fully productionized code. Additionally, guide and collaborate with a talented, curious and highly motivated group of engineers and engineering leads.

Responsibilities
Architect, design and build a big data online analytic platform processing tens of TBs/Day, serves thousands of clients and supports advanced analytic workloads
Build Object Oriented or Functional Programming, scalable and high quality code
Constantly review code, look for design breaches, provide meaningful and relevant feedback to developers, stay up-to-date with system changes
Collaborate with multiple cross-disciplinary teams and provide technical leadership, guidance and coaching to engineers through brainstorming sessions, design reviews, and pair-programming
Create technical standards of CI/CD, quality, monitoring, security, modifiability, extensibility and maintainability of data processing software
Continuously explore the technical landscape of the Big Data ecosystem through POCs and analysis of various frameworks and technologies

Qualifications
8+ years of experience in building and operating mission-critical data-intensive and distributed systems
5+ hands-on coding experience with Scala/Java/.net Core/Python development
3+ years of experience creating complex data pipelines using SQL and analyzing data
Ability to Architect and Design complex software systems while adhering to fundamental principles and best practices
In-depth understanding and hands-on experience with distributed columnar data stores
Experience with BigQuery data modeling, performance tuning and cost optimizations
Experience with following and advocating state of the art SDLC processes
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or other related field
Additional skills:


Problem solver
Production operations and monitoring",3.6,"DoubleVerify
3.6","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
367,Data Scientist,$98k-$168k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Bloomberg, our products are fueled by powerful information. We combine data and context to paint the whole picture for our clients, around the clock from around the world. In Global Data, we're responsible for delivering this data, news and analytics through innovative technology - quickly and accurately.

Our Global Data team drives the algorithms and analytics at the core of what we do. Working across industries and asset classes, we draw on expertise from all backgrounds to identify the most impactful insights for our clients. We build on our knowledge of data trends to determine how customer needs might change over time, and code the foundation to support those changes. Whether it's identifying strong users of data sets like FX or creating more efficient data architecture, we write the programs, analyze patterns, and make recommendations to reduce customer churn and grow business success across the firm. The entire organization utilizes Global Data to forecast, set, and achieve their own goals. Our work leads directly to client satisfaction, which contributes to Bloomberg's profitability and ability to keep innovating.

Each member of Global Data has full ownership of their multidisciplinary role: we are nimble, autonomous, fast-paced, and work with purpose. And we'd like you to join us.

We'll trust you to:
Rise to the challenge: research new data sets and use your technical subject matter expertise to recommend new product offerings and generate premium content
Drive operations: draw on your scripting and programming skills to report on project progress, -create data visualizations, and propose new methods of analysis
Implement innovation: analyze metadata and current processes to find opportunities for improvement
Influence priorities: Review market conventions and data relationships to set rules for data validation
Achieve your purpose: optimize processes, lead projects, and improve the quality of the products sought by internal and external end-users
You'll need to have:


A bachelor's degree, preferably with combined studies in Information Systems and Finance, or related business and STEM fields
2+ years of programming and scripting experience in a Python production environment
Consistent track record of using technology to innovative data products and processes
Proficiency using data and statistical modeling and machine learning methods to solve real world problems
Legal authorization to work full-time in the United States and will not require visa sponsorship now or in the future
Does this sound like you?


Apply if you think we're a good match! We will be in touch to let you know what the next steps are.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.9,"Bloomberg
3.9","Princeton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
368,Research Scientist,$33k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Scientist*
Whitesboro, NY*
Responsibilities**: *
Perform Bioanalytical method development and method validation for the quantification of NCE, NBE and Biomarkers in tissues and biological fluids.
Work with clients to bring externally established assays and technologies in-house and/or transfer in-house assays externally as required.
Prepare Bioanalytical method documents.
Work with laboratory management to ensure that appropriate resources are available to complete the study to timeline. May obtain all client specific documents required for the analysis, i.e. study protocol, randomization lists, COA, demographic etc.
Work with clients to ensure studies are conducted in a manner compliant with the clients stated needs as defined by contract.
Maintain records of work conducted in a timely and consistent manner, sufficient to allow real-time tracking of the deliverables, including tracking of revenue and resources associated with assigned studies.
Identify changes to scope of work and notify contracts of need for change order.
Review all data in accordance with direction documents and ensure results are documented accurately, completely and compliant with GLP/GCP regulations and SOPs.
Perform assay for the routine batch analysis of NCE, NBE and Biomarkers in tissues and biological fluids involving simple and complex analytical techniques. Perform laboratory work to GLP/GCP standard.
Document all work and results accurately, completely and compliant with GXP regulations and SOP’s.
Approve release of method development and non-GXP data
Prepare reports (or oversee as appropriate) of the work conducted, address all QA findings and provide QA draft report in line with the terms and conditions stated in the signed contract.
Requirements*
BS degree in a science related field with a minimum 5 years (or PhD with 3+ years) of relevant work experience in the pharmaceutical or CRO business
Experience developing/validating pharmacokinetic (PK), immunogenicity (ADA), and biomarker ELISA-type assays needed
Experience with MSD and Gyrolab preferred
Benefits of Working in ICON*
ICON enjoys a strong reputation for quality and is focused on staff development. We make it our mission to attract the most diverse and creative minds into the business and we continually strive to provide opportunities for our people to excel, grow and build a great career. We understand that our greatest asset is the skills and talents of our people and they are truly what set us apart.

Other than working with a great team of smart and energetic people, we also offer a very competitive benefits package. This varies from country to country so a dedicated recruiter will discuss this with you at interview stage.

We care about our people as they are the key to our success. We provide an open and friendly work environment where we empower people and provide them with opportunities to develop their long term career.
ICON is an equal opportunity employer - M/F/D/V and committed to providing a workplace free of any discrimination or harassment*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"Icon Plc
3.4","Whitesboro, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1990,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
369,Data Engineer,$44k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"\*Applicantion must also be submitted at https://www.pechanga.com/careers

GENERAL SUMMARY
Data Engineer must be able to design, build and maintain Enterprise Level Data Pipe-Lines utilizing the tools available within Big Data Eco-System.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
• Design, build, and deploy new data pipelines within Big Data Eco-Systems
• Improve existing data pipelines by simplifying and increasing performance
• Follow best practices on design and implementation to aid in company-wide data governance
• Work closely with the data analysts and scientists, and database and systems administrators to create data solutions.
• Documents new/existing pipelines, Data Sets and Data Sets lineage.
• Abides by department development standards and SOP's.
• Attends all department meetings
• Protects the assets of PTSG Pechanga Resort & Casino and the Pechanga Tribe
• Keeps updated on latest technologies relevant to position’s duties.
• Has great knowledge of commonly used software concepts and design
• Great understanding of the development lifecycle
• Keeps management updated on projects and assigned work
• All other duties as assigned.

ACCOUNTABILITY: This position has no supervisory responsibilities.

\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

QUALIFICATIONS AND GUIDELINES

\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

EXPERIENCE/TRAINING/EDUCATION: Bachelor's degree (B. A.) from four-year college or university from related field is required.

COMMUNICATION SKILLS: This position requires the ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. This position also requires the ability to write routine reports and correspondence. The ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of the organization is required as well.

MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: This position requires the ability to work with mathematical concepts such as probability and statistical inference, and fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometry. This position also requires the ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations.

REASONING ABILITY: This position requires the ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. This position also requires the ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical instructions in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract and concrete variables.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS:
• Must be able to obtain a Class “A” gaming license

SKILLS/ABILITIES:
• Linux
• Hadoop (hdfs, hive, spark, sqoop)
• SQL and HiveQL
• noSQL (Mongodb, Cassandra, or Couchbase)
• Neo4j
• Git
• Python or Scala
• Bonus: Kafka, Kinetica, Streamsets
• Excellent troubleshooting ability
• Long periods of sitting and typing.
• Must be able to lift 35lbs.
• Working in a smoking environment (Casino only).
• Strong work ethic and positive attitude.
• Professional demeanour.
• Make eye contact while speaking.
• Ability to work under stressful situations.
• Mentally strong and able to cope with many challenges.
• Performs and completes variety of tasks under a fast-paced environment.
• Excellent troubleshooting and verbal and written communication skills.
• Commitment to the success of assigned projects, co-workers and the company.

OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
• At least 2 years experience of designing, building, and deploying production-level data pipelines using tools from Hadoop stack (Hive, Spark, Sqoop).
• Preferred: Cloudera Certified Data Engineer, i.e. CCP Data Engineering Exam
• At least 2 years experience with various noSQL databases (MongoDB, Couchbase, Cassandra, Neo4j)
• At least 2 years experience with SQL databases and Change Data Capture
• At least 2 years experience with production-level programming (python or scala or java)
• At least 2 years experience troubleshooting JVM-related issues
• Wxperience and strategies to deal with mutable data in Hadoop is preffered
• Experience with Kafka, Kinetica, Streamsets prefferred
• Understanding and experience of Agile and DevOps methodologies preferred
• Relies on limited experience and judgement to plan and accomplish goals
• Works under general supervision

ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
• Must be a self-starter who is highly motivated and resourceful.
• Must be able to work with a positive attitude in a fast paced and culturally diverse casino environment.
• Must be able to take direction and follow through with assigned tasks.
• Must be flexible and willing to work nights, weekends and holidays.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $77,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Holidays
Weekends
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Hadoop: 2 years (Preferred)
SQL: 2 years (Preferred)
Python: 2 years (Preferred)
Scala: 2 years (Preferred)
Java: 2 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.pechanga.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.8,"Pechanga Resort Casino
3.8","Temecula, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Sports & Recreation,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
370,Lead Data Analyst - Remote,-1,"ABOUT US

Life360 brings families closer with smart tools designed to protect and connect the people who matter most.

Known for first-to-market solutions for modern family challenges, Life360 recently reached #1 in Apple's US App Store's list of free social networking apps. Nearly 1 in 10 US families with kids use Life360 an average of 12 times a day, and global membership is growing exponentially, with over 25 million monthly active users in over 140 countries making Life360 the largest mobile service for families in the world.

This reach gives us the opportunity to do unprecedented good for families through our valued core offerings: advanced location sharing, private messaging, driver monitoring, help alerts, 24/7 roadside assistance, and Crash Detection with emergency response. On average we respond to 1,000 roadside assists and dispatch 200+ ambulances each month to those in need.

Offering both free and paid memberships. In addition, the company has raised over $200 million in equity financing, and recently completed an IPO on the ASX exchange giving our employees the liquidity of a public company with the upside of a private growth stage business.

Life360's rapidly growing team of 150+ employees is headquartered in San Francisco, with offices in San Diego, and Las Vegas.

POSITION SUMMARY

Life360 is looking for a savvy Lead Data Analyst to join our growing Data and Analytics and Data Science (DAS) team. As a senior member of the team, you will partner with business leaders to distill a thoughtful analytic strategy and roadmap to fuel business insights, understand performance drivers, find new growth opportunities, and create incremental value for the organization. The candidate will leverage their analytic and technical talents and our unique dataset of geolocation, mobile application, and transaction data to help answer key business driver and product efficacy questions and deliver analytic programs and strategic insights projects.

The ideal candidate has a passion for fueling the business with meaningful data driven insights and distilling results into a compelling narrative. Utilizing a blend of product strategy, technical data skills, and analytics techniques, the candidate should be able to answer a range of business questions and present the insights in a concise and effective manner. The candidate must bring a blend of consulting, collaboration, technical aptitude, leadership, programming skills, as well as business skills to be effective in this role.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Build a holistic understanding of our product, customers, data, product and business goals to create and deliver an analytics and data roadmap.
Analyze and deliver insights and recommendations utilizing complex, large volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources using a variety of tools and data analysis techniques.
Understand business drivers and performance trends as well as answer product and business questions to drive product actions.
Leverage industry best practices in establishing repeatable Business Intelligence capabilities and experiences.
Proactively foster and drive a data driven analytics culture.
Look for new opportunities to leverage data assets in innovative ways
Be an analytics thought leader and evangelist to create and drive the Life360 Data and Analytics brand both internally and externally.
EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS
7+ years of data analytics experience (Consumer internet, mobile app, or digital product experience preferred)
3+ Years in data and analytics consultative capacity as an engagement and delivery lead role.
Demonstrated experience in program and project delivery evolving translation of strategic business and product questions into a successful data and analytics roadmap.
Strong hands on technical Big Data SQL, Python / R or equivalent data wrangling and reporting experience with multi-billion daily row volume data sets.
Proven experience in delivering enterprise Data and Business Intelligence projects (Quicksight, Tableau, Qlick, Looker, or equivalent)
Ability to articulate vision, requirements & benefits, providing solid recommendations and rationale to business partners
Keen grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Proven hands on expertise in leveraging big data and cloud database technologies (AWS, Athena, Redshift, Snowflake, Hive, Teradata)
Team development and leadership experience preferred
Demonstrated project management and organizational skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.
PERKS
Fridays are Work From Home days at Life360
Competitive pay and benefits
Free snacks, drinks, and food in the office
Health, dental and vision insurance plans
401k plan
$200/month Quality of Life perk
A great office with plenty of light in the heart of the SOMA district in beautiful San Francisco
Whatever makes you stronger makes us stronger. We buy you the things you need to improve yourself and get your job done.
We are looking for candidates with a diverse background that will compliment the skills and backgrounds of the current team. If you don't fit all the criteria below please apply anyway as this list is more of a preference rather than a rule. Our priority is for a well rounded team that delivers results.

#LI-Remote",3.9,"Life360
3.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
371,Data Scientist,-1,"Established in 2017, Whisper is a team of artificial intelligence, hearing care, hardware, and software experts coming together to solve the challenge of providing better hearing. We set out to make the Whisper Hearing System so our parents, grandparents, friends and teammates can have a tomorrow that sounds even better than today.

Based in San Francisco, Whisper is lucky to have the support of great investors including Sequoia Capital, First Round Capital, Quiet Capital, IVP, and more.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our team to help build the future of hearing instruments and take on significant leadership and responsibility at a fast-growing startup.

THE ROLE

At Whisper, data is at the heart of how we make decisions about building products and services. As our first data scientist, you will bring modern analytical techniques to an old-guard industry and answer important questions about hearing loss, product usage, and what makes someone happy with their hearing. You'll up the standard for decision making internally by defining and building out our data infrastructure, developing key analyses and dashboards, and making information easy to access and consume by all Whisper employees. You'll work closely with our machine learning and audio teams to take our unique ML-based audio processing algorithms to the next level.

This role will partner with both our product development (80%) and business teams (20%). This is a great opportunity for someone excited to take responsibility over a broad domain and have a huge impact on how hearing care is delivered to the 450+ million people in the world with hearing loss

RESPONSIBILITIES
Define and build data pipelines from the ground up to transform raw internal and external data into usable forms (e.g. tables, dashboards, etc.)
Analyze clinical and usage data to gain deeper insights that translate into changes to our product (e.g. features) or service (e.g. training hearing care professionals)
Partner with our AI/Machine Learning teams to improve ML-based audio processing algorithms through data augmentation
Push forward a data-oriented culture internally and externally -- e.g. training teammates on how to use data tools, how to do logging to gather the best insight, how to ask good data questions, etc.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
At least 5+ years industry experience working as a data scientist, data analyst, or data engineer in a high growth environment
Professional experience with data tools suitable for a 50-person team
Professional experience using Python, SQL, and related tools to analyze large datasets, build pipelines, and generate automated reports
Professional experience communicating analyses with leadership to influence product strategy
Deep understanding of statistics (hypothesis testing, regressions)
Desire to work cross-functionally and educate colleagues on data tools and analytic techniques
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
BONUS POINTS
Experience building out data infrastructure for a small company or startup
Experience working with modern, cloud-based infrastructure technologies like Kubernetes/GKE, Google Cloud/AWS/Azure, Cloud Functions/AWS Lambda, etc.
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex. R, SAS) or other methods
Experience analyzing and optimizing the performance of machine learning algorithms
A personal connection to improving hearing health
If you're interested in immediate ownership of company defining decisions, and work which directly helps 360MM+ people hear again - we'd love to hear from you.

Whisper is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce with an inclusive working environment for everyone to do their best work. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.7,"Whisper.ai
4.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
372,Data Analyst,$51k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
10744
Menlo Park, CA
6/2/2020 2:54:00 PM

Learning
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Responsibilities

Primary
Query data and provide reports/query results to stakeholders
Manage requests and priorities independently
Provide documentation of queries/inbound requests for future use in improving GBM’s data infrastructure
Create new or improve existing dashboards by adding new metrics to support Business Education and other teams within the company

Secondary
Communicate with internal stakeholders about dashboards, and provide support about which metrics are available and from where
Understand existing data policy restrictions and determine if queries are possible to run/share
Skills

Minimum Qualifications

· 4+ years of experience in analytics or similar field

· Advanced proficiency in SQL

· Experience problem solving and providing business insights and recommendations from data

· Ability to manage multiple concurrent projects and drive initiatives in a cross-functional environment

· Ability to communicate complex data issues to audiences of different levels of technical expertise

Preferred Qualifications

· Experience building out large data sets and pipelines

· Python or similar scripting experience

Education

Minimum Qualifications

· Bachelor’s degree in a technical focus area

Preferred Qualifications

· MBA or graduate degree in a quantitative field

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Menlo Park, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
373,"Scientist, Discovery Biology",$65k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"NGM Biopharmaceuticals, Inc. is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to discovering and developing the next generation of medicines for the treatment of serious diseases. Our experienced scientific team has joined forces with an impressive group of industry professionals, Nobel Laureates and other distinguished researchers to build a company where innovation and cutting-edge science has provided the foundation for a robust drug discovery engine that has a track record of generating one new IND candidate per year. NGM’s current pipeline of clinical-stage programs consists of five drug candidates targeting liver and metabolic diseases, retinal diseases and cancer. The most advanced drug candidate, aldafermin (NGM282), is in Phase 2b clinical studies in non-alcoholic steatohepatitis (NASH) and is wholly-owned by NGM. Another drug candidate, NGM621, is in a Phase 2 study in geographic atrophy (GA) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD). NGM’s strategic collaboration with Merck, with a current term running to March 2022, provides us with the resources and flexibility to pursue our ambitious R&D goals and further extend our pipeline of novel drug candidates.

NGM is excited to hire a passionate biologist to join our discovery biology team. This role will involve creatively thinking about biomedical problems and independent design and execution of experiments with the goal of advancing biologic medicines to clinical development. An ideal candidate will be a soon-to-be or recent PhD graduate in the life sciences with a big-picture understanding of mammalian biology.
Responsibilities
Designing and executing independent experiments
Consistent critical review of scientific and patent literature
Presenting to internal project teams and R&D Leadership
Liaising with Commercial Research Organizations (CROs) and academic collaborators
Lead select research meetings
Working with a team to develop assays and perform experiments
Teaching techniques to collaborators and research associates
Competencies
Deep understanding of mammalian biology
Substantial mammalian cell culture experience
Substantive experience with in-vivo models experiments
Proficiency in experimental design and execution
Excellent communication skills, and ability to consistently understand and articulate scientific concepts and interpret data
Excellent project management skills
Well-versed in Excel and Graph Pad Prism
Qualifications
PhD in biological sciences, with 0-2 years of experience since graduating
Track record of high-impact publications and presentations
Deeply passionate about Biology and scientific discovery
NGM offers a creative, collaborative, highly challenging scientific environment, along with a strong compensation package that includes salary, stock options, employee stock purchase program participation, 401(k) and a comprehensive, industry-leading, benefits package.

Interested applicants should apply through the NGM Biopharmaceuticals website: https://www.ngmbio.com/open-positions/
We have become aware of false offers of employment being made by individuals impersonating NGM representatives in order to collect personal information and/or payment. Please exercise caution when receiving unsolicited recruiting offers. NGM always lists all open positions on the NGM careers page and all employment applications must be submitted through our online portal. NGM will never solicit payment or payment information from candidates. Please be advised that NGM is not currently hiring in any countries other than the US. We never request that candidate information be sent to a non-ngmbio.com email address.

Note to Recruitment Agencies: Please do not forward any agency résumés. NGM Bio is not responsible for any fees related to résumés that are unsolicited.",3.5,"Ngm Biopharmaceuticals
3.5","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
374,Data Scientist,$98k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"THE ROLE

Tesla's mission is to accelerate the world's transition to
sustainable energy. Tesla’s Finance Analytics team sits at the intersection of
financial analysis, business intelligence, data engineering, and data science
to support this mission by converting raw data into actionable insights.

We are looking for a senior data
scientist who can play a foundational role in measuring, predicting, and managing
risk across Tesla.

RESPONSIBILITIES

·
Contribute on all the
stages of Data Science projects: from performing raw data mining to translating
complex technical topics into business solutions.

·
Effectively communicate
actionable insights into Product offerings at all levels of the organization.

·
Collaborate closely with
leadership, engineering, and other stakeholders to improve our view of modeling
and decision engines.

·
Solve complex industrial
and technical problems using advanced mathematical modeling and optimization
techniques, including but not limited to, big data pre-processing, problem
formulation, features engineering, algorithmic selection and evaluation,
hyper-parameter tuning for machine learning, and deployment.

REQUIREMENTS

·
MS. or equivalent
experience in a quantitative field (i.e. Predictive Analytics, Applied
Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence,
Engineering).

·
Proven track record of delivering
risk predictive models and analytics for financial industry using regression
analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised and unsupervised
methods at various customers interaction stages as underwriting, early warning
risk detection and losses forecast.

·
Proficiency in Python, SQL
and experience with ML libraries and frameworks like Scikit-learn, h2o or Spark
ML.

·
Experience engineering
information out of massive, complex and, in some cases, unstructured datasets.

·
Ability to apply a strong
business sense with technical skills to effectively balance decisions around
the complexity and speed of the project delivery.

·
Strong written, verbal, and
interpersonal communication skills. Ability to effectively communicate at all
levels in the organization.

·
Ability to self-start and
self-direct work in an unstructured environment, comfortable dealing with
ambiguity.

·
Excellent problem-framing,
problem solving and project management skills and ability to change direction
quickly.

Preferred

·
Experience working within a
Big Data environment.

·
Experience with git and
version control workflows.",3.6,"Tesla
3.6","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2003,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
375,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,Employer Provided Salary:$125k-$150k,"SkySync is a dynamic, fast-paced, venture-backed software innovator based in the Ann Arbor tech cluster, with remote Syncopaths in all US time zones. Our quirky and unique workforce excels at managing our customers’ content migration, synchronization, and orchestration challenges like no other in our space. We are poised for rapid growth and need a Machine Learning Engineer to contribute to building a large-scale machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) system and developing our understanding of the data we encounter. This role will be a cross between an ML/NLP researcher and a software engineer, and good candidates will have prior experience doing both. We are looking for someone from the southeastern Michigan area and preference will be given to candidates within this geographic location.

You’ll be doing a lot of this:
Rapidly iterating over different techniques in a solution space, and effectively analyzing the performance of models on various tasks
Contributing to several large-scale production machine learning and natural language processing efforts
Developing and building guidelines for evaluation datasets
Understanding the decision-making process, workflows, and business and information needs of business unit heads and service manager/owners
Translating business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Visualizing information and developing engaging reports on the results of experiments
Advising product teams on new products, features or updates through evidence-based recommendations
Supporting user experience specialists and information architects to enhance information visualization through the development of dashboards and user interfaces
Distributing best practices to analytics and product teams and provides consultations for their data-based experimentations
Other duties as assigned
So you should have this:
Up-to-date knowledge of machine learning, natural language processing (NLP), and data analytics tools and techniques
Strong knowledge of Python, and related machine learning tools (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong experience with Docker, AWS
Familiarity with current SOTA NLP models like BERT
4+ years of work experience with Python and machine learning
Willingness and ability to learn new technologies on the job
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Demonstrated ability to work with minimal supervision
Experience building and deploying predictive models, web scraping, and scalable data pipelines
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, statistics, or related fields preferred
Ability to think critically while solving problems in a rapidly changing product
Nice to have:
Publications from ML/NLP venues such as ACL, NAACL, EMNLP, NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR

This position is a great fit for you if you like keeping up with the cutting edge of machine learning and NLP and helping build a position and product from the ground up. Knowing how to engage with new challenges daily and handle competing priorities is a must.
This position is not a great fit for you if you like established processes for every situation or a static set of duties and responsibilities.

Qualities Needed for Success
Excellent listening, writing, and professional communication skills are a must. You should be able to demonstrate proficiency in most of the duties and responsibilities listed above. In our fast-paced world, a great attitude combined with enthusiasm is key to individual success along with embodying our entrepreneurial spirit.",5.0,"SkySync
5.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
376,Staff Data Engineer,-1,"Checkr's mission is to build a fairer future by improving understanding of the past. We believe all candidates, regardless of who they are, should have a fair chance to work. Established in 2014 and valued at $2.2B, Checkr is using technology to bring hiring to the next level. Our People Trust Platform uses machine learning to help thousands of companies modernize their background check process and make hiring safer, more efficient, and more inclusive. Some of our customers include, Uber, Instacart, Doordash, Netflix, Compass Group, and Adecco.

A career with Checkr is an opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest minds, disrupt an industry for a better future, and give otherwise overlooked candidates access to employment. Checkr has been recognized in Forbes Best Startup Employers and is a top Y Combinator company by valuation.

We are looking for a Staff Data Engineer with a strong foundation in architecting modern cloud-based data pipelines that help to empower data-driven decision making across teams and organizations. As Checkr scales, so does the need to evolve our underlying data infrastructure. You will have the opportunity to work with key business stakeholders and engineering partners to help shape the long-term data strategy of our company and to build a data ecosystem that supports that strategy. While our current data platform uses Snowflake, dbt, Airflow, Kafka, and Spark, you will also evaluate open-source tools and vendors that expand our data capabilities. You will help ensure that our foundational data services and processes scale together with the rest of the company. This is an exciting opportunity to play a crucial role in the growth of Checkr!

Responsibilities:
Build, maintain and optimize critical data pipelines that serve as the foundation for Checkr's data platform and products,
Build tools that help streamline the management and operation of our data ecosystem,
Architect systems for scale and security to keep up with a huge influx of data as Checkr continues to grow,
Architect systems that empower repeatable and scalable machine learning workflows,
Identify innovative applications of data that can enable new products or insights and enable other teams at Checkr to maximize their own impact
What you bring:
6+ years of industry-related experience in a backend or data engineering role and a Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience.
Experience architecting, developing and maintaining production data services
Familiarity with modern CI/CD practices and tools (e.g., gitlab and kubernetes)
Experience and passion for mentoring other data engineers
Deep programming expertise in Python and SQL
What you get:
A fast-paced and collaborative environment
Competitive compensation and opportunity for advancement
100% medical, dental and vision coverage
Unlimited PTO policy
Fitness reimbursements
Equal Employment Opportunities at Checkr

Checkr is committed to hiring talented and qualified individuals with diverse backgrounds for all of its tech, non-tech, and leadership roles. Checkr believes that the gathering and celebration of unique backgrounds, qualities, and cultures enriches the workplace.

Checkr also welcomes the opportunity to consider qualified applicants with prior arrest or conviction records. Checkr's commitment to diversity extends to hiring talented individuals in spite of a prior criminal history in accordance with local, state, and/or federal laws, including the San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance.",4.0,"Checkr
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
377,Data Scientist,$84k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:


Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. Were focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldnt be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Data Scientist to provide mission critical support to our customer. As part of an Agile Team, you will design, develop, and maintain software applications using a tailored SAFe Agile DevSecOps Scrum process. This role implements data auditing, reporting, and security through the use of existing tools and developing new ones. This role requires familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers.

This role evaluates and uses algorithms for Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML). This role develops scripts, notebooks or applications (using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Scikit-Learn, Numpy, Tensorflow, Pytorch, Spark, Spark MLlib, H20.ai, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to perform analysis, clustering, entity resolution and structured information extraction for work products. Models are trained and refined using these tools and evaluated for effectiveness using appropriate criteria/metrics for the task. This role collaborates across a team of Data Scientists, Data Administrators, Software and Data Engineers to produce work products.

Primary Responsibilities
This role designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources.
This role develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, query techniques, models complex business problems, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate, and evaluate datasets.
This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools and techniques to include Python, Splunk, query experience, R and the like.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various data sources and business problems.
Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations.
This role develops algorithms and analytical techniques to improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.
Basic Qualifications
Experience with Python, Splunk, and query experience is required.
Experience negotiating complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience leading critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
Experience supervising others.
Candidate must have Masters with 12-15 years of prior relevant experience or Doctorate with 8+ years of prior relevant experience. Additional years of experience can be accepted in lieu of education.
Clearance/Citizenship
Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph
""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the worlds toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The companys 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
378,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary*
The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst position involves programming, data mining and analysis of healthcare data with an emphasis on medical economics, clinical and financial reporting.

An inquisitive and detail oriented mind and a passion for using data and analytics to drive results

is critical to the success of this position.
Essential Functions*
Analyze medical cost and utilization trends is support of medical economics and population health initiatives supporting our ACO
Work with key business owners to establish and meet their analytic needs and the analytic needs of the organization
Execute the various outcome and predictive analytic studies that support MHN’s model of care.
Management, maintenance, and design of integration strategies regarding eligibility and empanelment including data quality, reporting and retention initiatives.
Assist with the design, development, and maintenance of the Analytic DataMart including quality checks, identifying data issues and working with partners to create solutions
Complete a variety of clinical and financial client ad hoc analyses in an efficient and timely manner.
Developing and using risk models for comparative analysis and patient stratification
Work with IT teams to operationalize analytic and reporting innovations
Conduct analysis to support Shared Savings and other key improvement programs
Develop actionable dashboards and reports to support care management and ACO operations
Competencies*
Must be analytical, detail oriented, and a problem solver
Expertise in data manipulation, analysis, and presentation
Advanced knowledge of medical claims, pharmacy, and eligibility data
Ability to work independently on multiple projects. Must have strong organization and time management skills
Experience with risk adjustment methodologies and predictive analytics
Experience developing visualizations and working with BI tools
Experience developing medical performance metrics and clinical quality measures (Physician Scorecards, HEDIS, PQRS, etc.)
Required Experience*
Minimum 4 years of professional experience in a data analytics role within healthcare (payer, provider, consulting)
4 – 10 years of experience using Base SAS, SAS/Macros, and SQL
Required Education*
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, public health, information systems, computer science, or a comparable program with a quantitative emphasis. Master’s degree preferred.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
data analytics in healthcare field: 4 years (Required)
SAS work: 4 years (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Medical Home Network,"Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
379,Data Scientist,$90k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"Engineering at Postmates

We're building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We're tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

As a Data Scientist, you'll use your full toolkit - statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualization, and software engineering - to develop data products and models that are used by millions of users and power the growth of our business. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, product managers and data analysts in defining the frontier of data products and models in the three-sided marketplace. Data scientists will work on how to formulate a model from a real business problem, determine evaluation metrics, evaluate different modeling approaches, conduct data analysis, and build features and algorithms for the various challenging problems at Postmates.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
A deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models, or optimization
Extensive experience with data tools, Python (Pandas, Scipy, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, etc), R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization, and feature engineering
Ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to production deployment and beyond with minimal help from engineers
Strong communication skills; Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, and BigTable
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn
A bit about us

Postmates is changing delivery for good. While you may know us as the clever brand loved by celebrities and millennials, we are so much more. We are industry-first leaders in the modern logistics space, creating groundbreaking tech products that positively impact millions of customers, merchants and gig-economy workers as well as the underserved in the communities where we work. How will you help us change delivery for good?

Benefits

Postmates has your back. In our impact-first work environment, we value huge company vision. As you strive to build the future with us, we'll support you with a competitive rates and equity plan, along with access to our 401k plan and robust benefits including: health benefits, flexible paid time off, parental benefits, and food perks.

Postmates is proud to be an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants at Postmates are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.",3.4,"Postmates
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
380,Data Analyst (Data Mining/Oracle/Cloud),$77k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOIN THE CYBERCORE TECHNOLOGIES TEAM.

We are GROWING ! Bring your Technical Capabilities, Enthusiasm, and Team Focus.

CyberCore Technologies has a New Opportunity for a Data Analyst (Oracle/Cloud) – Top Secret – Quantico, VA.

CyberCore Technologies provides Services for Government and Commercial Clients. We have procured, integrated, and delivered over $2.6B in Information Technology products. CyberCore provides a wide range of professional services and solutions with specific strengths in Cyber Security, Networking, Engineering/Operations, and Software Development.

At CyberCore, Our Goal is to Maintain a Healthy Work-Life Balance and Provide Interesting Work Supporting Our Nation’s Security. CyberCore is Proud to Offer: Competitive Salaries; Corporate PTO Plan; Education Reimbursement and Bonuses for Completing Certifications; Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance for Team Members and Families; Social and Philanthropic Events Celebrating Our Team and Giving Back to Our Community. For more information on CyberCore Technologies, go to www.cybercoretech.com

Job Responsibilities:

Supports DoD Cyber Crime Center and Air Force Office of Special Investigations. The Data Analyst will work with the Enterprise Resource Directorate and be part of the new Data Analytics Team. The incumbent will be responsible for the analysis of current data holdings, document data systems related to capabilities and gaps, and will provide analytical products based on that data.

Responsibilities:

Mining data from primary and secondary sources, then reorganizing data in a format easily read by human or machine.

Use statistical tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that may be valuable for Mission Managers. Demonstrate the significance of the analysis in the context of local, national, and global law enforcement trends that impact OSI. Prepare reports for executive leadership that communicate trends, patterns, and predictions using relevant data. Collaborate with programmers, engineers, and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements, recommend system modifications, and develop policies for data governance. Create appropriate documentation for stakeholders to understand steps of data analysis process and duplicate/replicate analysis if required.

Required Candidate Qualifications:
Active Top Secret Clearance
Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college in a related discipline and 5 years of professional experience; Masters Degree and 3 years of professional experience; or related PhD and no experience. 13 years of professional experience without a Degree.
Demonstrated Experience with Data Science, performing design/engineering/mining/visualization.
Demonstrated Experience with descriptive and predictive analysis.
Demonstrated experience with data analysis/visualization tools.
Demonstrated experience developing, standardizing, and documenting processes and policies.
Demonstrated experience developing and standardizing processes, tools, templates, graphics/illustrations, and metrics.
Ability to learn Local, National and Global law enforcement trends and impact to OSI.
Desired:
Experience collaborating with programmers and engineers.
Experience supporting a LE/CI Mission.
Experience creating process and standards on a new team and/or initiative.
Law Enforcement Investigation Experience and Understanding of Search and Seizure.
CyberCore Technologies is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.9,"CyberCore Technologies
3.9","Quantico, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Security Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
381,Scientist I,-1,"Date: *3/5/2020
Position Title: *Scientist I
Department: *Biopharma Services
Location: * Headquarters - 126 Corporate
Supervisor: * Associate Director
Responsibilities*:

• Independently develop genomic assays.

• Carefully document experimental procedures and accurately record data.

• Train and supervise associate scientists on laboratory techniques.

• Perform primary data analysis/data review.

• Maintain in-depth scientific knowledge.
Qualifications *(knowledge, skills, experience, abilities, and other requirements):
• Ph.D in genetics, molecular biology, cancer biology, genomics or related field.

• Experience involving analytical characterization of nucleic acids required.

• Experience with method development preferred.

• Essential knowledge of key biological processes, NGS technology, and cancer genomics research experience desired.

• Be both a strong individual contributor as well as a collaborative team member.

• Strong communication skills, both written and verbal.

Admera Health focuses on advanced molecular diagnostics, personalized medicine and non-invasive cancer testing. Our goal is to fulfill unmet medical needs with cost-effective tests and accurate analysis that guide patient care by utilizing next generation sequencing technologies and advanced bioinformatics to redefine disease screening, diagnosis, treatment, monitoring, and management. It is our mission to deliver transformative, valuable solutions for patients, physicians, payers, and clinical researchers.

Admera Health employees have a winning attitude and champion innovation, teamwork and accountability through a results-oriented, customer-centric, and fun culture. We offer various health and financial benefits, learning opportunities, competitive compensation, rewarding bonus programs, and a wide range of work/ life benefits designed to make your life easier.

For more information, please visit www.admerahealth.com.

To review and apply to our open positions, please visit http://www.admerahealth.com/careers.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Experience:
Method development: 2 years (Preferred)
Cancer genomics research: 2 years (Preferred)
NGS: 2 years (Preferred)
analytical characterization: 2 years (Required)
biological processes: 2 years (Preferred)
Genomic Research: 2 years (Required)
Molecular Biology: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
www.admerahealth.com",3.7,"Admera Health
3.7","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
382,Geodetic Earth Scientist,$41k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Geodetic Earth Scientists analyze the Earth's gravity and magnetic fields, geophysical structure, material properties, and dynamics for geospatial intelligence and DoD applications. They define and maintain the World Geodetic System (WGS), perform datum transformations between WGS 84 and local datums, and develop spatial and temporal models defining Earth systems. They provide in-depth technical expertise on geodetic and geophysical issues to customers and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: 1) NGA is hiring in support of NGA & USSPACECOM's national security missions. It is advertised as an Earth Scientist until a SPACE work role is developed. This position drives SPACE-based derivative requirements / application, & SPACE mission assurance. Contributions will solidify resiliency of national Positioning, Navigation & Timing (PNT). 2) This program lead oversees a team of scientists addressing Geodesy & Geophysics (G&G) challenges related to a PNT SPACE environment. Must have an advanced understanding of DoD/IC processes, activities, standards, & GEOINT operations. Must demonstrate familiarity with SPACE doctrine, strategy, domain & application of Geomatics to understand, prioritize & communicate architecture, production methods & reference systems. Will determine & define distinct deliverables required for specific projects & initiatives with clear alignment to DoD/IC requirements & familiarity with acquisition & Planning, Programming, & Budgeting Execution (PPBE) Process. 3) Must be fluent in DoD program management to define, plan, develop, implement, deliver & maintain alternative positional reference systems to support SPACE PNT beyond the current capabilities of the World Geodetic System (WGS) & associated models. Demonstrate experience in managing stakeholders, scope, budget, risk & schedule in successful delivery of complex geospatial related projects. Develop plans, schedules, project estimates, resource demands, & status reports. Adhere to quality standards & review project deliverables. Excellent written/verbal communication skills & exceptional emotional intelligence. Ability to influence/motivate people across a broad variety of job functions. 4) As senior program manager, will make recommendations to leadership/staff on strategic direction of the Program. Will collaborate with policy, research, product, engineering & operations teams to orchestrate end-to-end policies, practices, procedures & address information & capability gaps. Employ analytical, quantitative & data visualization skills to use data & metrics to back up assumptions, recommendations & drive program decisions. Engage with stakeholders to orchestrate projects, tailor expert advice & discussions to convey the proposed method, data, & results to a large non-technical audience. Provide recommendations on G&G issues to internal / external stakeholders & attend community forums as necessary. 5) Support team, program & cross-functional initiatives to continuously improve processes to increase effectiveness & provide suggestions for best practices. Superintend analysis, including the conceptualization, creation, delivery of new products, tools, services, platforms, & technical solutions & identify full lifecycle requirements. Manage acquisition / mission assurance for geospatial data supporting SPACE, studies potential applications of geomatics tradecraft, & methods / production in a SPACE-based environment. Embed feasibility, sustainability, interoperability, resiliency, situational awareness, contingency, security & readiness in program planning. 6) Experience managing enterprise level projects in the following areas or processes: reference frame transformations, geocentric / lunar-centric systems, developing methodologies, procedures & production in support of SPACE, navigation, & operations, Earth / SPACE-based collection systems, & mission assurance. 7) Desired credentials: Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) level III, Six Sigma and/or Project Management Professional (PMP) 8) Exhibit technical knowledge, enable healthy partnerships & balance between the mission & employee development. He/she establishes & maintains open / ongoing dialogue with team members, assists performance expectations for direct-report employees & establishes a team who upholds to NGA core values; Excellence, Accountability, Respect, Teamwork, Honesty. 9) Applicants currently with a Top Secret security clearance are desired but is not mandatory to apply for this position. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Previous experience extracting and analyzing information from various sources and briefing the results to an audience 2. Documented experience of problem identification, analysis and resolution 3. Experience working in groups to develop solutions to problems and deliver those solutions to a customer 4. Demonstrated experience in technical program management (Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Physics, Geophysics, Geodesy, Geosciences, or Orbital Mechanics) 5. Experience in Reference Frame Transformations and Coordinate Systems EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Astronomy, Cartography, Computer Science, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geology, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Meteorology, Orbital Mechanics, Photogrammetry, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Surveying. Coursework must include differential and integral calculus. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in conducting work related to Civil Engineering, Geodesy, Geophysics, Geotechnical Analysis, Geodetic Surveying, or a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENT: Distinguish principal colors and shades/hues of principal colors; Near visual acuity of 20/40 or better with or without corrective lenses; Far visual acuity of 20/60 or better binocular with or without corrective lenses

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Having achieved an advanced degree (Masters or Masters and PhD) in one or more of the following areas: Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Applied Physics, Astronomy, Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geodetic Astronomy, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Orbital Mechanics, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Geodetic Surveying. Coursework would include differential equations and integral calculus. 2. Customer service principles; DoD organizational structure, mission, goals, and priorities; NGA organizational units' missions and functions; decision-making processes; experience and willingness to brief groups; performing scientific analysis; experience/knowledge of computer networking; knowledge of statistical analysis; recent experience in performing scientific analysis; and demonstrated ability to learn new technology. 3. Experience delivering strategic support; develop mission statements, vision statements, operational goals and objectives; integrate doctrine, strategy, concepts, and capability development; broker stakeholder interactions and participate in conferences, panels and policy forums. 4. Experience performing program oversight; anchor team activities in well-defined and traceable requirements; develop plans, manage budgets, schedules, risk and performance; track actions, identify milestones, construct and maintain roadmaps, and report progress; lead integration activities and matrix teams; experience and willingness to brief groups.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $128,669 - $167,275 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $128,669.00 - $167,275.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
383,SalesForce Data Analyst,$44k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: SalesForce Data Analyst

Overview

Varonis is a world-class organization with a straightforward mission: protecting vulnerable data.

Did you know that on average, 20% of an organization's data is accessible to every employee? Seventy percent of attacks take months or years to discover. But not for our customers.

At Varonis, we see the world of cybersecurity differently.

Our customers always know where their most valuable data is on premises or in the cloud. Only the right people have access to only the right data. With real-time awareness of how employees use data, our clients flag and stop malicious behavior in its tracks.

Were fighting a different battle than conventional cybersecurity companies, relentlessly focused on securing data. Data assets are the most valuable and vulnerable components of the global economy. Along with employees, data is at the heart of almost every organization, yet conventional cybersecurity solutions, by themselves, have failed to protect it.

Why Join Varonis as a SalesForce Data Analyst?

This is an exciting opportunity to join us as we expand our team!

In this role, you will perform administrative management of data including detection and correction of data-quality issues, process incoming data, and data standardization. You will collaborate with the Salesforce Team and Sales to engage in the ongoing and detailed evaluation of data quality and lead assignments.

You will be responsible for:
Validating and processing data import inquiries
Assisting with lead assignment updates which include: Updating and management of lead assignment rules, reassignment of leads, and validation of lead distribution with stakeholders
Ensuring sufficient data quality is maintained so that the data can effectively support the business process and reporting accuracy
Identifying, investigating, and managing the resolution and escalation of data quality issues
Coordinating ongoing data quality audits
Coordinating various data cleanup tasks which include: ensuring that Leads are assigned to the appropriate owner, standardizing data, and ensuring that necessary data fields are populated
Key skills, experience and personal attributes
BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience
1-year minimum experience in a data management role
Ability to manage multiple priorities
Logical thinker with superb interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure
Organized and detail-oriented
Comfortable with ambiguity
Customer service oriented
Great teammate
Salesforce experience preferred
We invite you to check out our Instagram Page to gain further insight into the Varonis culture!

@VaronisLife

Varonis is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",3.9,"Varonis
3.9","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
384,Cyber Data Modeler,$67k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"McLean 1 (19050), United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Cyber Data Modeler

At Capital One, data is at the center of everything we do. When we launched as a startup we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.

As a Data Modeler at Capital One, you’ll be part of a team that’s leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in distributed computing and simulation technologies and operating across billions of transactions to unlock the big opportunities. Be ready to join a community of the smartest people you’ve ever met, who put the customer first, and want to use their data and modeling skills to make a difference.

Specifically you will:

Join our Enterprise Cyber Modeling Team and drive the agenda for quantitative risk development

Develop mathematical models for complex adaptive systems from development through testing and validation to production

Work fluently with a variety of information sources and connect detailed analysis of cyber data with qualitative feedback from users

Present to and work with senior leadership and cross-functional teams to deliver on strategic and operational intent

Process and investigate large, messy data sets of numerical and textual data

Integrate with external data sources and APIs to discover interesting trends

Design innovative data visualizations to communicate complex ideas to customers or company leaders

Investigate the impact of new technologies on the future of cyber security in digital banking and the financial world of tomorrow

We expect to see:

Whether demonstrated through academic or professional experience, you’ll be at ease with numbers and enjoy solving problems that present numerically

You’ll have examples of where your outstanding judgement and critical thinking has delivered business impact

A desire and drive to succeed. You’ll be used to working across multiple teams and consider broad cyber and business perspectives

Example achievements that show a high level of ownership and where you’ve made things happen through your ambition and focus on results

An open mindset in your approach to change and personal development

Basic Qualifications:

High School Diploma, GED, or equivalent certification

At least 2 year of experience in data analytics

At least 1 year of experience with Python or R

At least 1 year of experience with relational databases and SQL

Preferred Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

Professional security management certification: AWS Certified Cloud Practitioner, or Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP), or Certified Information Security Manager (CISM)

2+ years of experience in Python or R

2+ years of experience with SQL

1+ years of experience with Tableau

1+ years of experience in Cyber Security

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
385,Data Scientist,$115k-$183k (Glassdoor Est.),"Performs advanced data design and analysis using the Electronic Medical Record (EMR) to create new knowledge useful to KP and outside organizations. Extracts and cleans large volumes of healthcare data across dozens of sources. Applies expert statistical methodologies to clinical outcomes. Partners effectively with physicians, other clinicians, software engineers and business managers to communicate findings using data visualization techniques.

Essential Responsibilities:
Works with physicians, epidemiologists, statisticians, business managers, and software engineers, to formulate and scope questions and translate knowledge into care transformation
Develops algorithms and predictive models to solve critical health service problems
Influences a general audience to understand the quality, completeness, and appropriate use of data
Provides advice about choice of statistical approaches, perform statistical analysis
Develops tools and libraries to create efficiencies for future work
Develops systematic approaches to assure data validity.
Identifies new sources of data within the electronic medical record that will improve information about target diseases and clinical processes.
Establishes links across existing data sources; process large volumes of data needed for complex research/operational studies
Trains Data Consultants and other data workers.
Kaiser Permanente conducts compensation reviews of positions on a routine basis. At any time, Kaiser Permanente reserves the right to reevaluate and change job descriptions, or to change such positions from salaried to hourly pay status. Such changes are generally implemented only after notice is given to affected employees.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience
Minimum eight (8) years of experience with multivariate data analysis commonly used in epidemiology (e.g. logistic regression, linear regression, cluster analysis, Cox proportional hazard analysis, GEE, and hierarchical models).
Minimum eight (8) years of experience writing and executing complex queries to extract/process data (e.g. SQL), including linking tables and variables from very large datasets.
Minimum eight (8) years of programming experience to build and validate machine language and statistical algorithms and to perform statistical analysis (e.g. R, Python, SAS)
Education
Master's degree required in a quantitative health field (epidemiology, math/statistics, bioinformatics) or computer science.
License, Certification, Registration
N/A

Additional Requirements:
Demonstrated understanding of data systems and architecture.
Experience using data science, AI, and machine-learning platforms to build and deploy supervised and unsupervised models.
Demonstrated ability to create and execute solutions to complex data science problems.
Demonstrated ability to lead project efforts, communicate effectively with team members, and guide decision making.
Advanced knowledge of data visualization tool principles, theories, and concepts.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with electronic medical record, to conduct health research and analytics.
Experience using novel open source software for analytic and non-analytic processing.
Experience with health record standards, including HL7 and other interchange and coding standards highly desirable.
Advanced training in biostatistics and/or statistics (degree or continuing education).
Demonstrated scholarly activities to advance the field (e.g., teaching, presentations at conferences, lead or co-authorship of scientific manuscripts).
Demonstrated understanding of clinical workflows.
Demonstrated proficiency with Natural Language Processing.
Well versed in open source libraries and methodologies for creating data workflows composed of most appropriate technologies, including command line tools, containerized tools, microservices, etc.

Kaiser Permanente is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status, parental status, ancestry, disability, gender identity, veteran status, genetic information, other distinguishing characteristics of diversity and inclusion, or any other protected status.

External hires must pass a background check/drug screen. Qualified applicants with arrest and/or conviction records will be considered for employment in a manner consistent with federal and state laws, as well as applicable local ordinances, including but not limited to the San Francisco and Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinances.",4.0,"Kaiser Permanente
4.0","Oakland, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1945,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
386,Chief Scientist,-1,"The Chief Scientist is fundamentally responsible to help establish and sustain NRECA and the cooperative community as leaders in the scientific aspects of the advancing electrical grid and enhance our standing in the scientific and engineering communities both in the private sector and in government. The Chief Scientist must participate in meetings on behalf of NRECA and the co-ops in government, industry, and professional forums and participate through authored papers and presentation. The Chief Scientist must organize the pursuit of underwritten research, and lead or support bidding efforts where appropriate. The Chief Scientist must recruit high level scientific talent and build partnerships with leading researchers in industry and research institution. The Chief Scientist may serve as the Principal Investigator on multiple projects and provide a technical role on others. Within NRECA, the Chief Scientist is responsible for the management and administration of staff involved in underwritten research.

Purpose and Mission

• Assists with leading and managing technologically-complex research projects, which provides bottom-line and operational effectiveness impact to cooperatives in such areas as distribution, transmission, generation, renewable and distributed energy, energy efficiency and demand response, and smarter grid technologies.
• Supports building and advancing strong, winning relationships with federal agencies, large industry, and the network of national laboratories. Forecast and inspire/incubate funding opportunities and support for NRECA projects; and generates innovative partnerships with federal agencies in order to secure funding.
• Identifies compelling, unique project ideas with high-win potential funding requests. Supports building strong project teams including subject matter experts; rallies large teams for proposals; and oversees, produces technical portions, and structures components of large, multi-million dollar funding requests.
• Conducts primary research and products while analyzing and communicating technical barriers, enlisting member and partner endorsements, and delivers results at high-level briefings to national laboratories and federal government agency executives, senior advisors, and project managers with funding authority.
• Serves as one of the technical resources for the BTS division and leads the development of intellectual property to expand NRECA’s technical capabilities and demonstrate national technical leadership.
• Attracts and recruits stakeholders and builds necessary coalitions to raise external matching funds and negotiates financial obligations for participation in joint research opportunities.
• Monitors Department of Energy (DOE), other federal, state, and non-governmental research organizations’ current engagements to maintain an understanding of their research portfolios, and forecasts and develops new NRECA research opportunities, which align with future external programs.
• Shapes opportunities for NRECA to participate in technical briefings and presentations to federal agencies, large industry, national laboratories, academia, and research institutions.
• Supports the development and maintenance of a comprehensive vision of the future of the grid.
• Seven direct reports

Chief Scientist
Location: Arlington

Category: Business Technology Strategy – Electricity

Department: Business Technology Strategies

Job Description

The National Rural Electric Cooperative Association (NRECA), with offices in Arlington, VA and Lincoln, NE is the trade association for over 900 consumer-owned electric cooperatives serving more than 42 million people. NRECA is committed to harnessing the strength of America’s electric cooperatives into a single powerful voice. NRECA has won the following awards over the past few years:

• Top Workplace by the Washington Post
• 100 Best Places to Work - ComputerWorld Magazine
• 50 Best Places to Work - The Washingtonian
• CARE Award Recipient - Recognizing organizations that promote a positive work-life balance
• Best Place to Work Award Recipient - Lincoln, NE
• Gold Well Workplace - Wellness Councils of America
• State of NE Governor's Wellness Award - Grower Level

At NRECA, we work with people who are leaders in their fields. They are down-to-earth, hardworking professionals committed to helping our members serve their communities. Our work is interesting, constantly evolving, and requires new skills to meet the evolving needs of a dynamic industry. In this collegial, inclusive work environment, united around the compelling purpose and history of electric cooperatives, we thrive. And topping it off, NRECA cares about each person’s overall well-being, encouraging health, financial security, and a sustainable work/life balance. EEO/AA- M/F/Disability/Protected Veteran Status/Genetic Data

Summary
Chief Scientist M.4

The Chief Scientist is fundamentally responsible to help establish and sustain NRECA and the cooperative community as leaders in the scientific aspects of the advancing electrical grid and enhance our standing in the scientific and engineering communities both in the private sector and in government. The Chief Scientist must participate in meetings on behalf of NRECA and the co-ops in government, industry, and professional forums and participate through authored papers and presentation. The Chief Scientist must organize the pursuit of underwritten research, and lead or support bidding efforts where appropriate. The Chief Scientist must recruit high level scientific talent and build partnerships with leading researchers in industry and research institution. The Chief Scientist may serve as the Principal Investigator on multiple projects and provide a technical role on others. Within NRECA, the Chief Scientist is responsible for the management and administration of staff involved in underwritten research.

Purpose and Mission

• Assists with leading and managing technologically-complex research projects, which provides bottom-line and operational effectiveness impact to cooperatives in such areas as distribution, transmission, generation, renewable and distributed energy, energy efficiency and demand response, and smarter grid technologies.
• Supports building and advancing strong, winning relationships with federal agencies, large industry, and the network of national laboratories. Forecast and inspire/incubate funding opportunities and support for NRECA projects; and generates innovative partnerships with federal agencies in order to secure funding.
• Identifies compelling, unique project ideas with high-win potential funding requests. Supports building strong project teams including subject matter experts; rallies large teams for proposals; and oversees, produces technical portions, and structures components of large, multi-million dollar funding requests.
• Conducts primary research and products while analyzing and communicating technical barriers, enlisting member and partner endorsements, and delivers results at high-level briefings to national laboratories and federal government agency executives, senior advisors, and project managers with funding authority.
• Serves as one of the technical resources for the BTS division and leads the development of intellectual property to expand NRECA’s technical capabilities and demonstrate national technical leadership.
• Attracts and recruits stakeholders and builds necessary coalitions to raise external matching funds and negotiates financial obligations for participation in joint research opportunities.
• Monitors Department of Energy (DOE), other federal, state, and non-governmental research organizations’ current engagements to maintain an understanding of their research portfolios, and forecasts and develops new NRECA research opportunities, which align with future external programs.
• Shapes opportunities for NRECA to participate in technical briefings and presentations to federal agencies, large industry, national laboratories, academia, and research institutions.
• Supports the development and maintenance of a comprehensive vision of the future of the grid.
• Seven direct reports

Requirements and Qualifications

• Ph.D. in energy science, physics, mathematics or engineering or 15 years of research industry experience
• Fifteen years of energy industry experience required, including federal contracting experience, and an established, robust set of contacts within key federal and non-governmental firms who are traditional awardees of federal programs.
• Ability to manage competing deadlines and multiple projects at various stages of development using effective organization skills and attention to detail.
• Ability to work with a wide variety of people to foster cooperation in sharing information and materials .
• Ability to lead people and foster collaborative skills and consensus building while operating in a fast-moving environment.
• Ability to build consortia and syndication of industry partners around research objectives.
• Ability to structure funding proposals with a successful win record.
• Ability to successfully function in the Federal contracting process.
• Ability to deliver academic-level technical research analysis, writings and patents.
• Ability to operate independently with a high level of visibility and to shift priorities in a rapidly changing environment.
• Ability to travel from up to 30%, fluctuating as needed to foster effective relationships.
• Ability to recruit, organize, lead, and manage technical teams in the execution of research work, contract work, and internally funded product.
• Ability to explain complex technical subjects clearly to non-specialists, in presentations and in writing.
• Ability to communicate, both verbally and in writing, with a diverse membership, employees and/or vendors in a clear and precise manner.
• Ability to use Microsoft Office tools (Excel, Word, Outlook, Power Point) in the day-to-day essential duties of the job.
• Ability to provide service excellence by building relationships, being resourceful, responsive and respectful.

ADA Requirements
• The worker is required to have close visual acuity to perform an activity such as: preparing and analyzing data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal and extensive reading.
• Exerting up to 20 pounds of force occasionally, and/or up to 10 pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force constantly to move objects. If the use of arm and/or leg controls requires exertion of forces greater than that for sedentary work and the worker sits most of the time, the job is rated for light work.
Disclaimer Statement: The preceding job description has been written to reflect management’s assignment of",3.5,"NRECA
3.5","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Membership Organizations,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
387,DATA ANALYST and HEALTH,-1,"Familiarity in analysis reporting, data entry, report writing, good communication skills, detail oriented and familiar with Microsoft Office products. In addition, the candidate should have a sound background in medical record databases, medical terminology and processes.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $23.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We follow CDC guidelines and best practices concerning COVID healthcare protocol.

Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Experience:
DATA ANALYST and HEALTH: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics: 4 years (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
manmadecreative.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Manmade Creative Inc,"Anchorage, AK",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
388,"Principal Scientist / Team Lead, Medicinal Chemistry",-1,"The Opportunity
Does delivering a great small molecule hit, lead or development candidate thrill you? We get excited, too, and we are building the best environment in the industry to discover the drugs that will make a difference for patients. We are looking for a self-motivated, experienced Medicinal Chemist to join our team and to help drive projects from lead generation through candidate selection in a highly collaborative environment.
We take what we do seriously, but we don’t take ourselves too seriously. You’ll have fun in our collaborative and energetic environment where you’ll face new challenges every day.
If you are flexible and fearless in the face of rapidly evolving data, then we want you to join us and discover the next generation of innovative therapeutics based on protein motion!
Your Role
You will apply your drug hunting expertise to leading teams and developing strategy across the spectrum of drug discovery, from hit validation to development candidate selection. You will work closely and collaboratively in a multi-disciplinary team of computational chemists, biophysicists, cell and molecular biologists, pharmacologists, and DMPK specialists. You see how all the aspects of compound performance are necessary to make it a drug, and you can communicate that effectively to your discovery partners.
You will work with chemists at Relay as well as with teams at CROs to advance your projects.
You will contribute to the chemistry team’s development of a platform for efficient project execution by identifying and establishing collaborations with both academic and industry partners to expand our capabilities. Internally, you will help drive the implementation of cutting-edge in silico methods of compound design and data analysis to facilitate rapid SAR decision making.
Your Background
You were educated in chemistry with an emphasis on synthetic organic chemistry, synthetic methodology or a related field.
You have 7+ years of relevant biotech and/or pharmaceutical industry experience in medicinal chemistry, with an emphasis on small molecule drug discovery.
You have participated in the delivery of clinical candidates from discovery into development, and your track record of excellence is supported by high impact, peer-reviewed publications and/or patents. You have led or are ready to lead a team and make critical decisions on the SAR direction.
Our current portfolio is oncology-focused, so experience in this therapeutic area and related targets is a strong plus.
You are comfortable enabling your compound design with in silico predictive tools and structure-based drug design.
You have strong communication skills, can flex to different work styles, and believe that the best outcomes result from bringing out the creativity of your colleagues.
You are committed to building an energetic, collaborative and open company culture and contributing to the company’s success.


We believe in building balanced teams and a place where our people can be their best self every day. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds to apply.

Relay Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of age, color, disability, gender, national origin, race, religion, sexual orientation, veteran status, or any classification protected by federal, state, or local law.

Our Culture:
At Relay Tx, we believe that along with our people, our culture is our greatest asset. In fact we're proud to share we were named as one of the Boston Business Journal's ""Best Places to Work"" in 2017, the #1 place for small companies in 2018 & the #2 place for small companies in 2019. To drive that culture, no one will stop you or hold you back. Instead, we will give you the tools and colleagues to push forward relentlessly and cheer you on as you go. If this resonates with you, drop us a line.

About Relay Therapeutics
Relay Therapeutics is a clinical-stage precision medicines company transforming the drug discovery process with the goal of bringing life-changing therapies to patients. Built on unparalleled insights into protein motion and how this dynamic behavior relates to protein function, we aim to effectively drug protein targets that have previously been intractable, with an initial focus on enhancing small molecule therapeutic discovery in targeted oncology. Our Dynamo platform integrates an array of leading-edge experimental and computational approaches to provide a differentiated understanding of protein structure and motion to drug these targets. We have built a world-class team of leading experts from each of these disciplines, and they are driven by a deep collaboration at every step of our drug discovery process.
Our team is equal parts fearless and relentless, with a shared passion for working collaboratively in intellectually stimulating environments. If you’re excited by the challenge of putting protein motion at the heart of drug discovery and passionate about making a difference in the lives of patients, join us!",5.0,"Relay Therapeutics
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
389,Lead Data Scientist / Engineer,-1,"Lead Data Scientist / Engineer - Aliso Viejo, CA*
AWM Smart Shelf is reinventing retail and looking for smart, talented people to help build on our current and future data and analytics platforms, pipelines, and machine learning models. Our solutions encompass a wide range of data such as:
Real-time computer vision and deep learning that enables an understanding of what shoppers and workers are doing (e.g. movement, actions, product selection, etc.)
AWM Frictionless™ Shopping (cashierless checkout)
Demographic data captured via anonymous facial analysis
Ads/video playback and effectiveness
Product placement and pricing
The ideal candidate will have the ability to use modern techniques to: *
Understand and interpret data, reaching meaningful conclusions based on solid premises
Predict optimizations both in real time and via big data processing
Handle large and rapidly growing data sets
Job Duties: *
Contributing to the development and maintenance of data pipelines as well as creation of new ones based on AI/computer vision and other data sources
Validation of AI models and big data analysis
Performing ad-hoc analysis on proprietary datasets for internal and external stakeholders
Annotating proprietary datasets and giving direction to data labelers
Performing exploratory analysis on data to find trends
Training and evaluating various machine learning models
Required Skills: *
SQL
Strong problem-solving / analytical skills
Undergraduate or higher degree in data science, statistics, computer science, or other relevant areas
Practical big data experience
Machine learning
Solid understanding of statistics
Dataset cleaning
Python
Git, or other version control framework
Skills Which Are A Plus But Not Required: *
Azure tools such as Data Factory, Databricks, and Synapse Analytics
Understanding of time series/sequence analysis
Power BI (preferred), Tableau, or other dashboarding software
Understanding of, or experience with, retail data and environments
Experience distilling and communicating insights to people that aren’t data scientists in a way that can be readily understood
Understanding of agile development processes
What We Offer: *
Paid vacation and sick time
Health benefits
A dynamic and engaging environment where you can make an impact using the latest technologies
Opportunity for growth
401k plan
Potential for employee stock option plan participation
About Adroit Worldwide Media, Inc. (AWM Smart Shelf): *
AWM Smart Shelf is an exciting tech company located in Orange County, CA and serving the retail industry globally. Our flagship offering is a cashierless checkout solution called AWM Frictionless™ which uses A.I. and computer vision to understand which products shoppers have taken from the shelf and eliminates the need to wait in a check out line or to scan products. The solution also enables a wide range of advanced data and reporting surrounding shopper activity.

Another of our key offerings is an in-store digital retail platform which utilizes unique edge-to-edge LED shelf displays paired with advanced software to replicate many benefits of the online shopping experience in-store. The platform is able to perform shopper proximity and 3D path analysis with content triggering, anonymous demographics, inventory measurement, and more. Our clients include a number of Fortune 500 companies, and we have deployments in North America, Europe, Asia, and the Middle East.
Please visit www.smartshelf.com to learn more and watch videos of our solutions.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $130,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Most employees are remote at the present time due to COVID and limited time in the office will be required, but eventually this position will be full time in the office.

Experience:
solid data science / engineering: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Aliso Viejo, CA 92656 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you require visa sponsorship?
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.smartshelf.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"AWM Smart Shelf (Adroit Worldwide Media, Inc.)","Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
390,Materials Scientist - Polymer Physics,$14k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Avery Dennison (NYSE: AVY) is a global materials science company specializing in the design and manufacture of a wide variety of labeling and functional materials. The company’s products, which are used in nearly every major industry, include pressure-sensitive materials for labels and graphic applications; tapes and other bonding solutions for industrial, medical, and retail applications; tags, labels and embellishments for apparel; and radio frequency identification (RFID) solutions serving retail apparel and other markets. Headquartered in Glendale, California, the company employs more than 30,000 employees in over 50 countries. Reported sales in 2019 were $7.1 billion. Learn more at www.averydennison.com.

Job Description

Avery Dennison is looking for a dynamic individual to provide Polymer Physics support to harness scientific understanding to deliver highly practical and actionable intelligence. The position will be with the Materials Science and Characterization (MSC) Group, which primarily supports R&D activities globally at Avery Dennison’s Mentor, OH location, chartered to support and resolve technical problems from long-term projects to urgent manufacturing and quality issues stemming from across Avery Dennison’s global operations. Highly creative and agile problem solving rooted in meticulous scientific fundamentals, experiments, theory and computations to propose highly practical and actionable solutions to product and process development activities is sought.

Responsibilities:
Drive fundamental understanding and insights of sophisticated materials and phenomena (polymeric adhesives, gels, colloids and multi-layer laminates) and develop material structure-process-property correlations using Polymer Physics principles.
Interact with teams composed of experimental synthetic scientists, product developers and process technologists to develop the insights from physical models, theory and surgical experiments that enable exploration of design parameter space without need for extensive prototyping.
Develop and use models and custom crafted experimental methods for creating and evaluating material and laminate paradigms in the Avery Dennison Materials Portfolio.
Distill concepts to a highly fundamental level using scaling concepts, treating problems unified by similar physical/chemical processes as a class, leading to the development/refinement of new material concepts.
Develop and apply predictive computational materials science including particle based such as Molecular Dynamics, Dissipative Particle Dynamics, and multi-scale simulations and/or mean field approaches and computational approaches to materials kinetics spanning range of spatial and time scales and material systems with a high degree of practical focus to guiding/solving product and process technology activities.
Solve highly interdisciplinary problems in complex materials interactions discerning nonlinear interactions utilizing thermodynamics and kinetic of polymeric materials. Rapidly transform problems to a mathematical/physical basis and design experiments and simulations to address them.
Interface with rheology/spectroscopy/ physical testing & analytical/process/product development teams etc."" to help surface relevant structure-property relationships and guide experiments to obtain data for model parameterization and validation.
Interpret data, write technical reports, and communicate research activities and results with other divisional scientists in a high-quality, professional, and timely manner.
Qualifications
Ph.D. in Polymer/Materials Science and Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Physics or a related discipline with thesis research centered on the Polymer Physics of soft matter, particularly using a combination of experiments, theory and simulations supported by a strong publication record.
Candidates with a minimum of 5 years, with a mix of post-doctoral and industrial experience preferred.
Demonstrated expertise in the materials science of soft visco-elastic materials such as polymers, adhesives, gels and composites. Doctoral and post-doctoral research that shows the utilization of deep polymer physical concepts to drive understanding of complex phenomena using a combination of experiments, theory and simulations.
Demonstrated ability in utilizing modeling and other relevant mathematical tools such as in particle based simulations (molecular dynamics, mesoscale simulations, dissipative particle dynamics), mean-field methods (Self-consistent and field theoretic methods), and materials kinetics.
Clear understanding of polymeric materials, relaxation behavior, and how chain composition, architecture and higher order structures (for ex. phase separation) relate to properties and the impact of process.
Excellent computer programming skills (C++, Python) and in the use of mathematical packages (Matlab, Mathematica etc…) in both Windows and Linux environments.
Demonstrated ability to think critically and solve problems using the above mentioned disciplines and techniques. Be comfortable in spanning theory, experiments and production environments.
Good organizational and planning skills; ability to balance multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Effective written and oral communications, high level of motivation, initiative, and energy.
Ability to work independently as well as in a diverse multi-functional team and ability to interact effectively with both internal and external customers.
Less than 10% travel expected
IND123

#GD123

Additional Information

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, protected veteran status or other protected status. EEOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled. All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Avery Dennison
3.8","Mentor, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1935,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
391,Data Scientist,$108k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

In this role, your primary responsibility will be to partner with key stakeholders and lead the development of an analytics program to support and enable the continued growth critical to Facebook's Data Center organization. You will be responsible for creating end to end analytics programs, from data sourcing to surfacing insights and driving action, for various aspects of Facebook's global data center operations. You will also help translate data and identify efficiency opportunities. You will be expected to use data to provide meaningful recommendations and actionable strategies to key stakeholders, and develop best practices, including streamlining of data sources and related programmatic initiatives.
The ideal candidate will have a passion for working in white space and creating impact from the ground up in a fast-paced environment. Additionally, you will have a proven track record of thought leadership and impact in developing similar analytics and metrics-based programs. This position is part of the Infrastructure Data Center team and located in Menlo Park, CA.
Leverage data and business principles to create and drive large scale FB Data Center programs
Define and develop the program for metrics creation, data collection, modeling, and reporting the operational performance of Facebooks data centers
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Be a self-starter, motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
Identify and implement streamlined processes for data reporting and communication
Use analytical models to identify insights that are used to drive key decisions across the organization
Routinely communicate metrics, trends and other key indicators to leadership
Provide leadership and mentorship to other members of the team
Lead and support various ad hoc projects, as needed, in support of Facebooks Data Center strategy
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms and capacity constraint models
Leverage tools like R, Tableau, PHP, Python, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Management Science)
3+ years of experience in a role with data analysis and metrics development
3+ years of hands-on experience analyzing and interpreting data, drawing conclusions, defining recommended actions, and reporting results across stakeholders
3+ years of SQL development experience writing queries
3+ years of hands-on project management experience
3+ years of experience with data visualization tools
3+ years of experience with packages such as R, Tableau, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc.
2+ years of experience with scripting in Python or PHP
Experience leveraging data driven models to drive business decisions
Experience using data access tools and building visualizations using large datasets and multiple data sources
Experience thinking analytically
Experience communicating data to all organizational levels
Experienced with packages such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, dplyr, ggplot2
Knowledge of statistics and optimization techniques
Hands-on experience with medium to large datasets (i.e. data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation)
Technical knowledge of data center operations
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
392,"Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist, Bioanalytical Sciences",-1,"Who we are

REGENXBIO is an exceptional place to work. You'll have the opportunity to collaborate with some of the best and the brightest people, touch amazing science, and be a part of extraordinary plans. Our core values: Trust, Accountability, Perseverance, and Innovation drive everything we do. We aim to bring these values to life every day with all that we do, and we believe that what we do matter - to patients, to their families, and to their communities.

The opportunity

As the Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist of the Bioanalytical Sciences team, you will be responsible for developing and validating bioanalytical methods to support our gene therapy products pipeline. You will have the opportunity to collaborate with many different groups across the organization, including Research and Early Development, Quality, and Clinical Development and may oversee Contract Research Organizations to ensure that all applicable bioanalytical test methods are appropriate for the stage of non-clinical and/or clinical development.

What you’ll be doing
Develop, qualify and/or validate robust bioanalytical methods (ligand binding and/or cell-based assays) to support the Company pipeline.
Troubleshoot and resolve analytical method and instrument issues to successful resolution.
Keep detailed, accurate testing records and assure that laboratory equipment is calibrated, standardized, and monitored, as appropriate.
Author technical documents (analytical method qualification/validation/transfer documents, technical reports, SOPs, etc.).
Conduct technology transfer between organizations (in-house and contract laboratories).
Conduct assay operations as needed for study support.
Keep accurate lab inventories and be responsible for ordering lab supplies.
Evaluate new analytical methods/equipment and make recommendations regarding their use.
Maintain effective communication with other relevant groups, including but not limited to R&D, Preclinical Development, Quality Assurance, and Process Development.
What we’re looking for

We set our employees up for success. To be successful in this role and help us achieve our goals, we are looking for someone with the following skills and qualifications:
A Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a relevant scientific discipline with at least 1-2 years of relevant industry experience. The level for this position will be based on skills and experience.
Prior experience and demonstrated ability with immunoassays (such as ELISA, ECL, western Blot, etc), cell based assays, qPCR, and/or LC-MS. Experience with ligand binding assays a major plus!
Demonstrated ability to perform assigned experiments and interpret data.
Ability to design experiments, analyze data, draw conclusions, and troubleshoot are preferred.
Experience working in a GLP and/or BSL-2 laboratory.
Knowledge and application of Bioanalytical method regulatory guidance and white papers a plus.
Excellent communication in the multiple formats (e.g. lab notebooks, presentations, formal documents, etc.).
Strong organizational, time management, and prioritization skills towork effectively within the team and meet objectives under time constraints.
Attention to detail, technical competency, and good pipetting skills.
Good computer skills and working knowledge of SoftMax or other data analysis software, MS word, Excel, Power Point are required.
Familiarity with statistical analysis tools and able to apply the basic statistic tools preferred.
Why should you apply?

By joining REGENXBIO, you will have the opportunity to be a part of a growing company and incredible team passionate about developing novel AAV gene therapy products to our patients.

We offer a comprehensive and competitive benefit plan which includes market-competitive salaries, an annual bonus program, education assistance, retirement plan with employer match, stock options at all levels, summer hours and more!

In addition, professional development is important to us. By joining our team, you’ll have the opportunity the be exposed to challenging projects and development resources to help you grow personally and professionally.",4.1,"REGENXBIO
4.1","Rockville, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
393,"Data Science Instructor, Part-Time - REMOTE",$98k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Part-Time Data Science Instructor - Remote*
Galvanize is a dynamic learning community for technology. Our community is where people and companies with the guts and smarts to create real-world change congregate and inspire each other. Our goal is to make opportunities in technology available to all those with the aptitude, determination, and drive. Across our beautifully designed urban campuses nationwide, we offer a unique combination of education, workspace, and networking.

The part-time data science instructor will host and teach technical workshops to inexperienced coders in order to help them learn foundational skills in data science and to solve data-science problems utilizing innovative educational techniques. We are looking for passionate educators and practical problem solvers with demonstrated flexibility and curiosity. Join us in building the world's hub for education in data science and data engineering.
As a Data Science instructor at Galvanize, you will: *
Deliver lectures and tutorials on scientific Python, SQL, probability, statistics (Bayesian and frequentist), machine learning, and data engineering.
Lead “sprints,” maintaining a strong presence in the virtual classroom
Clearly communicate well-crafted lesson plans
Deftly and patiently field student questions
Provide attendees of your workshops information about our full-time immersive programs and our prep programs
Build and refine data-science workshops
Utilize student feedback and experimentation to continuously improve teaching and assessment methods.
Evaluate new tools, packages, and tutorials for use in the curriculum.
Contribute to local evangelism, admissions, and nurture activities, such as attendance at meetups, speaking at conferences, leading workshops (evening), etc.
Promote a positive, fast-paced learning environment, and keep students moving forward in course content.
You should be available and flexible to teach evening workshops at least two days a week Monday through Thursday
Expected Experience: *
Experience in the industry in a data scientist or software engineer role
Strong understanding of the topics we teach: scientific Python, software engineering, probability, statistics, SQL, machine learning, data engineering, data visualization, data at scale
Outstanding communication skills
Experience teaching a quantitative subject preferred
This job description may not be inclusive of all assigned duties, responsibilities, or aspects of the job described, and may be amended at anytime at the sole discretion of the employer.

Galvanize provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status

Job Type: Part-time",4.3,"Galvanize
4.3","Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
394,Data Scientist,$106k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Introduction
As a Data Scientist at IBM, you will help transform our clients data into tangible business value by analyzing information, communicating outcomes and collaborating on product development. Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options. Whether its investigating patient trends or weather patterns, you will work to solve real world problems for the industries transforming how we live.

Your Role and Responsibilities
This position is a Data Scientist role in CIO supporting DGC that is focused on leading the design, development, and implementation of machine learning models to drive business results.The Office of the Chief Information Officer (CIO) owns IBMs IT strategy and provides the tools, workstations, devices, and infrastructure that IBMers use to do their jobs every day. Put simply, our mission is to create a productive environment for IBM's 365,000 worldwide employees.Join us as we lead with designto drive simplicity and ease of use,engineering the systems that run the business, andinnovatingto transform the business. Responsibilities include building innovative analytical models, testing and validating models, data gathering and research, fact-based quantitative analysis, systematic model explainability, interpreting the models in business terms, and communicating findings to business leaders. The Data Scientist will provide direction, guidance, and oversight for other data scientists on the team, as well as manage modelpipeline and perform change management.As a Data Scientist at IBM, you will help transform data into tangible business value by analyzing information, communicating outcomes and collaborating on product development.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
• BA/BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, or related STEM field
• Proficiency in Python
• Experience with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn)
• Experience or coursework in machine learning and/or natural language processing
• Statistical modeling through software (e.g. SPSS) or programming language (e.g. Python or R)
• Understanding of database and analytical technologies in the industry
• Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges in an enterprise environment
• Experience in Agile development
• Excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to collaborate in a team environment

Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
• MS in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, or related STEM field
• Experience and/or coursework in Deep Learning
• Proficiency with other programming languages such as R and SQL
• Professional experience with Spark and/or TensorFlow
• Hands-on experience deploying analytical models to solve business problems
• Ability to develop experimental and analytical plans for data modeling processes
• Experience with data visualization tools

About Business Unit
The Office of the Chief Information Officer (CIO) owns IBMs IT strategy and provides the tools, workstations, devices, and infrastructure that IBMers use to do their jobs every day. Put simply, our mission is to create a productive environment for IBM's 365,000 worldwide employees. Join us as we lead with with design to drive simplicity and ease of use, engineering the systems that run the business, and innovating to transform the business.

Your Life @ IBM
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?

Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world? What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion? Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice? What about all of these? If so, then IBM could be your next career challenge. Join us, not to do something better, but to attempt things you never thought possible.

Impact. Inclusion. Infinite Experiences. Do your best work ever.

About IBM
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that progress is made through progressive thinking, progressive leadership, progressive policy and progressive action. IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition. Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are the largest technology and consulting employer in the world, with more than 380,000 IBMers serving clients in 170 countries.

Location Statement
IBM will not be providing visa sponsorship for this position now or in the future. Therefore, in order to be considered for this position, you must have the ability to work without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.

Being You @ IBM
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",3.8,"IBM
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
395,Senior Data Engineer,$110k-$206k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why We Work at Dun & Bradstreet


We are at a transformational moment in our company journey - and we’re so excited about it. Each day, we are finding new ways to strengthen our award-winning culture, and to accelerate creativity, innovation and growth. Our purpose is to help customers improve business performance with Dun & Bradstreet’s Data Cloud and Live Business Identity, and we’re wildly passionate and committed to this purpose. So, if you’re looking to make an immediate impact at a company that welcomes bold and diverse thinking, come join us!



The Role:

The Dun & Bradstreet Analytics Technology team is looking for a Senior Big Data Engineer to join our Analytics Technology team. You will be part of a group responsible for designing, implementing, maintaining and supporting Analytics related data analysis and modelling environments for both internal as well as external customer use.

This role will be responsible for leading and driving multiple projects and will work closely with various technology groups, analytics teams and business teams to develop solutions for our data pipeline initiatives.

This position is a great opportunity to grow into a Tech/Team lead and manage multiple projects!

Responsibilities:
Develop Data pipelines/Ingestion/Engineering and Analytic Application processes to business specification and technology standards that leverage/extend existing Data Analytics platforms using Cloudera Hadoop, Spark (DataBricks), Amazon Elastic Map Reduce (EMR), Amazon Athena, AWS Glue, and other related services.
Collaborate with project teams (solution architects, business, QA and project management) to ensure solutions meet business objectives and fall within timelines and acceptance criteria
Participate in testing of prototypes & validate test procedures to ensure that they are applicable to the design
Perform root-cause analysis (RCA) of complex issues ranging from hardware, operating system, application, network, and information security platforms while working closely with various infrastructure teams and business users to quickly arrive at creative, tactical and long-term solutions.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information systems, or other related field or equivalent work experience
5+ years of high-tech industry and/or IT work experience in Big Data project hands on development and solution engineering roles
Experience with AWS ecosystem (Redshift, RDS, EMR, Kinesis, S3, Data pipeline, Glue, Athena, EC2, Lambda, etc.) is required
Experience with working on projects in multiple technological and business environments simultaneously
A thirst for knowledge, learning, and problem solving
Experience in Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Impala (Cloudera a plus)
Understanding of micro-services, web-based applications and REST APIs
Strong organization skills with high attention to detail
Able to work independently with minimal supervision
Excellent communication skills – written, verbal, presentation and interpersonal
Willing to learn new skills and implement new technologies
Dun & Bradstreet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, genetic information, protected military and veteran status, ancestry, marital status, medical condition (cancer and genetic characteristics) or any other characteristic protected by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with Dun & Bradstreet and need special assistance or an accommodation to use our website or to apply for a position, please send an e-mail with your request to TalentAcquisitionTeam@dnb.com. Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are made on a case-by-case basis.

Please note that all Dun & Bradstreet job postings can be found at https://dnb.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/Careers and all communication from Dun & Bradstreet will come from an email address ending in @dnb.com.",3.1,"Dun & Bradstreet
3.1","Short Hills, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1841,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
396,Data Scientist,-1,"JobID: DS002
Team: Data Science Team
Locations: Boston, MA, New York, NY

The target locations for this position are: Greater Boston, New York, or remote in neighboring areas.

Please send cover letter, CV or resume to careers@sflscientific.com or apply below.

Description

We are looking for a talented computer vision and deep learning expert to join the SFL Scientific Data Science team. As a data science consultant, you will be focused on developing and deploying image processing, machine learning or deep learning solutions that will have impact in the healthcare, biotech, security, and manufacturing industries. SFL Scientific is a US-based data science consulting firm, providing a broad range of services and solutions in data engineering, big data, machine learning, and Artificial Intelligence. This data scientist position will primarily be working with clients in the Northeast, in the Greater Boston Area.

About the Role:

As a computer vision and deep learning data scientist you will:

Collaborate with team members on developing computer vision systems starting from prototype to production.

Research, design, implement, and deploy full-stack scalable computer vision, deep learning, and machine learning solutions to novel and R&D problems.

Keep up with state-of-the-art in computer vision and deep learning and apply them to improve and create new solutions for clients.

Develop and implement state-of-the-art computer vision algorithms for object detection, classification, segmentation, or recognition.

Translate business requirements into quick prototypes or proof of concept and work with clients directly to uncover operational objectives.

Core Requirements:

Ph.D. or MS in computer science, machine learning, physics, engineering, or related fields.

Strong foundation in computer science, algorithms, data structures, machine learning, and statistics.

Depth and breadth in state-of-the-art computer vision, deep learning and machine learning technologies.

4+ years of experience in computer vision or deep learning at an enterprise level.

Proficiency with Tensorflow, Keras, or other deep learning frameworks.

Proficiency in C/C++, Python and associated packages, and image pre-processing methods.

Experience working with small & large datasets for deep learning applications.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to communicate effectively to both technical and nontechnical audiences.

Technical fluency; comfortable understanding and discussing architectural concepts and algorithms, assessing tradeoffs and new opportunities with technical team members.

Preferred Qualifications:

Proficient with AWS or Azure cloud computing environments.

Proficient with a distributed computing platform (Hadoop, Spark, etc.).

Experience with parallel/distributed computing or HPC systems.

Experience with prototyping on NVIDIA/DGX or equivalent architecture and hardware.

Experience in computer vision for healthcare, medical imaging, security, or anomaly and defect detection applications.

You must be authorized to work in the US. We support flexible work hours and paid professional development.",4.8,"SFL Scientific
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
397,"Senior Scientist, Machine Learning",$132k-$227k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to be part of a growing data organization that is helping to shape the game experiences of millions of players? Niantic, the developer of Pokemon GO and Harry Potter: Wizards Unite is looking for a Senior Scientist with the creativity, leadership, and experience to develop meaningful Machine Learning science and game interventions for all our popular titles. Work closely with other scientists, engineers, and product managers to design and deploy machine learning models that elevate gameplay in Niantic's AR driven games where the real world becomes our gameboard.

Responsibilities
Conceive, design, lead the development, and bring into production new, end-to-end Machine Learning models such as semi-supervised segmentation and optimized interventions via reinforcement learning.
Apply a high degree of scientific rigor and real world pragmatism in all your work, particularly to quantify the impact of features on relevant engagement metrics.
Mentor other scientists to grow their skills, create a collaborative environment, and employ tools and methodologies to test, revise, and improve models.
Lead by example: promote deep scientific expertise, constant learning, attention to detail, and an intimate relationship with the data while always being friendly, humble, and open to challenging any assumptions.
Collaborate with data engineers, product managers, and marketing to coordinate timely deployments from conception to release.
Qualifications
Successful candidate will have a PhD in Statistics, Machine Learning, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or a related field (or an MS with extensive industry experience). A minimum of 4 years of real-world experience developing and deploying machine learning models, preferably in a gaming context.
Strong command of statistics and the science underpinning machine learning techniques and able to defend choices with math as well as real-world tradeoffs.
Expert in ML models for classification, regression, and clustering; experience with production neural networks.
Demonstrated experience with large scale data processing (e.g. BigQuery, Spark, Hive, DataFlow/Beam).
Flexible with tools and programming languages (Python, Java, Scala, Go) and able to learn new technologies quickly.
Plus If...
Knowledge of real-time optimization models with delayed reward (multi-armed bandits, reinforcement learning).
Industry experience developing recommender systems for personalized game predictions or similar.
Experience applying ML models in mobile games, particularly at scale.
Experience working with business stakeholders - understanding and proving impact, resourcing, and schedules.
Join the Niantic team!


Niantic is the world's leading AR technology company, sparking creative and engaging journeys in the real world. Our products inspire outdoor exploration, exercise, and meaningful social interaction.

Originally formed at Google in 2011, we became an independent company in 2015 with a strong group of investors including Nintendo, The Pokémon Company, and Alsop Louie Partners. Our current titles include pioneering global-control game Ingress, record-breaking AR game Pokémon GO, and recently released third title, Harry Potter: Wizards Unite.

Niantic is an Equal Opportunity employer. We believe that cultivating a workplace where our people are supported and included is essential to creating great products our community will love. Our mission emphasizes seeking and hiring diverse voices, including those who are traditionally underrepresented in the technology industry, and we consider this to be one of the most important values we hold close.

We're a hard-working, fun, and exciting group who value intellectual curiosity and a passion for problem-solving! We have growing offices located in San Francisco, Sunnyvale, Bellevue, Los Angeles, London, Tokyo, Hamburg, and Zurich.",4.1,"Niantic
4.1","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
398,Data Scientist,$89k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY

The Data Scientist participates in the design and prototyping of cutting edge algorithms for analysis of genetic data.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyze next-generation sequencing data ranging from single research experiments to commercial data sets of hundreds of thousands of samples.
Develop Python software infrastructure to support algorithm testing and simulation studies.
Contribute to research and product development efforts in the statistics group.
Produce correct conclusions based on rigorous mathematical analysis and principles of statistics and probability.
Produce high quality technical documentation including research reports and algorithm specifications.
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelors degree in engineering, applied math, statistics, or similar, Masters degree preferred
At least 1 year practical experience in scientific data analysis using software such as Python
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Strong foundation in probability theory and/or statistics including concepts like joint and conditional probability distributions, parameter estimation and hypothesis testing
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the desire to work in a dynamic and collaborative environment.
Desire to learn about human genetics and sequencing technologies.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT
Duties are typically performed in an office setting.
This position requires the ability to use a computer keyboard, communicate over the telephone and read printed material.
Duties may require working outside normal working hours (evenings and weekends) at times.
OUR OPPORTUNITY

Driven by the passion for elevating the science and utility of genetic testing, Natera is committed to helping families identify and manage genetic diseases. Natera is a rapidly-growing diagnostics company with proprietary bioinformatics and molecular technology for analyzing DNA. Our complex technology has been proven clinically and commercially in the prenatal testing space and we are actively researching its applications in the liquid biopsy space for developing products with oncology applications.

The Natera team consists of highly dedicated statisticians, geneticists, doctors, laboratory scientists, business professionals, software engineers and many other professionals from world-class institutions, who care deeply for our work and each other. When you join Natera, youll work hard and grow quickly. Working alongside the elite of the industry, youll be stretched and challenged, and take pride in being part of a company that is changing the landscape of genetic disease management.

WHAT WE OFFER

Competitive Benefits. Healthy catered lunches, Premium snacks and beverages, Onsite gym with cardio and weight-training equipment, Game room with satellite TV, Onsite dry cleaning and alteration service with pick-up and delivery, Employee-organized sport leagues, Happy hours and BBQs, Generous Employee Referral program.

For more information, visit www.natera.com.

Natera is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to ensuring a diverse and inclusive workplace environment, and welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. Inclusive collaboration benefits our employees, our community and our patients, and is critical to our mission of changing the management of disease worldwide.

All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply, and will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable laws.",4.0,"Natera
4.0","San Carlos, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
399,Staff Scientist I – Life Sciences,$42k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Staff Scientist I – Life Sciences


As a representative of EH&E’s Life Sciences team, a Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who works with our biotechnology and research laboratory clients throughout New England. Educates, trains, and provides support to operations in the development and execution of consistent safety and environmental management programs. Directs accident investigation programs, develops accident trends, and develops programs for improving performance. Ensures compliance with all safety and environmental programs. Directs a proactive safety and environmental program. Improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Managing Principal Consultant or Senior Scientist. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you.

About You:


The ideal candidate will have industrial experience in a research laboratory, clinical laboratory, or biotech industry environment; or, at least experience working within an environmental health and safety department for a biotech or research facility. Background working with radioactive materials or radiation safety is preferred.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities


Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, respectful and professional image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Consults with Principal Investigators and laboratory personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance
QA/QC:
Participates in Institutional Biosafety Committee (IBC) and Laboratory Safety Committee meetings
Conducts or oversees periodic inspections of laboratories by qualified personnel in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies; conducts air sampling for specific materials used in the research environment
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Assists clients with identification of appropriate biological laboratory containment levels, and strategies for hazard assessment and control
Assist in project/study design
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online biosafety and laboratory EH&S training programs. Topics include laboratory safety and chemical hygiene, biosafety, NIH recombinant DNA, OSHA Bloodborne Pathogens Standard, Shipping (IATA/DOT), and other customized training. Updates written materials regarding biological safety and laboratory EH&S (e.g., Biosafety Manual, Chemical Hygiene Plan, Hazard Communication, etc.)
Conducts follow-up with laboratory personnel as needed
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a team member/project manager
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Performs risk assessments and job safety analyses for work involving chemical and biological materials
Conducts air sampling and personal monitoring for specific materials used in the research environment; inspects and/or tests and audits the performance of safety equipment such as but not limited to emergency safety showers and eyewash stations, chemical fume hoods and spill kits; performs respiratory protection fit-testing
Assists in shipping hazardous materials and biological materials; investigates research environment incidents; responds to chemical, biological, and after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintain context and understanding the audience
Financial Management:
Be able to work to timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals
Key Skills
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
Commercial awareness
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers)
Education / Training


Bachelor of Science (BS) or Master of Science (MS) in Biology, Microbiology, Molecular Biology, or related subject.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:


Registered Biosafety Professional; Certified Industrial Hygienist; Certified Safety Professional; HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification; membership in the American Biological Safety Association; membership in the American Industrial Hygiene Association.

Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com

EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).

Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Needham Heights, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
